If people like Ted Kennedy and Howard Metzenbaum get their way, America
will become The land of the Fee and the home of the Slave.  --unknown

Is it any wonder the Japanese hold us in such contempt?  They call us
crybabies and who are we to disagree?  Those guys play for keeps, just like
we used to before we decided that surrender was infinitely preferable to
sacrifice.  That the way to personal satisfaction was to hold hands around
the campfire.  That a pose of sincerity was more important than either
competence or experience.         --Michael S. Malone

In the end, one or the other will triumph--a funeral dirge will be sung
over the Soviet republic or over world capitalism.     --V.I. Lenin, 1920

To err is human, to moo; bovine.        --unknown

I went to the movies by myself the other night and sat down.  A few minutes
later a priest came in and pointed to the seat next to mine and said "Is
this seat saved?".  "No", I said, "but it is willing to listen."
                                                        --John Fereira

GUIs normally make it simple to accomplish simple actions and impossible to
accomplish complex actions.   --Doug Gwyn  (22/Jun/91 in comp.unix.wizards)

I see a divine hand in this AIDS thing.
                --Dr. John Wilke, President, National Right to Life Committee

Sign in the vestry of a Church:  "Will the last person to leave please see
that the perpetual light is extinguished."              --unknown

A preposition is a prefectly good thing to end a sentence with.  --unknown

People, not commercial organizations or chains of command, are what make
great civilizations work.  Every civilization depends upon the quality of
the individuals it produces.  If you over-organize humans, over-legalize
them, supress their urge to greatness -- they cannot work, and their
civilization collapses.        --Frank Herbert from "Children of Dune"

I'd sign on for the War on Drugs if they'd include
alcohol and nicotine on the official hit list.                  --Dale Worley

I'm not sure which upsets me more: that people are so
unwilling to accept responsibility for their own actions,
or that they are so eager to regulate everyone else's.          --unknown

Limit congressmen to two terms.  One in office.  One in jail.   --unknown

"Fault Tolerant Computing" means having redundant coffee machines and at
least two good Szechuan restaurants within easy walking distance.
                                                -notebooks of a heretic

If it ain't broke, don't touch it.   --The Unix way
If we can't fix it, it ain't broke.  --Maintainer's Motto

A horse is a horse, ofcourse, ofcourse, He follows a lifestyle we don't en-
dorse, He drinks the blood of a sheep by force, The vampire horse Count Ed!
                                                --Miquel van Smoorenburg

A "sucking chest wound" is Nature's way of telling you to slow down.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Incoming fire always has right of way.          --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Eat your cereal with a fork, and do your homework in the dark.
                                        --Christian Slater

I didn't say that I didn't say it.  I said that I didn't say that I said
it.  I want to make that very clear.    --former Mich. gov. George Romney

Any excuse will serve a tyrant.  --Aesop

"... the right of the people to keep and bear arms shall not be infringed."
-- offer void where prohibited by law --

I like a man who grins when he fights.    --Winston Churchill

Intel: putting the 'backward' in 'backward compatible'...  --unknown

Thinking is a momentary dismissal of irrelevancies.
                                        --R. Buckminster Fuller (1969)

Good advice is something you give when you're too old
to set a bad example.                                   --unknown

A human being should be able to change a diaper, plan an invasion, butcher
a hog, conn a ship, design a building, write a sonnet, balance accounts,
build a wall, set a bone, comfort the dying, take orders, give orders,
cooperate, act alone, solve equations, analyze a new problem, pitch manure,
program a computer, cook a tasty meal, fight efficiently, die gallantly.
Specialization is for insects.            --Robert A. Heinlein

Ted Kennedy thought he had the (presidential) nomination in his pocket.
His problem was he couldn't find his pants.     --David Brinkley

I understand the chairman of the Senate Ethics comittee is going to examine
the check-bouncing scandal with a microscope. ...makes sense... If you're
going to look at ethics in Congress, a microscope is what you need.
                                                --Jay Leno

A society that will trade a little liberty for a
little order will lose both, and deserve neither.        --John Stuart Mill

In some parts of the city curiosity didn't just kill the cat, it threw it
in the river with lead weights tied to its feet.
                                        --Terry Pratchett, "Sourcery"

Diplomat:  A person who can tell you to go to hell,
and make you look forward to the trip.                      --unknown

Kludges are conceived of man's natural fallibility, nourished by his
loyalty to erroneous opinion, and perfected by the human capacity to apply
maximum effort only when proceeding in the wrong direction.
        --New Scientist 22 Dec. 1966 pg. 699 (from oed2, on-line OED)

Knowing how things work is the basis for appreciation,
and is thus a source of civilized delight.              --William Safire

She was the kind of woman who lived for others.
You could tell the others by their hunted look.              --C.S. Lewis

A tax is a compulsory payment for which no specific benefit is received.
                                --United States Department of the Treasury

Of what is oatmeal made?  48% of Americans said wheat.  --Harper's

The weather is here.  Wish you were beautiful.          --unknown

If at first you don't succeed, destroy all evidence that you tried.
                                                        --unknown

Excerpted (and probably paraphrased) from an interview with
Gen. William T. Sherman:
    Q: General, is not a Negro as good as a white man at stopping a bullet?
    A: Yes, but a sandbag is better.

Man loves little and often, women much and rarely.      --Basta

Love is an ocean of emotions, surrounded by expenses!   --Lord Dewar

The only victory over love is flight.           --Napoleon

LOVE - A grave mental disease.                  --Plato

Keep thy eyes wide open before marriage, and half shut afterward.
                                                --Thomas Fuller

Every woman should marry - and no man.          --Disraeli

A deaf husband and a blind wife are always a happy couple.  --Danish Proverb

Men marry because they are tired, women because they are curious;
both are disappointed!                                            --Wilde

The woman cries before the wedding, the man afterward.  --Polish Proverb

A man finds himself seven years older the day after his marriage.   --Bacon

Marriage is a romance in which the hero dies in the first chapter.  --Anon

Life is uncertain.  Eat dessert first.          --unknown

Upward compatibility:  a manufacturer's commitment to previous mistakes.
                                                        --unknown

Note to DOS users:  UNIX is a lot more fun.     --Peter Norton

Government exists to protect us from each other.  Where Government has
gone beyond its limits is in deciding to protect us from ourselves.
                                    --Ronald Reagan - NYT April 13, 1980

This is your Brain: (unix)
This is your Brain on drugs: (MSDOS)            --unknown

And as we all know from experiments conducted during the Korean War, Diane,
sleep deprivation is a one-way ticket to temporary psychosis.
                        --FBI Special Agent Dale Cooper, "Twin Peaks"

They have one big advantage over us: *they* know where they're going.
                                                            --Batman

MS-DOS is one of those rare environments where applications are written
around the operating system rather than under it.           --unknown

The difference between genius and stupidity is that genius has its limits.
                                                            --unknown

I prefer a small government which may permit some evil to a huge government
which promotes evil at my expense.                          --unknown

The church is near, but the road is icy.
The bar is far away, but I will walk carefully.         --Russian Proverb

Simmons' Law of Alcoholic Expectations: The best stuff always happens after
the meeting, when everyone goes to the bar.                     --unknown

Corollary to Simmons' Law of Alcoholic Expectations: Any meeting which
doesn't adjourn to the bar isn't worth going to.                --unknown

Those who have long enjoyed such privileges as we enjoy forget
in time that men have died to win them.                         --unknown

Critics are like eunuchs in a harem.  They know how it's done, they've seen
it done every day, but they're unable to do it themselves.     --B. Behan

I got a dog and named him 'Stay'.  Now, I go 'Come here, Stay!'  After a
while the dog went insane and wouldn't move at all.     --Steven Wright

Eat a live toad first thing in the morning, and nothing worse will happen
to you for the rest of the day.                                --unknown

Now I've got the bead on you with MY disintegrating gun.  And when it
disintegrates, it disintegrates. (pulls trigger) ...Well, what do you
know...  it disintegrated.     --Duck Dodgers in the 24th and a half century

User friendly software:  Software so obliging that it assumes a priori that
the user is incapable of getting their job done without being asked "are
you *SURE*!?" and generally treated like an ignoramus.
                                                --notebooks of a heretic

Good design means less design.  Design must serve users, not try to fool them.
                                    --Dieter Rams, Chief Designer, Braun

If you can get them to ask the wrong questions,
it doesn't matter what the answers are.                 --Thomas Pynchon

I'd love to go out with you, but I'm teaching my ferret to yodel.  --unknown

Jesus Saves.  Moses Invests.  Buddha collects the Rent.         --unknown

[George Bush] is a man who was born on third base and thinks he hit a triple.
                                                            --Jim Hightower

I cannot and will not cut my conscience to fit this year's fashions.
                        --Lillian Hellman in a letter to the House
                          Un-American Activities Committee, May 19, 1952.

When you're swimmin in a creek, and an
eel bites your cheek, that's a Moray...                 --Pete Hartman

The nation faces this year, just as it did last year, a tremendous deficit
in the federal budget.  But in the President's message there was no sense
of sacrifice on the part of the government, no assignment of priorities,
no hint of the need to put first things first.
                                        --George Bush, 1968, critiquing LBJ

USEFUL PHRASES TO KNOW WHEN TRAVELING IN MOSLEM AREAS #1:
"Akbar khalo-kili haftir loftan"
(Thank you for showing me your marvelous gun)

USEFUL PHRASES TO KNOW WHEN TRAVELING IN MOSLEM AREAS #2:
"Fekr gabul cardan davat paeh gush divar"
(I am delighted to accept your kind invitation to lie down on the floor
with my arms above my head and my legs apart)

USEFUL PHRASES TO KNOW WHEN TRAVELING IN MOSLEM AREAS #3:
"Shomaeh fekr tamomeh oeh gofteh bande"
(I agree with everything you have ever said or thought in your life)

USEFUL PHRASES TO KNOW WHEN TRAVELING IN MOSLEM AREAS #4:
"Auto arraregh davateman mano sepaheh hast"
(It is exceptionally kind of you to allow me to travel in the trunk of
your car)

USEFUL PHRASES TO KNOW WHEN TRAVELING IN MOSLEM AREAS #5:
"Fashal eh tupehman na degat mano goftam cheeseayah mohemara jebehk"
(If you will do me the kindness of not harming my genital regions,
I will gladly reciprocate by betraying my country in public)

USEFUL PHRASES TO KNOW WHEN TRAVELING IN MOSLEM AREAS #6:
"Khrel jepaheh maneh vajayeh Amrikahey"
(I will tell you the names of many American spies travelling as reporters)

USEFUL PHRASES TO KNOW WHEN TRAVELING IN MOSLEM AREAS #7:
"Balli Balli Balli!"
(Whatever you say!)

USEFUL PHRASES TO KNOW WHEN TRAVELING IN MOSLEM AREAS #8:
"Maternier ghermez ahlieh ghorban"
(The red blindfold will be lovely, excellency)

USEFUL PHRASES TO KNOW WHEN TRAVELING IN MOSLEM AREAS #9:
"Tikeh nuneh ba ob khrelleh bezorg va khrube boyast ino begeram"
(The water-soaked breadcrumbs were delicious, I would like the recipe)

Programming is like sex: one mistake and you have to support for a lifetime.
                                                            --unknown

One time I removed all the hair from a mouse with Nair-Hair just to see
what it looked like.  And it looked beautiful.
                                --David Lynch, creator of "Twin Peaks"

The Post Office raises the price of stamps, becomes a paying sponsor of the
Olympics, then purchases ad time on tv to brag about it.  Is this a great
country or what?                                            --unknown

Coach: How's a beer sound, Norm?
Norm:  I dunno.  I usually finish them before they get a word in.  --"Cheers"

The two major things that have come out of Berkeley are LSD and Unix,
and we are not convinced that they are unrelated.       --unknown

Necessity is the argument of tyrants, it is the creed of slaves.
                                                --William Pitt (1783)

I do not find in orthodox Christianity one redeeming feature.
                                                        --Thomas Jefferson

People are more violently opposed to fur than leather, because it's safer
to harass rich women than biker gangs.                          --unknown

Ride a motorcycle.  Save Gas, Oil, Rubber, Steel, Aluminum, Parking Spaces,
The Environment, and Money.  Plus, you get to wear all the leather you want!
                                                            --Rich Chandler

Never worry about theory as long as the machinery does
what it's supposed to do.                               --Robert A. Heinlein

A distributed system is one where a system you've never
heard of and are not using can cause you to fail.       --unknown

I wish TV had a knob so you could turn up the intelligence.
The one marked Brightness doesn't work.                     --Gallagher

Wherever the real power in a Government lies,
there is the danger of oppression.              --James Madison

An alcoholic is a man you don't like who drinks as much as you do.
                                                --Dylan Thomas

I have never been lost, but I will admit to being
confused for several weeks.                             --Daniel Boone

We are truly at the end of an era -- BSD UNIX and Yes are dead, the politics
of the time are conservative, the idea of having fun is becoming more and
more forbidden, the USA no longer controls its own economy, and we have
strangled ourselves by litigating against innovation.    --greywolf@ossi.com

    Sarah Young:  Who is the Prince of Darkness ... in unix-land?
Chip Salzenberg:  I'd nominate Bill Gates, father of MS-DOESN'T and
                  godfather of Windoze.

I'm certainly going into this as a dog-eat-dog fight,
and I will do what I have to do to be re-elected.       --George Bush

Have you ever noticed that the people who are always trying to tell you,
"There's a time for work and a time for play," never find the time for play?

The truth hurts.  Oh sure, maybe not as much as jumping onto a bicycle
with the seat missing, but it hurts.                     --Scott Campbell

The 3 most useless things in flying: Altitude above you,
runway behind you, fuel in the truck.                       --Will Crowder

Best anagram of George Herbert Walker Bush:  Huge Berserk Rebel Warthog
                                                --Lindsey Durway

...Then anyone who leaves behind him a written manual, and likewise anyone
who receives it, in the belief that such writing will be clear and certain,
must be exceedingly simple-minded...    --Plato, "Phaedrus"

If anyone disagrees with anything I say, I am quite prepared not only to
retract it, but also to deny under oath that I ever said it.    --Tom Lehrer

Every passing hour brings the solar system 43,000 miles closer to globular
cluster M13 in Hercules, and still there are some misfits who insist that
there is no such thing as progress.             --Kurt Vonnegut Jr.

I also bought some batteries, but they weren't included.  --Steven Wright

He who will not reason, is a bigot; he who cannot is a fool;
and he who dares not is a slave.                  --Sir William Drummond

Sometimes I think the surest sign that intelligent life exists elsewhere in
the universe is that none of it has tried to contact us.
                                             --Calvin of "Calvin & Hobbes"

After you stop believing in Santa Claus, the whole world just goes downhill.
                                                            --Tom Clancy

I used to work in a fire hydrant factory.
You couldn't park anywhere near the place.              --Steven Wright

Don't steal.  The government hates competition.         --Jeff Cooper

Withdrawing in disgust is not apathy.  Vote none of the above.
                                                --Jerry Sullivan

A countryman between two lawyers is like a fish between two cats.
                                                --Benjamin Franklin

Bureaucracy:  turning energy into solid waste.          --unknown

John Gotti for president.  If we're going to have a crook in the White
House, let's have a competent one who knows how to run a business without
being robbed blind by his subordinates.                 --unknown

If you make $50,000 today, you have the same buying power as the average
coal miner did in 1949, adjusted for taxes and inflation.
        --John Sestina, nationally known Certified Financial Planner (1987)

If all economists were laid end to end, they would not reach a conclusion.
                                                        --George Benard Shaw

First thing we do, we kill all the lawyers.             --Shakespeare

I hate quotations.      --Ralph Waldo Emerson

Sure we should sell California to the Japanese.
It's going to fall into the ocean anyway.       --Heard on a talk show.

Q: How many feminists does it take to change a lightbulb?
A: Two, one to change the bulb and one to complain bitterly about the
   plight of the socket.                        --Tundra Tim Daneliuk

You don't sew with a fork, so I see no reason to eat with knitting needles.
                                    --Miss Piggy, on eating Chinese Food

May I take this opportunity of emphasizing that there is no cannibalism in
the British Navy.  Absolutely none, and when I say none, I mean there is a
certain amount, more than we are prepared to admit.         --Monty Python

Mountain Dew and sushi: not just for breakfast anymore.     --Stephen Friedl

Renting airplanes is like renting sex: It's difficult to arrange on short
notice on Saturday, the fun things always cost more, and someone's always
looking at their watch.                                     --Ron Wanttaja

UNIX is a bell of AT&T Trademark Laboratories.
                                        --Chris Torek and/or Mike Urban

Nobody likes nuclear bombs.  We're trying to get rid of them.
                                             --DOE Secretary James Watkins

Programmer /prougraema/, n.  A person who spends his time trying to explain
to a computer the imaginative fantasies of the Marketing department.
This involves translating from one unintelligible series of hieroglyphics
to another.  See "Lunacy".                          --Hacker's Dictionary

Hardware, n.  The part of a computer system that can be kicked.
                                                        --Hacker's Dictionary

Whenever you find that you are on the side of the majority,
it is time to reform.                                           --M. Twain

Yesterday, I got food poisoning.  I haven't decided when I'm going to use it.
                                                            --Steven Wright

Television is a medium because anything well done is rare.  --Fred Allen

The genius of you Americans is that you never make any clear-cut stupid moves,
only complicated stupid moves that leave us scratching our heads wondering
if we might possibly have missed something.             --Gamel Abdel Nasser

If all the veins in your body were laid end to end, you'd be dead.

"Oh, the world's most decrepit room-service waiter remembers nothing out of
the ordinary about the night in question, no surprise there."
                --Albert Rosenfield, FBI Forensic Specialist, "Twin Peaks"

"You tell me, vigilante justice or just clean country living?"
                --Albert Rosenfield, FBI Forensic Specialist, "Twin Peaks"

"Look, it's trying to think."
                --Albert Rosenfield, FBI Forensic Specialist, "Twin Peaks"

"I've got compassion running out of my nose, pal.  I'm the sultan of
sentiment."     --Albert Rosenfield, FBI Forensic Specialist, "Twin Peaks"

"Senor Drool Cup has, shall we say, a mind that wanders."
                --Albert Rosenfield, FBI Forensic Specialist, "Twin Peaks"

"...either Josie Packard pulled the trigger or she's loaning her winterwear
to the wrong kind of people."
                --Albert Rosenfield, FBI Forensic Specialist, "Twin Peaks"

"Cooper, I do not suffer fools gladly, and fools with badges never!"
                --Albert Rosenfield, FBI Forensic Specialist, "Twin Peaks"

"Cooper, an observation.  I don't know where this is headed, but the only
one of us with the coordinates for this destination in his hardware is you.
Go on whatever vision quest you require.  Stand on the rim of the volcano,
stand alone and do your dance.  Just find this beast before he takes
another bite."  --Albert Rosenfield, FBI Forensic Specialist, "Twin Peaks"

"Has anyone seen BOB on earth in the past few weeks?"
                --Albert Rosenfield, FBI Forensic Specialist, "Twin Peaks"

"Currently appearing at the Calhoun Memorial Hospital as Mr. Potato Head."
                --Albert Rosenfield, FBI Forensic Specialist, "Twin Peaks"

"Mr. Horne, I recognize that your position in this fair community
necessitates venality, insincerity, and a certain irritating manner of
expressing yourself.  Stupidity, however, is not a necessarily inherent
trait.  Therefore, please listen closely--You can have a funeral any old
time.  You dig a hole, you plant a coffin.  I, however, cannot perform
these tests next year, next month, next week or even tomorrow--I must
perform them now....I've got a lot of cutting and pasting to do, gentlemen,
so please return to your porch rockers and resume whittling!"
                --Albert Rosenfield, FBI Forensic Specialist, "Twin Peaks"

"I know Andy.  I know.  I know.  I know.  It's what we call a real three
hanky crime."    --Agent Rosenfield speaking to Deputy Brennan, "Twin Peaks"

"How do you feel?"
"Me?"
"I believe it's customary to ask after the health of one recently
 plugged three times."
"Thanks for asking."
"Don't get sentimental."     --Agents Rosenfield and Cooper, "Twin Peaks"

"Coop, about the uniform."
"Yes, Albert?"
"Usually, replacing the quiet elegance of the dark suit and tie for the
casual indifference of these muted earthtones is a form of fashion suicide.
But, call me crazy, on you it works."
                --Agents Rosenfield and Cooper, "Twin Peaks"

"I have only been in Twin Peaks a short time, but in that time I have seen
decency, honor and dignity.  Murder is not a faceless event here; it is not
a statistic to be tallied up at the end of the day.  Laura Palmer's death has
affected each and every man, woman and child, because life has meaning here,
every life.  That's a way of living I thought had vanished from the Earth,
but it hasn't, Albert; it's right here in Twin Peaks."
"Sounds like you've been snacking on some of the local mushrooms."
                --Agents Cooper and Rosenfield, "Twin Peaks"

"Bobby Briggs."
"What's he doing here?"
"He doesn't look sick."
"Sheriff Truman, to see this kind of investigative genius at work, it's
 just a real treat for me."
        --Sheriff Truman, Cooper, Truman again, and Rosenfield, "Twin Peaks"

"Anything we should be working on?"
"Yeah, try not dragging your knuckles on the ground when you walk!"
                --Sheriff Truman and Agent Rosenfield, "Twin Peaks"

"Nothing beats the taste sensation when maple syrup collides with ham."
                        --Dale Cooper, FBI Special Agent, "Twin Peaks"

You can get further with a kind word and a gun than a kind word alone.
                                                        --Al Capone

The four phases of public office;
Nomination, Election, Indictment, Conviction.           --Devon Prichard

"...(and) We've heard how teen prostitution, pregnancy, drug use, cults,
runaways, suicide and poor hygiene are sweeping this nation.  We thought
you might like to share with the committee any particular *causes* you might
see for those latter problems..."
"I dunno, Maybe the proliferation of narrow, suffocating zealotry
masquerading as parenting in this country."    --Steve Dallas, 'Bloom County'

It is much easier to apologize than to get permission.    --Adm. Grace Hopper

Computers are like Old Testament gods; lots of rules and no mercy.  --unknown

It's better to get mugged than to live in fear.  Down with software patents!
                                                                --unknown

You know the honeymoon's over when you're taking a shower and (s)he comes
in just to take a dump.                                         --unknown

Dyslexics untie!                --unknown

Be wary of strong drink.  It can make you shoot at tax
collectors - and miss.                                  --Lazarus Long

The only thing that separates us from the animals
is superstition and mindless rituals.                           --Latke

Government is like a baby.  An alimentary canal with a big appetite at
one end and no sense of responsibility at the other.
                        --Ronald Reagan, Saturday Evening Post, 1965

Anyone who remembers the sixties probably wasn't there.   --Robin Williams

We must not confuse dissent with disloyalty.    --Edward R. Murrow

Help a cop...beat yourself up.                  --Random Simi Valley Juror

An eye for an eye leaves everybody blind.
                           --Edward James Olmos on Arsenio Hall 4/30/92

Strong characters emerge only from confronting serious difficulties squarely
and courageously.                                       --Selznick, 1957

Insisting on perfect safety is for people who don't have
the balls to live in the real world.    --Mary Shafer, NASA Ames Dryden

Sometimes you're the windshield, sometimes you're the bug.
Sometimes you're the Louisville Slugger, sometimes you're the ball.
                                                --Mary Chapin Carpenter

Education is the ability to listen to almost anything without losing your
temper or your self-confidence.                         --Robert Frost

I'd give my right arm to be ambidexterous.      --Simon McClenahan

Nearly any man can handle adversity, but to test a man's character,
give him power.                                         --Abraham Lincoln

House: though your own, yet in England a place of no security, as ruffians
may enter it & pillage it as they please, and drag the owner away to prison,
whenever the Minister thinks proper.       --Pigott's Political Dict., 1795

My kid beat up your honor student               --bumper sticker

A committee is an animal with at least six legs, and no brain.
                                                --Robert A. Heinlein

We are a hedge.  Please move along.                     --Anonymous ninjas

There are lots of people who mistake their imagination for their memory.
                                                        --Josh Billings

Nuke the homeless gay baby whales for Jesus!           --bumper sticker

Rock band auditions today:  Must be able to play 3 chords
and grimace musically.  See Steve Dallas.         --seen in "Bloom County"

Everywhere is walking distance if you have the time.    --Steven Wright

Smith and Wesson: the ultimate point-and-click user interface.  --Alan Denney

Fear is the main source of superstition, and one of the main sources of
cruelty.  To conquer fear is the beginning of wisdom.  --Bertrand Russell

The proper response to detecting a bug isn't to fix the bug - it's to make
sure you'll never have to worry about that bug again.   --Richard Hamming

The legitimate powers of government extend to such acts only as are
injurious to others.                                    --Thomas Jefferson

Sam:  What do you say, Norm?
Norm: Any cheap, tawdry thing that'll get me a beer.    --"Cheers"

It's a fax from your dog, Mr. Dansworth.  It looks like your cat.  --Far Side

The bomb will never go off.  I speak as an expert in explosives.
                     --Admiral William Leahy, US Atomic Bomb Project.

They itch, therefore I exist.                   --Cartesian Mosquito

The large print giveth and the small print taketh away.     --Tom Waits

Just about any movie could be made better if one of the characters
were a vampire.                                             --John Purlia

The manager will be continually amazed that policies he took for common
knowledge are totally unknown to some member of his team.
                                      --Fredrick P. Brooks, Jr.

No one hates so bitterly as the lazy and poor contemplating the energetic
and prosperous.                                         --Dale Worley

The activist is not the man who says the river is dirty.
The activist is the man who cleans up the river.        --Ross Perot

If I had any humility I would be perfect.       --Ted Turner

Never attribute to malice what can adequately be explained by stupidity.
                                                 --Hanlon's Razor

Always assume malice after stupidity is proven.    --Hanlon's Corollary

Seen on Pavlov's door:  Knock.  Don't ring bell.       --Mathew Sutherland

It has been alleged that SVR4 is one of BSD's bastard children, but if
you ask *her* family, they'll deny everything.  They'll also refuse a
paternity test.                                 --Larry Wall

Mollison's Bureaucracy Hypothesis:  If an idea can survive a bureaucratic
review and be implemented, it wasn't worth doing.       --unknown

Heaven is where the police are British, the cooks French, the mechanics
German, the lovers Italian and it is all organized by the Swiss.  Hell is
where the chefs are British, the mechanics French, the lovers Swiss, the
police German and it is all organized by the Italians.           --unknown

The First Amendment is often inconvenient.  But that is besides the point.
Inconvenience does not absolve the government of its obligation to tolerate
speech.                                 --Justice Anthony Kennedy, in 91-155

If a kid asks where rain comes from, I think a cute thing to tell him is
"God is crying."  And if he asks why God is crying, another cute thing to
tell him is "Probably because of something you did."
                                        --Jack Handy, "Saturday Night Live"

There's an old proverb that says just about whatever you want it to.
                                                            --unknown

A population of sheep will eventually beget a government of wolves.
                                                    --William Sloan Coffin

Applicants must also have extensive knowledge of Unix, although they
should have sufficiently good programming taste to not consider this an
achievement.       --MIT AI Lab job ad, Comm. of the ACM, v35/n6, June 1992

Seen in a newspaper ad:  Men wanted for expanding contracting company.
                                                --Jon Jagger

Last night I played poker with a deck of Tarot cards.
I got a full house and four people died.                 --Steven Wright

We came in peace for all mankind, and all we got were these
lousy tee-shirts.                                       --Roger Lincoln

Cats seem to go on the principle that it never does
any harm to ask for what you want.                      --Joseph Wood Krutch

Save the whales.  Collect the whole set.        --Matthias Urlichs

America is a large, friendly dog in a very small room.  Every time it
wags its tail, it knocks over a chair.          --Arnold Joseph Toynbee

My psychiatrist says I have a messiah complex.  But I forgive him.
                                                --Jim Carrey

Jerry [Brown] is the equivalent of a drive-by shooting.
                                   --NPR's Morning Edition, 13 July 1992

People demand freedom of speech to make up for the
freedom of thought which they avoid.                   --Kierkegaard

I die.  My flesh rots and my bones are cracked by the hungry tiger.  He drops
me behind him all around the forest, and nothing will grow where his excrement
from my marrow falls.  As the years pass, the forest dies from the poison of
my remains.  The soil washes into the sea and poisons the fish, and all die.
O the embarrassment.                                       --unknown

I die.  The records clerk downtown makes a typo entering my name and the
whole city computer crashes during the Republican National Convention.
David Duke is nominated and wins the election.  The US gets into a war with
China and nuclear death drops from the sky.  All die.  O, the embarrassment.
                                                        --unknown

I die.  My relatives collect my things and lose the unpaid phone bill.
The phone company goes under.  Loss of phones takes the stock market, and
this takes the economy.  Eventually all die.  O the embarrassment.
                                                --Cameron Simpson

Several thousand years ago our ancestors thought that despotic chieftains,
thunder gods, tribal feuds, and cannibalism were good ideas.  --Achim Stoesser

Jesus saves...but Gretzky gets the rebound!  He shoots!  He scores!!
                                                        --Rich Holland

Heard on Letterman:
    PHIL DONAHUE: [talking about Barbara Bush]:  I think she's probably
                  the most popular person in America.
    LETTERMAN: Oh, I don't know... that Luke Perry kid is pretty big.

Most people would rather die than think; many do.       --Bertrand Russell

Clothes make the man.  Naked people have little or no influence on society.
                                                        --Mark Twain

The probability of someone watching you is proportional
to the stupidity of your action.                        --Roland A. Wilcher

When we are planning for posterity, we ought to remember
that virtue is not hereditary.                          --Thomas Paine

System managers do it with privileges.                  --unknown

Eagles may soar, but weasels don't get sucked into jet engines.
                                                        --John Benfield

Politics - Formed from the Latin 'poly', meaning many,
and 'tic', meaning little bloodsucking insects.         --Paul Joslin

If I had to do it over, I wouldn't do what I did then, for a lot of reasons,
including political reasons.
   --George Bush, on raising taxes, March 1992.  On the campaign trail a few
     days later: "Life means nothing without fidelity to principles."

Personally, I think putting a question like "Is Unix dead?" on the cover of
a computer magazine is about three notches below "Is Elvis alive and
programming with aliens at IBM?"                --Harley Hahn

It is important to focus on writing software that is "adequate."  Having
one's software be "good" or even "excellent" is over-rated.  If "good" were
necessary or even important, DOS would not be the de facto standard
operating system.                                 --notebooks of a heretic

RWFM? TFRM, TFUM, OTFGSM?
(Read Which F***ing Manual? The F***ing Reference Manual, The F***ing User
Manual Or The F***ing Getting Started Manual?)           --Michael Swaine

...all ideas need to be heard, because each idea contains one aspect of
the truth.  By examining that aspect, we add to our own idea of the truth.
Even ideas that have no truth in them whatsoever are useful because by
disproving them, we add support to our own ideas.
                                       --John Stuart Mill, "On Liberty"

It seems like everyone that has used OS/2, that I have talked to, has come
to the conclusion that it would be better to wait for NT.  --Mike Figg

When you vomit on someone, what do you say?  Next time lunch is on me?
                                                       --Jerry Seinfeld

Outside of a dog, a book is a man's best friend.
Inside of a dog it's too dark to read.                   --Groucho Marx

Blessed are they who go around in circles;
for they shall be known as big wheels.                  --Martien Verbruggen

Don't teach the blind until you have practiced living with closed eyes.
                                                            --Dave Haynes

To arrive at the simplest truth, as Newton knew and practised, requires years
of contemplation.  Not activity.  Not reasoning.  Not calculating.  Not busy
behaviour of any kind.  Not reading.  Not talking.  Not making an effort.
Simply bearing in mind what it is one needs to know.
                                       --George Spencer-Brown, Laws of Form

Descartes enters a pub.  "Evening, Descartes. Same as usual?"
Descartes says: "No, I think not."  -- and disappears.  --Ulrich Steimann

I was 35 years old before I knew a pie was meant to be eaten.
                                        --Moe Howard from "The Three Stooges"

TV is chewing gum for the eyes.                 --Frank Lloyd Wright

Country music is 3-D: divorce, death, and depression.           --unknown

Things you don't hear on Star Trek: "Uhura, I'm scared."
                                                --(richid@owlnet.rice.edu)

Things you don't hear on Star Trek:
"Shut 'er down, Scotty, she's suckin' mud."     --(richid@owlnet.rice.edu)

Things you don't hear on Star Trek:
"Dammit Spock, that's the fifteenth NutterButter you've eaten today!"
                                                --(richid@owlnet.rice.edu)

I admit that when I was in school I wrote COBOL.  But I didn't compile.
                                --Bill "Slick Willie" Davidsen, GE Corp.

Honest, Officer, had I known my health stood in
jeopardy I would never have lit one.            --Maxim of the Hells Angels

Quickly, Scotty, beam me up.  There is no ox..y..ge...  --Cor Bosman

A programmer is a machine for converting coffee into code.
                                                        --Tom Christiansen

Love sickness is like sea sickness.  You think you're going to die,
and everyone else thinks it's hilarious.                    --Orson Welles

People cannot be managed.  Inventories can be managed, but people must be led.
                                                        --H. Ross Perot

The feminist agenda is not about equal rights for women.  It is about a
socialist, anti-family political movement that encourages women to leave
their husbands, kill their children, practice witchcraft, destroy capitalism,
and become lesbians.                    --Pat Robertson on Iowa's proposed ERA

"Hil... Hil... Can I choose the cabinet?"       --Bill Clinton
"Bar... Bar... Can I choose the curtains?"      --George Bush
                                                                --Gary Dietz

How do we persuade new users that spreading fonts across the page like
peanut butter across hot toast is not necessarily the route to typographic
excellence?                             --Peter Flynn

See, when the GOVERNMENT spends money, it creates jobs; whereas when the
money is left in the hands of TAXPAYERS, God only knows what they do with it.
Bake it into pies, probably.  Anything to avoid creating jobs.  --Dave Barry

An analogy is like instant coffee: it can wake you up,
but it's not the real thing.                                 --Peter da Silva

THIS definitely takes, eats and sh*ts the cake.      --allane@unsw.oz.au

Why no one ever uses the Restroom on "Star Trek" #10:
Wesley won't be able to save the ship.

Why no one ever uses the Restroom on "Star Trek" #9:
It would be illogical for Vulcans.

Why no one ever uses the Restroom on "Star Trek" #8:
After his assimilation Picard doesn't need to.

Why no one ever uses the Restroom on "Star Trek" #7:
Special effects dept. draws a blank on Hi-tech toilets.

Why no one ever uses the Restroom on "Star Trek" #6:
Data doesn't know how.

Why no one ever uses the Restroom on "Star Trek" #5:
Make up dept. can only do Klingon heads and hands.

Why no one ever uses the Restroom on "Star Trek" #4:
A tinkerbell entity might enter the available entrance.

Why no one ever uses the Restroom on "Star Trek" #3:
As a Joke Geordi keeps reprogramming the toilets to surge instead of flush.

Why no one ever uses the Restroom on "Star Trek" #2:
"Klingons do NOT ... go to the bathroom".

Why no one ever uses the Restroom on "Star Trek" #1:
Deanna would sense it, and then tell everyone.

Things that never happen in "Star Trek" #1:
The Enterprise runs into a mysterious energy field of a type it has
encountered several times before.

Things that never happen in "Star Trek" #2:
The Enterprise visits a remote outpost of scientists, who are just fine.

Things that never happen in "Star Trek" #3:
Some of the crew visit the holodeck, and it works properly.

Things that never happen in "Star Trek" #4:
The crew of the Enterprise discover a totally new lifeform, which later
turns out to be a rather well-known old lifeform wearing a funny hat.

Things that never happen in "Star Trek" #5:
The crew of the Enterprise are struck by a mysterious plague, for which the
only cure can be found in the well-stocked Enterprise sick-bay.

Things that never happen in "Star Trek" #6:
The Captain has to make a difficult decision about a less advanced people
which is made a great deal easier by the Starfleet Prime Directive.

Things that never happen in "Star Trek" #7:
The Enterprise successfully ferries an alien VIP from one place to another
without serious incident.

Things that never happen in "Star Trek" #8:
An enigmatic being composed of pure energy attempts to interface to the
Enterprise's computer, only to find out that it has forgotten to bring
the right leads.

Things that never happen in "Star Trek" #9:
A power surge on the Bridge is rapidly and correctly diagnosed as a faulty
capacitor by the highly-trained and competent engineering staff.

Things that never happen in "Star Trek" #10:
The Enterprise is captured by a vastly superior alien intelligence which
does not put them on trial.

Things that never happen in "Star Trek" #11:
The Enterprise is captured by a vastly inferior alien intelligence which
they easily pacify by offering it some sweeties.

Things that never happen in "Star Trek" #12:
The Enterprise visits an earth-type planet called "Paradise" where everyone
is happy all of the time.  However, everything is soon revealed to be exactly
what it seems.

Things that never happen in "Star Trek" #13:
A major Starfleet emergency breaks out near the Enterprise, but fortunately
some other ships in the area are able to deal with it to everyone's
satisfaction.

Things that never happen in "Star Trek" #14:
The Enterprise is involved in a bizarre time-warp experience which is in
no way connected with the Late 20th Century.

Things that never happen in "Star Trek" #15:
Kirk/Riker/Picard falls in love with a woman on a planet he visits, and isn't
tragically separated from her at the end of the episode.

Things that never happen in "Star Trek" #16:
Counsellor Troi states something other than the blindingly obvious.

Things that never happen in "Star Trek" #17:
The warp engines start playing up a bit, but seem to sort themselves out
after awhile without any intervention from boy genius Wesley Crusher.

Things that never happen in "Star Trek" #18:
Wesley Crusher gets beaten up by his classmates for being a smarmy git,
and consequently has a go at making some friends of his own age for a change.

Things that never happen in "Star Trek" #19:
Spock (or Data) is fired from his high-ranking position for not being able
to understand the most basic nuances of about one in three sentences that
anyone says to him.

Things that never happen in "Star Trek" #20:
Most things that are new or in some way unexpected.

Things that never happen in "Star Trek" #21:
Wesley Crusher tries to upgrade the warp drive and it works better than ever.

You have to keep busy; no dog ever peed on a moving car.  --Morten Skjelland

What goes up must come down, but don't expect it to come down where you can
find it.  Newton's Law applied to Murphy's.             --Lily Tomlin

Not that I would wish to suggest that the union of the set of persons who
would USE OS/2 and watch football is limited solely by the common factor of
dog-paddling in the shallow end of the gene pool.
                --drieux@wetware.com, Castle WetWare Philosopher and Sniper

Let's get linear, linear, I want to get linear...    --Olivia Newton Algebra

Let's Get Tactical, Tactical, I want to Get Tactical....
                                                --Olivia Newton PanzerGruppen

Just because you're a homicidal maniac doesn't mean
you don't have a sense of humor.                        --Barry Sadler

Due to budgetary shortfalls, the light at the
end of the tunnel has been turned off.                  --anonymous

Freedom of the press is still alive in America, at the US Mint.  --Gallagher

The end of the world is ni*O(&%^#$%g)}:&(*   NO CARRIER         --unknown

"He's a jealous God, all right," said Mary, "it comes of being no good
in bed."                        --Meta-Apocrypha 42:42 (drieux@wetware.com)

I hear it isn't the size of the disk that matters, it's the access time.
Longer the access time, the better.      --Patrick Cofield & W. David Rohwer

In America, we tax work, investment, employment, savings and productivity,
while we subsidize non-work, consumption and debt.  It's time we start to
reverse this trend.                                             --Jack Kemp

I also realize that it is possible to get by without really understanding
[source] code; this approach "works" in roughly the same sense that Communism
"worked" in the USSR up to the point it collapsed.           --Michael Yoder

I don't have any solution but I certainly admire the problem.
                                                        --Ashleigh Brilliant

Everything is controlled by a small evil group to which,
unfortunately, no one we know belongs.                  --Erik Rantapaa

To call something 'Public' is to define it as filthy, inefficient and
dangerous.  The public toilet is the epitome of social spending.
                                                        --P.J. O'Rourke

Question: If I hire Dr. Kevorkian and live, can I sue him for malpractice?
                                                        --Richard Gerberding

I've a good mind to join a club and beat you over the head with it!
                                                        --Groucho Marx

Mob rule isn't any prettier merely because the mob calls itself a government.
It ain't charity if you're using someone else's money.  --Mark Wilson

For each and every bureaucratic action, there is an
equal and opposite creative solution.                   --Dennis Wingo

I am not...in favor of bringing about in any way the social and political
equality of the white and black races...of making voters or jurors of Negroes,
nor of qualifying them...to intermarry with white people.
                                                        --Abe Lincoln, 1858

Democracy is two wolves and a lamb voting on what to have for lunch.
Liberty is a well-armed lamb contesting the vote.       --Benjamin Franklin

There is nothing so susceptible to the secret manipulations of evil men
as a democracy.                                     --Plutarch, circa 120 AD

There are two rules for success in life:
Rule 1:  Don't tell people everything you know.         --Patrick Dockhorn

Man is a rational animal who always loses his temper when called upon
to act in accordance with the dictates of reason.       --Orson Welles

Why can't a computer scientist tell Halloween
from Christmas?  Because oct(31)=dec(25)                --Kai Voigt

The Amish don't have the problems the native Americans
do because there is no Bureau of Amish affairs.         --Russell Means

The truth is cruel, but it can be loved,
and it makes free those who have loved it.              --George Santayana

Always do right.  This will gratify some people and astonish the rest.
                                                        --Mark Twain

I dream of the day when conservatives learn the difference between a sin and
a crime and liberals learn the difference between a virtue and a requirement.
                                                --William A. Niskanen

Skepticism is the chastity of the intellect, and it is shameful
to surrender it too soon or to the first comer.         --G. Santayana

An ambassador is a man of virtue sent to lie abroad for his country; a
news-writer is a man without virtue who lies at home for himself.
                                --Sir Henry Wotton, Reliquae Wottonianae

White males make up only 39.8% of the American population, yet they comprise
fully 88% of the officers who drove savings and loans into bankruptcy.
                                                        --Ron Buckmire

The American Republic will endure, until politicians realize
they can bribe the people with their own money.      --Alexis de Tocqueville

When Clinton said he was going to create 8 million new jobs,
I didn't think they were all going to be tax collectors.        --Jay Leno

If pigs could vote, the man with the slop bucket would be elected swineherd
every time, no matter how much slaughtering he did on the side.
                                                        --Orson Scott Card

I want to make it very clear that this middle-class tax cut, in my view,
is central to any attempt we're going to make to have a short-term economic
strategy and a long-term fairness strategy, which is part of getting this
country going again.                --William Jefferson Clinton, ABC News,
                                      Primary Debate, Manchester, 1/19/92

In the lexicon of the political class, the word "sacrifice" means that the
citizens are supposed to mail even more of their income to Washington so that
the political class will not have to sacrifice the pleasure of spending it.
                                        --George Will, Newsweek, 22-Feb-1993

Ronald Reagan's library burnt down.  Both books were destroyed.  But the
real horror: he hadn't finished coloring either of them.        --Gore Vidal

Though the fruits of crime bear bitter seaweed, the
sea cucumbers of crime make a killer salad.   --Dr. Calamari, DC/Marvel comics

Where a calculator on the ENIAC is equipped with 18,000 vacuum tubes and
weighs 30 tons, computers in the future may have only 1,000 vacuum tubes
and weigh only 1 1/2 tons.                 --Popular Mechanics, March 1949

The other night I was lying in bed, looking up at the stars,
and I wondered, "WHERE the hell is my ROOF?!?"       --Grieser Alle Sammen

                  |                The RF-4C Phantom:
                 /0\               Living proof that if you put enough
       \_______[|(.)|]_______/     engine on something, even a BRICK
         o   ++   0   ++   o       can fly!

He who lives to fight another day..
Lives to NUKE the site from orbit.              --Samuel H. Edwards

Do not, therefore, say "I feel nauseous" unless you are sure you
have that effect on others.   --Strunk and White, "The Elements of Style"

Condoms aren't completely safe.  A friend of mine was
wearing one and got hit by a bus.                       --Bob Rubin

In the force if Yoda's so strong, construct a sentence with
words in the proper order then why can't he?            --Frank "Crash" Edwards

And on Monday God created the politicians.  Before that He had only made
apes, but then He ran out of fur.       --quoted from the Carnival in Cologn

A fanatic is a person who can't change his mind and won't change the subject.
                                                        --Winston Churchill

[The United States] can't be so fixed on our desire to preserve the rights
of ordinary Americans...
    --President William Clinton, March 1, 1993 during a press conference in
      Piscataway, NJ, Boston Globe, 3/2/93, page 3

The existential atmosphere of [the pre-WW1 West] (which was then being
destroyed by Europe's philosophical trends and political systems) still held
a benevolence that would be incredible to the men of today, i.e., a smiling
confident good will of man to man, and of man to life.          --Ayn Rand

Famous comedian on snack food commercial: Crunch all you want, we'll make more
Democratic Party twist: Earn all you can, we'll *take* more     --H.R. Holm

I place economy among the first and most important virtues, and public debt
as the greatest of dangers to be feared.  To preserve our independence, we
must not let our rulers load us with perpetual debt.  If we run into such
debts, we must be taxed in our meat and drink, in our necessities and in
our comforts, in our labor and in our amusements.         --Thomas Jefferson

If we can prevent the government from wasting the labor of the people under
the pretense of caring for them, they will be happy.      --Thomas Jefferson

He has erected a multitude of new offices, and sent hither swarms of officers
to harrass our people, and to eat out their substance.
                                                --Declaration of Independence

Giving Congress more money is like giving an alcoholic a liquor store.
                                                        --H. Ross Perot

"NO! NO!  DON'T OPEN THE BOX!  DON'T OPEN THE BLOODY BO--"
                                                        --Schrodinger's cat

Last night I shot an elephant in my pajamas.
How he got in there I'll never know.                      --Groucho Marx

The natural progress of things is for liberty to yield
and government to gain ground.                          --Thomas Jefferson

To preserve free thought, we all have the positive
moral obligation to be thick-skinned.                   --J. Rauch.

Good ideas are not adopted automatically.  They must be driven into
practice with courageous impatience.            --Admiral Hyman G. Rickover

CELEBRATING THE 250th BIRTH ANNIVERSARY OF THOMAS JEFFERSON 4-13-1993
It is error alone which needs the support of government.
Truth can stand by itself.                              --Thomas Jefferson

President Clinton had to reassess his position on this particular promise,
and for a very solid reason:  He's just another suit-wearing weasel.
                                        --Dave Barry, "Flush with Money"

A flatterer is a friend who is your inferior, or pretends to be so.
                                                                --Aristotle

Most of us spend the first 6 days of each week sowing wild oats, then we go
to church on Sunday and pray for a crop failure.                --Fred Allen

The mere act of drinking beer in an attempt to measure your tolerance is
likely to affect your impression of how many beers you've drunk.
                                        --The Heineken uncertainty principle

Let me get this straight: Medical treatment costs too much and is inefficient,
so we're going to let government make it better?
                                        --Dave O'Shea <dos@major.panix.com>

CELEBRATING THE 250th BIRTH ANNIVERSARY OF THOMAS JEFFERSON 4-13-1993
The legitimate powers of government extend to such acts only as are
injurious to others.                                    --Thomas Jefferson

CELEBRATING THE 250th BIRTH ANNIVERSARY OF THOMAS JEFFERSON 4-13-1993
It does me no injury for my neighbor to say there are twenty gods, or no God.
It neither picks my pocket nor breaks my leg.           --Thomas Jefferson

Our fiscal history for the past 30 years can be written in three sentences:
1) The share of total earned income taxed by the government has remained
   between 18% and 20%; in 1992, it was 18.6%.
2) The share of federal government spending to total spending has increased
   from about 17% or 18% to about 23% or 24%.
3) The deficit has increased with spending.
                 --Allan H. Meltzer, professor of economics, Carnegie-Mellon
                                                Wall Street Journal, 2/22/93

CELEBRATING THE 250th BIRTH ANNIVERSARY OF THOMAS JEFFERSON 4-13-1993
All, too will bear in mind this sacred principle, that though the will of
the majority is in all cases to prevail, that will, to be rightful, must be
reasonable; that the minority possess their equal rights, which equal laws
must protect, and to violate which would be oppression.    --Thomas Jefferson

Ideas are more powerful than guns.  We would not let our
enemies have guns, why should we let them have ideas?           --Joseph Stalin

Last year I worried that Bush would die and let Quayle take over.
This year I worry that Hillary will die and let Bill take over.
                                                --Bill Davidsen, GE Corp.

If at first you don't succeed, then skydiving isn't for you.   --Greg McCrory

Never try to outstubborn a cat.         --Lazarus Long

Never hit a man with glasses.  Use your fist.       --Ron "Asbestos" Dippold

Leadership is ACTION, NOT position.                   --D.H. McGannon

If double jeopardy is good enough for Rodney King's arresting officers,
then it's good enough for me.                               --Faisal Jawdat

A car is useless in New York, essential everywhere else.
The same with good manners.                        --Ron "Asbestos" Dippold

If the principle were to prevail of a common law [i.e., a single government]
being in force in the United States...it would become the most corrupt
government on the earth.                            --Thomas Jefferson, 1800

Buddhist to hot dog vendor: "Make me one with everything."      --Eric Eide

The Uniform Commercial Code protects the innocent purchaser, but it is not a
shield for the sly conniver, the blindly naive, or the hopelessly gullible.
     --Ruling in Atlas Auto Rental Corp. v. Weisberg, NY City Civ. Ct. 1967

Sir, I admit your gen'ral rule, that every poet is a fool;
But you yourself may serve to show it, that every fool is not a poet.
                                                                --A. Pope

...unfortunately we can't control the actions of everyone.
                                                --President Clinton 04/20/93

The man who fights for his ideals is the man who is alive.
                                        --Cervantes, author of Don Quixote

Don't go around saying the world owes you a living.
The world owes you nothing.  It was here first.                 --Mark Twain

What's the function of the galaxy?  I don't know if our life has a purpose
and I don't see that it matters.  What does matter is that we're a part.
Like a thread in a cloth or a grass-blade in a field.  It IS and we ARE.
What we do is like wind blowing on the grass.           --The Lathe of Heaven

I think that I shall never see a billboard lovely as a tree.
Indeed, unless the billboards fall, I'll never see a tree at all.
                                                                --Ogden Nash

Can a blue man sing the whites?                --Will Steeves

Vikings?  There ain't no vikings here, just us honest farmers.  The town
was burning, the villagers were dead.  They didn't need those sheep anyway.
That's our story and we're sticking to it.                    --Liz Stokes

When I was crossing the border into Canada, they asked me if I had any
firearms with me.  I said, "Well, what do you need?"    --Steven Wright

When they took the fourth amendment, I was silent because I don't deal drugs.
When they took the sixth amendment, I kept quiet because I know I'm innocent.
When they took the second amendment, I said nothing because I don't own a gun.
Now they've come for the first amendment, and I can't say anything at all.
                                                        --Tim Freeman

Talk sense to a fool and he calls you foolish.          --Euripides

The secrecy that shielded the meetings and written communications of the
men at the top helped to perpetuate the false impression that they sought
and weighed facts in their discussions.
                --Neil Sheehan, on US military leaders during the Vietnam War

Advertising is the rattling of a stick inside a swill bucket.  --George Orwell

A democracy cannot exist as a permanent form of government.  It can only
exist until a majority of voters discover that they can vote themselves
largess out of the public treasury.                     --Alexander Tyler

See the happy moron, He doesn't give a damn.
I wish I were a moron, My God! perhaps I am!            --unknown

I feel that if a person can't communicate,
the very least he can do is shut up.                    --Tom Lehrer

Nobody has ever taxed a nation into prosperity.         --George Will

The President is doing a fine job, but the problem is we don't know what to
do with her husband.    --James Carville (Clinton campaign strategist),2/93

Oh, please call Daddy.  Mom's far too busy.
                                --Chelsea Clinton to nurse, CSPAN, 2/93

Which is more useful, the sun or the moon?  The moon is the more useful,
for it gives light at night when it is dark, whereas the sun only shines in
the daytime when it is light anyway.                        --George Gamow

Laziness is nothing more than the habit of resting before you get tired.
                                                            --Jules Renard

The secret of my success is that at a very
early age I discovered that I'm not God.        --Oliver Wendell Holmes

He'd make a lovely corpse.                      --Charles Dickens

He who knows not & knows not that he knows not is a fool.  SHUN HIM
He who knows not & knows that he knows not is a child.  TEACH HIM
He who knows & knows not that he knows is asleep.  AWAKE HIM
He who knows & knows that he knows is wise.  FOLLOW HIM
                                                --probably somebody famous

A liberal is a man too broadminded to take his own side in a quarrel.
                                                        --Robert Frost

The theoretical broadening which comes from having many humanities subjects on
campus is offset by the general dopiness of the people who study these things.
                                                        --Richard Feynman

The suddenness of the leap from hardware to software cannot but produce a
period of anarchy and collapse, especially in the developed countries.
                                                        --Marshall McLuhan

Scientists tell us that the fastest animal on earth, with a top speed of
120 ft/sec, is a cow that has been dropped out of a helicopter.  --Dave Barry

Nature takes no account of even the most reasonable of human excuses.
                                                        --Joseph Wood Krutch

I don't want to achieve immortality through my work; I want to achieve
immortality through not dying.                          --Woody Allen

For a successful technology, reality must take precedence
over public relations, for nature cannot be fooled.     --Richard P. Feynman

I had to quit drinking 'cause I used to wake up nude on
the hood of my car with my keys in my a**.            --Robin Williams, 1987

You should join Over-Talkers Anonymous, it's called Onanonanon.  --Don Swensen

You never know when some crazed rodent with cold feet might be
running loose in your pants.                    --Calvin, "Calvin and Hobbes"

Bumper sticker: "My child is an honor inmate at the
Hughes Juvenile Correctional Facility".                 --Lars Huttar

A truth does not become greater by repetition.      --Maimonides (1135-1204)

If you're not part of the solution, you're part of the precipitate.
                                                        --Steven Wright

I prefer a rude vigor to a polished banality.           --Utah Phillips

It is almost always good practice to qualify virtually
everything you say, usually.                            --Brian Milner

Government is the agent of those who are too refined to do their own mugging.
                                                            --Joseph Sobran

Reaching consensus in a group is often confused with
finding the right answer.                               --Norman Mailer

Flair is what marks the difference between artistry and mere competence.
                --Cmdr. William Riker, "Time Squared," stardate 42679.2.

Make lots of money, enjoy the work, operate within the law: pick any two.
                                                        --unknown

Conservative: A statesman enamoured of the existing evils; as distinguished
from the liberal who exists to replace them with others.  --Ambrose Bierce

Windows is, at best, a priggish, effeminate interface modeled after the
sissified Macintosh operating system interface.         --John C. Dvorak

At times like this one feels, well, perhaps extinct animals SHOULD be left
extinct.  Don't you have that feeling now?      --Malcolm, "Jurassic Park"

Yesterday I bought a decaffinated coffee table.         --Steven Wright

It shall be unlawful to shout "whiplash", "ambulance", or "free Perrier"
for the purpose of trapping attorneys.
                        --Washington State Attorney Season and Bag Limits

"What kind of fool do you take me for?"
"I don't know.  How many kinds are there?"       --Gummy Bears

Q:  How many Microshaft Engineers does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
A:  None.  They just define darkness as an industry standard.
                                --Fletcher Bonds <a-fleb@microsoft.com>

Q:  How many IBM rep's does it take to screw in a light bulb?
A:  None.  Sooner or later, the rest of the world is going to have to
    realize that IBM's candles are much better and will follow their lead.
                                --Fletcher Bonds <a-fleb@microsoft.com>

I am a firm believer in Luck.  The  harder I work, the more I have of it.
                                                        --Thomas Jefferson

But after all, isn't that what life's all about?  Complaining that someone
somewhere has been treated unfairly, and that it is the responsibility of
society and/or the Government to correct the situation?     --Larry Riedel

Heisenbug: a bug that goes away when you switch on the debugger.
                                                        --Mike Gelman

I feel strongly that society needs to condemn a little more and understand a
little less.
                 --John Major, Prime Minister of England, after a 2-yr-old
                   was beaten to death by two 10-yr-olds (4/1993)

We don't know who discovered water, but we're pretty sure it wasn't a fish.
                                        --Attributed to Marshall McLuhan

"Hi.  I'm probably home, I'm just avoiding someone I don't like.
Leave me a message, and if I don't call back, it's probably you..."
                      --From the canonical list of answering machine messages

An atheist doesn't have to be someone who thinks he has a
proof that there can't be a god.  He only has to be someone
who believes that the evidence on the God question is at
a similar level to the evidence on the werewolf question.    --John McCarthy

Advertising may be described as the science of arresting
human intelligence long enough to get money from it.    --Stephen Leacock

That's the thing about being a boxer: even when you're at
the top of your field, people still hit you in the head.   --Paula Poundstone

I spilled spot remover on my dog.  He's gone now.       --Steven Wright

Open letter to Republicans in Congress: "Next time you've got a chance to
bite Clinton's 'hand of friendship,' do the country a favor and take it
off at the arm instead.  Thanks."                       --John Switzer

And who are these people?       --Vice President Al Gore, talking to the
                                  curator of Monticello while pointing to
                                  busts of George Washington and Ben Franklin.

Thoughtcrime was not a thing that could be concealed forever.  You might
dodge sucessfully for awhile, even for years, but sooner or later they were
bound to get you.                                   --George Orwell, "1984"

The difference between a moral man and a man of honour is that the latter
regrets a discreditable act, even when it has worked and he has not been
caught.                                                     --Dave Hayes

curses: May you be forced to grep the termcap of an unclean yacc while a
herd of rogue emacs fsck your troff and vgrind your pathalias!  --David Nolan

If the enemy general is obstinate and prone to anger, insult and enrage him,
so that he will be irritated and confused, and without a plan will recklessly
advance against you.                            --"The Art of War", Sun Tzu

Two telepaths walk into a bar.  One says, "I'll have the same!"

Parenthood is too important a responsibility to force on anyone.
                                           --attributed to Sarah Weddington

When the mouse laughs at the cat, there is a hole nearby.  --Nigerian Proverb

I walked into a store and asked the girl if she had anything
to put underneath the coasters.  She started to cry.        --Steven Wright

I went to a map-maker and asked him if he had any maps
that weren't aerial views.  He started to cry.          --Steven Wright

When I was a fetus, I used to sneak out at night while mom was asleep.
I thought to myself, now's the time to steal some neat stuff, because I
don't have any fingerprints.                            --Steven Wright

I went to lost and found, and told the guy "I don't get it".  --Steven Wright

What does "definition" mean?                            --Steven Wright

I took a lie detector test.  No, I didn't.              --Steven Wright

C makes it easy to shoot yourself in the foot.  C++ makes it harder, but when
you do, it blows away your whole leg.  --Bjarne Stroustrup, inventor of C++

I have a full-size map of the world.  At the bottom it
says "1 inch = 1 inch".  I hardly ever unroll it.       --John Martinez

First get the facts straight, then you are free to
distort them at your leisure.                           --Mark Twain

America: You have Billy Clinton, Stevie Wonder, Bob Hope and Johnny Cash.
Germany: We have Helmut Kohl, no wonder, no hope and no cash.
                                                        --Reinhard Hamid

If you saw a heat wave, would you wave back?            --Steven Wright

I picked up my girlfriend the other night.  Her Dad said, "I want her home
by eight-fifteen."  I said, "Middle of August?  That's cool."  --Steven Wright

It is a popular delusion that the government wastes vast amounts of money
through inefficiency and sloth.  Enormous effort and elaborate planning are
required to waste this much money.                          --P.J. O'Rourke

Anyone who considers protocol unimportant has never dealt with a cat.
                                                        --Robert Heinlein

"Welcome to Occupied Mexico"
                --seen spray painted on underpass in Salinas, California

I've never seen President Clinton out helping the homeless/handicapped, but
I believe he's for it.  I guess there are those who might say that Hilary
helped the handicapped by getting him the job, but I wouldn't.
                                        --Larry Riedel, on alt.tv.bh90210

There's a fine line between fishing and standing on the shore like an idiot.
                                                        --Steven Wright

It sounded better in the original German.
                        --Commentary by Molly Ivins about Pat Buchanan's
                          speech at the 1992 Republican Convention

What is of supreme importance in war is to attack the enemy's strategy.
                                                            --Sun Tzu

The only freedom which deserves the name, is that of pursuing our own good
in our own way, so long as we do not attempt to deprive others of theirs,
or impede their efforts to obtain it.        --John Stuart Mill, "On Liberty"

Q: What's the difference between Jurassic Park and IBM?
A: One is a complex and expensive theme park, filled with dinosaurs and
   unreliable equipment, and the other is a Steven Spielberg movie.
Q: What's the similarity?
A: They both have clones.                               --Scott Coleman

A fanatic is a man who does what he thinks the Lord would do
if only He knew the facts of the case.                  --Finley Peter Dunne

Having SMOKING and NON-SMOKING sections in a room is like having URINATING
and NON-URINATING sections in a swimming pool!          --Rob Clark

Curiosity killed the cat, but for awhile I was the suspect.  --Steven Wright

I've always wondered about Girl Scouts: young girls dressed in paramilitary
uniforms, reciting oaths, and learning to start fires.  --Murphy Brown, 1993

I thought for a second that my monkey had rabies; Thank God
it turned out he had just gotten into the Cool Whip.        --Dave Letterman

Fifth Law of Applied Terror:
        If you are given an open-book exam, you will forget your book.
Corollary:
        If you are given a take-home exam, you will forget where you live.

My squid's name is Ned, or maybe Fred.
He's painted red to match his bed.
A pedigreed squid thoroughbred
Is Ned, or Fred, or is it Ted?                          --B. Kliban

It has about as much chance of survival in the current marketplace as a
blonde ingenue overnight guest at a Transylvanian castle.
                                --review of Jimmy Buffet's first album, 1973

If Karen Carpenter and Mama Cass had only shared that ham sandwich, both of
them might still be alive today.                        --Jonathan B. Horen

New York: when civilization falls apart, remember, we were way ahead of you.
                                                        --David Letterman

It's not just Congress!  Even Secretary of Defense Dick Cheney now admits
to bouncing something like 21 checks.  Did you seem him on the news the the
other night?  He says that because he ONLY overdrew his account by $10,000,
he shouldn't be lumped in with those who were TRULY abusing the system.
I know $10,000 seems like a lot of money....but when you're Secretary of
Defense, you can't even buy a TOILET SEAT for that kind of money!  --Jay Leno

My theory of evolution is that Darwin was adopted.      --Steven Wright

I hate you, you hate me;
Let's go out and kill Barney.
A shot rang out, Barney hit the floor;
No more purple dinosaur.                        --unknown

I have a large seashell collection, which I keep scattered
on beaches around the world.  Maybe you've seen it.         --Steven Wright

You can't legislate morality.  We tried to outlaw comsumption of alcoholic
beverages.  We found that violation of the law led to bigger crimes and
bred disrespect for the law.                        --Jimmy Carter, 1976

The prestige of government has undoubtedly been lowered considerably by
the Prohibition law.  For nothing is more destructive of respect for the
government and the law of the land than passing laws which cannot be enforced.
It is an open secret that the dangerous increase of crime in this country
is closely connected with this.
                --Albert Einstein, "My First Impression of the USA", 1921

To come with a well-informed mind is to come with an inability of
administering to the vanity of others, which a sensible person would
always wish to avoid.                                        --Jane Austen

No question, *somebody* has to hold the spots on the low end of the clue
distribution curve.                                     --Kent Paul Dolan

Diplomacy is the art of saying 'nice doggy' until you can find a rock.
                                                        --Jeff Goslin

People who make liquor are businessmen, not the "members of an international
ring of alcohol refiners"; people who sell liquor are retail merchants, not
"pushers"; and people who buy liquor are citizens, not "dope fiends."
The same goes for tobacco, coffee, and tea.             --Thomas Szasz

Hah.  He's obviously spent all his clue money on beer.  --Chris Jercha

Come, let us peel back the foreskin of misconception,
and apply the wire brush of enlightenment.              --Geoff Miller

It is difficult to produce a television documentary that is both
incisive and probing when every twelve minutes one is interrupted
by twelve dancing rabbits singing about toilet paper.           --Rod Serling

How can three dozen computer designers beat a team of over a thousand?
                                                        --Thomas Watson
I believe Mr. Watson has answered his own question.
                                                        --Seymour Cray

The wages of sin are death, but by the time taxes are taken out,
it's just sort of a tired feeling.                      --Paula Poundstone

"man":  A biodegradable but non-recyclable animal blessed
with opposable thumbs capable of grasping at straws.    --Bernard Rosenberg

Had this been an actual emergency, we would have fled in terror,
and you would not have been informed.           --Attr. to Paul Falstad

As the poet said, "Only God can make a tree".  Probably because it's
so hard to figure out how to get the bark on.           --Woody Allen

Man messes with nature.  Nature eats man.  Steven Spielberg
inherits the earth.         --Review of "Jurassic Park" in Dallas Observer

We are today in the most literal sense a lawless society, for OUR law has
ceased to be law and become instead its opposite - mere force at the disposal
of whoever is at the controls.                          --Charles A. Reich

The job of the military is to go to war and win, not to be the instruments
of social experimentation.      --(retired) General H. Norman Schwartzkopf

Some people don't see the advantages of combining Microsoft applications.
But then some people didn't see what would come of mixing nitro and glycerin.
                                                        --Microsoft ad

Q:  How many surrealists does it take to change a light bulb?
A:  Two.  One to hold the giraffe and the other to fill the bathtub
    with brightly colored machine tools.

The difference between involved and committed is the difference between
ham & eggs. The chicken is involved.  The pig is committed.
                                                        --Darren E. Peterson

A smartass once accused me of being subtle.  I decked him with a short
right over the heart and and elbow in the tranchea.     --Harlan Ellison

I'm not very keen for doves or hawks. I think we need more owls.
                      --Senator George Aiken on the Vietnam war, Jan 1966

Love is like an hourglass, with the heart filling up as the brain empties.
                                                             --Jules Renard

For thousands of years, homoeopathic magic was known to the sorcerors of
ancient India, Babylon and Egypt, as well as of Greece and Rome, and at this
day it is still resorted to by cunning and malignant savages in Silicon
Valley, California.                                             --Anonymous

It is the business of little minds to shrink.           --Carl Sandburg

Any kiddie in school can love like a fool,
but hating, my boy, is an art.                  --Ogden Nash

It's just a job.  Grass grows, birds fly,
waves pound the sand, I beat people up.                 --Mohammed Ali

If you have that kind of money to spend on an exclusive monument to
overengineered excess, that's your perogative.
                 --"Car and Driver" on the new Mercedes-Benz 600SEC ($147K)

Writing science fiction for about a penny a word is no way
to make a living.  If you really want to make a million,
the easiest way is to start your own religion.          --L. Ron Hubbard

He who stands on toilet seat, is high on pot.
             --found in a bathroom in Goldwin Smith Hall, Cornell University

If you shoot a mime, should you use a silencer?         --Steven Wright (?)

The effect of life in society is to complicate and confuse our existence,
making us to forget who we really are by causing us to become obsessed with
what we are not.                                            --Chuang-Tzu

Operated by professionals, do not try at home, see your dealer for details.
Your mileage may vary.  Call before digging.  Best if eaten by date on
package.  Apply only to affected area.  Batteries not included.  Member FDIC.
Deliberate misuse by concentrating and inhaling fumes may be harmful or fatal.
Some settling of contents may have occurred during shipping.     --unknown

I can't go out and save every undercapitalized entrepreneur in America.
           --Hillary Clinton, when asked about the impact of her health care
             "plan" on small business (Wall St Jnal, 9/24/93, pg A10, col 3)

I was in a speed reading accident.  I hit a bookmark.   --Steven Wright

Barney the Dinosaur: Insipidus Rex                      --anonymous

Adam was a Canadian.  Nobody but a Canadian would stand
beside a naked woman and worry about an apple.          --Gord Favelle

The Soviet Union was sliding in to an economic collapse so comprehensive
that in the end its factories produced not goods but bads: finished products
less valuable than the raw materials they were made from.   --The Economist

Bill Gates should limit his salary to the number of bytes addressable by
the latest version of MS-DOS, and be taxed based on the number of bytes
of RAM needed by the latest version of MS-Windows.          --Andy Eskilsson

Hey, it's Unix!  I know this!                   --Lexie, "Jurassic Park"

The phrases "body of a supermodel", "head like a horse", and "low IQ" are
NOT mutually exclusive.
        --Alan Asper, commenting on Donna and Brenda in "Beverly Hills 90210"

Curse you, Batman!  May you fall down a flight of stairs and break every
tooth in your head except one, and in that may you have a toothache for the
rest of your life, which won't be very long!
                                --King Tut, Episode 88 (Batman's Waterloo)

I am returning this otherwise good typing paper to you because someone has
printed gibberish all over it and put your name at the top.
                                        --English Professor, Ohio University

Peace: in international affairs, a period of cheating
between two periods of fighting.                        --Ambrose Bierce

A translated sentence from a Russian chess book: A lot of water has been
passed under the bridge since this variation has been played.  --Heiko Rupp

"Shot my dog today."
"Was he mad?"
"Well, he weren't too damned pleased."      --Rick Tilson <rtilson@sun.com>

I want to die peacefully in my sleep like my grandfather,
not screaming in terror like his passengers.            --Jim Harkins

Advice is what we ask for when we already know
what the answer is, but we wish we didn't.              --Erica Jong

If everyone is thinking alike, then somebody isn't thinking.
                                        --George S. Patton, Jr., General USA

A local paper gave away thousands of ballons printed with an anti-drugs
message.  Some children kept coming back for more.  They were inhaling the
helium from the balloons.   --"The Economist", Britain in Brief (13-19/11/93)

I'm not dumb.  I just have a command of thoroughly useless information.
                                                       --"Calvin and Hobbes"

Paul Pomes:    The social circumstances appropriate for grenades
               just don't occur that often.
Steve Dorner:  For shame, Paul.  Congress meets daily.

Originality is the art of concealing your sources.      --Anonymous

Would you fire on US Citizens while in the process of confiscating their guns?
        --A question on a survey given to members of Navy SEAL Team Six by
        their commanders, September 1993.

The problem, of course, was that even though the information was coming
a lot faster, the vast majority of it, having originated with human
beings, was still wrong.  Eventually people realized that the Information
Superhighway was essentially CB radio, but with more typing.    --Dave Barry

Wheaties is not the breakfast of champions; one's opponent is.  --unknown

American law has a solid tradition of punishing the
responsible for the behavior of the irresponsible.      --C. D. Tavares

Why does man kill?  He kills for food.  And not only food:
frequently there must be a beverage.    --Woody Allen, "Without Feathers"

You can learn a lot from listening to people talk.  Why everything I
know today I've learned from listening to myself talk about things that
I knew absolutely nothing about.                        --Gracie Allen

What the world needs is not dogma but an attitude of scientific inquiry
combined with a belief that the torture of millions is not desirable, whether
inflicted by Stalin or by a Deity imagined in the likeness of the believer.
                                                        --Bertrand Russell

It is important that students bring a certain ragamuffin barefoot
irreverence to their studies; they are here not to worship what is
known, but to question it.      --Jacob Bronowski (in Ascent of Man 1975)

Dessert is probably the most important stage of the meal, since it will be
the last thing your guests remember before they pass out all over the table.
                                                --The Anarchist Cookbook

Smoking kills.  If you're killed, you've lost
a very important part of your life.             --Brooke Shields on smoking

90% of the politicians give the other 10% a bad reputation.
                                                --Henry Kissinger

The outpatients are out in force tonight, I see.        --Tom Lehrer

An apple every eight hours keeps three doctors away.    --B. Kliban

Education makes a people easy to lead, but difficult to drive;
easy to govern but impossible to enslave.       --Baron Henry Peter Brougham

The place where optimism flourishes most is the lunatic asylum.
                                                        --Havelock Ellis

Always remember, that someone, somewhere, is making a product that will
make your product obselete.     --Georges Doriot, founder of American R & D.

If it's tourist season, why can't we shoot them?        --Steven Wright (?)

Psychiatrist's secretary: "There's a man in the waiting room who claims
  to be invisible."
Psychiatrist: "Tell him I can't see him right now."       --John E. Lundgren

Try to get all of your posthumous medals in advance.    --Paul Falstad

Diane, last night I dreamed I was eating a large, tasteless gumdrop, and
awoke to discover I was chewing on one of my foam disposable earplugs.
Perhaps I should consider moderating my nighttime coffee consumption.
                            --FBI Special Agent Dale Cooper, "Twin Peaks"

Here's to champagne and real friends, and real pain to sham friends.
                                                        --June Peckingham

Those who cannot remember the past are condemned to ignore it.  --David Barr

The right to be heard does not automatically include
the right to be taken seriously.                        --Hubert Humphrey

I recommend that the Statue of Liberty on the East Coast be supplemented
by a Statue of Responsibility on the West Coast.        --Viktor E. Frankl

Society in every state is a blessing, but Government, even in its best state,
is but a necessary evil; in its worst state, an intolerable one.
                                                        --Thomas Paine

Excerpt from students' history papers:
  France was in a very serious state.  The French Revolution was accomplished
before it happened.  The Marseillaise was the theme song of the French
Revolution, and it catapulted into Napoleon.  During the Napoleonic Wars
the crowned heads of Europe were trembling in their shoes.  Then the
Spanish Gorillas came down from the hills and nipped at Napoleon's flanks.
Napoleon became ill with bladder problems and was very tense and unrestrained.
He wanted an heir to inherit his power, but since Josephine was a baroness,
she couldn't bear children.             --Bob Glickstein <bobg@z-code.com>

Excerpt from students' history papers:
  The sun never set on the British Empire because the British Empire is in the
East and the sun sets in the West.  Queen Victoria was the longest queen.
She sat on a thorn for 63 years.  Her reclining years and finally the end of
her life were exemplatory of a great personality.  Her death was the final
event which ended her reign.            --Bob Glickstein <bobg@z-code.com>

The majority of problems on the planet are a result of the idea that
human beings are not sovereign and autonomous but property owned by
abstractions such as Gods and governments.      --Christopher S. Hyatt

Come to think of it, I'm not sure exactly what Sun's target market is,
because it sure doesn't seem to be anyone worried about ease of operation
or performance.                      --Vincent Fox <vincent@cad.gatech.edu>

The government that can ban abortions can also mandate them.  Think about it.
                                                        --Keith Cochran

Ad campaigns that didn't make it: Then there was a magazine ad with a simple
Before-and-After equation, with a tube of Clearasil photographed on the Before
side and a wrapped Trojan on the After side.  Wrote the Clearasil managers:
"This promise cannot be substantiated."  --USAToday, submitted by Dale Worley

Pessimism is only the name that men of weak nerves give wisdom. --Mark Twain

What do you get when you cross Lee Iococca with a vampire?
Autoexec.bat!                                           --Dianne Montgomery

There is a limit to the legitimate interference of
collective opinion with individual independence...      --John Stuart Mill

Q:  What is IBM's definition of a man year?
A:  720 programmers trying to finish the job before lunch.  --David Heller

Suicide is our way of saying to God: "You can't fire me, I QUIT!"
                                                        --Juan G. Molinari

Overheard in Congressional debate: "Why can't the Jews and Arabs just sit
down together and settle this like good Christians?"      --Kevin Allegood

Our opinions are what makes us different.             --C. Kenneth Stern
Is that a quote from the latest Charles Manson parole hearing?  --Larry Riedel

If God doesn't like the way I live, let him tell me, not you.
                                                        --As seen on a button.

Old soldiers never die.  Young ones do.                 --unknown

Rumor has it that the morning after his wedding, Bill Gates' wife looked
down at him and said "Now I know why you call your company Microsoft"
                                                        --Mark Jeffrey

Q:  Will Lorena Bobbitt ever find a new husband?
A:  Only if he's just nuts...                           --unknown

Q:  What did Jeffrey Daumer say to Lorena Bobbit?
A:  Ya gonna eat that?                                  --unknown

A second flood, a simple famine, plagues of locusts everywhere,
Or a cataclysmic earthquake, I'd accept with some despair.
But no, you sent us Congress!  Good God, sir, was that fair?
                --John Adams, "Piddle, Twiddle, and Resolve", from "1776"

Love is said to be blind, but I know some fellows who can
see twice as much in their sweethearts as I do.         --Josh Billings

Love, n.  A temporary insanity cured by marriage.       --Ambrose Bierce

All the questions had received excellently drafted answers, and the answers
were not open to doubt because they were not the work of human thought,
always liable to error, but were all the work of bureaucratic officialdom.
                                                        --Leo Tolstoi

The computer makes writing so easy that nobody has to think at all before
knocking off a 500-pager.  Result: The typical 500-pager nowadays reads
as though nobody had thought at all.  My suggestion: a new system warning
writers that they have reached the 300-page mark and that going over 300
will produce a death-dealing electronic assault.
                                --Russell Baker, New York Times, 1/25/94, A15

Lord, grant me serenity to accept what cannot be changed, courage to change
what can be changed and the wisdom to hide the bodies of the people I had
to kill because they really ticked me off.                  --Bill Rauscher

What is often a dislike for organization is
just a desire for unbridled license.            --some Victorian philosopher

If Jim Morrison drove his van to Van Morrison's gym,
would Don Johnson use the john in Van Johnson's van?    --Charles Fleischer

The danger is not that one class is unfit to govern.
All classes are unfit to govern.                        --Lord Acton

The freshmen bring a little knowledge in and the seniors take none out,
so it accumulates through the years.    --A. Lawrence Lowell, Pres. of Harvard

Please do not mistake my sympathy for understanding.
Please do not mistake my understanding for sympathy.    --Dale Worley

A cop pulled me over and said, "You know the speed limit through here is
55 miles an hour?"  I said, "Yes, but I wasn't gonna be out that long."
                                                            --Steven Wright

Freedom is the freedom to say that two plus two make four.
If that is granted, all else follows.               --George Orwell, "1984"

Liberty means responsibility.  That is why most men dread it.  --G. B. Shaw

Nature is blind.  We are merely short-sighted.  That's an improvement.
                                                        --Henry Spencer

To hate man and worship God seems to be the sum of all creeds.
                                                        --Robert G. Ingersol

Relying on the government to protect your privacy is
like asking a peeping tom to install your window blinds.   --John Perry Barlow

At some time in the recent past someone had decided to brighten the ancient
corridors of the University by painting them, having some vague notion that
Learning Should Be Fun.  It hadn't worked.  --Terry Pratchett, "Equal Rites"

Speech is civilization itself.  The word, even the most contradictory
word, preserves contact--it is silence which isolates.          --Thomas Mann

That guy's obviously a few devilled eggs short of a picnic.  --Sarah Holland

Listening to her spout off was like being slowly pulled over carpet tacks
and dipped in rubbing alcohol.                              --Sarah Holland

There is no nonsense so arrant that it cannot be made the creed of the vast
majority by adequate governmental action.               --Bertrand Russell

People say that one advantage of Religion is that it teaches humans humility.
But there is nothing so humiliating as Science.  Religion teaches that you are
important to the Gods.  Science teaches that you are utterly insignificant,
that you couldn't affect the Universe-as-a-Whole even if you had all the
resources of the Earth at your command.                       --Dale Worley

The difference between baseball and politics is that, in baseball, if you
get caught stealing, you're out.                                --Ed Shanks

Freedom lost, and then regained, bites with keener
fangs than freedom never endangered.                    --Cicero [106-43 BC]

People who can't write, talking to people who
can't think, writing for people who can't read.    --Frank Zappa on the press

Tonya Harding takes the Gold at Lillehammer!
(Authorities are still looking for her)     --NY Times editorial page cartoon

The whole aim of practical politics is to keep the populace alarmed
(and hence clamorous to be led to safety) by menacing it with an
endless series of hobgoblins, all of them imaginary.            --H. L. Mencken

I'm a peripheral visionary.  I can see the future,
but it's way off to the side.                           --Steven Wright

If a gun bill will pass because of the politics of the situation, you must
see to it that its burdens are imposed upon a man because of a criminal
background and not because he is an ordinary citizen and perhaps poor.
                                                --Gen. James H. Doolittle

All my life I've wanted to be somebody.
Now I see I should have been more specific.             --Lily Tomlin

Prohibition goes beyond the bounds of reason in that it attempts to control
a man's appetite by legislation and makes crimes out of things that are not
crimes.  A prohibition law strikes a blow at the very principles upon which
our government was founded.                               --Abraham Lincoln

We have the right to defend ourselves and our property, because of the
kind of animals that we are.  True law derives from this right, not from
the arbitrary power of the omnipotent state.            --James A. Donald

This show has gone off the deep end of Cheesey-ness.  It has gone from brie
at room temperature to Kraft singles right out of the fridge.
                                --Ronny Pudding, on "Beverly Hills 90210"

It is seldom that liberty of any kind is lost all at once.      --David Hume

At Tower Books in Bellevue, Helen Custer's "Inside Windows NT" is
outselling Madonna's "Sex" by 125 to 109.
                                             --Seattle Times, Jan 21, 1993

Diplomacy is the art of saying "nice doggie" until you can find a rock.
                                                            --Will Rogers

What I did must have been right, or an angel would have stopped me, just
as the angel stopped Abraham in the Bible.       --Albert Fish, the cannibal

Don't stand too close to people who are always bandaged up.
(From "Fires Give the Test Just Ahead of the Lesson")
                                 --Joe Duval (duvalj@bionette.cgrb.orst.edu)

Potential product endorsement campaign for Tonya Harding:
Hanes Pantyhose: "Who says nothing beats a great pair of Leggs?"
                                                --Gregg "Bo Duke" Primm

Pessimism,n. A philosophy forced upon the convictions of the observer by
the disheartening prevalence of the optimist with his scarecrow hope and
his unsightly smile.             --"The Devil's Dictionary", Ambrose Bierce

Nihilist, n. A Russian who denies the existence of anything but Tolstoi.
The leader of the school is Tolstoi.
                                --"The Devil's Dictionary", Ambrose Bierce

Cynic, n. A blackguard whose faulty vision sees things as they are, not as
they ought to be.  Hence the custom among the Scythians of plucking out a
cynic's eyes to improve his vision.
                                --"The Devil's Dictionary", Ambrose Bierce

Christian, n.  One who believes that the New Testament is a divinely inspired
book admirably suited to the spiritual needs of his neighbor.  One who follows
the teachings of Christ in so far as they are not inconsistent with a life
of sin.                           --"The Devil's Dictionary", Ambrose Bierce

    \  Nancy! Skate back here! --- O
   O/   I only want to talk   --- /|\
  /|    to you. Honest.     ----- /\
  /\                         --  =  =

Snow is what you are up to your neck in when people send you post cards
from Florida saying they wish you were there.                  --Ogden Nash

A coward is a man who, facing a danger, thinks with his legs.
                                                           --Ambrose Bierce

Some people are born mediocre, some people achieve mediocrity, and some
people have mediocrity thrust upon them.        --Joseph Heller, "Catch-22"

I will not do it as a hack, I will not do it on a Mac,
I will not do it for my friends, I will not do it on weekends,
I will not write for Uncle Sam, I won't do ADA, Sam-I-Am     --Gregory Bond

Thanks to the interstate highway system, it is now possible
to travel coast to coast without seeing anything.       --Charles Kuralt

Politics is the art of looking for trouble, finding it everywhere, diagnosing
it incorrectly and then applying the wrong remedies.           --Groucho Marx

And since the stench of death will always attract flies
and vermin, the arrival of Geraldo was perhaps inevitable.      --Rick Pim

To hear many religious people talk, one would think God created the torso,
head, legs and arms, but the devil slapped on the genitals.  --Don Schrader

You can't have everything.  Where would you put it?     --Steven Wright

Me, I'll start believing this information superhighway stuff when Chelsea's
grades start to slip because she spends all night on a MUD, Al Gore gets
into a flamewar with John de Armond on sci.environment, and the President
has a satellite- fed news server installed on Air Force One so he can keep
up with alt.autos.rod-n-custom on his way to summit meetings.     --Joe Chew

Remember: Once you pull the pin, Mr. Grenade is no longer your friend.
                                                            --Jamie Zawinski

Jones Motto:  Friends come and go, but enemies accumulate.

Eat well, stay fit, die anyway.                   --bumper sticker

SCRUM: A collection of "real men" enagaged in an activity, which, if conducted
anywhere other than on a rugby field, would result in their immediate arrest.
                                                                --Alan Brown

O holy altar of passive entertainment, bestow upon me thy discordant images
at such speed as to render linear thought impossible.
                           --Calvin, of Calvin and Hobbes, worshipping his TV

Scuba diving is the only sport where it's okay to urinate on yourself.
Let's see that on the tennis court.                         --Adam Wallace

Iraq's invasion of Kuwait is a case of bad men doing wrong things for wicked
reasons.  This is the full-sized or standard purebred evil and is easily
recognized even by moral neophytes.  Other malignities -- drugs in America,
famine in Africa and everything in the Middle East -- are more complex.  When
combating those evils people sometimes have trouble deciding whom to shoot.
                                        --P.J. O' Rourke, "Give War a Chance"

It must be inordinately taxing to be such a boob.               --Will Bell

Giving money and power to government is like giving
whiskey and car keys to teen-age boys.                  --PJ O'Rourke

They know that it is human nature to take up causes whereby a man may oppress
his neighbor, no matter how unjustly...  Hence they have had no trouble in
finding men who would preach the damnability and heresy of the new doctrine
from the very pulpit...                              --Galileo Galilei, 1615

The whole point of Christianity is that everyone in the world, from
Charles Manson to Mother Teresa, deserves to go to hell.    --Sean P. Ningen

Otherwise reasonable people who understand that wishing will not make rocks
levitate often believe, in effect, that a well-intentioned government program
can successfully violate the laws of economics.  This irrational and almost
religious belief in government is the root of our tragedy.  --Perry Metzger

Number of listings under "Find Subject Karl Marx"
in the Princeton library on-line catalog: 589
Number of listings under "Find Subject Adam Smith"
in the Princeton library on-line catalog: 35            --Paul Falstad

Horse sense is the thing a horse has which keeps it from betting on people.
                                                           --W.C. Fields

No one has the right to destroy another person's belief by demanding
empirical evidence.  --Ann Landers, nationally syndicated advice columnist
                       and Director at Handgun Control Inc.

Spock!  That's negatory on "daisy dancing."  You are out,
repeat, out of character.  Do you read me?  Spock?        --Bloom County

Feminism was established to allow unattractive women
easier access to the mainstream of society.             --Rush Limbaugh

Authority has every reason to fear the skeptic, for
authority can rarely survive in the face of doubt.      --Robert Lindner

I am Porky of Borg.  You will be assim...bdeh...assim...      --Tommy Usher

"Hi, T-Rex!  I'm Barney!  Will you be my --"  **CHOMP**       --Tommy Usher

The silliest woman can manage a clever man;
but it needs a very clever woman to manage a fool.      --Rudyard Kipling

When a finger points to the moon, the fool looks at the finger.
                                                           --Chinese Proverb

The thing about golf is, no matter how many bad shots you hit, every once
in awhile by sheer luck you hit a shot that is so hypnotizingly perfect that
you're hooked for life.                                      --Sarah Holland

Better late than before anybody has invited you.
                                --Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"

Absolute:  Independent, irresponsible.  An absolute monarchy is one in which
the sovereign does as he pleases so long as he pleases the assassins.  Not
many absolute monarchies are left, most of them having been replaced by
limited monarchies, where the sovereign's power for evil (and for good) is
greatly curtailed, and by republics, which are governed by chance.
                                --Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"

Abstainer:  A weak person who yields to the temptation of denying himself a
pleasure.  A total abstainer is one who abstains from everything but
abstention, and especially from inactivity in the affairs of others.
                                --Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"

Alliance:  In international politics, the union of two thieves who have their
hands so deeply inserted in each other's pocket that they cannot separately
plunder a third.                --Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"

Australia, n.:  A country lying in the South Sea, whose industrial and
commercial development has been unspeakably retarded by an unfortunate
dispute among geographers as to whether it is a continent or an island.
                                --Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"

Disobedience:  The silver lining to the cloud of servitude.
                                --Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"

Egotist:  A person of low taste, more interested in himself than in me.
                                --Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"

Mausoleum:  The final and funniest folly of the rich.
                                --Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"

Meekness:  Uncommon patience in planning a revenge that is worth while.
                                --Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"

Ocean: A body of water occupying about two-thirds of a world made for man --
who has no gills.               --Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"

One evening Mr. Rudolph Block, of New York, found himself seated at dinner
alongside Mr. Percival Pollard, the distinguished critic.
   "Mr. Pollard," said he, "my book, _The Biography of a Dead Cow_, is
 published anonymously, but you can hardly be ignorant of its authorship.
 Yet in reviewing it you speak of it as the work of the Idiot of the Century.
 Do you think that fair criticism?"
   "I am very sorry, sir," replied the critic, amiably, "but it did not
 occur to me that you really might not wish the public to know who wrote it."
                                --Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"

Physician:  One upon whom we set our hopes when ill and our dogs when well.
                                --Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"

Pig: An animal (Porcus omnivorous) closely allied to the human race by the
splendor and vivacity of its appetite, which, however, is inferior in scope,
for it balks at pig.              --Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"

Politician:  An eel in the fundamental mud upon which the superstructure of
organized society is reared.  When he wriggles he mistakes the agitation of
his tail for the trembling of the edifice.  As compared with the statesman,
he suffers the disadvantage of being alive.
                                --Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"

Pray:  To ask that the laws of the universe be annulled in behalf of a single
petitioner confessedly unworthy.  --Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"

Saint:  A dead sinner revised and edited.
                                --Ambrose Bierce, "The Devil's Dictionary"

I would like to die quietly in my sleep like my grandfather
rather than screaming in terror like his passengers     --Jack Handy

The traditional way [of schooling] is to put off all creative aspects until
the last part of graduate school.  For seventeen or more years, the student
is taught examsmanship, then suddenly after passing enough exams in graduate
school he's told to do something original.                       --D. Knuth

Claim of actual innocence based on newly discovered evidence is not ground
for federal habeas relief.   --US Supreme Court, 1/1993 -- execution, 5/1993

Do we not feast upon trivialities to divert attention
from the truly portentous issues that engulf us?        --Stephen Jay Gould

I was once into necro-bestiality, but I quit cold turkey.
                                                --Tom Jones (not the singer)

Don't ever take a fence down until you know why it was put up.  --Robert Frost

A jury consists of twelve persons chosen to decide
who is the better lawyer.                               --Robert Frost

Girls do what their mothers tell them.  Ladies do what society tells them.
Women make up their own minds.  The same is true for boys, gentlemen, and men.
                                                                --Lori Hylan

A hundred thousand lemmings can't be wrong.
                                        --attributed to Larry Sheldon, Jr.

When an Arkansas couple divorces are they still brother and sister?
                                                        --Mcarthur Bevin

Life is short, but by achieving greater speeds a man
can make his life a little longer and more affluent.    --Soichiro Honda

There's nothing wrong with you that can't be cured
with a little Prozac and a polo mallet.                 --Woody Allen

Early to rise, early to bed
Makes a man healthy, but socially dead.     --Matt Gumbley, u2d92@keele.ac.uk

The good rain, like the bad preacher, does not know when to leave off.
                                                        --Emerson

Phillips Petroleum gives you gas; fortunately
Phillips Chemical makes antacid.                        --Aninda DasGupta

Having the federal government run the health care system is a lot like
hiring Dr. Kevorkian to be your personal physician.        --Larry Martell

If you put all of your users end-to-end, you would
quickly learn who was wearing clean socks.              --Bob Walter

"I sometimes wonder how people like you happen."
"The same as anyone else, mister, and it's fun for a
couple people for awhile, and then the trouble starts."    --Roger Zelazny

Information is the currency of democracy.               --Thomas Jefferson

So we have erected a glowing altar in the center of our lives that feeds on
our terror, and fear has become our national religion.
                            --John Perry Barlow on the current state of TV

The people who own the country ought to govern it.
                                --John Jay (signer of the U.S. Constitution)

Inventions reached their limit long ago, and I see no
hope for further development.           --Julius Frontinus, 1st century AD

Good taste is timeless... and a good time is usually tasteless.
                                                        --Steve Pearlmutter

Morning amnesia -- Nature's way of keeping you from waking up screaming.
                                                --from the comic "Dilbert"

COPY PROTECTION n. A class of clever methods for preventing incompetent
pirates from stealing software and legitimate customers from using it.
                                                        --Hacker's Dictionary

We keep hearing that as soon as the information highway exists people
will use it.  Are these not the same people who can't program their VCRs?
                                            --William Esrey, CEO, US Sprint

The paperless office is as likely as the paperless toilet.  --Simon Ritter

When a true genius appears in the world, you may know him by this sign,
that the dunces are all in confederacy against him.         --Jonathan Swift

Experience is something you don't get until just after you need it.  --Olivier

Meddle not in the affairs of dragons, for you are crunchy and
good with ketchup.                           --seen in a "Tolkien" newsgroup

If you can't beat them, beat them.                      --Tonya Harding

No, no. I'm not saying anything of the kind; in fact,
I'm very consciously avoiding saying anything.          --Alexander Haig

Rules...are mostly made to be broken...and are too often for the lazy to
hide behind.                                             --Douglas MacArthur

At my lemonade stand I used to give the first glass away free and charge
five dollars for the second glass.  The refill contained the antidote.
                                                            --Emo Phillips

I do not feel obliged to believe that the same God who endowed us with sense,
reason and intellect has intended us to forgo their use.  --Galileo Galilei

COMING SOON TO YOUR COUNTRY (unless *you* do something about it): A medical
delivery system with all the compassion of the IRS, the efficiency of the
Postal Service and the prices of the Pentagon.                   --unknown

Capital Punishment: when the government taxes you to get capital, in order
to go into business in competition with you, and then taxes the profits on
your business in order to cover its losses.              --Martin N. Steed

When anyone asks me how I can best describe my experience in nearly forty
years at sea, I merely say, uneventful.  Of course there have been winter
gales, and storms and fog and the like.  But in all my experience, I have
never been in any accident...of any sort worth speaking about.  I have seen
but one vessel in distress in all my years at sea.  I never saw a wreck and
never have been wrecked nor was I ever in any predicament that threatened
to end in disaster of any sort.    --E. J. Smith, 1907, Captain, RMS Titanic

The very purpose of a Bill of Rights was to withdraw certain subjects from
the vicissitudes of political controversy, to place them beyond the reach
of majorities and officials and to establish them as legal principles to
be applied by the courts.  One's right to life, liberty and property, to
free speech, a free press, freedom of worship and assembly, and other
fundamental rights may not be submitted to a vote; they depend on the
outcome of no elections.                                        --unknown

But the fact that some geniuses were laughed at does not imply that all
who are laughed at are geniuses.  They laughed at Columbus, they laughed
at Fulton, they laughed at the Wright brothers.  But they also laughed at
Bozo the Clown.                                                 --Carl Sagan

This is the kind of arrant pedantry up with which I will not put.
                                                        --Winston Churchill

I think it's right up there with finding someone who's
willing to give Lorena Bobbitt a set of steak knives.   --tarzan@deakin.edu.au

I have two very rare photographs; one is a photograph of Harry Houdini
locking his keys in his car, the other is Norman Rockwell beating up a child.
                                                        --Steven Wright

The only place where Success comes before Work is in the dictionary.
                                                                --unknown

Sex without love is an empty and meaningless experience.  But
as empty, meaningless experiences go it's one of the best.      --Woody Allen

Being afraid of monolithic organizations especially when they have computers,
is like being afraid of really big gorillas especially when they're on fire.
                                                            --Bruce Sterling

You can watch an actor absolutely sabotage a good script and then read
reviews like "Unfortunately, even the impressive talents of Cheech Marin
could not salvage Anton Chekhov's trite and meandering script."  --Chet Ramey

Listen.  Strange women lying in ponds distributing swords is no basis for
a system of government!                    --Monty Python and the Holy Grail

1983 called, and it wants its fashion cliche' back.
                        --Alan Asper, on hearing someone called a "preppie"

Fourth Law of Thermodynamics:  If the probability of
success is not almost one, it is damn near zero.        --David Ellis

The fortune of my spirit is not to be blown into coins of brass and flung
to the winds as alms for the poor of the spirit.
                                        --from the novel "Anthem" by Ayn Rand

Graveyards are full of indispensable people.            --Phillip J. Windley

Folks, folks, I am seriously considering investing heavily in Eli Lilly & Co,
for I have seen the future and it is named Prozac.
                --Jonathan L. Neuenschwander, observing the flame-fest
                  surrounding the announcement of Mosaic Communications Corp.

My grandmother used to say that when the need to vomit arises, a lady always
uses the ice bucket and only if there are no indoor plants handy.
                                                            --Jamie Hamilton

Stop me if you've heard this one.  Jesus walks into an Inn.  He hands the
Innkeeper three nails and asks him "Can you put Me up for the night?"
                                                --Brandon Lee, "The Crow"

Those who really deserve praise are the people who, while human enough
to enjoy power, nevertheless pay more attention to justice than they are
compelled to do by their situation.                           --Thucydides

The two most abundant elements in the universe are hydrogen and stupidity.
                                                        --Robert Heinlein

"Christ is risen! Truly He is risen!"
"Well, then it's time to knead him down and let him rise again.  Or did you
do that?  If so, knead him down and divide him into loaf pans and *then*
let him rise again.  Did that too?  OK, then bake him."    --Donald Edwards

We will create new Hiroshimas and Nagasakis.  I will not hesitate to use
nuclear weapons...You will get your own Chernobyl in Germany.
                                                    --Vladimir Zhirinovsky

A man that expects to train lobsters to fly in a year is called a lunatic
and is locked up.  But a man that thinks people can be turned into angels by
legislation is called a reformer and allowed to walk free.      --Mr. Dooly

A friend of mine is into Voodoo Acupuncture.  You don't have to go.  You'll
just be walking down the street, and...  ooooohhhhhh, that's much better.
                                                            --Steven Wright

Opera is when a guy gets stabbed in the back and instead of bleeding he sings.
                                                                --Ed Gardner

The advantage of a classical education is that it enables you
to despise the wealth which it prevents you from achieving.   --Russell Green

Gerrold's Laws of Infernal Dynamics:
1.  An object in motion will always be headed in the wrong direction.
2.  An object at rest will always be in the wrong place.
3.  The energy required to change either one of these states
    will always be more than you wish to expend, but never so
    much as to make the task totally impossible.                --Paul Falstad

The goal of Computer Science is to build something that
will last at least until we've finished building it.    --Eric D. Hendrickson

Why is it that when men look at women, it must be assumed that it has some
negative effect.  Men and women are of a separate sex and were designed to
be attractive to each other.  Before we had enough intellect to create love,
there was natural, healthy lust.  Now, this natural healthy drive is looked
at as bad.                                                         --unknown

PROGRAM n.: 1-A magic spell cast over a computer allowing it to turn one's
input into error messages.  2-An exercise in expermental epistemology.
3-A form of art, ostensibly intended for the instruction of computers, which
is nevertheless almost inevitably a failure if other programmers can't
understand it.           --"New Hacker's Dictionary" edited by Eric Raymond

PROGRAMMING n.: 1-The art of debugging a blank sheet of paper (or, in these
days of on-line editing, the art of debugging an empty file).  2-A pastime
similar to banging one's head against a wall, but with fewer opportunities
for reward.  3-The most fun you can have with your clothes on (although
clothes are not mandatory).  --"New Hacker's Dictionary" edited by Eric Raymond

Q: What did Lee Harvey Oswald say to Sirhan Sirhan?
A: Out the window, through the grassy knoll, off Gov. Conlon,
   nothing but head.                                            --unknown

Sometimes I really wish I could be what
I was when I wanted to be what I am now.                --Brendan Field

Are American citizens really so neurotically uptight about deviant sexual
behavior that we will allow our entire information infrastructure to be
dictated by the existence of pedophiles?                   --Bruce Sterling

If you don't find it in the Index, look very carefully through the entire
catalogue.              --"Consumer's Guide", Sears, Roebuck and Co. (1897)

The political tactic to promove privileges to rights and demote rights to
privileges is well known, but is hard to stop as long as those who receive
privileges by new-found rights do not object to the rights of which they
are stripped, instead considering it the "price to pay".     --Erik Naggum

Talk is cheap, unless it is done by Congress.           --Anon.

If you melt dry ice in a pool and go swimming, do you get wet?
                                                        --Steven Wright

(M)achine (A)lways (C)rashes (I)f (N)ot (T)he (O)perating (S)ystem (H)angs
                                                        --Dennis Stalnaker

It's a spinoff of a spinoff of Beverly Hills 90210.  Sort of like a good meal
that has been processed by the body, re-ingested, and then processed again.
                        --Larry Riedel, describing the series "Models, Inc."

Someone said using TSO was like kicking a dead whale accross the beach.
You could do it, but it took lots of effort, the longer you did it the worse
it smelled, and you CERTAINLY didn't want anyone to watch, because it was
inherently gross.                                          --Spencer Dawkins

A flashing "12:00" on the VCR of life.                  --Spencer Dawkins

Excuse me while I pop upstairs to the basement.         --M. C. Escher

In the beginning of a change, the patriot is a scarce man, and brave, and
hated and scorned.  When his cause succeeds, the timid join him, for then
it costs nothing to be a patriot.                               --Mark Twain

Iraqi Bingo:  B52...F-16...A-10...F-18...F-117...B2....       --Robert Clark

The FDA attacks tryptophan, melatonin, etc. to increase their and MDs' monopoly
on permission to buy medicine.  This is power; power corrupts.  Health matters.
                                                --kpc@ptolemy.arc.nasa.gov

I've got a mind like a... a... what's that thing called?      --Rebekah Davis

The meerkat is an African prairie dog, close kin to the mongoose and weasel.
They eat vegetation and small animals, including the giant African scorpions,
which can reach eight inches in length.  I respect them greatly for that.
                                                        --Blair P. Houghton

Today's public figures can no longer write their own speeches or books,
and there is some evidence that they can't read them either.    --Gore Vidal

If this is the "information superhighway", and someone gets on the highway
who doesn't know how to drive, the solution isn't to make everyone else walk.
                                                        --Michael Priestley

I believe in Spinoza's God who reveals himself in the orderly harmony of
what exists, not in a God who concerns himself with the fates and actions
of human beings.                                         --Albert Einstein

It is a civilization committed to the quest for continually
improved means to carelessly examined ends.             --Robert K. Merton

Can you trust a government that subsidizes tobacco and tries to ban vitamins
to make intelligent choices about YOUR health care?        --David H. Citron

To poldly bow air mobius gumby four: Trek on novocaine.         --Ken Weinert

Cat:  God's way of saying your furniture is too nice.           --Allan Marain

Destiny: A tyrant's authority for crime and a fool's excuse for failure.
                                                        --Ambrose Bierce

We are not permitted to choose the frame of our destiny.
But what we put into it is ours.                        --Dag Hammarskjold

Lots of folks confuse bad management with destiny.      --Kin Hubbard

If fate means you to lose, give him a good fight anyhow.     --William McFee

It is a mistake to look too far ahead.  Only one link of
the chain of destiny can be handled at a time.          --Winston Churchill

We didn't see it ... I remember looking into the cow's eyes just before
we hit.  I kind of feel bad for the cow.
        --Tracy Davis of Troy, Ohio, speaking of a motorcycle accident
          where she was a passenger on a bike that struck a cow in the dark.

I'm not a man to mince words.  People, yes.  But not words.     --Colm Buckley

Faith is believing what you know ain't so.              --Mark Twain

Faith means not *wanting* to know the truth.            --Nietzsche

Reality is that which, when you stop believing in it, doesn't go away.
                                                        --Phillip K. Dick

It appears to me that the time has come for all to
make their dissent from religion known.                 --John Stuart Mill

If it weren't for change, your job would largely consist of making
sure the corporate abacus rods were adequately greased.     --John Cleese

Q: Why did the Clintons send Chelsea to a private school?
A: Because in a public school, the Secret Service would have been out-gunned.

"Sulfuric Acid to ya!"  What's that?  Bye, in any language!     --Ben Green

Experience is the comb that Nature gives us after we are bald.
                                                        --Belgian Proverb

No minute lost comes ever back again.
Take heed and see ye nothing do in vain.        --London Clock Tower motto

Gratitude: A lively sense of future benefit.    --French definition

Make it a point to do something everyday that you won't want to do.  This is
the golden rule for acquiring the habit of doing your duty without pain.
                                                                --Mark Twain

Two things we ought to learn from history: one, that we are not in ourselves
superior to our fathers; another, that we are shamefully and monstrously
inferior to them, if we do not advance beyond them.         --Thomas Arnold

The Four Horse Oppressors of the Apocalypse were Nutritional Deprivation, State
of Belligerency, Widespread Transmittable Condition and Terminal Inconvenience.
                                    --Official Politically Correct Dictionary

A pessimist is surprised as often as an optimist, but always pleasantly.
                                                            --Robert Heinlein

Oh, I don't blame Congress.  If I had $600 billion at
my disposal, I'd be irresponsible, too.                 --Lichty & Wagner

I have too seen a female nipple--two of them, to be sure-- in the April 1967
issue of National Geographic, featuring the Ngutu tribe of southwest Tanzania.
                                                                --Alan Asper

Ass-engined Nazi slot cars.   --American journalist P.J. O'Rourke on Porsches

We should grant power over our affairs only to those who are reluctant to hold
it and then only under conditions that increase the reluctance.  --Alan Brown

Objects in calendar are closer than they appear.
                      --Jim Duncan, Penn State Math Dept Systems Administrator

I am Homer of Borg! Prepare to be... Ooooooo! Donuts!           --Pete Gontier

Did you hear that they gave Postal Workers a raise?
Yeah, the price of bullets went up.                     --Dave Brinkman

A schizophrenia patient who held her Siamese cat at knife-point inside an
Oregon Grocery store was shot and killed by police.  Police said they had
no choice when she raised the knife and lunged at them.  They sprayed her
with mace as she walked toward them with the 6 inch folding knife.
                                        --AP Wire Service, DDN 23 Aug 1994

Napoleon said he was able to win all of those battles
because he understood the value of five minutes.        --Zig Ziglar

There are "three absolute rights [sic] the right of personal security,
personal liberty and personal property."  --Sir William Blackstone.
"The protection of these faculties is the first object of government."
                                        --James Madison, Federalist Paper #10.

Gun Control means holding it in both hands.             --Mario M. Butter

IBM: you can buy better, but you can't pay more.        --Mario M. Butter

At Microsoft:  Quality is job 1.1                       --Ben Green

At Intel:  Quality is job 0.99999                       --me

If you throw a cat out of a moving vehicle, would you be fined
for kitty-littering?  Would a passer-by think that it was raining cats?
Would the cat land on its feet?  If the cat struck a mime, would he feign
screaming in pain from the claws?                       --Ben Green

Picaboo: one one-trillionith of a surprise.             --John A. Murphy

I don't think Hitler had cable.         --Bobcat Goldthwait on TV "violence"

Whosoever has lived long enough to find out what life is, knows how deep a
debt of gratitude we owe to Adam.  He brought death into this world.
                                                        --Mark Twain

Man sees sign:  "Drink Canada Dry."  Dies trying.       --Ben Green

Q: Why does Michael Fay have to wear mascara?
A: Because he has four lashes.                          --Ben Green

Q: What's black and tan and looks good on a lawyer?
A: A Rottweiler.                                        --John J. Irvine

Q:  What is the difference between a lawyer and a leech?
A:  A leech will let go and drop off when its victim dies.   --Ben Green

The best way to die is sit under a tree, eat lots of bologna and salami,
drink a case of beer, then blow up.
    --Art Donovan, Hall of Fame lineman of the 1950's and 60's championship
      teams of the Baltimore Colts, talking to Johnny Carson, April 13, 1990

Give me ambiguity, or give me something else.                   --unknown

The Health Care Nationalization Act of 1994: Guaranteed taxes for all
Americans that can never be taken away, regardless of ability to pay.
                                                        --Perry Metzger

Tidbits: What they found all over the place after Tid
lit up a stogie in the dynamite shack.                  --J. Hart

I've gone to hundreds of fortune-tellers' parlors, and have been told
thousands of things, but nobody ever told me I was a policewoman getting
ready to arrest her.                             --New York City detective

Why does California have so many lawyers and New Jersey have so many toxic
waste dumps?  New Jersey got to pick first.                    --Ben Green

Tori on the other hand needs a couple whacks on the head with the "Good Hair
Day" stick.  --Steve Fulton, discussing Tori Spelling's appearance on 90210

Q: Did you hear that Fidel Castro changed the Cuban national anthem?
A: Yup.  Now it's "Row, row, row your boat ... "        --Ben Green

A little rebellion now and then is a good thing; the tree of liberty must
be refreshed from time to time with the blood of patriots and tyrants.
                                                          --Thomas Jefferson

A man said to the Universe: "Sir, I exist!"  "However," the Universe replied,
"That fact has not created in me a sense of obligation".    --Stephen Crane

I saw Elvis.  He sat between me and Bigfoot on the UFO.      --Eddy Jansson

How do you identify ODOT workers' kids on the playground?  They're the ones
standing around watching the other kids play.                   --Ben Green

Germans, of course, have no love life.  They can't, since whispering "I love
you" to your sweetie sounds just the same as telling her that you wish to
eviscerate her corpse and place the head on a spear in the front yard as a
warning to others.                                      --Dan Sorenson

Is Brian Austin-Green aware that he's sporting what appears to be fairly
fresh roadkill where he used to have hair?     --Eric C. Anderson, on 90210

Of course it's not true, but let's make the bastard deny it!   --LBJ (1948)

The problem with attending such things is that, when a woman shows up wearing
a dress cut daringly low, everyone stares, not at *her*, but at *me*, to
see if *I* am staring at her.         --Pope John XXIII, on diplomatic events

Q: Why did the guru refuse Novocaine when he went to his dentist?
A: He wanted to transcend dental medication.                    --Ben Green

He kept saying I didn't listen to him... or something.      --Tritchen Smith

I've often thought the process of aging could be
slowed down if it had to go through Congress.  --President George Bush, 1/28/92

Q: What is the difference between a lawyer and a vulture?
A: The lawyer gets frequent flyer miles.                        --Ben Green

Ignorance of your profession is best concealed by solemnity and silence,
which pass for profound knowledge upon the generality of mankind.
                        --"Advice to Officers of the British Army", 1783

You might be a redneck if on your first date you had
to ask your Dad to borrow the keys to the tractor.              --Ben Green

I myself have never been able to find out precisely what feminism is;
I only know that people call me a feminist whenever I express sentiments
that differentiate me from a doormat.                   --Rebecca West, 1913

If there is no struggle there is no progress.  Power concedes nothing
without a demand.  It never did and it never will.      --Frederick Douglass

I've been thinking of having my testicles laminated.
                --George Carlin, giving an example of something you never hear

I lost a button hole today.  --Steven Wright

I met her at Macy's.  She was shopping... I was putting
Slinky's on the escalator.                              --Steven Wright

He was a multi-millionaire.  Wanna know how he made all of his money?
He designed the little diagrams that tell which way to put batteries in.
                                                            --Steven Wright

I bought some batteries, but they weren't included.
I had to buy them again.                                --Steven Wright

If you can't hear me, it's because I'm in parentheses.  --Steven Wright

For my birthday I got a humidifier and a de-humidifier.
I put them in the same room and let them fight it out.        --Steven Wright

Yesterday I parked my car in a tow-away zone.
When I came back the entire area was missing.              --Steven Wright

I have a switch in my apartment.  It doesn't do anything.  Every once in
awhile, I turn it on and off.  One day I got a call.  It was from a woman
in France.  She said "Cut it out".                         --Steven Wright

It doesn't matter what temperature the room is, it's always room temperature.
                                                            --Steven Wright

I was skydiving horizontally.               --Steven Wright

If toast always lands butter-side down, and cats always land on their feet,
what happen if you strap toast on the back of a cat and drop it?
                                                        --Steven Wright

On my walls I have pictures of the rooms on the second floor, so I never
have to go upstairs.                                        --Steven Wright

I just redecorated my appartment.  I put fake brick wallpaper over a real
brick wall just so nobody would know.                       --Steven Wright

I bought some dehydrated water, but I don't know what to add to it.
                                                        --Steven Wright

I invented the cordless extension cord.         --Steven Wright

When I was little, my grandfather used to make me stand in a closet for five
minutes without moving.  He said it was elevator practice.  --Steven Wright

I saw a sign at a gas station.  It said "help wanted".  There was another
sign below it that said "self service".  So I hired myself.  Then I made
myself the boss.  I gave myself a raise.  I paid myself.  Then I quit.
                                                        --Steven Wright

A cop stopped me for speeding.  He said, "Why were you going so fast?"  I said,
"See this thing my foot is on?  It's called an accelerator.  When you push down
on it, it sends more gas to the engine.  The whole car just takes right off.
And see this thing [mimes steering wheel]?  This steers it".  --Steven Wright

Every so often, I like to go to the window, look up, and smile for a
satellite picture.                                           --Steven Wright

In Vegas, I got into a long argument with the man at the
roulette wheel over what I considered to be an odd number.   --Steven Wright

While I was gone, somebody rearranged all the furniture in my bedroom.
They put it in *exactly* the same place it was.  When I told my roommate,
he said "Do I know you?"                                    --Steven Wright

When I have a kid, I want to buy one of those strollers for
twins.  Then put the kid in and run around, looking frantic.  --Steven Wright

When the baby gets older, I'd tell him he used to have a brother, but he
didn't obey.                                                 --Steven Wright

I had a friend who was a clown.  When he died, all his friends went to the
funeral in one car.                                          --Steven Wright

I put instant coffee in a microwave and went back in time.  --Steven Wright

I want to get a tatoo of myself on my entire body only 2" taller.
                                                        --Steven Wright

I made wine out of raisins so I wouldn't have to wait for it to age.
                                                            --Steven Wright

I used to own an ant farm but had to give it up.
I couldn't find tractors small enough to fit it.         --Steven Wright

I couldn't find my socks this morning, so I called information.
She said they were behind the couch.  She was right.          --Steven Wright

I like to skate on the other side of the ice.           --Steven Wright

My house is made out of balsa wood, so when I want to scare the neighborhood
kids I lift it over my head and tell them to get out of my yard or I'll
throw it at them.                                         --Steven Wright

One time the power went out in my house and I had to use the flash on my
camera to see my way around.  I made a sandwich and took fifty pictures of
my face.  The neighbors thought there was lightning in my house.
                                                        --Steven Wright

Right now I'm having amnesia and deja-vue at the same time.  I think I've
forgotten this before.                                     --Steven Wright

Sponges grow in the ocean ... that *kills* me.
I wonder how much deeper they'd be if that didn't happen.    --Steven Wright

The judge asked: "what do you plead?" I said "Insanity.  Your Honor,
who in their right mind would park in the passing lane?      --Steven Wright

I got pulled over by a cop, and he said, "Do you know the speed limit here
is 50 miles per hour?".  So I said, "Oh, that's OK, I'm not going that far."
                                                            --Steven Wright

Someone sent me a postcard picture of the Earth.
On the back it said, "Wish you were here."              --Steven Wright

Cross country skiing is great if you live in a small country.  --Steven Wright

"Did you sleep well?"  "No, I made a couple of mistakes."     --Steven Wright

My dental hygienist is cute.  Every time I visit, I eat a whole package of
Oreo cookies while waiting in the lobby.  Sometimes she has to cancel the
rest of the afternoon's appointments.                         --Steven Wright

I hate it when my foot falls asleep during the day
because that means it's going to be up all night.            --Steven Wright

I went to the hardware store and bought some used paint.  It was in the
shape of a house.  I also bought some batteries, but they weren't included.
                                                            --Steven Wright

I went to the museum where they had all the heads and
arms from the statues that are in all the other museums.     --Steven Wright

What's another word for Thesaurus?                      --Steven Wright

When I was crossing the border into Canada, they asked if
I had any firearms with me.  I said, "Well, what do you need?"  --Steven Wright

I planted some bird seed.  A bird came up.  Now I don't know what to feed it.
                                                            --Steven Wright

I made a chocolate cake with white chocolate.  Then I took it to a potluck.
I stood in line for some cake.  They said, "Do you want white cake or
chocolate cake?"  I said, "yes".                             --Steven Wright

My aunt gave me a walkie-talkie for my birthday.  She says
if I'm good, she'll give me the other one next year.         --Steven Wright

I went to the bank and asked to borrow a cup of money.  They said,
"What for?"  I said, "I'm going to buy some sugar."          --Steven Wright

I eat Swiss cheese from the inside out.         --Steven Wright

I bought a million lottery tickets.  I won a dollar.    --Steven Wright

I got a chain letter by fax.  It's very simple.
You just fax a dollar bill to everybody on the list.         --Steven Wright

I plugged my phone in where the blender used to be.
I called someone.  They went "Aaaaahhhh..."             --Steven Wright

My friend Sam has one leg.  I went to his house.  I couldn't go up the stairs.
                                                        --Steven Wright

The sun never sets on the British Empire.  But it rises
every morning.  The sky must get awfully crowded.           --Steven Wright

I brought a mirror to Lovers' Lane.  I told everybody I'm Narcissus.
                                                        --Steven Wright

You know how it is when you decide to lie and say the check is in the mail, and
then you remember it really is?  I'm like that all the time.  --Steven Wright

How many people does it take to change a searchlight bulb?      --Steven Wright

I was in the grocery store.  I saw a sign that said "pet supplies".  So I did.
Then I went outside and saw a sign that said "compact cars".  --Steven Wright

I wear my heart on my sleeve.  I wear my liver on my pant leg.  --Steven Wright

If you can wave a fan, and you can wave a club,
can you wave a fan club?                                --Steven Wright

When I was in boy scouts, I slipped on the ice and hurt my ankle.  A little
old lady had to help me across the street.              --Steven Wright

You know how it is when you're reading a book and falling asleep, you're
reading, reading...  and all of a sudden you notice your eyes are closed?
I'm like that all the time.                             --Steven Wright

My roommate got a pet elephant.  Then it got lost.
It's in the apartment somewhere.            --Steven Wright

Smoking cures weight problems...  eventually...         --Steven Wright

Yesterday I told a chicken to cross the road.  It said, "what for?
                                                        --Steven Wright

I xeroxed my watch.  Now I have time to spare.          --Steven Wright

I took a course in speed waiting.  Now I can wait an hour in 10 minutes.
                                                        --Steven Wright

I eat swiss cheese, but I only nibble on it.  I make the holes bigger.
                                                        --Steven Wright

I moved into an all-electric house.  I forgot and left the porch light on
all day.  When I got home the front door wouldn't open.      --Steven Wright

You know how it is when you go to be the subject of a psychology experiment,
and nobody else shows up, and you think maybe that's part of the experiment?
I'm like that all the time.                               --Steven Wright

My friend Sally is a nudist.  I went to her house.  The closets have no doors.
The walls are covered with see-through wallpaper.         --Steven Wright

My friend Sally is a nudist.  When she plays strip poker and loses, she has
to put something on.                                      --Steven Wright

The sky is falling...  no, I'm tipping over backwards.    --Steven Wright

Is "tired old cliche" one?                              --Steven Wright

If you tell a joke in the forest, but nobody laughs, was it a joke?
                                                        --Steven Wright

It only rains straight down.  God doesn't do windows.   --Steven Wright

The sign said "eight items or less".  So I changed my name to Les.
                                                            --Steven Wright

Yesterday I saw a chicken crossing the road.  I asked it why.
It told me it was none of my business.                  --Steven Wright

I rented a lottery ticket.  I won a million dollars, but I had to return it.
                                                        --Steven Wright

In school, every period ends with a bell.  Every sentence ends with a period.
Every crime ends with a sentence.                          --Steven Wright

I xeroxed a mirror.  Now I have an extra xerox machine.     --Steven Wright

I went to San Francisco.  I found someone's heart.   --Steven Wright

A beautiful woman moved in next door.  So I went over and returned
a cup of sugar.  "You didn't borrow this."  "I will."       --Steven Wright

I had my coathangers spayed.                               --Steven Wright

The Bermuda Triangle got tired of warm weather.  It moved to Alaska.
Now Santa Claus is missing.                             --Steven Wright

I went to a fancy french restaurant called "Deja Vu."
The headwaiter said, "Don't I know you?"                --Steven Wright

I had some eyeglasses.  I was walking down the street when suddenly the
prescription ran out.                                    --Steven Wright

I put my air conditioner in backwards.  It got cold outside.  The weatherman
on TV was confused.  "It was supposed to be hot today."    --Steven Wright

I was in the first submarine.  Instead of a periscope, they had a kaleidoscope.
"We're surrounded."                                      --Steven Wright

I went camping and borrowed a circus tent by mistake.  I didn't notice until
I got it set up.  People complained because they couldn't see the lake.
                                                        --Steven Wright

When I turned two I was really anxious, because I'd doubled my age in a year.
I thought, if this keeps up, by the time I'm six I'll be 90.  --Steven Wright

It's a fine night to have an evening.           --Steven Wright

Even snakes are afraid of snakes.               --Steven Wright

I can't stop thinking like this.                --Steven Wright

This isn't all true.            --Steven Wright

You know how it is when you're walking up the stairs, and you get to the top,
and you think there's one more step?  I'm like that all the time.
                                                        --Steven Wright

Tinsel is really snakes' mirrors.               --Steven Wright

My grandfather gave me a watch.  It doesn't have any hands or numbers.
He says it's very accurate.  I asked him what time it was.  You can guess
what he told me.                                          --Steven Wright

I spent all my money on a FAX machine.  Now I can only FAX collect.
                                                        --Steven Wright

If a word in the dictionary were mispelled, how would we know?  --Steven Wright

If God dropped acid, would he see people?               --Steven Wright

All the plants in my house are dead -- I shot them last night.  I was teasing
them by watering them with ice cubes.                      --Steven Wright

When I was five years old I was on a merry-go-round.  There was a gunshot
nearby.  The horses stampeded.  There I was running down the street on a
purple wooden horse.                                         --Steven Wright

I'm kinda tired.  I was up all night trying to round off infinity.  Then I got
bored and went out and painted passing lines on curved roads.  --Steven Wright

Doin' a little work around the house.  Putting hardwood floors over wall-to
wall carpeting.  I put fake brick wallpaper over a real brick wall, just so
I'd be the only one who knew.  People come over and I'm gonna say "Go ahead,
touch it, it feels real".                                     --Steven Wright

My girlfriend does her nails with white-out.  When she's asleep,
I go over there and write misspelled words on them.           --Steven Wright

One night I walked home very late and fell asleep in somebody's satellite dish.
My dreams were showing up on TV's all over the world.       --Steven Wright

I went to a general store.  They wouldn't let me buy anything specifically.
                                                        --Steven Wright

I was watching the Superbowl with my 92 year old grandfather.  The team
scored a touchdown.  They showed the instant replay.  He thought they scored
another one.  I was gonna tell him, but I figured the game HE was watching
was better.                                                 --Steven Wright

It's a good thing we have gravity or else when birds died they'd just stay
right up there.  Hunters would be all confused.             --Steven Wright

I wrote a few children's books...not on purpose.            --Steven Wright

I wrote a song, but I can't read music so I don't know what it is.  Every once
in awhile I'll be listening to the radio and I say, "I think I might have
written that."                                             --Steven Wright

So, do you live around here often?              --Steven Wright

When I was a little kid we had a sand box.  It was a
quicksand box.  I was an only child... eventually.            --Steven Wright

(Referring to a glass of water:)  I mixed this myself.
Two parts H, one part O.  I don't trust anybody!              --Steven Wright

I love to go shopping.  I love to freak out salespeople.  They ask me if
they can help me, and I say, "Have you got anything I'd like?"  Then they
ask me what size I need, and I say, "Extra medium."           --Steven Wright

I was reading the dictionary, I thought it was a poem about everything.
                                                              --Steven Wright

I saw a tree fall in the woods, and I didn't hear it.   --Steven Wright

I washed mud off of mud.                --Steven Wright

I took a baby shower.                   --Steven Wright

I didn't get a toy train like the other kids, I got a toy subway instead;
you couldn't see anything but every now and then you'd hear this rumbling
noise go by.                                      --Steven Wright

When I was a kid, I went to the store and ask the guy,
"Do you have any toy train schedules?"             --Steven Wright

When I was 8, I played little league.  I was on first; I stole third; I went
straight across.  Earlier that week, I learned that the shortest distance
between two points was a direct line.  I took advantage of that knowledge.
                                                            --Steven Wright

I couldn't find the remote to the remote.               --Steven Wright

I busted a mirror and got seven years bad luck,
but my lawyer thinks he can get me five.              --Steven Wright

The other day I ... no wait, that wasn't me.            --Steven Wright

You know how it feels when you're leaning back on a chair, and you lean too
far back, and you almost fall over backwards, but then you catch yourself
at the last second?  I feel like that all the time.        --Steven Wright

There is a thin line between fishing and standing on the shore
looking like an idiot.                                   --Steven Wright

I hooked up my accelerator pedal in my car to my brake lights.
I hit the gas, people behind me stop, and I'm gone.     --Steven Wright

I have a microwave fireplace in my house.  The other night I laid down
in front of the fire for the evening in two minutes.     --Steven Wright

I once tried to commit suicide by jumping off a building.  I changed my
mind at the last minute, so I just flipped over and landed on my feet.
Two little kittens nearby saw what happened and one turns to the other
and says, "See, that's how it's done."                      --Steven Wright

If you melt dry ice in a pool and go swimming, will you get wet?
                                                          --Steven Wright

I was trying to daydream, but my mind kept wandering.     --Steven Wright

I'm moving to Mars next week, so if you have any boxes...  --Steven Wright

Power outage at a department store yesterday,
twenty people were trapped on the escalators.         --Steven Wright

I like to reminisce with people I don't know.           --Steven Wright

I like to fill my tub up with water, then turn the shower
on and act like I'm in a submarine that's been hit.          --Steven Wright

When I get real bored, I like to drive downtown and get a great parking
spot, then sit in my car and count how many people ask me if I'm leaving.
                                                             --Steven Wright

Winny and I lived in a house that ran on static electricity.  If you wanted
to run the blender, you had to rub balloons on your head.     --Steven Wright

Winny would spend all of his time practicing limbo.
He got pretty good.  He could go under a rug.              --Steven Wright

The guy who lives above me designs synthetic hairballs for ceramic cats.
                                                           --Steven Wright

My neighbor tried to rob a store with a pricing gun.  She said,
"Give me the cash, or I'm marking down everything."     --Steven Wright

Last year we drove across the country.  We switched on the driving every
half mile.  We had one cassette tape to listen to on the entire trip.
I don't remember what it was.                               --Steven Wright

One day, when I came home from work, I accidently put my car key in the door
of my apartment building.  I turned it, and the whole building started up.
So I drove it around.  A policeman stopped me for going too fast.  He said,
"Where do you live?"  I said, "Right here."  Then I drove my building onto
the middle of a highway, and I ran outside, and told all of the cars to get
the hell out of my driveway.                                 --Steven Wright

I saw a close friend of mine the other day.  He said "Stephen, why haven't
you called me?"  I said, "I can't call everyone I want, my new phone has no
'five' on it."  He said, "How long have you had it?"  I said, "I don't know,
my calendar has no sevens on it."                            --Steven Wright

There's a pizza place near where I live that sells only slices.
in the back you can see a guy tossing a triangle in the air.  --Steven Wright

I had to stop driving my car for awhile, the tires got dizzy.  --Steven Wright

Do you think that when they asked George Washington for ID
that he just whipped out a quarter?                             --unknown

I love the Stones.  I watch them whenever I can.  Fred, Barney..
                                                        --Steven Wright

I saw a man with a wooden leg, and a real foot.         --Steven Wright

I was going to commit suicide the other day, but I must not have been
serious because I brought a beach towel.                --Steven Wright

I replaced the headlights on my car with strobe lights.
Now it looks like I'm the only one moving.              --Steven Wright

I'm writing a book.  I've got the page numbers done.    --Steven Wright

My friend has a baby.  I'm recording all the noises he makes so later I
can ask him what he meant.                              --Steven Wright

I got my driver's license photo taken out of focus on purpose.  Now when I
get pulled over the cop looks at it [moving it nearer and farther, trying
to see it clearly]....  and says "Here, you can go."      --Steven Wright

I watched the Indy 500, and I was thinking that if they left earlier
they wouldn't have to go so fast.                        --Steven Wright

I used to be a bartender at the Betty Ford Clinic.      --Steven Wright

I put contact lenses in my dog's eyes.  They had little pictures of cats
on them.  Then I took one out and he ran around in circles.  --Steven Wright

I'm writing an unauthorized autobiography.              --Steven Wright

I went down the street to the 24-hour grocery.  When I got there, the
guy was locking the front door.  I said, "Hey, the sign says you're open
24-hours."  He said, "Yeah, but not in a row."            --Steven Wright

My neighbor has a circular driveway... he can't get out.    --Steven Wright

I was born by Ceasarian Section, but not so you'd notice.  It's just
that when I leave a house, I go out through the window.    --Steven Wright

After they make styrofoam, what do they ship it in?     --Steven Wright

My grandfather invented Cliff's Notes.  It all started back in 1912.
Well, to make a long story short...                       --Steven Wright

I saw a subliminal advertising executive, but only for a second.
                                                        --Steven Wright

I bought my brother some gift-wrap for Christmas. I took and to the Gift
Wrap department and told them to wrap it, but in a different print so he
would know when to stop unwrapping.             --Steven Wright

I saw a small bottle of cologne and asked if it was for sale.  She said it's
Free With Purchase.  I asked her if anyone bought anything today.
                                                           --Steven Wright

I broke my arm trying to fold a bed.  It wasn't the kind that folds.
                                                        --Steven Wright

I have an answering machine in my car. It says "I'm home now,
but leave a message and I'll call when I'm out."         --Steven Wright

I bought a self learning record to learn Spanish, I turned it on and went to
sleep, the record got stuck, the next day I could only stutter in Spanish.
                                                        --Steven Wright

I bought a house on a one-way dead-end road.  I don't know how I got there.
                                                           --Steven Wright

I installed a skylight in my apartment.  The people who live above me
are furious.                                               --Steven Wright

Babies don't need a vacation, but I still see them at the beach... it
pisses me off!  I'll go over to a little baby and say "What are you
doing here?  You haven't worked a day in your life!"    --Steven Wright

My girlfriend asked me how long I was going to be gone on this tour.
I said "the whole time".                                    --Steven Wright

I can remember the first time I had to go to sleep.  Mom said, "Steven, time
to go to sleep."  I said "But I don't know how."  She said, "It's real easy.
Just go down to the end of tired and hang a left."  So I went down to the
end of tired, and just out of curiosity I hung a right.  My mother was there,
and she said "I thought I told you to go to sleep."       --Steven Wright

I went to this restaurant last night that was set-up like a big buffet
in the shape of a Ouija board.  You'd think about what kind of food you
want and the table would move across the floor to it.       --Steven Wright

One time a cop pulled me over for running a stop sign.  He said "Didn't you
see the stop sign?"  I said "Yeah, but I don't believe everything I read."
                                                            --Steven Wright

They say we're 98% water.  We're that close to drowning.    --Steven Wright

I went to the eye doctor and found out I needed glasses
for reading.  So, I got some flip-up contact lenses.        --Steven Wright

Four years ago..............no, it was yesterday.           --Steven Wright

I'd like to sing you a song about my old girlfriend.  It's called "They'll
Find Her When the Leaves Blow Away 'Cause I'm Not Raking 'Til Spring."
                                                            --Steven Wright

I have a hobby...I have the world's largest collection of sea shells.  I keep
it scattered on beaches all over the world.  Maybe you've seen some of it.
                                                            --Steven Wright

I got a new shadow.  I had to get rid of the other one, it wasn't doing
what I was doing.                                           --Steven Wright

The other day when I was walking through the woods, I saw a rabbit standing
in front of a candle making shadows of people on a tree.   --Steven Wright

I used to be an airline pilot.  I got fired because I kept locking the keys
in the plane.  They caught me on an 80-foot stepladder with a coathanger.
                                                           --Steven Wright

I used to work at a health food store.  I got fired for drinking straight
Bosco on the job.                                           --Steven Wright

Ever notice how irons have a setting for PERMANENT press?   --Steven Wright

If you take an oriental and turn him around so he faces west, does he
become disoriented?                                         --Steven Wright

I saw a want ad for "light housekeeping."  They said "Here, change
this bulb."  I said "I'll need some friends."               --Steven Wright

I forgot and left the lighthouse on all night.
Next day the sun wouldn't rise.                             --Steven Wright

I saw a vegetarian wearing a furry coat, so I looked closer.
It was made of grass.                                       --Steven Wright

The sun got confused about daylight savings.  It rose twice.
Everything had two shadows.                                 --Steven Wright

On the other hand, you have different fingers.              --Steven Wright

I saw a bank that said "24 Hour Banking", but I don't have that much time.
                                                            --Steven Wright

I like to go to art museums and name the untitled paintings.
Boy With Pail...  Kitten On Fire.               --Steven Wright

I went to a restaurant that serves "breakfast at any time".
So I ordered French Toast during the Renaissance.          --Steven Wright

I worked in a health food store once.  A guy came in and asked me, "If I
melt dry ice, can I take a bath without getting wet?"      --Steven Wright

I went to a 7-11 and asked for a 2x4 and a box of 3x5's.
The clerk said, "ten-four."                                --Steven Wright

Today I dialed a wrong number.  The other person said "Hello?"  and I
said, "Hi, could I speak to Joey?"  They said, "Uh, I don't think so,
he's only 2 months old."  I said, "I'll wait."             --Steven Wright

My house is on the median strip of a highway.  You don't really notice,
except I have to leave the driveway doing 60 MPH.          --Steven Wright

I play the harmonica.  The only way I can play is if I get my car going
really fast, and stick it out the window....  I put a new engine in
my car, but forgot to take the old one out.  Now my car goes 500 miles
per hour.  The harmonica sounds *amazing*.                 --Steven Wright

I saw a sign: "Rest Area 25 Miles".  That's pretty big.  Some people
must be really tired.                                      --Steven Wright

I was trying to daydream, but my mind kept wandering.    --Steven Wright

I went into this bar and sat down next to a pretty girl.  She looked at
me and said, "Hey, you have two different colored socks on."  I said,
"Yeah, I know, but to me they're the same because I go by thickness."
                                                        --Steven Wright

Last year I went fishing with Salvador Dali.  He was using a dotted line.
He caught every other fish.                             --Steven Wright

The other day, I was walking my dog around my building... on the ledge.
Some people are afraid of heights.  Not me, I'm afraid of widths.
                                                        --Steven Wright

My friend Winnie is a procrastinator.  He didn't
get his birthmark until he was eight years old.         --Steven Wright

My school colors were clear.  We'd say, "I'm not naked, I'm in the band."
                                                        --Steven Wright

Lots of comedians have people they try to mimic.  I mimic my shadow.
                                                        --Steven Wright

Why is the alphabet in that order?  Is it because of that song?
                                                        --Steven Wright

My VCR flashes 01:35, 01:35, 01:35, ...         --Steven Wright

She said, "Well, my analyst said I'm a nymphomaniac and I only like
Jewish cowboys.  By the way, my name is Denise."  I said, "Hello, Denise.
My name is Bucky Goldstein."                               --Steven Wright

I had a dream that all the victims of The Pill came back.  They were mad.
                                                        --Steven Wright

I filled out an application that said, "In case of emergency notify".
I wrote "Doctor".  What's my mother going to do?          --Steven Wright

My girlfriend and I went on a picnic.  I don't know how she did it, but she
got poison ivy on the brain.  When it itched, the only way she could scratch
it was to think about sandpaper.                          --Steven Wright

I have a map of the United States.  Actual size.  It says, "Scale: 1 mile =
1 mile."  I spent last summer folding it.  I also have a full-size map of
the world.  I hardly ever unroll it.                      --Steven Wright

Two babies were born on the same day at the same hospital.  They lay there and
looked at each other.  Their families came and took them away.  Eighty years
later, by a bizarre coincidence, they lay in the same hospital, on their
deathbeds, next to each other.  One of them looked at the other and said,
"So.  What did you think?"                                --Steven Wright

I had amnesia once or twice.            --Steven Wright

I still have my Christmas Tree.  I looked at it today.  Sure enough,
I couldn't see any forests.                             --Steven Wright

If you write the word "monkey" a million times,
do you start to think you're Shakespeare?               --Steven Wright

I had fried octopus last night.  You have to be really quiet when you
eat it.  Otherwise, it emits a cloud of black smoke and falls on the floor.
                                                            --Steven Wright

I got a garage door opener.  It can't close.  Just open.     --Steven Wright

There aren't enough days in the weekend.                --Steven Wright

Droughts are because God didn't pay his water bill.        --Steven Wright

If you had a million Shakespeares, could they write like a monkey?
                                                        --Steven Wright

I Xeroxed my watch.  Now I can give away free watches.       --Steven Wright

I took a course in speed reading.  Then I got Reader's Digest on microfilm.
By the time I got the machine set up, I was done.            --Steven Wright

Yesterday I found out what doughnuts are for.  You put them on doughbolts.
They hold dough airplanes together.  For kids, they make erector sets out
of play-dough.                                               --Steven Wright

I went to a haunted house, looked under the kitchen table, and found
spirit gum.                                                  --Steven Wright

I know the guy who writes all those bumper stickers.  He hates New York.
                                                             --Steven Wright

I washed a sock.  Then I put it in the dryer.  When I took it out,
it was gone.                                                 --Steven Wright

Last week I forgot how to ride a bicycle.               --Steven Wright

I took lessons in bicycle riding.  But I could only afford half of them.
Now I can ride a unicycle.                       --Steven Wright wannabe

I worked as a lumberjack for a lumber company.  All of the trees were
just 10 feet high and 1/4 inch thick.  We made paneling.
                                                 --Steven Wright wannabe

Called a blind date to set up a meeting at a restaurant.  I said, "I'll
be the one in the leather jacket."  She said, "I'll be the one drinking
sake."  Turned out it was one of those biker-sushi places.  We never met.
                                                --Steven Wright wannabe

Called a blind date to set up a meeting at a restaurant.  I said, "I'll
be the one driving the Mercedes and wearing a Rolex."  Never found her,
but when I got home my place was robbed.           --Steven Wright wannabe

A metaphor is like a simile.                       --Steven Wright wannabe

I was arrested for selling illegal-sized paper.    --Steven Wright wannabe

It takes money to make money because you have to copy the design exactly.
                                                    --Steven Wright wannabe

The only thing houseflies fear more than the Venus fly trap is the
hanging plant.                                      --Steven Wright wannabe

At the all-you-can-eat barbecue, you have to pay the regular dinner
price if you eat less than you can.                 --Steven Wright wannabe

For my sister's 50th birthday, I sent her a singing mammogram.
                                                --Steven Wright wannabe

The majority and I have both had the good sense to avoid each other as much
as possible.  We have both benefitted.                         --James Boe

If 7-11 is open 24 hours a day, 365 days a year,
why are there locks on the doors?                       --Ben Green

Why isn't phonetic spelled the way it sounds?           --Ben Green

The more noise a motor or a man makes the less power is available.
                                                        --W. R. McGeary

There are only 2 enterprises that refer to their
customers as users, and one is illegal.                 --Michael Hammer

Enjoyment is not a goal, it is a feeling that accompanies
important ongoing activity.                             --Paul Goodman

The great pleasure in life is doing what people say you cannot do.
                                                        --Walter Bagehot

Work is hard if you're paid to do it, and it's pleasure if you pay to be
allowed to do it.                                     --Finley Peter Dunne

The ugliest of trades have their moments of pleasure.  If I were a grave
digger, or even a hangman, there are some people I could work for with
a good deal of enjoyment.                                 --Douglas Jerrold

In the final choice a soldier's pack is not so heavy a burden as a
prisoner's chains.           --Dwight D. Eisenhower (first Inaugural Address)

When aiming for the lowest common denominator,
be prepared for the occasional division by zero.                --Anonymous

My body is producing milk.  Do you know how weird that is?  That's like
suddenly discovering you can get bacon from your elbow.
                --Murphy Brown in the episode where she gives birth

Committees do not design!  They are never held responsible, nor are they
rewarded or punished.  Committees can review.              --C. Gordon Bell

There is only one basic human right, the right to do as you damn well please.
And with it comes the only basic human duty, the duty to take the consequences.
                                                            --P.J. O'Rourke

You have to be a real stud hombre cybermuffin to handle Windows.  --Dave Barry

thespacebaronthisdeviceisbusted         --Trouble report seen at U. of Tulsa

Most of the... candidates' economic packages involve 'tax breaks,'
which is when the government, amid great fanfare, generously decides
to take not quite so much of your income.                      --Dave Barry

Backbite, v.: To speak of a man as you find him, when he can't find you.
                                                             --Ambrose Bierce

The computer is mightier than the pen, the sword, and usually, the programmer.
                                                        --Jennifer Nolan

I stopped believing in Santa Claus when I was six.  Mother took me to see
him in a department store and he asked for my autograph.   --Shirley Temple

Life is like a box of chocolates.  It's overpriced,
and most of the stuff in it sucks.                      --ObGumpism

Q: What do you call a short psychic who escapes from prison?
A: A small medium at large.                                     --Ben Green

There's nothing wrong with shooting, as long as the right people get shot.
                                                              --Dirty Harry

At the core of liberalism is the spoiled child -- miserable, as all spoiled
children are, unsatisfied, demanding, ill-disciplined, despotic and useless.
Liberalism is an ideology of sniveling brats.
                                        --PJ O'Rourke, "Give War A Chance"

The Soviet State wished to remake man and,
if one knows Russians, one can sympathize.    --Anthony Burgess

The crows seemed to be calling his name, thought Caw.
                                        --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

About Wagner's music:  It's better than it sounds.        --Mark Twain

We hang the petty thieves and appoint the great ones to public office.
                                                             --Aesop

THE WORST HOMING PIGEON IN HISTORY was released in Pembrokeshire in June 1953
and was expected to reach its base that evening.  It was returned by post,
dead, in a cardboard box eleven years later from Brazil.

When Congressman Newt Gingrich was a graduate student at Tulane University
I baptized him by immersion into the membership of the St. Charles Avenue
Baptist Church.  Perhaps I didn't hold him under long enough.
                                                 --(The Rev) G. Avery Lee

Sometimes it is said that man cannot be trusted with the government of himself.
Can he, then, be trusted with the government of others?  Or have we found
angels in the forms of kings to govern him?  Let history answer this question.
                                    --Thomas Jefferson, 1st Inagural Address

Every time history repeats itself, the price goes up.           --anonymous

Some will rob you with a six-gun, and some with a fountain pen.
                                                         --Woody Guthrie

When buying and selling are controlled by legislation, the first things to
be bought and sold are legislators.  --P.J. O'Rourke, "Parliament of Whores"

A: Dr Livingston I Presume.
Q: What is your full name, Dr Presume?          --PDQ Bach, "Knock, Knock"

IF the math or science or history contradicts the Bible, then that math,
science, or history is a LIE.  That's why I don't believe the Satanic lie
of evolution.                          --David L. Hanson (on talk.origins)

Bumper sticker seen on a Plumber's truck:
           In my business, a flush beats a full house.

Laws that forbid the carrying of arms..disarm only those who are neither
inclined nor determined to commit crimes.  Such laws make things worse for
the assaulted and better for the assailants; they serve rather to encourage
than prevent homicides, for an unarmed man may be attacked with greater
confidence than an armed one.
          --Thomas Jefferson quoting Cesare Beccaria, Criminologist 1764.

An ounce of pretension is worth a pound of manure.              --unknown

Specification documents for the 747:  1
    Ditto for Air Force One (a 747):  14000                   --Henry Spencer

I sometimes think that the Internet is a way to air out all the awful
odors which lurk in the American hinterland.   --Bruce Salem (on talk.origins)

One Bananosecond = the amount of time between slipping on the peel and
landing on the pavement.

Q: Why didn't they tell jokes in Jonestown?
A: The punch lines were too long.                       --Ben Green

Always read stuff that will make you look good
if you die in the middle of it.                         --P. J. O'Rourke

I used to think that the brain was the most wonderful organ in
my body.  Then I realized who was telling me this.           --Emo Phillips

There once was a girl named Irene
Who lived on distilled kerosene
But she started absorbin'
A new hydrocarbon
And since then has never benzene.                       --Anon

Please do not feed the squirrels.  If you feed the squirrels, they'll become
overweight and prone to disease.  Their population will grow, and they'll lose
their ability to forage for food on their own.  They will expect you to feed
them and will attack you if you don't.  They'll become like little welfare
recipients, and you wouldn't want to do this to them.
                                --Sign in Rocky Mountain National Park

Guns don't kill people.  Driving 40 in the fast lane kills people.
                                                --bumper sticker

Don't shoot me, I'll move over.       --bumper sticker

Honk if you're reloading.             --bumper sticker

The best way to convince a fool that he is wrong
is to let him have his own way.                         --Josh Billings

Boot up, log in, nerd out.                      --unknown

And doesn't it say something weird about the 90's when having your credit
card ready is an acceptable type of foreplay?  --Amy Ward--othello@iac.net

I don't want any yes-men around me.  I want everybody to tell me the
truth even if it costs them their jobs.   --Samuel Goldwyn (1882-1974)
                        (Rumored to have also been said by J. Caesar.)

Government is not reason.  It is not eloquence.  It is a force.
Like fire, a dangerous servant and a fearful master.    --G. Washington

If ease of use is the highest goal, we should all be driving golf carts.
                                                                --Larry Wall

It is seldom that liberty of any kind is lost all at once.       --Hume

A banker is a fellow who lends you his umbrella when the sun
is shining and wants it back the minute it begins to rain.      --Mark Twain

Be nice to your kids.  They'll choose your nursing home.        --Ken Applin

Beauty is in the eye of the beer holder.        --Ken Applin

3 kinds of people: those who can count & those who can't.       --Ken Applin

Why is "abbreviation" such a long word?         --Ken Applin

Don't use a big word where a diminutive one will suffice.       --Ken Applin

Every morning is the dawn of a new error.       --Ken Applin

A flying saucer results when a nudist spills his coffee.        --Ken Applin

For people who like peace and quiet: a phoneless cord.  --Ken Applin

I can see clearly now, the brain is gone...     --Ken Applin

I used up all my sick days, so I'm calling in dead.     --Ken Applin

Mental Floss prevents Moral Decay.      --Ken Applin

Madness takes its toll.  Please have exact change.      --Ken Applin

Proofread carefully to see if you any words out.        --Ken Applin

There cannot be a crisis today; my schedule is already full.    --Ken Applin

I'd explain it to you, but your brain would explode.    --Ken Applin

Ever stop to think, and forget to start again?          --Ken Applin

A conclusion is simply the place where you got tired of thinking.  --Ken Applin

Diplomacy - the art of letting someone have your way.   --Ken Applin

If things get any worse, I'll have to ask you to stop helping me.  --Ken Applin

If I want your opinion, I'll ask you to fill out the necessary forms.

Don't look back, they might be gaining on you.  --Ken Applin

It's not hard to meet expenses, they're everywhere.     --Ken Applin

Help Wanted: Telepath.  You know where to apply.        --Ken Applin

Look out for #1.  Don't step in #2 either.      --Ken Applin

Budget: A method for going broke methodically.  --Ken Applin

Car service:  If it ain't broke, we'll break it.        --Ken Applin

Shin: A device for finding furniture in the dark.       --Ken Applin

Do witches run spell checkers?                          --Ken Applin

Demons are a Ghouls best Friend.        --Ken Applin

Copywight 1994 Elmer Fudd.  All wights wesewved.        --Ken Applin

Department of Redundancy Department     --Ken Applin

Headline: Bear takes over Disneyland in Pooh D'Etat!    --Ken Applin

Cannot find REALITY.SYS.  Universe halted.      --Ken Applin

COFFEE.EXE Missing - Insert Cup and Press Any Key       --Ken Applin

Buy a Pentium 586/90 so you can reboot faster.  --Ken Applin

2 + 2 = 5 for extremely large values of 2.      --Ken Applin

Computers make very fast, very accurate mistakes.       --Ken Applin

Computers are not intelligent. They only think they are.        --Ken Applin

My software never has bugs.  It just develops random features.  --Ken Applin

C:\VISTA   C:\VISTA\GO   C:\PC\CRAWL                        --unknown

BREAKFAST.COM halted, cereal port not responding      --Ken Applin

The name is Baud, James Baud.   --Ken Applin

Access denied--nah nah na nah nah nah!      --Ken Applin

C:\> Bad command or file name! Go stand in the corner.  --Ken Applin

Bad command. Bad, bad command! Sit! Stay! Staaay..      --Ken Applin

Why doesn't DOS ever say "EXCELLENT command or filename!"       --Ken Applin

As a computer, I find your faith in technology amusing. --Ken Applin

Southern DOS: Y'all reckon? (Yep/Nope)  --Ken Applin

... File not found. Should I fake it? (Y/N)     --Ken Applin

Ethernet (n): something used to catch the etherbunny    --Ken Applin

A mainframe: The biggest PC peripheral available.       --Ken Applin

A computer's attention span is as long as its power cord.      --Ken Applin

Disinformation is not as good as datinformation.        --Ken Applin

SENILE.COM found... Out Of Memory...    --Ken Applin

Who's General Failure & why's he reading my disk?       --Ken Applin

Ultimate office automation: networked coffee.   --Ken Applin

RAM disk is *not* an installation procedure.    --Ken Applin

Shell to DOS... Come in DOS, do you copy? Shell to DOS...       --Ken Applin

Smash forehead on keyboard to continue...       --Ken Applin

Enter any 11-digit prime number to continue...  --Ken Applin

E-mail returned to sender --insufficient voltage.       --Ken Applin

Help! I'm modeming... and I can't hang up!      --Ken Applin

All wiyht. Rho sritched mg kegtops awound?      --Ken Applin

Error: Keyboard not attached. Press F1 to continue.     --Ken Applin

Press any key to continue or any other key to quit...   --Ken Applin

Excuse me for butting in, but I'm interrupt-driven.     --Ken Applin

REALITY.SYS corrupted: Reboot universe? (Y/N/Q) --Ken Applin

Sped up my XT; ran it on 220v! Works greO?_~"   --Ken Applin

Hit any user to continue.       --Ken Applin

2400 Baud makes you want to get out and push.   --Ken Applin

Disk Full - Press F1 to belch.  --Ken Applin

Backup not found: (A)bort (R)etry (P)anic       --Ken Applin

(A)bort, (R)etry, (T)ake down entire network?   --Ken Applin

(A)bort, (R)etry, (G)et a beer?                 --Ken Applin

If debugging is the process of removing bugs, then
programming must be the process of putting them in.             --Ken Applin

Programmers don't die, they just GOSUB without RETURN.          --Ken Applin

Programmer - A red-eyed, mumbling mammal capable
of conversing with inanimate objects.                   --Ken Applin

Real programmers don't document.  If it was
hard to write, it should be hard to understand.         --Ken Applin

Beware of programmers who carry screwdrivers.           --Ken Applin

A pessimist is one who has been intimately acquainted with an optimist.
                                                            --Elbert Hubbard

I believe every human has a finite number of heartbeats.  I don't intend
to waste any of mine running around doing exercises.        --Neil Armstrong

150 years ago everybody was a Christian Scientist.   --dmr

1776 - 1984
There Is No Middle Ground               --a button from the Libertarian Party

36% of the American Public believes that boiling radioactive milk makes it
safe to drink.  --survey results by Jon Miller, Northern Illinois University

Maybe you should call the Internet and talk to their tech support people.
        (Reply from an AOL tech-support rep speaking to a customer complaining
        about e-mail that failed to go through.)
        (SOURCE: Internet World, February 1995, p. 18)

Batten down the hatches, several thousand Zulus approaching from the north.
       --Christopher Commision report of LAPD car-to-car computer message, 7/91

Politicians in government should be changed
regularly, like diapers, for the same reason.     --British political aphorism

Actually, you just think that's a telephone.  Really,
it's the alarm that rings whenever I get out of my chair.       --E.S.

Q. Why are New Yorkers always depressed?
A. The light at the end of the tunnel is New Jersey.       --Fredrick Homan

The race may not be to the swift nor the victory
to the strong, but that's how you bet.             --Damon Runyon (1844-1946)

In an Orkin Exterminating Co. survey of what pests Pitsburghers fear most,
1.3% named their spouses and kids.       --Wall Street Journal, 26 May 1988

America: a country so rich and so strong we can reward the
lazy and punish the productive and still survive (so far).      --Don Melvin

America, land of the Constitution.  Void where prohibited.     --Don Melvin

True, money can't buy happiness, but it's not happiness I want, it's money.
                                                --Someone at the bus station

In a Copenhagen airline ticket office:
We take your bags and send them in all directions.

Forget the past.  No one becomes successful in the past.        --Anonymous

Anyone who says business people deal only in facts, not fiction, has never
read old five-year projections.                            --Malcolm Forbes

Accident: An inevitable occurrence due to the action of
immutable natural laws.                                   --Ambrose Bierce

One good teacher in a lifetime may sometimes
change a delinquent into a solid citizen.                      --Philip Wylie

Truth fears no trial.                           --Thomas Paine

Always bear in mind that your own resolution to
succeed is more important than any other one thing.     --Abraham Lincoln

It has been my observation that most people get
ahead during the time that others waste.                --Henry Ford

In great attempts it is glorious even to fail.          --Vince Lombardi

Don't just make a living, design a life.                --Jim Rohn

There is no limit to what can be accomplished
when no one cares who gets the credit.                  --John Wooden

You cannot escape the responsibility of tomorrow
by evading it today.                                    --Abraham Lincoln

It is kind of fun to do the impossible.                 --Walt Disney

No one can make you feel inferior without your consent.  --Eleanor Roosevelt

Between saying and doing many a pair of shoes is worn out.  --Italian Proverb

Wealth, I was discovering, is more accurately measured
in what you enjoy than in what you possess.         --Jean Aspen, "Arctic Son"

Any closet is a walk-in closet if you try hard enough.       --Steven Wright

Palindromic was I ere I saw Cimordnilap.                --David Dubin

There is no substitute for hard work.                   --Thomas Edison

Millions saw the apple fall, but Newton was the one who asked why.
                                                        --Bernard Baruch

I don't know the secret to success but the key to failure is to try to
please everyone.                                            --Bill Cosby

I was born by Caesarian section, but not so you'd notice.  It's
just that when I leave a house, I go out through the window.    --Steven Wright

Of all the strange "crimes" that humanity has legislated out of nothing,
"blasphemy" is the most amazing - with "obscenity" and "indecent
exposure" fighting it out for second and third place.        --Lazarus Long

The right to be heard does not include the right to be taken seriously.
                                                       --Hubert H. Humphrey

Error of opinion may be tolerated where reason is left free to combat it.
                        --Thomas Jefferson from his First Inaugural Address

Imagine how little used calculus would have been if a court had decided
that no one could study, use or do research on it without paying a royalty
to Newton's designated heirs.             --The Independent, October 5, 1992

Be braver.  You cannot cross a chasm in two small jumps.
                                                --Stephen R. van den Berg

He couldn't get a clue during the clue mating season in a field full of horny
clues if he smeared his body with clue musk and did the clue mating dance.
                                                            --Tom Limoncelli

The person who makes a success of living is the one who sees their goal
steadily and aims for it unswervingly.  That is dedication.
                                                        --Cecil B. DeMille

If you don't make a total commitment to whatever you're doing, then you start
looking to bail out the first time the boat starts leaking. It's tough enough
getting that boat to shore with everybody rowing, let alone when one person
stands up and starts putting their life jacket on.               --Lou Holtz

A stone thrown at the right time is better than gold given at the wrong time.
                                                            --Persian saying

To open a shop is easy, to keep it open is an art.      --Chinese saying

Nothing great was ever achieved without enthusiasm.     --Ralph Waldo Emerson

WARNING: Do not look into laser with remaining eye.  --Stephen R. van den Berg

One of the illusions of life is that the present hour is not the critical,
decisive hour.  Write it on your heart that every day is the best day of
the year.                                              --Ralph Waldo Emerson

No one can avoid aging, but aging productively is something else.
                                                        --Katharine Graham

I never worry about action, but only about inaction.    --Winston Churchill

The gods do not protect fools.  Fools are protected by more capable fools.
                                                              --Larry Niven

I think contraception is disgusting --people using each other for pleasure.
                        --Joseph Scheidler, Director, Pro-Life Action League

Shake and shake / The catsup bottle. / None will come, / And then a lot'll.
                                                        --Richard Armour

Sign at a nursery school: Please pick up your children
promptly after service.  No refunds after Wednesday.  --Stephen R. van den Berg

Lord, help me to be the man my dog thinks I am.
                               --bumper sticker seen in a church parking lot

Nothing helps a bad mood like spreading it around.      --Calvin & Hobbes

People call and say, "[Opossums]'re ugly."  And I say, "You might be
ugly, too.  But that doesn't mean I can have you eradicated."
              --Ellen Plachter (Wildlife Care Center, Ft. Lauderdale, Florida)

No person is so grand or wise or perfect as to be the master of another.
                                                                 --Karl Hess

Our mission is clear: make America drug-free in as short a time as possible
using any means necessary no matter what the cost.     --LtGen J.B. Conway

A loggerhead turtle fell from the sky and hit a man in his white Chevy Nova.
                       --Newspaper article, "Tallahassee Democrat", 9/17/95

Death and taxes are inevitable; at least death doesn't get worse every year.
                                --Cookie Monster <kmanley@bits.fc.hp.com>

Boys will be boys, and so will a lot of middle-aged men.       --Kin Hubbard

Windws is ine for bckgroun comunicaions.        --Bll Gats, 192

Prescriptions are no more moral than ration slips for food, vitamins,
or shoes.                                         --kpc@ptolemy.arc.nasa.gov

You need only reflect that one of the best ways to get yourself a reputation
as a dangerous citizen these days is to go about repeating the very phrases
which our founding fathers used in the struggle for independence.
                                                          --Charles A. Beard

A sign seen in a jewelry store window: "Ears pierced while you wait".
                                                --Stephen R. van den Berg

Those who expect to reap the blessings of freedom must, like men,
undergo the fatigue of supporting it.                         --Thomas Paine

Is your lifestyle BATF approved?                             --unknown

Those who have long enjoyed such privileges as we enjoy forget in time
that men have died to win them.                      --Franklin D. Roosevelt

No amount of experimentation can ever prove me right;
a single experiment can prove me wrong.              --Albert Einstein

All that is necessary for evil to triumph is for good men to do nothing.
                                                              --Edmund Burke

Poor people have access to the courts in the same sense that the
Christians had access to the lions.                 --Judge Earl Johnson Jr.

Question Authority and the Authorities will question You.       --unknown

I have traveled the length and breadth of this country and talked with the
best people, and I can assure you that data processing is a fad that won't
last out the year.
        --The editor in charge of business books for Prentice Hall, 1957

But what... is it good for?
                --Engineer at the Advanced Computing Systems Division of IBM,
                  1968, commenting on the microchip.

There is no reason anyone would want a computer in their home.
                --Ken Olson, president, chairman and founder of DEC, 1977

This "telephone" has too many shortcomings to be seriously considered
as a means of communication.  The device is inherently of no value to us.
                                        --Western Union internal memo, 1876

The wireless music box has no imaginable commercial value.  Who would
pay for a message sent to nobody in particular?
                --David Sarnoff's associates in response to his
                  urgings for investment in the radio in the 1920s.

The concept is interesting and well-formed, but in order to earn better
than a C, the idea must be feasible.
        --A Yale University management professor in response to Fred
          Smith's paper proposing reliable overnight delivery service.
          (Smith went on to found Federal Express Corp.)

Who the hell wants to hear actors talk?  --H.M. Warner, Warner Brothers, 1927

I'm just glad it'll be Clark Gable who's falling on his face
and not Gary Cooper.
        --Gary Cooper, on his decision not to take the leading role
          in "Gone With The Wind".

A cookie store is a bad idea.  Besides, the market research reports say
America likes crispy cookies, not soft and chewy cookies like you make.
        --Response to Debbi Fields' idea of starting Mrs. Fields' Cookies.

We don't like their sound, and guitar music is on the way out.
                        --Decca Recording Co. rejecting the Beatles, 1962.

Heavier-than-air flying machines are impossible.
                                --Lord Kelvin, president, Royal Society, 1895.

If I had thought about it, I wouldn't have done the experiment.
The literature was full of examples that said you can't do this.
                --Spencer Silver on the work that led to the unique
                  adhesives for 3-M Post-It Notepads.

So we went to Atari and said, "Hey, we've got this amazing thing, even built
with some of your parts, and what do you think about funding us?  Or we'll
give it to you.  We just want to do it.  Pay our salary, we'll come work for
you."  And they said, "No."  So then we went to Hewlett-Packard, and they said,
"Hey, we don't need you.  You haven't got through college yet."
        --Apple Computer Inc. founder Steve Jobs on attempts to get Atari
          and H-P interested in his and Steve Wozniak's personal computer.

Professor Goddard does not know the relation between action and reaction
and the need to have something better than a vacuum against which to react.
He seems to lack the basic knowledge ladled out daily in high schools.
                --1921 New York Times editorial about Robert Goddard's
                  revolutionary rocket work.

You want to have consistent and uniform muscle development across all of your
muscles?  It can't be done.  It's just a fact of life.  You just have to accept
inconsistent muscle development as an unalterable condition of weight training.
                                --Response to Arthur Jones, who solved the
                                  unsolvable problem by inventing Nautilus.

Drill for oil? You mean drill into the ground to try and find oil?
You're crazy.            --Drillers who Edwin L. Drake tried to enlist
                           to his project to drill for oil in 1859.

Stocks have reached what looks like a permanently high plateau.
                --Irving Fisher, Professor of Economics, Yale University, 1929

Airplanes are interesting toys but of no military value.
                --Marechal Ferdinand Foch, Professor of Strategy, Ecole
                  Superieure de Guerre.

Everything that can be invented has been invented.
                --Charles H. Duell, Commissioner, U.S. Office of Patents, 1899

Louis Pasteur's theory of germs is ridiculous fiction.
                --Pierre Pachet, Professor of Physiology at Toulouse, 1872

The abdomen, the chest, and the brain will forever be shut from the intrusion
of the wise and humane surgeon.
                --Sir John Eric Ericksen, British surgeon, appointed
                  Surgeon-Extraordinary to Queen Victoria 1873.

640K ought to be enough for anybody.            --Bill Gates, 1981

On March 21, 1995, the state of Mississippi ratified the Thirteenth
Amendment to the U.S. Constitution and officially abolished slavery.
                                                --Harper's Index, July, 1995

I, personally, decided during my childhood, that I'd never eat something I
wouldn't kill myself.  Gets rid of all kinds of moral dilemmas.  The real
jump is to generalize to the moral principle that you refuse to benefit from
any activity you wouldn't perform yourself.  --Kirk Hays <khays@sequent.com>

I yam Popeye of Borg.  You will be askimilgrated.       --Corey D. Brenner

For every credibility gap, there is a gullibility fill.       --R. Clopton

He didn't administer the reign of terror, just the occasional light shower.
                                                --Terry Pratchett, "Sorcery"

And in all of Babylonia there was wailing and gnashing of teeth, till the
prophets bade the multitudes get a grip on themselves and shape up.
                                                            --Woody Allen

I haven't committed a crime.  What I did was fail to comply with the law.
      --David Dinkins, New York City Mayor, answering accusations
        that he failed to pay his taxes.

They gave me a book of checks.  They didn't ask for any deposits.
      --Congressman Joe Early (D-Mass) at a press conference to answer
        questions about the House Bank scandal.

He didn't say that.  He was reading what was given to him in a speech.
         --Richard Darman, director of OMB, explaining why President Bush
           wasn't following up on his campaign pledge that there would be
           no loss of wetlands

It depends on your definition of asleep.  They were not stretched out.
They had their eyes closed.  They were seated at their desks with their
heads in a nodding position.
      --John Hogan, Commonwealth Edison Supervisor of News Information,
        responding to a charge by a Nuclear Regulatory Commission inspector
        that two Dresden Nuclear Plant operators were sleeping on the job.

I didn't accept it.  I received it.
      --Richard Allen, National Security Advisor to President Reagan,
        explaining the $1000 in cash and two watches he was given by two
        Japanese journalists after he helped arrange a private interview
        for them with First Lady Nancy Reagan.

I was a pilot flying an airplane and it just so happened that where I was
flying made what I was doing spying.
        --Francis Gary Power, U-2 reconnaissance pilot held by the Soviets
          for spying, in an interview after he was returned to the US

I was under medication when I made the decision not to burn the tapes.
                                        --President Richard Nixon

I support efforts to limit the terms of members of Congress, especially
members of the House and members of the Senate.     --former VP Dan Quayle

Outside of the killings, Washington has one of the lowest crime rates
in the country.                      --Mayor Marion Barry, Washington, D.C.

Sure, it's going to kill a lot of people, but they may be dying of something
else anyway.
     --Othal Brand, member of a Texas pesticide review board, on chlordane

Beginning in February 1976 your assistance benefits will be discontinued.
Reason: it has been reported to our office that you expired on January 1, 1976.
                        --Letter from the Illinois Department of Public Aid

In the early sixties, we were strong, we were virulent...
     --John Connally, Secretary of Treasury under Richard Nixon, in an
       early 70s speech, as reported in a contemporary American Scholar

The streets are safe in Philadelphia.  It's only the people who make
them unsafe.       --Frank Rizzo, ex-police chief and mayor of Philadelphia

I've always thought that underpopulated countries in Africa are vastly
underpolluted.      --Lawrence Summers, chief economist of the World Bank,
        explaining why we should export toxic wastes to Third World countries

The crime bill passed by the Senate would reinstate the Federal death penalty
for certain violent crimes: assassinating the President; hijacking an airliner;
and murdering a government poultry inspector.
                                --Knight Ridder News Service dispatch

After finding no qualified candidates for the position of principal, the
school board is extremely pleased to announce the appointment of David Steele
to the post.    --Philip Streifer, Superintendent of Schools, Barrington, RI

DOS is Protestant, or even Calvinistic.  It allows free interpretation
of scripture, demands difficult personal decisions, imposes a subtle
hermeneutics upon the user, and takes for granted the idea that not all
can reach salvation.       --Umberto Eco, in "Espresso," September 30, 1994.

Why is it, "A penny for your thoughts," but, "You have
to put your two cents in?"  Somebody's making a penny.     --Steven Wright

We are Pentium of Borg.  Precision is futile.  You will be approximated.
                                                           --Paul Smith

I don't recommend it, but it can be done.
             --Chuck Yeager, fighter pilot and legendary test pilot, when
               talking about flying fighter planes in combat drunk off his ass

It's men like him that give the Y chromosome a bad name.     --Kevin Robinson

Politics is not a bad profession.  If you succeed there are many
rewards, if you disgrace yourself you can always write a book.  --Ronald Reagan

Oh, to be only half as wonderful as my child thought I was when he was small,
and only half as stupid as my teenager now thinks I am.    --Rebecca Richards

Woman's virtue is man's greatest invention.         --Cornelia Otis Skinner

It is the greatest of all mistakes to do nothing because you can do
only a little.  Do what you can.                           --Sydney Smith

The ability to accept responsibility is the measure of the man.  --Roy L. Smith

Remember when we all wanted to look like Elizabeth Taylor?  Well, now I do.
                                                                --Carrie Snow

Science is the refusal to believe on the basis of hope.         --C .P. Snow

Time: That which man is always trying to kill, but which ends in
killing him.                                                 --Herbert Spencer

Man does not live by words alone, despite the fact that sometimes he
has to eat them.                                         --Adlai Stevenson

An editor is one who separates the wheat from the chaff and prints the chaff.
                                                            --Adlai Stevenson

First Law of Socio-Genetics: celibacy is not hereditary.        --unknown

Intoxicated: to feel sophisticated but not be able to say it.   --unknown

Aquadextrous, adj.: Possessing the ability to turn the bathtub faucet on
and off with your toes.                            --Rich Hall, "Sniglets"

My vocabulary was as bad as, like, whatever.            --Jim Howard

When their numbers dwindled from 50 down to 8, the remaining dwarfs began
to suspect "Hungry".                                         --Jim Howard

When I started programming, we didn't have any of these sissy 'icons' and
'windows'.  All we had were zeros and ones -- and sometimes we didn't even
have ones.                                      --Dilbert (by Scott Adams)

When aiming for the common denominator, be prepared for the occasional
division by zero.                                               --Jim Howard

Cartoon Law #2:  Everything falls faster than an anvil.         --Jim Howard

Heavy, adj.: Seduced by the chocolate side of the force.        --Jim Howard

Windows is *not* a virus.  Viruses *do* something.              --Jim Howard

Q: What has four legs and an arm?
A: A *very* happy pit bull.                                     --Jim Howard

Women's Libbers are OK.  I just wouldn't want my sister to marry one.
                                                --Wotan <wotan@netcom.com>

You're the type of guy who'd give a Rubik's Cube to Forrest Gump.
                                                     --Local DJ, station Z93

I want to thank everybody who made this day necessary.          --Yogi Berra

If you can't imitate him, don't copy him.
                                --Yogi Berra advising a player trying to
                                  crowd the plate like Frank Robinson

He must have made that before he died.
                            --Yogi Berra, on a movie starring Steve McQueen

Always go to other people's funerals; otherwise they won't go to yours.
                                                                --Yogi Berra

Time is money: anyone telling you otherwise is asking for a
*non-returnable* handout.                                  --Philip Guenther

"Am a perfectionist and rarely if if ever forget details."
                --From a list of resume errors collected by personnel
                  expert Robert Half, Forbes, page 28, 5/6/96

Censorship works best when you have quiet fear, not open hostility.
                                --Richard Jay Solomon <rjs@rpcp.mit.edu>

It is the duty of every free person to oppose attempts by politicians,
police, teachers and medical authorities to control who and what adults
put into their bodies.                                           --Guy Geens

Q:  How many right-to-lifers does it take to change a light bulb?
A:  Two.  One to screw it in and one to say that light
    started when the screwing began.                        --wotan@netcom.com

The Internet interprets the US Congress as damage and routes around it.
                                                                   --unknown

Criticism is particularly objectionable when it is directed toward church
authorities, general or local.  Evil speaking of the Lord's anointed is in a
class by itself.  It is one thing to depreciate a person who exercises
corporate power or even government power.  It is quite another thing to
criticize or depreciate a person for the performance of an office to which he
or she has been called of God.  It does not matter that the criticism is true.
                        --Dallin H. Oaks, Former Justice, Utah Supreme Court
                        Apostle, Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-Day Saints

Many a man owes his success to his first wife and his second wife to
his success.                                                     --Jim Backus

I heard that love is entirely a matter of chemistry.  That must be why
my wife treats me like toxic waste.                       --David Bissonette

I've sometimes thought of marrying, and then I've thought again.
                                                --Noel Coward, 1956

A man is incomplete until he is married.  After that, he is finished.
                                                            --Zsa Zsa Gabor

I'm an excellent housekeeper.  Every time I get a divorce, I keep
the house.                                                  --Zsa Zsa Gabor

When a man steals your wife, there is no better revenge than to let
him keep her.                                               --Sacha Guitry

Marriage is like pi: natural, irrational, and very important.  --Lisa Hoffman

She's a lovely person.  She deserves a good husband.  Marry her before
she finds one.     --Oscar Levant to Harpo Marx upon meeting Harpo's fiancee

Eighty percent of married men cheat in America.  The rest cheat in Europe.
                                                              --Jackie Mason

Marriage is like a cage; one sees the birds outside desperate to get in,
and those inside desperate to get out.                           --Montaigne

After marriage, husband and wife become two sides of a coin; they just
can't face each other, but still they stay together.           --Hemant Joshi

By all means marry.  If you get a good wife, you'll be happy.  If you get a
bad one, you'll become a philosopher...and that is a good thing for any man.
                                                                --Socrates

A successful man is one who makes more money than his wife can spend.
A successful woman is one who can find such a man.      --Lana Turner

Marriage is a great institution, but I'm not ready for an institution.
                                                        --Mae West

Marriage is a three ring circus: engagement ring, wedding ring, suffering.
                                                                --unknown

Marriage is bliss.  Ignorance is bliss.  Therefore ...          --unknown

Marriage is not a word; it is a sentence.                       --unknown

Marriage is the triumph of imagination over intelligence.
Second marriage is the triumph of hope over experience.         --unknown

Marriage is when a man and woman become as one;
the trouble starts when they try to decide which one.           --unknown

They say marriages are made in heaven.  So is thunder and lightning.
                                                         --Clint Eastwood

Before marriage, a man yearns for the woman he loves.
After marriage, the 'Y' becomes silent.                         --unknown

I had some words with my wife, and she had some paragraphs with me.  --unknown

If you want your spouse to listen and pay strict attention to every
word you say, talk in your sleep.                               --unknown

In America, any boy may become president and I suppose that's just one
of the risks he takes.                                  --Adlai Stevenson

Hell hath no fury like a bureaucrat scorned.            --Milton Friedman

The typewriting machine, when played with expression, is no more annoying
than the piano when played by a sister or near relation.       --Oscar Wilde

A great obstacle to good education is the inordinate passion prevalent for
novels, and the time lost in that reading which should be instructively
employed.  When this poison infects the mind, it destroys its tone and
revolts it against wholesome reading.  Nothing can engage attention unless
dressed in all the figments of fancy, and nothing so bedecked comes amiss.
The result is a bloated imagination, sickly judgment, and disgust towards
all the real business of life.
       --from a letter Thomas Jefferson wrote to John Adams on June 10th, 1815
         "Citizen Jefferson: The Wit and Wisdom of an American Sage"

There's plenty of youth around, what we need is a fountain of *smart*.
                                        --Jon Hamilton  <hamilton@mixcom.com>

I conclude that the CDA is unconstitutional and that the First Amendment
denies Congress the power to regulate protected speech on the Internet.
                               --Judge Stewart Dalzell in "ACLU v. Reno"

Don't Like My Driving?
http://www.byte.me.com                  --Silicon Valley bumper sticker

Total economic equality will be achieved when
tax freedom day reaches December 31st.                  --LNUSMCD.BZCZ97

Only the morally courageous can speak to their
fellow man for two hours in the dark.             --Frank Capra, filmmaker

On his birthday he sent himself flowers, took himself out to dinner,
invited himself up for a drink, and damn near got lucky.      --The Top 5 List

Cheque not in the post yet; still trying
to separate blood from stone.           --Dave Blake <dave.blake@reuters.com>

Concerto (n): a fight between a piano and a pianist.            --Beth Nicol

Optimist: someone who says a glass is half full.
Pessimist: someone who says a glass is half empty.
Reengineering consultant:  "You've got twice as much glass as you need."
                                                        --Steven Johnson

In the long run the pessimist may be proved right,
but the optimist has a better time on the trip.        --Daniel L. Reardon

Always give generously; a small bird or rodent
left on the bed tells them, "I care".           --A cat's guide to life

Great Lover, n.: A man who can breathe through his ears.
                                                --Wotan <wotan@netcom.com>

The Number 1 Sign You're Pledging the Wrong Sorority or Fraternity:
"Smegma" may sound like a letter in the Greek alphabet, but it's not.
                                        --The Top Five List, top5@walrus.com

I'd like to have a dinner party and invite John Tesh
and Charles Manson.  Not for their company, but because
I really don't like John Tesh.                                  --Steve Hurd

Why you might be the reincarnation of someone famous #14:
Working on your back under the car, you get the sudden urge to paint a church.
                                        --The Top Five List, top5@walrus.com

Why you might be the reincarnation of someone famous #13:
Same thing every morning: wake up, brush teeth, carve "SID" into your
chest with a razor blade.
                                        --The Top Five List, top5@walrus.com

Why you might be the reincarnation of someone famous #12:
You can actually sing Bohemian Rhapsody without sounding like a complete idiot.
                                        --The Top Five List, top5@walrus.com

Why you might be the reincarnation of someone famous #11:
When your boss criticizes your sales projection figures, you hack off your ear.
                                        --The Top Five List, top5@walrus.com

Why you might be the reincarnation of someone famous #10:
Disqualified during Swim Suit Competition for smoking cigar and wiggling
eyebrows at other contestants.
                                        --The Top Five List, top5@walrus.com

Why you might be the reincarnation of someone famous #9: Can't understand why
a fine doctor like yourself is being sued for putting leeches on a patient.
                                        --The Top Five List, top5@walrus.com

Why you might be the reincarnation of someone famous #8:
Century after century, you find Shirley MacLaine consistently annoying.
                                        --The Top Five List, top5@walrus.com

Why you might be the reincarnation of someone famous #7:
Not only do you consider Yoko an artistic genius, but you love her
singing voice.
                                        --The Top Five List, top5@walrus.com

Why you might be the reincarnation of someone famous #6:
Whenever you get sick, it's always a rockin' pneumonia or a boogie-woogie flu.
                                        --The Top Five List, top5@walrus.com

Why you might be the reincarnation of someone famous #5:
In preparation for Hurricane Hortense, you build a giant boat and start
stealing your neighbors' pets.
                                        --The Top Five List, top5@walrus.com

Why you might be the reincarnation of someone famous #4:
You cannot tell a lie.  Regardless, you considering running for president.
                                        --The Top Five List, top5@walrus.com

Why you might be the reincarnation of someone famous #3:
Other scouts return from that first mountain hike with poison ivy; *you're*
lugging tablets of inscribed stone.
                                        --The Top Five List, top5@walrus.com

Why you might be the reincarnation of someone famous #2:
You fill your pants every time you hear the words, "Little Bighorn."
                                        --The Top Five List, top5@walrus.com

Why you might be the reincarnation of someone famous #1:
Timmy is stuck in the old mine and all you can do is bark as your husband
asks, "What is it, girl?!?"
                                        --The Top Five List, top5@walrus.com

Imagine if every Thursday your shoes exploded if you
tied them the usual way.  This happens to us all the
time with computers, and nobody thinks of complaining.          --Jeff Raskin

#1 on Forrest Gump's "To Do" List:
Pee;  Unzip pants;  Change order of "TO DO" List.
                                        --The Top Five List, top5@walrus.com

#2 on Forrest Gump's "To Do" List:
Socks first, THEN shoes.                --The Top Five List, top5@walrus.com

#3 on Forrest Gump's "To Do" List:
Send a thank you note to Mr. Simpson for
the swell knife he gave me on the plane.   --The Top Five List, top5@walrus.com

MacDonald has the gift of compressing the largest
amount of words into the smallest amount of thoughts.   --Winston Churchill

I can't believe that we are going to let a majority
of the people decide what is best for this state.
                                    --Rep. John Travis, D-Jackson, Louisiana

These are indeed harsh times for the dim.       --jott@snugbug.cts.com

Owing to past neglect, in the face of the plainest warnings, we have
now entered upon a period of danger.  The era of procrastination, of
half measures... of delays, is coming to its close.  In its place we
are entering a period of consequences...  We cannot avoid this period;
we are in it now.  Unless... [management] resolves to find out the
truth for itself, it will have committed an act of abdication of duty
without parallel.                           --Winston Churchill, 11/12/1936

Don't worry about avoiding temptation.
As you grow older, it starts avoiding you.      --The Old Farmer's Almanac

I just got my own computer.  It's like a paraplegic getting a treadmill.
                                                    --a relative of my boss

It's dangerous to be right when the government is wrong.       --Voltaire

Only good girls keep diaries.  Bad girls don't have the time.
                                   --Attributed to Tallulah Bankhead (1903-68)

We ran outta turkey and ate my brain.                      --Greg Coleman

Collaboration, n.: A literary partnership based on the false assumption
that the other fellow can spell.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when you refuse to go on a
vacation spot with no electricity and no phone lines.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when your bookmark takes fifteen
minutes to scroll from top to bottom.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when you begin to wonder how
on earth your service provider is allowed to call 200 hours per month
"unlimited."

You know you're addicted to the Internet when your phone bill comes to
your door in a box.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when you move into a new house
and decide to Netscape before you landscape.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when all of your friends have an
"@" in their names.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when the last girl/guy you picked
up was only a JPEG.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when you start tilting your head
sideways to smile :-)

You know you're addicted to the Internet when your eyeglasses have a
website burned in on them.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when you don't know the sex of
your closest friends because they all have neutral nicknames.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when you turn off your modem and
get this awful empty feeling, like you just pulled the plug on a loved one.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when you refer to going to the
bathroom as downloading.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when you step out of your room
and realize that your parents have moved.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when you kiss your girlfriend's
home page instead of her.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when you tell the cab driver
you live at http://123.elm.street/house/bluetrim.html

You know you're addicted to the Internet when you wake up at 3:00 AM to
go to the bathroom and stop to check your e-mail on the way back to bed.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when you check your e-mail, and
it says no new messages, so you check it again.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when your fantasy dreams at
night are in HTML.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when you get a tattoo that says,
"This body is best viewed with Netscape 3.0 or higher."

My karma ran over my dogma.                      --bumper sticker

The gene pool could use a little chlorine.       --bumper sticker

I didn't fight my way to the top of the food chain to be a vegetarian.
                                                --bumper sticker

Women who seek to be equal with men lack ambition.  --bumper sticker

Your kid may be an honor student but you're still an idiot   --bumper sticker

If we aren't supposed to eat animals, why are they made with meat?
                                                --bumper sticker

Few women admit their age, few men act it.      --bumper sticker

I don't suffer from insanity, I enjoy every minute of it.   --bumper sticker

It's lonely at the top, but you eat better.     --bumper sticker

Love:  two vowels, two consonants, two fools.     --bumper sticker

According to my calculations the problem doesn't exist.     --bumper sticker

Some people are alive only because it is illegal to kill them.
                                                --bumper sticker

Pride is what we have.  Vanity is what others have.        --bumper sticker

Forget world peace.  Visualize using your turn signal.    --bumper sticker

Give me ambiguity or give me something else.          --bumper sticker

Make it idiot-proof and someone will make a better idiot.   --bumper sticker

He who laughs last thinks slowest.               --bumper sticker

I smile because I don't know what's going on.    --bumper sticker

Lottery:  A tax on people who are bad at math.   --bumper sticker

Very funny, Scotty.  Now beam down my clothes.   --bumper sticker

Puritanism: The haunting fear that someone, somewhere may be happy.
                                                --bumper sticker

Consciousness:  That annoying time between naps.         --bumper sticker

3 kinds of people: those who can count and those who can't.   --bumper sticker

Why is "abbreviation" such a long word?          --bumper sticker

I like you but I wouldn't want to see you working with sub-atomic particles.
                                                --bumper sticker

"Auntie Em:  hate you, hate Kansas, taking the dog."  -Dorothy
                                                --bumper sticker

You are entitled to your own opinion.  You are not entitled to your
own facts.                                                      --Anonymous

Success is the ability to go from failure to failure with no loss
of enthusiasm.                                            --Winston Churchill

His eyes were cold.  As cold as the bitter winter snow that was falling
outside.  Yes, cold and therefore difficult to chew...      --some bad novel

Click here if you're not using a mouse.  --Microsoft installation prompt

If you're trying to be politically correct you're like a chameleon in
front of a mirror.  What can you say that won't be offensive to somebody?
                                                            --Robin Williams

Violence on television only affect children whose parents behave like
TV characters.                                              --David Byrne

The closest anyone ever comes to perfection is on a job application form.
                                                            --unknown

... that whenever any form of government becomes destructive of these
ends, it is the right of the people to alter or to abolish it, and to
institute new government, laying its foundation on such principles,
and organizing its powers in such form, as to them shall seem most
likely to effect their safety and happiness.
                --Thomas Jefferson, Prologue, "Declaration of Independence"

Someone told me that each equation I included in the book would halve
the sales.        --Prof. Stephen Hawking, 'A Brief History of Time', 1988

Cinemuck, n.: The combination of popcorn, soda, and melted chocolate
which covers the floors of movie theaters.        --Rich Hall, "Sniglets"

The man who sets out to carry a cat by its tail learns something that
will always be useful and which never will grow dim or doubtful.  --Mark Twain

Veni vidi velcro - I came, I saw, I stuck around.       --Gordon Findlay

I will not do that thing with my tongue.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I cannot absolve sins.              --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not draw naked ladies in class.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not barf unless I'm sick.    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

My mom is not dating Jerry Seinfeld.  --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not waste chalk.             --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I no longer want my MTV.            --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I am not a 32 year old woman.       --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

Garlic gum is not funny.            --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

They are laughing at me, not with me.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not skateboard in the halls.  --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not instigate revolution.     --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not burp in class.           --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not fake my way through life.  --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

Tar is not a play thing.            --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I did not see Elvis.                --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not call my teacher "Hot Cakes".
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not trade pants with others.  --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not drive the principal's car.  --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not yell 'fire' in a crowded classroom.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not encourage others to fly.  --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not Xerox my butt.           --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not pledge allegiance to Bart.  --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

It's potato, not potatoe.           --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not sleep through my education.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not cut corners.             --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will finish what I sta___.        --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

The Christmas pageant does not stink.  --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not sell school property.     --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not get very far with this attitude.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not do anything bad ever again.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not hide behind the Fifth Amendment.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not make flatulent noises in class.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not belch the national anthem.  --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not sell land in Florida.     --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not grease the monkey bars.    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not show off.              --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I am not a dentist.              --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

Nobody likes sunburn slappers.      --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

High explosives and school don't mix.  --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

Underwear should be worn on the inside.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not torment the emotionally frail.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

"Bart Bucks" are not legal tender.    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

Spitwads are not free speech.      --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not bribe Principal Skinner.   --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not squeak chalk.            --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

Teacher is not a leper.             --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

Coffee is not for kids.             --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

A burp is not an answer.            --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

My name is not "Dr. Death".         --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not conduct my own fire drills.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not spin the turtle.         --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not fake seizures.           --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not aim for the head.        --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not carve gods.              --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not expose the ignorance of the faculty.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not bury the new kid.        --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not say "Springfield" just to get applause.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I am not deliciously saucy.         --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

The Pledge of Allegiance does not end with Hail Satan.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

Five days is not too long to wait for a gun.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not spank others.            --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not barf unless I'm sick.      --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I saw nothing unusual in the teachers lounge.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

Funny noises are not funny.         --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not snap bras.              --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

This punishment is not boring and pointless.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not defame New Orleans.      --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not prescribe medication.     --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not teach others to fly.     --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not bring sheep to class.     --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not yell "She's dead" during roll call.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not sell miracle cures.      --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not eat things for money.     --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

The principal's toupee is not a Frisbee.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

Goldfish don't bounce.              --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not call the principal "spud head".
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

Mud is not one of the 4 food groups.  --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not charge admission to the bathroom.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I do not have diplomatic immunity.   --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

The cafeteria deep fryer is not a toy.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

All work and no play makes Bart a dull boy.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will never win an Emmy.          --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will return the seeing-eye dog.    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

No one is interested in my underpants.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

Organ transplants are best left to the professionals.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

My homework was not stolen by a one-armed man.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I am not the reincarnation of Sammy Davis Jr.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not celebrate meaningless milestones.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not re-transmit without the express permission of major league baseball.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

Beans are neither fruit nor musical.  --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

There are plenty of businesses like show business.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I am not authorized to fire substitute teachers.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not dissect things unless instructed.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not whittle hall passes out of soap.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not send lard through the mail.  --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

Ralph won't "Morph" if you squeeze him hard enough.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

The boys room is not a water park.   --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

No one wants to hear from my armpits.  --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I am not a lean mean spitting machine.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I do not have power of attorney over first graders.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

Cursive writing does not mean what I think it does.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not complain about the solution when I hear it.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will stop talking about the twelve inch pianist.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

Indian burns are not our cultural heritage.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

"Bewitched" does not promote Satanism.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

Nerve gas is not a toy.          --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

Wedgies are unhealthy for children and other living things.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will only do this once a year.     --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

The first amendment does not cover burping.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

Adding 'just kidding' doesn't make it okay to insult the principal.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

"Bagman" is not a legitimate career choice.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not hang donuts on my person.  --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

Next time it could be me on the scaffolding.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not strut around like I own the place.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

The Good Humor man can only be pushed so far.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will remember to take my medication.
                                    --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I will not mock Mrs. Dumbface.      --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

I am not certified to remove asbestos.  --written on blackboard by Bart Simpson

Scientists are explorers, philosophers are tourists.    --Richard Feynman

Chemists wash their hands BEFORE they go to the bathroom.
                                --Tim Thompson, System Administrator/Chemist

After eating, do amphibians have to wait one hour before getting out
of the water?                                                --Steven Wright

How can there be self-help "groups"?             --Steven Wright

If white wine goes with fish, do white grapes go with sushi?   --Steven Wright

If a mute swears, does his mother make him wash his hands with soap?
                                                              --Steven Wright

If someone has a mid-life crisis while playing hide & seek,
does he automatically lose because he can't find himself?    --Steven Wright

If someone with multiple personalities threatens to
kill himself, is it considered a hostage situation?      --Steven Wright

Instead of talking to your plants, if you yelled at them would they
still grow, but only to be troubled and insecure?        --Steven Wright

Is there another word for synonym?               --Steven Wright

Isn't it a bit unnerving that doctors call what they do "practice"?
                                                             --Steven Wright

Just *before* someone gets nervous, do they
experience cocoons in their stomach?             --Steven Wright

When sign makers go on strike, is anything written on their picket signs?
                                                             --Steven Wright

When you open a new bag of cotton balls,
is the top one meant to be thrown away?          --Steven Wright

When your pet bird sees you reading the newspaper, does he wonder
why you're just sitting there, staring at carpeting?         --Steven Wright

Where do forest rangers go to "get away from it all"?    --Steven Wright

Why isn't there mouse-flavored cat food?                 --Steven Wright

Why do they report power outages on TV?          --Steven Wright

Why are builders afraid to have a 13th floor but
book publishers aren't afraid to have a Chapter 11?      --Steven Wright

You can learn many things from children.
How much patience you have, for instance.               --Franklin P. Jones

I think men who have a pierced ear are better prepared for
marriage.  They've experienced pain and bought jewelry.        --Rita Rudner

And how do you spell that?      --response given by Microsoft Tech Support
                                  when Christine Gates gave her last name

History doesn't repeat itself tho' sometimes it rhymes.         --Mark Twain

The chance of forgetting something is directly proportional to... uh...
                                               --Hurewitz's Memory Principle

In nature there are neither rewards, nor punishments;
there are consequences.                         --Robert G. Ingersoll

Back of every achievement is a proud wife, and a surprised mother-in-law.
                                                              --Brooks Hays

Noise proves nothing.  Often a hen who has merely laid an egg cackles
as if she had laid an asteroid.                               --Mark Twain

Prudence, indeed, will dictate that governments long established should
not be changed for light and transient causes; and accordingly all
experience hath shown that mankind are more disposed to suffer, while
evils are sufferable, than to right themselves by abolishing the forms
to which they are accustomed.
                    --Thomas Jefferson, Prologue, "Declaration of Independence"

The future masters of technology will have to be lighthearted and
intelligent.  The machine easily masters the grim and the dumb.
                                                   --Marshall McLuhan, 1969

I think animal testing is a terrible idea; they get all nervous
and give the wrong answers.                       --A Bit of Fry and Laurie

A Freudian slip is when you say one thing but mean your mother.

The hypothalamus is one of the most important parts of the brain,
involved in many kinds of motivation, among other functions.
The hypothalamus controls the "Four F's": fighting, fleeing, feeding,
and mating.          --Psychology professor in neuropsychology intro course

What is a committee?  A group of the unwilling, picked from the unfit,
to do the unnecessary.    --Richard Harkness, The New York Times, 1960

Slogan of 105.9, the classic rock radio station in Chicago:
"Of all the radio stations in Chicago...we're one of them."

The graduate with a Science degree asks, "Why does it work?"
The graduate with an Engineering degree asks, "How does it work?"
The graduate with an Accounting degree asks, "How much will it cost?"
The graduate with a Liberal Arts degree asks, "Do you want fries with that?"

Karate is a form of martial arts in which people who have had years
and years of training can, using only their hands and feet, make some
of the worst movies in the history of the world.              --Dave Barry

I am not a vegetarian because I love animals.
I am a vegetarian because I hate plants.                   --A. Whitney Brown

There's so much comedy on television.  Does that cause comedy in the streets?
                                                --Dick Cavett, on TV-violence

If a woman has to choose between catching a fly ball and saving an
infant's life, she will choose to save the infant's life without even
considering if there are men on base.                         --Dave Barry

No matter how great your triumphs or how tragic your defeats,
approximately one billion Chinese couldn't care less.
                                        --Lazlo's Chinese Relativity Axiom

668: The Neighbor of the Beast

Some mornings, it's just not worth chewing through the leather straps.
                                                               --Emo Phillips

Experience is that marvelous thing that enables you to recognize a
mistake when you make it again.                             --F.P. Jones

Human beings, who are almost unique in having the ability to learn
from the experience of others, are also remarkable for their apparent
disinclination to do so.               --Douglas Adams, "Last Chance to See"

As your attorney, it is my duty to inform you that it is not important
that you understand what I'm doing or why you're paying me so much money.
What's important is that you continue to do so.
                                        --Hunter S. Thompson's Samoan Attorney

When I told the people of Northern Ireland that I was an atheist,
a woman in the audience stood up and said, "Yes, but is it the God of
the Catholics or the God of the Protestants in whom you don't believe?"
                                        --Quentin Crisp

I think that all right-thinking people in this country are sick and
tired of being told that ordinary, decent people are fed up in this
country with being sick and tired.  I'm certainly not!  But I'm sick
and tired of being told that I am!                          --Monty Python

May the forces of evil become confused on the way to your house.
                                                           --George Carlin

Sorry, but my karma just ran over your dogma.

Those who make peaceful revolution impossible
will make violent revolution inevitable.              --John F. Kennedy

Her/his kisses left something to be desired --the rest of her/him.

Drawing on my fine command of language, I said nothing.

Based on what you know about him in history books, what do you think
Abraham Lincoln would be doing if he were alive today?
1. Writing his memoirs of the Civil War.
2. Advising the President.
3. Desperately clawing at the inside of his coffin.        --David Letterman

Once at a social gathering, Gladstone said to Disraeli, "I predict,
sir, that you will die either by hanging or of some vile disease".
Disraeli replied, "That all depends, sir, upon whether I embrace your
principles or your mistress."

For three days after death, hair and fingernails continue to grow but
phone calls taper off.                                   --Johnny Carson

I think that the team that wins game five will win the series.
Unless we lose game five.                                --Charles Barkley

My initial response was to sue her for defamation of character, but
then I realized that I had no character.
                --Charles Barkley, on hearing Tonya Harding proclaim
                  herself "the Charles Barkley of figure skating"

A slipping gear could let your M203 grenade launcher fire when you least
expect it.  That would make you quite unpopular in what's left of your unit.
          --In the August 1993 issue, page 9, of PS magazine, the Army's
            magazine of preventive maintenance

Suppose you were an idiot.  And suppose you were a member of Congress.
But I repeat myself.                                         --Mark Twain

Calvin: People think it must be fun to be a super genius, but they don't
        realize how hard it is to put up with all the idiots in the world.
Hobbes: Isn't the zipper on your pants supposed to be in the front?

Old Yiddish proverb: "If triangles had a God, He'd have three sides."

G:   "If we do happen to step on a mine, Sir, what do we do?"
EB:  "Normal procedure, Lieutenant, is to jump 200 feet in the air and
      scatter oneself over a wide area."
                                        --Somewhere in No Man's Land, BA4

Sometimes I lie awake at night, and I ask, "Where have I gone wrong?"
Then a voice says to me, "This is going to take more than one night."
                         --Charlie Brown, Peanuts [Charles Schulz]

I hate to advocate drugs, alcohol, violence, or insanity
to anyone, but they've always worked for me.           --Hunter S. Thompson

Sacred cows make the best hamburger.  --Mark Twain

Time's fun when you're having flies.  --Kermit the Frog

Did you ever notice when you blow in a dog's face he gets mad at you?
But when you take him in a car he sticks his head out the window.
                                                          --Steve Bluestone

Have you ever noticed....  Anybody going slower than you
is an idiot, and anyone going faster than you is a maniac?  --George Carlin

You have to stay in shape.  My grandmother, she started walking five
miles a day when she was 60.  She's 97 today and we don't know where
the hell she is.                                          --Ellen Degeneres

I would love to speak a foreign language but I can't.
So I grew hair under my arms instead.                  --Sue Kolinsky

I have a great diet.  You're allowed to eat anything you
want, but you must eat it with naked fat people.          --Ed Bluestone

The second day of a diet is always easier than the first.
By the second day you're off it.                          --Jackie Gleason

I went into a McDonald's yesterday and said, "I'd like some fries."
The girl at the counter said, "Would you like some fries with that?"
                                                                --Jay Leno

I date this girl for two years -- and then the nagging starts:
"I wanna know your name..."                                --Mike Binder

The reason most people play golf is to wear clothes they
would not be caught dead in otherwise.                      --Roger Simon

You have a cough?  Go home tonight, eat a whole box of
Ex-Lax, tomorrow you'll be afraid to cough.              --Pearl Williams

I'm desperately trying to figure out why kamikaze pilots wore helmets.
                                                             --Dave Edison

If it weren't for electricity we'd all be watching
television by candlelight.                          --George Gobel

I would live all my life in nonchalance and insouciance,
Were it not for making a living, which is rather a nouciance.  --Ogden Nash

If a tree falls in the forest and no one's around, and it hits a mime,
does anyone care?                                                --Far Side

When it rains, why don't sheep shrink?    --important query found on Internet

Nicotine is good stuff for that 30% of the general public who suffer
from a genetic neurotransmitter disorder of the amygdala; it's the
delivery system that kills.          --Grayson Lynn <Grayson@POBoxes.com>

Dejanesia (noun): the feeling that I've forgotten this before.

Such has been the patient sufferance of these colonies; and such is
now the necessity which constrains them to alter their former systems
of government.    --Thomas Jefferson, Prologue, "Declaration of Independence"

Her figure described a set of parabolas that could cause cardiac arrest
in a yak.                                                     --Woody Allen

Give a man a piece of working code and you solve his problem.
Teach a man to write code and you give him a lifetime of new problems.
                                        --Timothy J. Luoma <luomat@peak.org>

The length of a film should be directly related to the endurance of
the human bladder.                                       --Alfred Hitchcock

In the world of the blind, the one-eyed man is a hallucinating idiot.
                                                        --Marshall McLuhan

I think there is only one quality worse than hardness of heart and that
is softness of head.                                  --Theodore Roosevelt

One of the nice things about being in the minority is that you can be
irresponsible and get away with it.
                        --Leonard Weiss, minority staff director to the
                          Senate Committee on Governmental Affairs

Whenever I watch TV and see those poor starving kids all over
the world, I can't help but cry.  I mean I'd love to be skinny
like that but not with all those flies and death and stuff.    --Mariah Carey

Crash programs fail because they are based on the theory that,
with nine women pregnant, you can get a baby a month.    --Wernher von Braun

Mustgo, n.: any item of food that has been sitting in the
refrigerator so long it has become a science project.    --Sniglets, Rich Hall

What moron said that knowledge is power?  Knowledge is power only if
it doesn't depress you so much that it leaves you in an immobile heap
at the end of your bed.                              --Paula Poundstone, 1997

ACCORDIONATED (ah kor' de on ay tid) adj. Being able
to drive and refold a road map at the same time.  --Sniglets, Rich Hall

AQUADEXTROUS (ak wa deks' trus) adj. Possessing the ability
to turn the bathtub faucet on and off with your toes.  --Sniglets, Rich Hall

AQUALIBRIUM (ak wa lib' re um) n. The point where the stream of drinking
fountain water is at its perfect height, thus relieving the drinker from
(a) having to suck the nozzle, or (b) squirting her(him)self in the eye
(or ear).                                              --Sniglets, Rich Hall

BURGACIDE (burg' uh side) n. When a hamburger can't take any more and
hurls itself through the grill into the coals.         --Sniglets, Rich Hall

BUZZACKS (buz' aks) n. People in phone marts who walk around picking
up display phones and listening for dial tones even when they know the
phones are not connected.                              --Sniglets, Rich Hall

CARPERPETUATION (kar' pur pet u a shun) n. The act, when vacuuming,
of running over a string or a piece of lint at least a dozen times,
reaching over and picking it up, examining it, then putting it back down
to give the vacuum one more chance.                   --Sniglets, Rich Hall

DIMP (dimp) n. A person who insults you in a cheap department store
by asking, "Do you work here?"                        --Sniglets, Rich Hall

DISCONFECT (dis kon fekt') v. To sterilize the piece of candy
you dropped on the floor by blowing on it, somehow assuming
this will remove all the germs.                       --Sniglets, Rich Hall

ECNALUBMA (ek na lub' ma) n. A rescue vehicle which can
only be seen in the rearview mirror.                  --Sniglets, Rich Hall

EIFFELITES (eye' ful eyetz) n. Gangly people sitting in front of you
at the movies who, no matter what direction you lean in, follow suit.
                                                      --Sniglets, Rich Hall

ELBONICS (el bon' iks) n. The actions of two people
maneuvering for one armrest in a movie theater.       --Sniglets, Rich Hall

ELECELLERATION (el a cel er ay' shun) n. The mistaken notion that
the more you press an elevator button the faster it will arrive.
                                                      --Sniglets, Rich Hall

FRUST (frust) n. The small line of debris that refuses to be swept
onto the dust pan and keeps backing a person across the room until he
finally decides to give up and sweep it under the rug.
                                                      --Sniglets, Rich Hall

LACTOMANGULATION (lak' to man gyu lay' shun) n. Manhandling the
"open here" spout on a milk container so badly that one has
to resort to the illegal side.                        --Sniglets, Rich Hall

NEONPHANCY (ne on' fan see) n. A fluorescent light bulb
struggling to come to life.                           --Sniglets, Rich Hall

PEPPIER (pehp ee ay') n. The waiter at a fancy restaurant
whose sole purpose seems to be walking around asking diners
if they want groundpepper.                            --Sniglets, Rich Hall

PETROPHOBIC (pet ro fob' ik) adj. One who is embarrassed
to undress in front of a household pet.               --Sniglets, Rich Hall

PHONESIA (fo nee' zhuh) n. The affliction of dialing a phone number
and forgetting whom you were calling just as they answer.
                                                      --Sniglets, Rich Hall

PUPKUS (pup' kus) n. The moist residue left
on a window after a dog presses its nose to it.       --Sniglets, Rich Hall

TELECRASTINATION (tel e kras tin ay' shun) n. The act of always
letting the phone ring at least twice before you pick it up,
even when you're only six inches away.                --Sniglets, Rich Hall

A diamond is merely a lump of coal
that handled stress rather well.                        --Mike Woods

My best dream involved 4 sets of identical twins, 2 gallons of Cool
Whip, 5 quarts of chocolate syrup, 2-1/4 pounds of strawberries,
satin sheets, a magnum of champagne, a trapeze, and a python.    --unknown

Men!  You can't live with them and you can't (1) dip them in batter for
tempura, (2) use them for collateral on a loan, (3) put in new batteries.
                             --"Sylvia" (comic strip by Nicole Hollander)

You must get involved to have an impact.  No one is
impressed with the won-loss record of the referee.        --John H. Holcomb

If you pick up a starving dog and make him prosperous,
he will not bite you.  This is the principal difference
between a man and a dog.                                       --Mark Twain

When the chips are down, the buffalo is empty.         --bumper sticker

Pardon my driving, I'm reloading.                      --bumper sticker

Evidence is building that the software Silver Bullet is of .45 caliber,
and can only be fired from a Colt automatic.  This premise is based upon
remarkable similarities to the legendary accuracy of the firearm in
battle, of which it has been said that the most effective use of the
weapon is to throw it at the enemy's head.
                                        --Grayson Lynn <Grayson@POBoxes.com>

According to Decartes, you don't exist.                 --unknown

Neckties strangle clear thinking.                       --Lin Yutang

You're not drunk if you can lie on the floor without holding on.
                                                        --Dean Martin

No greater wrong can ever be done than to put a good man at the mercy of
a bad, while telling him not to defend himself or his fellows; in no way
can the success of evil be made surer or quicker.      --Theodore Roosevelt

If your position is everywhere, your momentum is zero.
                         --Congressional corollary to Heisenberg's Principle

The Universe is utterly indifferent to the fact that you do not realize
the consequences of your actions; you will have to deal with them just
the same.                                                     --Bernie Sayers

Just because MS-Windows holds 90% of the market doesn't mean
it's superior.  Remember 90% of all animals are insects.     --Ralph Lindberg

The Internet - billions of electrons with nothing better to do.
                                                        --Coyt D. Watters

I can only pray that your personal magnetism doesn't erase my hard drive.
                                            --Alice from "Dilbert", 11/19/96

Common sense is the collection of prejudices acquired by age eighteen.
                                                        --Albert Einstein

He who attacks the fundamentals of the American broadcasting
industry attacks democracy itself.       --William S. Paley, chairman of CBS

Since we have to speak well of the dead, let's knock them while they're alive.
                                                                 --John Sloan

What happens to sour cream when it goes bad?              --amy@year2000.com

Who's supposed to read a sign saying 'Seeing Eye Dogs Only'?
                                                         --amy@year2000.com

Windows95: <win-doz-nin-te-fiv> n.
   32 bit extensions and a graphical shell for a 16 bit patch to an 8 bit
   operating system originally coded for a 4 bit microprocessor, written
   by a 2 bit company that can't stand 1 bit of competition.

I know not a single less relevant reason for an update than bug fixes.
The reason for updates is to present new features.
                                 --Bill Gates in Focus, a German magazine

I must have a prodigious quantity of mind; it takes me as much as a
week sometimes to make it up.           --Mark Twain, "The Innocents Abroad"

You can lead a man to slaughter, but you can't make him think.  --unknown

Churchill's commentary:  Man will occasionally stumble over the truth,
but most of the time he will pick himself up and continue on.

The greatest dangers to liberty lurk in the insidious encroachment
by men of zeal, well-meaning but without understanding.
                                         --Justice Louis D. Brandeis (1928)

Never criticize a man till you've walked a mile in his shoes.
That way, you'll be a mile away from him and have his shoes as well.
                                                        --Peter Salzman

Year-2000 Federal budget numbers are ... brought to you by the same
folks who like to refer to a 200-point drop in the market as "the
biggest plunge in history" rather than as a 2-1/2% correction.
                                                        --Grayson Lynn

DEAR ABBY: I have always wanted to have my family history traced, but I
can't afford to spend a lot of money to do it.  Any suggestions?  --SAM IN CA
DEAR SAM: Yes. Run for public office.

The doorway to all freedoms is framed with muskets.     --Charlton Heston

A dozen, a gross, and a score,
Plus three times the square root of four,
Divided by seven, plus five times eleven,
Equals nine squared plus zero, no more.             --unknown

Government expands to absorb revenue and then some.       --Wiker's Law

Out of my mind.  Back in five minutes.      --bumper sticker

Cover me!  I'm changing lanes.      --bumper sticker

As long as there are tests, there will be prayer in public schools.
                                                        --bumper sticker

Happiness is a belt-fed weapon.      --bumper sticker

Laugh alone, and the world thinks you're an idiot.      --bumper sticker

Sometimes I wake up grumpy; other times, I let her sleep.    --bumper sticker

The gene pool could use a little chlorine.      --bumper sticker

It's as BAD as you think, and they ARE out to get you.      --bumper sticker

When you do a good deed, get a receipt, in case Heaven is like the IRS.
                                                            --bumper sticker

I took an IQ test, and the results were negative.      --bumper sticker

We are born naked, wet, and hungry.  Then things get worse.   --bumper sticker

Consciousness: that annoying time between naps.      --bumper sticker

The sex was so good that even the neighbors had a cigarette.  --bumper sticker

Ever stop to think, and forget to start again?      --bumper sticker

I killed a 6-pack just to watch it die.      --bumper sticker

Sex on television can't hurt unless you fall off.      --bumper sticker

The rings of Saturn are made entirely of lost airline luggage.
                                                        --bumper sticker

The Earth is 98% full.  Please delete anyone you can.      --bumper sticker

Klingon prompt: strike any user when ready.      --bumper sticker

1024x768x256.... sounds like one mean woman.      --bumper sticker

People like that are the reason we have middle fingers.      --bumper sticker

A single fact can ruin a good argument.      --bumper sticker

All stressed out and no one to choke.      --bumper sticker

Next from Intel: the Repentium.      --bumper sticker

If not for politicians, we wouldn't NEED assault rifles.      --bumper sticker

G = Guns, PG = Plenty of Guns, PG13 = more than 12 guns.      --bumper sticker

Cat bathing is a martial art.      --bumper sticker

Morals for sale, never used.  Contact Bill Clinton.      --bumper sticker

Sorry, my mind was on edible underwear today.      --bumper sticker

Circular definition: see definition, circular.      --bumper sticker

Sorry, I don't date outside my species.      --bumper sticker

Lead me not into temptation, I can find it myself.      --bumper sticker

I'm out of bed and dressed, What more do you want?      --bumper sticker

Support cannibalism.  Eat me.      --bumper sticker

I just got lost in thought.  It was unfamiliar territory.   --bumper sticker

Seen it all, done it all, can't remember most of it.      --bumper sticker

Those who live by the sword get shot by those who don't.    --bumper sticker

You have the right to remain silent.  Anything you say
will be misquoted, then used against you.      --bumper sticker

SPIRTLE, n.:  The fine stream from a grapefruit
that always lands right in your eye.              --Sniglets, Rich Hall

We trained hard... but it seemed that every time we were beginning to
form up into teams we would be reorganized..  I was to learn later
in life that we tend to meet any new situation by reorganizing and
a wonderful method it can be for creating the illusion of progress
while producing confusion, inefficieny and demoralization.
                                            --Pelronis Arbiter, 210 B.C.

How come you press harder on a remote-control when you know the battery
is dead?

Have you ever imagined a world with no hypothetical situations?

You know how most packages say "Open here".  What is the protocol if
the package says, "Open somewhere else"?

Americans throw rice at weddings; do Orientals throw hamburgers?

Why are they called buildings, when they're already finished?
Shouldn't they be called builts?

Why are they called apartments, when they're all stuck together?

Why do people without out a watch look at their wrist when you ask them
what time it is?

Why do you ask someone without a watch what time it is?

Why does sour cream have an expiration date?

The light went out, but where to?

Why do banks charge you a "non-sufficient funds fee" on money they
already know you don't have?

Why is it you have a "pair" of pants and only one bra?

How come when I call Information they can't tell me where my keys are?

Why do people go to Burger King and Order a Double Whopper with a Large
French Fry and insist on getting a Diet Coke?

Does the reverse side also have a reverse side?

Why is the alphabet in that order?

If the universe is everything, and scientists say that the universe is
expanding, what is it expanding into?

If you got into a taxi and he started driving backwards, would the taxi
driver end up owing you money?

What would a chair look like if your knees bent the other way?

If a tree falls in the forest and no one is around, do the other trees
make fun of it?

A closed mouth gathers no feet.

Health is merely the slowest possible rate at which one can die.

Never lick a gift horse in the mouth.

The only difference between a rut and a grave is the depth.

Never do card tricks for the group you play poker with.

The colder the X-ray table, the more of your body is required on it.

The severity of the itch is proportional to the reach.

Two wrongs are only the beginning.

You never really learn to swear until you learn to drive.

The problem with the gene pool is that there is no lifeguard.

A clear conscience is usually the sign of a bad memory.

If you must choose between two evils, pick the one you've never tried before.

Get a new car for your spouse - it'll be a great trade!   --seen on billboard

Hell hath no fury like the lawyer of a woman scorned.

Bills travel through the mail at twice the speed of checks.

Hard work pays off in the future.  Laziness pays off now.

Borrow money from pessimists - they don't expect it back.

Half the people you know are below average.

99 percent of lawyers give the rest a bad name.

Boycott shampoo.  Demand REAL poo.

If you choke a Smurf, what color does it turn?

Energizer Bunny arrested, charged with battery.

I couldn't repair your brakes, so I made your horn louder.

Why do psychics have to ask you for your name?

Wear short sleeves!  Support your right to bare arms!

For Sale: Parachute.  Only used once, never opened, small stain.

All those who believe in psychokinesis raise my hand.

Money is better than poverty, if only for financial reasons.  --Woody Allen

Geek used to be a four-letter word.  Now it's a six-figure one.
                                                --seen on a T-shirt

My work is done, why wait?     --suicide note of Kodak founder George Eastman

If merely 'feeling good' could decide, drunkenness would be the supremely
valid human experience.    --William James, Varieties of Religious Experience

Pillage first, THEN burn.

You know you're not a kid anymore when you're asleep, but others worry
that you're dead.

You know you're not a kid anymore when you can live without sex but
not without glasses.

You know you're not a kid anymore when your back goes out more than you do.

You know you're not a kid anymore when you quit trying to hold your
stomach in, no matter who walks into the room.

You know you're not a kid anymore when you buy a compass for the dash
of your car.

You know you're not a kid anymore when you're proud of your lawn mower.

You know you're not a kid anymore when your best friend is dating
someone half his age, and isn't breaking any laws.

You know you're not a kid anymore when your arms are almost too short
to read the newspaper.

You know you're not a kid anymore when you sing along with the elevator music.

You know you're not a kid anymore when you would rather go to work than
stay home sick.

You know you're not a kid anymore when you constantly talk about the
price of gasoline.

You know you're not a kid anymore when you enjoy hearing about other
people's operations.

You know you're not a kid anymore when you make an appointment to see
the dentist.

You know you're not a kid anymore when you no longer think of speed
limits as a challenge.

You know you're not a kid anymore when people call at 9 pm and ask,
"Did I wake you ?"

You know you're not a kid anymore when you have a dream about prunes.

You know you're not a kid anymore when you answer a question with,
"Because I said so!"

You know you're not a kid anymore when you send money to PBS.

You know you're not a kid anymore when you still buy records, and you
think a CD is a certificate of deposit.

You know you're not a kid anymore when the end of your tie doesn't come
anywhere near the top of your pants.

You know you're not a kid anymore when you take a metal detector to
the beach.

You know you're not a kid anymore when you wear black socks with sandles.

You know you're not a kid anymore when you know what the word "equity" means.

You know you're not a kid anymore when you can't remember the last time
you lay on the floor to watch television.

You know you're not a kid anymore when your ears are hairer than your head.

You know you're not a kid anymore when you talk about "good grass,"
and you're referring to someone's lawn.

You know you're not a kid anymore when you get into a heated argument
about pension plans.

You know you're not a kid anymore when you got cable for the weather channel.

You know you're not a kid anymore when you can go bowling without drinking.

You know you're not a kid anymore when you have a party, and the
neighbors don't even realize it.

Creativity is allowing yourself to make mistakes.
Art is knowing which ones to keep.      --Scott Adams (The Dilbert Principle)

Yoda of Borg I am.  Futile resistance is.  Assimilated you will be.
                                --Frank Cusack <fcusack@voicenet.com>

If Bill Gates had a dime for every time a Windows box crashed ...
Oh, wait a minute, he already does.     --Eric Hamilton <gee-que@imagina.com>

A Mexican girl phoned me the other day and said "Come on over,
there's nobody home."  I went over.  Nobody was home.    --Gustavo Vazquez

If it weren't for pick-pocketers I'd have no sex life at all.
                                                --Gustavo Vazquez

And we were poor too.  Why if I wasn't born a boy I'd have
nothing to play with.                           --Gustavo Vazquez

During sex my girlfriend always wants to talk to me.
Just the other night she called me from a hotel.     --Gustavo Vazquez

One day as I came home early from work, I saw a guy jogging naked.
I said to the guy, "Hey buddy, what are you doing that for?"
He said, "Because you came home early."                 --Gustavo Vazquez

I got up this morning, put on a shirt, and a button fell off.
I picked up my briefcase and the handle came off.
I'm afraid to go to the bathroom.                   --Gustavo Vazquez

I could tell that my parents didn't like me much.
My bath toys were a toaster and a radio.           --Gustavo Vazquez

My mother never breast-fed me.  She told me that she only
liked me as a friend.                              --Gustavo Vazquez

My father carries around the picture of the kid who came with his wallet.
                                                           --Gustavo Vazquez

I remember the time I was kidnapped and they sent a piece of my finger
to my father.  He said he wanted more proof.               --Gustavo Vazquez

Once when I was lost.  I saw a policeman and asked him to help me
find my parents.  I said to him, "Do you think we'll ever find them?"
He said, "I don't know, kid, there are so many places they can hide."
                                                           --Gustavo Vazquez

On Halloween, when I answer the door the kids give me candy.  --Gustavo Vazquez

My wife made me join a bridge club.  I jump off next Tuesday.
                                                --Gustavo Vazquez

I worked in a pet shop and people kept asking how big I'd get.
                                                --Gustavo Vazquez

I went to see my doctor.  "Doctor, every morning when I get up and look
in the mirror, I feel like throwing up.  What's wrong with me?"  He said.
"I don't know, but your eyesight is perfect."              --Gustavo Vazquez

When I was born the doctor took one look at my face,
turned me over and said, "Look, twins!"               --Gustavo Vazquez

Jesus is coming, everyone look busy.         --bumper sticker

A bartender is just a pharmacist with a limited inventory.   --bumper sticker

Horn broken, watch for finger.            --bumper sticker

My kid had sex with your honor student.     --bumper sticker

I've been doing the Fonda workout: the Peter Fonda workout.  That's where
I wake up, take a hit of acid, smoke a joint, and go to my sister's
house and ask her for money.                                  --Kevin Meaney

Thou shall not kill.  Thou shall not commit adultery.  Don't eat pork.
I'm sorry, what was that last one?  "Don't eat pork.  God has spoken."
Is that the word of God or is that pigs trying to outsmart everybody?
                                                              --Jon Stewart

My mom said she learned how to swim.  Someone took her out in the lake and
threw her off the boat.  That's how she learned how to swim.  I said, "Mom,
they weren't trying to teach you how to swim."            --Paula Poundstone

In elementary school, in case of fire you have to line up quietly
in a single file line from smallest to tallest.  What is the logic?
Do tall people burn slower?  --Warren Hutcherson

I have six locks on my door all in a row.  When I go out, I lock every
other one.  I figure no matter how long somebody stands there picking
the locks, they're always locking three.                  --Elayne Boosler

When I was a kid, I had two friends, and they were
imaginary and they would only play with each other.      --Rita Rudner

I haven't taken my Christmas lights down.  They look so nice on the pumpkin.
                                                        --Winston Spear

I don't know what's wrong with my television set.  I was getting C-Span
and the Home Shopping Network on the same station.  I actually bought
a congressman.                                                --Bruce Baum

I had a linguistics professor who said that it's man's ability to use
language that makes him the dominant species on the planet.  That may be.
But I think there's one other thing that separates us from animals.
We aren't afraid of vaccuum cleaners.                       --Jeff Stilson

My grandfather's a little forgetful, but he likes to give me advice.
One day, he took me aside and left me there.                 --Ron Richards

I ask people why they have deer heads on their walls.  They always say
because it's such a beautiful animal.  There you go.  I think my mother
is attractive, but I have photographs of her.             --Ellen DeGeneres

I met a new girl at a barbecue, very pretty, a blond I think.  I don't
know, her hair was on fire, and all she talked about was herself.  You know
these kind of girls: "I'm hot.  I'm on fire.  Me, me, me."  You know.
"Help me, put me out."  Come on, could we talk about me just a little bit?
                                                         --Garry Shandling

Where lipstick is concerned, the important thing is not color, but
to accept God's final word on where your lips end.  --Jerry Seinfeld

I think that's how Chicago got started.  A bunch of people in New York
said, "Gee, I'm enjoying the crime and the poverty, but it just isn't
cold enough.  Let's go west."                               --Richard Jeni

Why does Sea World have a seafood restaurant?  I'm halfway through my
fishburger and I realize, Oh my God, I could be eating a slow learner.
                                                        --Lynda Montgomery

You know you're from California when the fastest part of your
commute is down your driveway.

You know you're from California when you were born somewhere else.

You know you're from California when you know how to eat an artichoke.

You know you're from California when the primary bugs that you
worry about are electronic.

You know you're from California when your car has bulletproof windows.

You know you're from California when left is right and right is wrong.

You know you're from California when your monthly house payments
exceed your annual income.

You know you're from California when your mouse has only one ball.

You know you're from California when you need a new TV, you can
run down to the local riot and pick one up.

You know you're from California when you dive under a desk whenever
a large truck goes by.

You know you're from California when you can't find your other
earring because your son is wearing it.

You know you're from California when you drive to your neighborhood
block party.

You know you're from California when your family tree contains
"significant others".

You know you're from California when your cat has its own psychiatrist.

You know you're from California when you don't exterminate your
roaches, you smoke them.

You know you're from California when you see 25 lawyers chasing an ambulance.

You know you're from California when more than clothes come out of
the closets.

You know you're from California when The Dead are best live.

You know you're from California when you go to a tanning salon
before going to the beach.

You know you're from California when your blind date turns out to
be your ex-spouse.

You know you're from California when more money is spent on facelifts
than on diapers.

You know you're from California when smoking in your office is not optional.

You know you're from California when you pack shorts and a t-shirt
for skiing in the snow, and a sweater and a wetsuit for the beach.

You know you're from California when you can't schedule a
meeting because you must "do lunch".

You know you're from California when your children learn to walk
in Birkenstocks.

You know you're from California when rainstorms or thunder are the
lead story for the local news.

You know you're from California when you'll reluctantly miss yoga
class to wait for the hottub repairman.

You know you're from California when you consult your horoscope
before planning your day.

You know you're from California when a glass has been reserved for
you at your favorite winery.

You know you're from California when all highways into the
state say: no fruits.

A surgeon could do less damage than a bad tech[nician] with a Cisco
router.  Good-bye corporate secrets.  But we pay lawyers $650 an hour...
                 --Jim Griffin, director of technology at Geffen Records

Sam:  What's going on, Normie?
Norm: My birthday, Sammy.  Give me a beer, stick a candle in it,
      and I'll blow out my liver.                                --"Cheers"

Scouts are saving aluminum cans, bottles, and other items to be recycled.
Proceeds will be used to cripple children.       --seen in a church bulletin

The outreach committee has enlisted 25 visitors to make calls on
people who are not afflicted with any church.    --seen in a church bulletin

Evening massage - 6 pm.                   --seen in a church bulletin

The Pastor would appreciate it if the ladies of the congregation would
lend him their electric girdles for the pancake breakfast next Sunday
morning.                                        --seen in a church bulletin

The audience is asked to remain seated until the end of the recession.
                                        --seen in a church bulletin

Low Self-Esteem Support Group will meet Thursday at 7 to 8:30p.m.
Please use the back door.                     --seen in a church bulletin

Ushers will eat latecomers.                 --seen in a church bulletin

The third verse of Blessed Assurance will be sung
without musical accomplishment.                --seen in a church bulletin

For those of you who have children and don't know it,
we have a nursery downstairs.                  --seen in a church bulletin

The Rev. Merriwether spoke briefly, much to the delight of the audience.
                                                --seen in a church bulletin

The pastor will preach his farewell message, after which
the choir will sing, "Break Forth Into Joy."    --seen in a church bulletin

During the absence of our pastor, we enjoyed the rare privilege
of hearing a good sermon when J.F. Stubbs supplied our pulpit.
                                                --seen in a church bulletin

Next Sunday Mrs. Vinson will be soloist for the morning service.
The pastor will then speak on "It's a Terrible Experience."
                                                --seen in a church bulletin

Due to the Rector's illness, Wednesday's healing services
will be discontinued until further notice.       --seen in a church bulletin

Stewardship Offertory: "Jesus Paid It All"      --seen in a church bulletin

The music for today's service was all composed by George Friedrich
Handel in celebration of the 300th anniversary of his birth.
                                                --seen in a church bulletin

Remember in prayer the many who are sick of our church and community.
                                                --seen in a church bulletin

The eighth-graders will be presenting Shakespeare's Hamlet in the
church basement on Friday at 7 pm.  The congregation is invited
to attend this tragedy.                          --seen in a church bulletin

The concert held in Fellowship Hall was a great success.  Special thanks
are due to the minister's daughter, who labored the whole evening at
the piano, which as usual fell upon her.         --seen in a church bulletin

Twenty-two members were present at the church meeting held at the home
of Mrs. Marsha Crutchfield last evening.  Mrs. Crutchfield and Mrs.
Rankin sang a duet, The Lord Knows Why.          --seen in a church bulletin

A song fest was hell at the Methodist church Wednesday.
                                                --seen in a church bulletin

Today's Sermon: HOW MUCH CAN A MAN DRINK? with hymns from a full choir.
                                                --seen in a church bulletin

Hymn 43: "Great God, what do I see here?"
Preacher: The Rev. Horace Blodgett
Hymn 47: "Hark! An awful voice is sounding"     --seen in a church bulletin

On a church bulletin during the minister's illness:
GOD IS GOOD Dr. Hargreaves is better.            --seen in a church bulletin

Potluck supper: prayer and medication to follow.  --seen in a church bulletin

Don't let worry kill you off -- let the church help.
                                                --seen in a church bulletin

The 1997 Spring Council Retreat will be hell May 10 and 11.
                                                --seen in a church bulletin

Pastor is on vacation.  Massages can be given to church secretary.
                                                --seen in a church bulletin

Official sign near door: Door alarmed.
Hand-printed sign nearby: Window frightened.       --hazelcb@polaris.net

The natural tendency of the desperate is to resort to logical errors
like: "The necessary remedy is too costly, thus it cannot be necessary."
                                             --David A. Smith <das@acm.org>

Nothing in the affairs of men is worthy of great anxiety.
                                             --Plato (B.C. 427?-347?)

The dogmas of the quiet past are inadequate to the stormy present.
The occasion is piled high with difficulty, and we must rise to the
occasion.  As our case is new, so we must think anew and act anew.
                                                      --Abraham Lincoln

If they ever come up with a swashbuckling School, I think one of the
courses should be Laughing, Then Jumping Off Something.
                                        --Deep Thought #13, by Jack Handy

The Millennium Falcon did something nasty on my windshield.
                                         --title of a magazine advertisement

When It Absolutely, Positively Has To Be Destroyed Overnight:  1-800-MARINES

Men are from Mars.  Women are from Venus.  Idiots are Universal.
                                                --Esther Muller

Woody: What's your pleasure, Mr. Peterson?
Norm:  Boxer shorts and loose shoes.  But I'll settle for a beer.   --Cheers

Politics are now nothing more than a means of rising in the world.
                                                           --Samuel Johnson

The problems of victory [in war] are more agreeable than the problems
of defeat, but they are no less difficult.       --Winston Churchill, 1942

Demand the establishment of the government in its rightful home at
Disneyland.                                             --Morgan Sarges

It's one thing to challenge conventional wisdom, but it's quite another to
line conventional wisdom up against the wall and pump it full of lead.
                                                --Paul Phillips

Linux: generous programmers from around the world all join forces to
help you shoot yourself in the foot for free.

To be considered half as good as Microsoft, Linux has to work twice
as fast.  Fortunately, this is easy.

If the box says Windows 95 or better, it should run under Linux, right?

Linux: Because rebooting is for adding new hardware

Linux users never complain about Microsoft.  They don't need to!

Linux -- no more forced obsolescence!

The feature you'd like to have is probably already installed on your
Linux system.

An NT server can be run by an idiot, and usually is.

Computers are like air conditioners - they stop working properly if
you open Windows.

Microsoft is not the answer.  Microsoft is the question.  NO is the answer.

If the answer is WinNT, you're asking the wrong question.

In most countries selling harmful things like drugs is punishable.
Then how come people can sell Microsoft software and go unpunished?

Hiroshima '45 -- Czernobyl '86 -- Windows '95

"Lotto: A tax on people who are bad at math."        --unknown
"Windows: Microsoft's tax on computer illiterates."  --WE7U

Better dead than Redmond.

The early bird who catches the worm works for someone who
comes in late and owns the worm farm.                        --Travis McGee

The reason it's always so difficult for this president to tell the truth,
the whole truth, and nothing but the truth is because it's usually three
different stories.                      --Sam Donaldson, referring to Bubba

If the president could convince every woman in America that the Bible
says oral sex is not adultery, he'd even have my vote.      --Newt Gingrich

What's wrong with extending my probe?  The president did the same thing.
                                                            --Kenneth Starr

The special prosecutor is asking me to give oral testimony to the entire
Grand Jury.                                                 --Monica Lewinsky

Shouldn't the president be held to the same standards as a TV sportscaster?
                                                        --Marv Albert

The president should promise to spend the rest of his life trying to
find the real person who had oral sex with the intern.      --OJ Simpson

If I had to spend all day trying to find jobs for every bimbo who swore
she didn't have sex with the president, I'd never get any of my own
work done.                                              --Vernon Jordan

If you're looking for me this week, I'll be in the bunker.   --Saddam Hussein

Practicing safe sex in the Clinton White House
means making sure the door is locked.             --George Stephanopoulos

In last week's Cabinet meeting, the president asked
us to go out and win one for the zipper.     --Madeliene "Aunt Bea" Albright

We've all heard that a million monkeys banging on a million typewriters
will eventually reproduce the works of Shakespeare.  Now, thanks to the
Internet, we know this is not true.
                               --Robert Wilensky, University of California

Courage is the willingness of a person to stand up for his beliefs in
the face of great odds.  Chutzpah is doing the same thing wearing a
Mickey Mouse hat.                                          --Bill Benedetto

Never do housework.  No man ever made love to a
woman because the house was spotless.  --"Women's Compact Instruction Book"

Don't imagine you can change a man unless he's in diapers.
                                --"Women's Compact Instruction Book"

Never let your man's mind wander.  It's too little to be left out alone.
                                        --"Women's Compact Instruction Book"

Go for younger men.  You might as well - they never mature anyway.
                                        --"Women's Compact Instruction Book"

A man who can dress himself without looking like
Pee Wee Herman is unquestionably gay.   --"Women's Compact Instruction Book"

The best way to get a man to do something is to suggest he's too old for it.
                                        --"Women's Compact Instruction Book"

Women sleep with men who, if they were women, they wouldn't even have
bothered to have lunch with.           --"Women's Compact Instruction Book"

Remember, a sense of humor does not mean that you tell him jokes,
it means you laugh at his.              --"Women's Compact Instruction Book"

Don't say you don't have enough time.  You have exactly the same number of
hours per day that were given to Helen Keller, Louis Pasteur, Michelangelo,
Leonardo DaVinci, Thomas Jefferson, and Albert Einstein.      --Roshan Shah

Eight out of every five people are math illiterates.  --Anon.

One of the most overlooked advantages to computers is, if they do foul
up, there's no law against whacking them around a little.      --Joe Martin

"Troops" is filmed on location with the men of the Imperial Forces.
All suspects are guilty--period.  Otherwise, they wouldn't be suspect,
would they?                                     --Kevin Rubio's "Troops"

The care of human life and happiness, and not their destruction, is
the first and only legitimate object of good government.  --Thomas Jefferson

I have a simple philosophy.  Fill what's empty.
Empty what's full.  Scratch where it itches.     --Alice Roosevelt Longworth

I still miss my ex-husband, but my aim is improving.  --bumper sticker

Conscience is what hurts when everything else feels so good.  --bumper sticker

Talk is cheap because supply exceeds demand.  --bumper sticker

Stupidity got us into this mess - why can't it get us out?  --bumper sticker

Meeting - an event at which the minutes are kept and the hours are lost.
                                                        --bumper sticker

Love is grand; divorce is a hundred grand.  --bumper sticker

People will accept your ideas much more readily if you tell them that
Benjamin Franklin said it first.                         --bumper sticker

I don't mind going nowhere as long as it's an interesting path.
                                                        --bumper sticker

Indecision is the key to flexibility.  --bumper sticker

Make failure your teacher, not your undertaker.  --bumper sticker

It hurts to be on the cutting edge.  --bumper sticker

If it ain't broke, fix it till it is.  --bumper sticker

I don't get even, I get odder.  --bumper sticker

In just two days, tomorrow will be yesterday.  --bumper sticker

I considered atheism but there weren't enough holidays.  --bumper sticker

I am an escapee from a political correction facility.  --bumper sticker

I always wanted to be a procrastinator, never got around to it.
                                                        --bumper sticker

Dijon vu - the same mustard as before.  --bumper sticker

I am a nutritional overachiever.  --bumper sticker

I believe in youthenasia.  --bumper sticker

My inferiority complex is not as good as yours.  --bumper sticker

I am having an out of money experience.  --bumper sticker

I plan on living forever.  So far, so good.  --bumper sticker

I am in shape.  Round is a shape.  --bumper sticker

Not afraid of heights - afraid of widths.  --bumper sticker

Practice safe eating - always use condiments.  --bumper sticker

A day without sunshine is like night.  --bumper sticker

If marriage were outlawed, only outlaws would have in-laws.  --bumper sticker

If it weren't for me, there'd just be a pile of my clothes on the floor.
                                                        --bumper sticker

I am not a perfectionist.  My parents were, though.  --bumper sticker

Who lit the fuse on your tampon?                --bumper sticker

Support Cannibalism.  EAT ME!           --bumper sticker

God is my co-pilot, but the Devil is my bombardier.          --bumper sticker

I don't have a license to kill.  I have a learner's permit.   --bumper sticker

I wasn't born a bitch.  Men like you made me this way.       --bumper sticker

Keep honking while I reload.            --bumper sticker

Taxation WITH representation isn't so hot, either.        --bumper sticker

Who were the beta testers for Preparations A through G?     --bumper sticker

5 days a week my body is a temple.  The other two, it's an amusement park.
                                                        --bumper sticker

EARTH FIRST!  We'll stripmine the other planets later.     --bumper sticker

Your child may be an honor student but you're still an idiot.
                                                        --bumper sticker

If you drink, don't park.  Accidents cause people.      --bumper sticker

If you can read this, I can hit my brakes and sue you.    --bumper sticker

Whitewater is over when the First Lady sings.     --bumper sticker

Jack Kevorkian for White House physician.         --bumper sticker

Just say NO! to sex with pro-lifers.       --bumper sticker

My wife keeps complaining I never listen to her...  or something like that.
                                                        --bumper sticker

Sure you can trust the government!  Just ask an Indian!     --bumper sticker

Alcohol and calculus don't mix.  Never drink and derive.      --bumper sticker

If we are what we eat, I'm cheap, fast, and easy.      --bumper sticker

Stop repeat offenders.  Don't re-elect them!           --bumper sticker

Having come out of the Catholic seminary, I can say
with conviction that the Catholic Church is evil.       --LeVar Burton

I have PMS and a handgun.  Any questions?       --bumper sticker

A small deer came into my camp and stole my bag of pickles.
Is there a way I can get reimbursed?  Please call.
                             --actual comment received by Forest Service

Escalators would help on steep uphill sections.
                             --actual comment received by Forest Service

Instead of a permit system or regulations, the Forest Service needs to reduce
worldwide population growth to limit the number of visitors to wilderness.
                             --actual comment received by Forest Service

Trails need to be wider so people can walk while holding hands.
                             --actual comment received by Forest Service

Ban walking sticks in wilderness.  Hikers that use walking sticks are more
likely to chase animals.         --actual comment received by Forest Service

All the mile markers are missing this year.
                             --actual comment received by Forest Service

Found a smouldering cigarette left by a horse.
                             --actual comment received by Forest Service

Trails need to be reconstructed.  Please avoid building trails that go uphill.
                             --actual comment received by Forest Service

Too many bugs and leeches and spiders and spider webs.  Please spray
the wilderness to rid the area of these pests.
                             --actual comment received by Forest Service

Please pave the trails so they can be plowed of snow in the winter.
                             --actual comment received by Forest Service

Chairlifts need to be in some places so that we can get to wonderful
views without having to hike to them.
                             --actual comment received by Forest Service

The coyotes made too much noise last night and kept me awake.
Please eradicate these annoying animals.
                             --actual comment received by Forest Service

Reflectors need to be placed on trees every 50 feet so people can hike
at night with flashlights.      --actual comment received by Forest Service

Need more signs to keep area pristine.
                             --actual comment received by Forest Service

A McDonald's would be nice at the trailhead.
                             --actual comment received by Forest Service

The places where trails do not exist are not well marked.
                             --actual comment received by Forest Service

Too many rocks in the mountains.
                             --actual comment received by Forest Service

We are going to cut off [Netscape's] air supply.  Everything
they're selling, we're going to give away for free.  --Bill Gates, June 1996

Man finds nothing so intolerable as to be in a state of complete
rest, without passions, without occupation, without diversion, without
effort.  Then he feels his nullity, loneliness, inadequacy, dependence,
helplessness, emptiness.                     --Blaise Pascal, Pensees 1670

You know you're addicted to the Internet when Tech Support calls you for help.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when someone at work tells
you a joke and you say LOL.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when you watch TV with the
closed captioning turned on.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when you keep begging your
friends to get an account so "we can hang out."

You know you're addicted to the Internet when you want to meet someone
new and your first impulse is to turn on your computer.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when you have to get a second
phone line just so you can call Domino's.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when you go into labor and
you stop to type a special e-mail letting everyone know you are going
to be away.  For just a little while.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when you begin to say
"heh heh heh" instead of laughing.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when you have an identity
crisis if someone else is using a screen name similar to yours.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when you would rather tell
people your bloodshot eyes are from partying too much instead of being
online all night.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when you marry your cyberboyfriend
and you both sit at your own computers and chat to each other from across
the room.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when your dog leaves you.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when you can actually read and
follow all the names of the cast that scrolls up your TV screen at the
end of a movie, including the Best Boy, Dolly Grip and Production Accountant.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when people say, "If it
weren't for the super reflexes in your eyes and fingers, you would have
classified as a vegetable long ago."

You know you're addicted to the Internet when you double-click your TV remote.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when you have to be pried from
your computer with the Jaws Of Life.  And they don't do the trick.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when your last sexual experience
was really just a textual experience.

You know you're addicted to the Internet when while cooking dinner, you
"just wanted to check your mail," and while you were there you "just
wanted to see who was on."  The resulting fire caused $12,000 in damage.

The future of "I give" is "I take."     --paper by US grade school student

The parts of speech are lungs and air.  --paper by US grade school student

The inhabitants of Moscow are called Mosquitoes.
                                --paper by US grade school student

A census taker is man who goes from house to house increasing the population.
                                --paper by US grade school student

Water is composed of two gins.  Oxygin and hydrogin.  Oxygin is pure gin.
Hydrogin is gin and water.               --paper by US grade school student

(Define H2O and CO2.)  H2O is hot water and CO2 is cold water.
                                --paper by US grade school student

A virgin forest is a forest where the hand of man has never set foot.
                                --paper by US grade school student

The general direction of the Alps is straight up.
                                --paper by US grade school student

A city purifies its water supply by filtering the water
then forcing it through an aviator.      --paper by US grade school student

Most of the houses in France are made of plaster of Paris.
                                --paper by US grade school student

The people who followed the Lord were called the 12 opossums.
                                --paper by US grade school student

The spinal column is a long bunch of bones.  The head sits on the top and
you sit on the bottom.                   --paper by US grade school student

We do not raise silk worms in the United States, because we get our silk
from rayon.  He is a larger worm and gives more silk.
                                        --paper by US grade school student

One of the main causes of dust is janitors.
                                --paper by US grade school student

A scout obeys all to whom obedience is due and respects all duly
constipated authorities.                --paper by US grade school student

One by-product of raising cattle is calves.
                                --paper by US grade school student

To prevent head colds, use an agonizer to spray into the nose until it
drips into the throat.                --paper by US grade school student

The four seasons are salt, pepper, mustard and vinegar.
                                --paper by US grade school student

The climate is hottest next to the Creator.
                                --paper by US grade school student

Oliver Cromwell had a large red nose, but under it were deeply
religious feelings.                     --paper by US grade school student

The word trousers is an uncommon noun because it is singular
at the top and plural at the bottom.  --paper by US grade school student

Syntax is all the money collected at the church from sinners.
                                        --paper by US grade school student

The blood circulates through the body by
flowing down one leg and up the other.    --paper by US grade school student

In spring, the salmon swim upstream to spoon.
                                --paper by US grade school student

Iron was discovered because someone smelt it.
                                --paper by US grade school student

In the middle of the 18th century, all the morons moved to Utah.
                                --paper by US grade school student

A person should take a bath once in the summer, not so often in the winter.
                                --paper by US grade school student

Since my last report, this employee has reached rock bottom and
has started to dig.          --from actual employee performance evaluation

His men would follow him anywhere, but only out of morbid curiosity.
                            --from actual employee performance evaluation

I would not allow this employee to breed.
                            --from actual employee performance evaluation

This associate is really not so much of a has-been, but more of
a definitely won't be.      --from actual employee performance evaluation

Works well when under constant supervision and cornered like a rat in a trap.
                                --from actual employee performance evaluation

When she opens her mouth, it seems that this is only to change
whichever foot was previously in there.
                            --from actual employee performance evaluation

He would be out of his depth in a parking lot puddle.
                            --from actual employee performance evaluation

This young lady has delusions of adequacy.
                            --from actual employee performance evaluation

He sets low personal standards and then consistently fails to achieve them.
                            --from actual employee performance evaluation

This employee should go far - and the sooner he starts, the better.
                            --from actual employee performance evaluation

This employee is depriving a village somewhere of an idiot.
                            --from actual employee performance evaluation

ISDN: It Still Does Nothing               --computer acronyms

USELESS PHRASES WHEN SPEAKING TO A COP #1:
"I can't reach my license unless you hold my beer."

USELESS PHRASES WHEN SPEAKING TO A COP #2:
"Sorry, Officer, I didn't realize my radar detector wasn't plugged in."

USELESS PHRASES WHEN SPEAKING TO A COP #3:
"Aren't you the guy from the Village People?"

USELESS PHRASES WHEN SPEAKING TO A COP #4:
"Hey, you must've been doin' about 125 mph to keep up with me!  Good job!"

USELESS PHRASES WHEN SPEAKING TO A COP #5:
"Excuse me.  Isn't "stick up" hyphenated?"

USELESS PHRASES WHEN SPEAKING TO A COP #6:
"I thought you had to be in relatively good physical condition to be a
police officer."

USELESS PHRASES WHEN SPEAKING TO A COP #7:
"I was going to be a cop, but I decided to finish high school instead."

USELESS PHRASES WHEN SPEAKING TO A COP #8:
"Bad cop!  No donut!"

USELESS PHRASES WHEN SPEAKING TO A COP #9:
"You're not gonna check the trunk, are you?"

USELESS PHRASES WHEN SPEAKING TO A COP #10:
"Gee, that gut sure doesn't inspire confidence..."

USELESS PHRASES WHEN SPEAKING TO A COP #11:
"Didn't I see you get your butt kicked on Cops?"

USELESS PHRASES WHEN SPEAKING TO A COP #12:
"Wow, you look just like the guy in the picture on my girlfriend's nightstand."

USELESS PHRASES WHEN SPEAKING TO A COP #13:
"Is it true that people become cops because they're too dumb to work at
McDonald's?"

USELESS PHRASES WHEN SPEAKING TO A COP #14:
"I pay your salary!"

USELESS PHRASES WHEN SPEAKING TO A COP #15:
"So, uh, you on the take, or what?"

USELESS PHRASES WHEN SPEAKING TO A COP #16:
"Gee, Officer, that's terrific!  The last officer only gave me a warning, too!"

USELESS PHRASES WHEN SPEAKING TO A COP #17:
"Do you know why you pulled me over?  Okay, just so one of us does."

USELESS PHRASES WHEN SPEAKING TO A COP #18:
"I was trying to keep up with traffic.  Yes, I know there is no other car
around; that's how far ahead of me they are."

USELESS PHRASES WHEN SPEAKING TO A COP #19:
"What do you mean, 'Have I been drinking?'  You're the trained specialist."

USELESS PHRASES WHEN SPEAKING TO A COP #20:
"Well, when I reached down to pick up my bag of crack, my gun fell off my
lap and got lodged between the brake pedal and the gas pedal, forcing me to
speed out of control."

USELESS PHRASES WHEN SPEAKING TO A COP #21:
"Hey, is that a 9 mm?  That's nothing compared to this .44 magnum."

USELESS PHRASES WHEN SPEAKING TO A COP #22:
"Hey, can you give me another one of those full cavity searches?"

"One World, One Web, One Program" --Microsoft Promotional Ad
"Ein Volk, Ein Reich, Ein Fuhrer" --Adolf Hitler

It is always the best policy to speak the truth, unless of course you are
an exceptionally good liar.    --Jerome K. Jerome (1859-1927), British author

"Woman Rents House but Complains about Corpse"     --Reuters headline

"Women drawn to men with muscles"                  --Reuters headline

"Bride attacks groom with stiletto shoe"           --Reuters headline

"Dinner guest finds host's wife, son in freezer"   --Reuters headline, 2007

"Gators to face Seminoles with Peters out"   --headline, The Tallahassee Bugle

"Messiah climaxes in chorus of Hallelujahs"
                 --headline, The Anchorage Alaska Times

Governor's Penis Busy [should be "pen is"]
                 --headline, The New Haven Connecticut Register

"Thanks to President Clinton, Staff Sgt. Fruer now has a son"
                                         --headline, The Arkansas Plainsman

"Clinton places Dickey in Gore's hands"     --headline, Bangor Maine News

"Starr aghast at First Lady sex position"    --headline, The Washington Times

"Clinton stiff on withdrawal"                --headline, The Bosnia Bugle

"Long Island stiffens for Lili's blow"        --headline, Newsday

"Organ festival ends in smashing climax"      --headline, San Antonio Rose

"Petroleum jelly keeps idle tools rust-free"    --headline, Chicago Daily News

"Textron Inc. makes offer to Screw Company stockholders"
                                         --headline, The Miami Herald

"Married priests in Catholic Church a long time coming"
                                 --headline, The New Haven Connecticut Register

"Governor Chiles offers rare opportunity to goose hunters"
                                         --headline, The Tallahassee Democrat

"Would she climb to the top of Mr. Everest again?  Absolutely!"
                                         --headline, The Houston Chronicle

Show me a sane man, and I will cure him for you.          --Carl Jung

I was recently on a tour of Latin America, and the only regret I have
was that I didn't study Latin harder in schools so I could converse
with those people.                         --former VP J. Danforth Quayle

Republicans understand the importance of bondage between a mother and child.
                                        --former VP Dan Quayle

The war isn't the war between the blacks and the whites, the liberals
and the conservatives, or the Federation and the Romulans.  It's between
the clueful and the clueless.         --anonymous poster on Cypherpunks list

Only in America can a pizza get to your house faster than an ambulance.

Only in America are there handicap parking places in front of a skating rink.

Only in America do people order double cheese burgers, a large fry,
and a diet coke.

Only in America do banks leave both doors open and then chain the
pens to the counters.

Only in America do we leave cars worth thousands of dollars in the
driveway and leave useless things and junk in boxes in the garage.

Only in America do we use answering machines to screen calls and then
have call waiting so we won't miss a call from someone we didn't want
to talk to in the first place.

Only in America do we buy hot dogs in packages of ten and buns in
packages of eight.

Only in America do we use the word "politics" to describe the
process so well; "Poli" in Latin meaning "many" and "tics" meaning
"blood-sucking creatures".

I think most Americans just wish it would go away but also it is very
hard to know what the truth is because some journalists don't always
print the truth and so I really don't know what to believe.
                 --Cindy Crawford, on a South American promotional tour,
                   when asked about President Clinton and Monica Lewinsky

How to Get Along With Coworkers #1:
Page yourself over the intercom.  Don't disguise your voice.

How to Get Along With Coworkers #2:
Find out where your boss shops and buy exactly the same outfits.
Wear them one day after your boss does.  (This is especially effective
if your boss is of a different gender than you.)

How to Get Along With Coworkers #3:
Make up nicknames for all your coworkers and refer to them only
by these names; "That's a good point, Sparky" and "No, I'm sorry,
but I'm going to have to disagree with you there, Cha-Cha."

How to Get Along With Coworkers #4:
Send e-mail to the rest of the company telling them exactly what you
are doing.  For example: "If anyone needs me, I'll be in the bathroom."

How to Get Along With Coworkers #5:
Hi-lite your shoes.  Tell people you have not lost them as often
since you did this.

How to Get Along With Coworkers #6:
While sitting at your desk, soak your fingers in Palmolive liquid
and call everyone Madge.

How to Get Along With Coworkers #7:
Hang mosquito netting around your cubicle.  When you emerge to get
coffee or a printout, slap yourself randomly the whole way.

How to Get Along With Coworkers #8:
Every time someone asks you to do something, anything, ask them if
they want fries with that.

How to Get Along With Coworkers #9:
Put decaf in the coffeemaker for three weeks.  Once everyone is
withdrawn from caffeine addition, switch to espresso.

How to Get Along With Coworkers #10:
Put your trash can on your desk.  Label it "IN."

The ultimate result of shielding men from the effects of folly is to
fill the world with fools.                              --Herbert Spencer

...Making false and misleading public statements for the purpose of
deceiving the people of the United States...
              --part of the bill of particulars against Richard Nixon

If the dress ain't a mess, he won't need to confess.
                 --"US v. Clinton" closing argument by Johnny Cochrane #10

The economy's great, let the white boy skate.
                 --"US v. Clinton" closing argument by Johnny Cochrane #9

If the bitch didn't spit, you must acquit.
                 --"US v. Clinton" closing argument by Johnny Cochrane #8

If she's not spread eagle, than it's not illegal.
                 --"US v. Clinton" closing argument by Johnny Cochrane #7

Lewinsky's a whore, and Bill's better than Gore.
                 --"US v. Clinton" closing argument by Johnny Cochrane #6

So he lied to the masses, he was just saving some asses.
                 --"US v. Clinton" closing argument by Johnny Cochrane #5

He cheats on his wife, but it's his personal life.
                 --"US v. Clinton" closing argument by Johnny Cochrane #4

Bill can't tell the truth till he sees Ken Starr's proof.
                 --"US v. Clinton" closing argument by Johnny Cochrane #3

Bill's not sleazy, Lewinsky's just easy.
                 --"US v. Clinton" closing argument by Johnny Cochrane #2

If the sex is just oral, it's not really immoral.
                 --"US v. Clinton" closing argument by Johnny Cochrane #1

God grant me the senility to forget the people I never liked anyway,
the good fortune to run into the ones I do, and the eyesight to tell
the difference.                                                --unknown

No question that an admission of making false statements to government
officials and interfering with the FBI ... is an impeachable offense.
                        --Bill Clinton, 8 August 1974, "Arkansas Gazette"

Yes, the president should resign.  He has lied to the American people,
time and time again, and betrayed their trust.  He is no longer an
effective leader.  Since he has admitted guilt, there is no reason to put
the American people through an impeachment.  He will serve absolutely
no purpose in finishing out his term; the only possible solution is
for the president to save some dignity and resign.
                                          --William Jefferson Clinton, 1974

Illiterate?  Write today for free help.        --seen in the want ads

Auto Repair Service.  Free pick-up and delivery.
Try us once, you'll never go anywhere again.       --seen in the want ads

Our experienced Mom will care for your child.
Fenced yard, meals, and smacks included.          --seen in the want ads

Dog for sale: eats anything and is fond of children.  --seen in the want ads

Stock up and save.  Limit: one.               --seen in the want ads

Semi-Annual after-Christmas Sale.            --seen in the want ads

3-year old teacher needed for pre-school.  Experience preferred.
                                                --seen in the want ads

Mixing bowl set designed to please a cook with
round bottom for efficient beating.                  --seen in the want ads

Girl wanted to assist magician in cutting-off-head
illusion.  Blue Cross and salary.                    --seen in the want ads

Dinner Special -- Turkey $2.35; Chicken or Beef $2.25; Children $2.00
                                                     --seen in the want ads

For sale: antique desk suitable for lady with thick legs and large drawers.
                                                       --seen in the want ads

The conveniences and comforts of humanity in general will be linked up
by one mechanism, which will produce comforts and conveniences beyond
human imagination.  But the smallest mistake will bring the whole
mechanism to a certain collapse.  In this way the end of the world will
be brought about.    Pir-o-Murshid Inayat Khan, 1922 (Sufi Prophet)

PACKAGING INSTRUCTIONS ON TESCO'S TIRIMISU DESSERT:
     Do not turn upside down.
     (Printed on the bottom of the box.)

PACKAGING INSTRUCTIONS ON MARKS & SPENCER BREAD PUDDING:
     Product will be hot after heating.

INSTRUCTIONS ON PACKAGING FOR A ROWENTA IRON:
     Do not Iron clothes on body.

PACKAGING INSTRUCTIONS ON BOOTS CHILDREN'S COUGH MEDICINE:
     Do not drive car or operate machinery.

PACKAGING INSTRUCTIONS ON NYTOL (A SLEEPING AID):
     Warning: may cause drowsiness.

PACKAGING INSTRUCTIONS ON A KOREAN KITCHEN KNIFE:
     Warning: keep out of children.

PACKAGING INSTRUCTIONS ON A STRING OF CHINESE MADE CHRISTMAS LIGHTS:
     For indoor or outdoor use only.

PACKAGING INSTRUCTIONS ON THE MANUAL FOR A CANON CAMERA (circa 1966):
     "Do not rattle playfully at the shutter button."

PACKAGING INSTRUCTIONS ON A JAPANESE FOOD PROCESSOR:
     Not to be used for the other use.

PACKAGING INSTRUCTIONS ON SAINSBURY'S PEANUTS:
     Warning: contains nuts.

PACKAGING INSTRUCTIONS ON AN AMERICAN AIRLINES PACKET OF NUTS:
     Instructions: open packet, eat nuts.

PACKAGING INSTRUCTIONS ON A SWEDISH CHAINSAW:
     Do not attempt to stop chain with your hands.

PACKAGING INSTRUCTIONS ON A BAR OF DIAL SOAP:
     Directions: Use like regular soap.

PACKAGING INSTRUCTIONS ON A FROZEN DINNER AT HOME:
     Serving suggestion: Defrost.

PACKAGING INSTRUCTIONS ON A HOTEL-PROVIDED SHOWER CAP IN A BOX:
     Fits one head.

PACKAGING INSTRUCTIONS ON A PACKET OF SUN-MAID RAISINS:
     Why not try tossing over your favorite breakfast cereal?

PACKAGING INSTRUCTIONS ON A HAIRDRYER:
     Do not use while sleeping.

PACKAGING INSTRUCTIONS ON A BAG OF FRITOS:
     You could be a winner!  No purchase necessary.  (Details inside.)

Sign at a Santa Fe gas station:
   "We will sell gasoline to anyone in a glass container"

Sign in a New York restaurant:
   "Customers who consider our waitresses uncivil ought to see the manager"

Sign on the wall of a Baltimore estate:
   "Trespassers will be prosecuted to the full extent of the law.
   --Sisters of Mercy"

Sign on a long-established New Mexico dry cleaners:
   "38 years on the same spot"

Sign in a Los Angeles dance hall: "Good clean dancing every night but Sunday"

Sign in a Florida maternity ward: "No children allowed"

Sign in a New York drugstore: "We dispense with accuracy"

Sign in the offices of a loan company:
   "Ask about our plans for owning your home"

Sign in a New York medical building: "Mental Health Prevention Center"

Sign on a New York convalescent home:
   "For the sick and tired of the Episcopal Church"

Sign on a Maine shop:
   "Our motto is to give our customers the lowest possible prices and
   workmanship."

Sign at a number of military bases: "Restricted to unauthorized personnel"

Sign on a display of "I love you only" Valentine cards:
   "Now available in multi-packs"

Sign in the window of a Kentucky appliance store:
   "Don't kill your wife.  Let our washing machine do the dirty work."

Sign in a funeral parlor: "Ask about our layaway plan"

Sign in a clothing store:
   "Wonderful bargains for men with 16 and 17 necks"

Sign in a Tacoma, Washington men's clothing store:
   "15 men's wool suits, $10.  They won't last an hour!"

Sign on a shopping mall marquee: "Archery Tournament -- Ears pierced"

Sign outside a country shop: "We buy junk and sell antiques"

Sign in the window of an Oregon store:
   "Why go elsewhere and be cheated when you can come here?"

Sign in a Maine restaurant: "Open 7 days a week and weekends"

Sign on a radiator repair garage: "Best place to take a leak"

Sign in a Pennsylvania cemetery:
   "Persons are prohibited from picking flowers from any but their own graves"

Sign on a roller coaster: "Watch your head"

Sign on the grounds of a public school: "No trespassing without permission"

Sign on a Tennessee highway:
   "When this sign is under water, this road is impassable."

Sign in front of a New Hampshire car wash:
   "If you can't read this, it's time to wash your car"

Man who live in glass house, dress in basement.         --Bryan Albright

I can please only one person per day.  Today is
not your day.  Tomorrow isn't looking good either.         --Dilbert

Someday we'll look back on all this and plow into a parked car.   --Dilbert

There are very few personal problems that cannot be solved
through a suitable application of high explosives.         --Dilbert

Tell me what you need, and I'll tell you how to get along without it.
                                                                --Dilbert

Accept that some days you're the pigeon, and some days you're the statue.
                                                                --Dilbert

Needing someone is like needing a parachute.  If he isn't there the first
time you need him, chances are you won't be needing him again.      --Dilbert

I don't have an attitude problem.  You have a perception problem.   --Dilbert

I don't suffer from stress.  I'm a carrier.         --Dilbert

You're slower than a herd of turtles stampeding through peanut butter.
                                                                --Dilbert

Everybody is somebody else's weirdo.         --Dilbert

In India, "cold weather" is merely a conventional phrase
and has come into use through the necessity of having some
way to distinguish between weather which will melt a brass
door-knob and weather which will only make it mushy.       --Mark Twain

Most Over-Educated for Job of Movie Star:
  "X-File"-er David Duchovny.               --Movieline, November 1998

Most Inexcusably In Our Face:
  "The Nanny" Fran Drescher.                --Movieline, November 1998

Most Obnoxiously Proselytizing Scientologist in Show Biz:
  "Dharma" of "Dharma & Greg," Jenna Elfman.  --Movieline, November 1998

Most Likely to Drop Off the Face of the Earth Once "Friends" is Canceled:
  Matthew Perry, aka Chandler Bing.       --Movieline, November 1998

Most Likely to Be at the Opening of An Envelope:
  Ellen Degeneres & Anne Heche.                --Movieline, November 1998

Most Perfect Example of How Irritating Hipness Can Be:
  "Ally McBeal" barrister Calista Flockhart.    --Movieline, November 1998

Most Dreaded Publicity Client:
  Former "Charlie's Angel" Farrah Fawcett.     --Movieline, November 1998

Most Likely to Play Monica Lewinsky in a TV Movie:
  Former "90210" and current "Charmed" star Shannen Doherty.
                                            --Movieline, November 1998

Most Likely to Have Demonstrated Her Entire Range Already:
  "Party of Five" ingenue Neve Campbell.      --Movieline, November 1998

If I were in the President's place I would not get a chance to resign.
I would be lying in a pool of my own blood hearing Mrs. Armey standing
over me saying, 'How do I reload this damn thing?'
               --Representative Dick Armey, when asked if he would
                 resign were he in the President's place

Remember, when you're having a horrible day and everyone's just
gettin' you down, it takes 43 muscles to frown, but it only takes
FOUR to pull the trigger on a halfway decent sniper rifle.    --Kevin Cannon

Seen in a newspaper: Now is your chance to have your ears pierced and
get an extra pair to take home, too.

Seen in an East African newspaper: A new swimming pool is rapidly taking
shape since the contractors have thrown in the bulk of their workers.

Windows NT: Micro$oft's Ode To P.T. Barnum           --Robert Harris

Am I getting smart with you?  How would you know?        --Dilbert

Kids in the back seat cause accidents; accidents in the back seat cause kids.
                                                        --unknown

Why is it when driving and looking for an address, we turn down the radio?

Why do people remember where they were when someone famous was killed?
Do they have to prove an alibi?

Does condensed milk comes from smaller cows?

Why does an alarm clock go off, by going on?

If vampires can't see their reflection, why is their hair always so neat?

Why is cheese so secret that we must shred it?

When a cow laughs does milk come out its nose?

What do they use to ship Styrofoam?

Why do we wait until a pig is dead to cure it?

Do infants enjoy infancy as much as adults enjoy adultery?

Can you tell how old a pirate is by cutting off his peg leg and counting
the rings?

Do Scottish Terriers get Scotch tapeworms?

Does the person who inventories sheep often fall asleep on the job?

Why do we put suits in a Garment Bag and put garments in a suitcase?

If a person thinks marathons are superior to sprints, is that racism?

Can fat people go Skinny Dipping?

How do you let someone know you painted a wet paint sign?

Is it possible to have a civil war?

Why do they call it a TV Set, when there is only one?

What happens if you get scared half to death twice?

If you choked a Smurf, what color would it turn?

Should crematoriums give a discount to burn victims?

Is animal shampoo tested on humans?

Why don't they call mustaches Mouthbrows?

Could it be that Boulders are statues of famous rocks?

Can they put more clowns than people in a Taxi?

Why do Kamikaze pilots wear helmets?

If the #2 pencil is the most popular, why is it still #2?

Do fish get thirsty?

If someone with multiple personalities threatens to kill themself,
would that be considered a hostage situation?

Why is abbreviation such a long word?

How would you throw away a garbage can?

Why are there interstate highways in Hawaii?

Do bleach blondes pretend to have more fun?

Why is it when you transport something by car its called a shipment,
but when you transport something by ship its called cargo?

Why isn't the word phonetic spelt like it sounds?

Why is it a pair of pants, but only one shirt?

Would a blind tourist use a sightseeing eye dog?

Why is the word dyslexia so hard to read?

Do elves really wear those shoes with the curling tips?

Do police sketch artists start out by drawing chalk outlines?

Why don't they just make food stamps edible?

Would they invent fireproof matches?

Should mutes be yelled at for talking with their hands full?

Would they invent a solar powered flashlight?

Do you think it should be illegal to yell "theater" in a crowded fire?

After eating, do amphibians have to wait one hour before getting OUT
of the water?

Do chickens think rubber humans are funny?

Do cannibals get hungry one hour after eating a chinaman?

If you're born again, do you have two bellybuttons?

Why do women have a pair of underwear, but just one bra?

What keeps glue from sticking to the inside of the bottle?

If a duck goes in the water right after he eats, does he get cramps?

My childhood was a period of waiting for the moment
I could send everyone connected to it to hell.         --Igor Stravinsky

"This isn't true in practice -- what we've missed out is Stradivarius's
constant."  And then the aside: "For those of you who don't know, that's
been called by others the fiddle factor..."
                --from a 1B Electrical Engineering lecture

EXCUSE FOR GETTING TO WORK LATE #1:
I can't come in to work today because I'll be stalking my previous boss,
who fired me for not showing up for work.  Okay?

EXCUSE FOR GETTING TO WORK LATE #2:
I have a rare case of 48-hour projectile leprosy, but I know we have
that deadline to meet...

EXCUSE FOR GETTING TO WORK LATE #3:
I am stuck in the blood pressure machine down at the Food Giant.

EXCUSE FOR GETTING TO WORK LATE #4:
Yes, I seem to have contracted some attention-deficit disorder and, hey,
how about them Skins, huh?  So, I won't be able to, yes, could I help
you?  No, no, I'll be sticking with Sprint, but thank you for calling.

EXCUSE FOR GETTING TO WORK LATE #5:
I just found out that I was switched at birth.  Legally, I shouldn't come
to work knowing my employee records may now contain false information.

EXCUSE FOR GETTING TO WORK LATE #6:
The psychiatrist said it was an excellent session.  He even gave me
this jaw restraint so I won't bite things when I'm startled.

EXCUSE FOR GETTING TO WORK LATE #7:
The dog ate my car keys.  We're going to hitchhike to the vet.

EXCUSE FOR GETTING TO WORK LATE #8:
My mother-in-law has come back as one of the Undead and we must track
her to her coffin to drive a stake through her heart and give her
eternal peace.  One day should do it.

EXCUSE FOR GETTING TO WORK LATE #9:
I can't come to work today because the EPA has determined that my
house is completely surrounded by wetlands and I have to arrange for
helicopter transportation.

EXCUSE FOR GETTING TO WORK LATE #10:
I refuse to travel to my job in the District until there is a commuter
tax.  I insist on paying my fair share.

I'd like to see a nude opera, because when they hit those high
notes, I bet you can really see it in those genitals.
                                      --Deep Thought #49, by Jack Handy

Thursday night potluck supper.  Prayer and medication to follow.
                                              --seen in a church bulletin

The rosebud on the altar this morning is to announce the birth of David
Alan Belier, the sin of Rev. and Mrs. Julius Blesser.
                                              --seen in a church bulletin

This afternoon there will be a meeting in the South and north ends of
the church.  Children will be baptized at both ends.
                                              --seen in a church bulletin

Thursday at 5 PM there will be a meeting of the Little
Mothers Club.  All wishing to become Little Mothers,
please see the minister in his private study.   --seen in a church bulletin

This being Easter Sunday, we will ask Mrs. Lewis to
come forward and lay an egg on the altar.       --seen in a church bulletin

The ladies of the church have cast off clothing of every kind and they
may be seen in the church basement Friday.      --seen in a church bulletin

A bean supper will be held on Tuesday evening
in the church hall.  Music will follow.       --seen in a church bulletin

At the evening service tonight, the sermon topic will be "What Is Hell?"
Come early and listen to our choir practice.    --seen in a church bulletin

Weight Watchers will meet at 7 PM at the First Presbyterian Church.
Please use the large double door at the side entrance.
                                              --seen in a church bulletin

The Senior Choir invites any member of the congregation
who enjoys sinning to join the choir.          --seen in a church bulletin

The Lutheran Men's group will meet at 6 PM.  Steak, mashed potatoes,
green beans, bread and dessert will be served for a nominal feel.
                                              --seen in a church bulletin

The Associate Minister unveiled the church's new tithing campaign slogan
last Sunday: "I Upped My Pledge - Up Yours!!"
                                              --seen in a church bulletin

If you wouldn't take out a one-page ad in the Wall Street
Journal to say something, then don't say it by email.       --Brad Knowles

If it weren't for marriage, men and women
would have to fight with total strangers.                   --anonymous

Mind like a steel trap: rusty and illegal in 37 states.  --Steven Wright

I told them if they wanted me to take care of the mail they would have
to let me use qmail (and drop the NT server from a very high precipice
onto a seething mass of Microsoft Certified Professionals).
                                        --Jason van Zyl <jason@periapt.com>

Boss    - "My boss says we need some eunuch programmers."
Dilbert - "I think he means UNIX."
Boss    - "Well, if the company nurse comes by, tell her I said never mind."

I was thrown out of college for cheating on the metaphysics
exam; I looked into the soul of the boy next to me.          --Woody Allen

If C gives you enough rope to hang yourself, then C++ gives you enough rope
to bind and gag your neighborhood, rig the sails on a small ship, and still
have enough rope to hang yourself from the yardarm.              --anonymous

Measure wealth not by the things you have, but by the
things you have for which you would not take money.       --D. Israel

If at first you don't succeed, nuclear warhead disarmament
should *not* be your first career choice.        --Roger "Merch" Merchberger

"I hear that if you play the NT 4.0 CD backwards, you get a Satanic message."
"That's nothing.  If you play it forward, it installs NT 4.0"
                                                        --unknown

I've taught years of middle school, and all my students ever got out of
personal Internet access - with very few exceptions - was pornography,
someone else's term paper, and a teen chat room full of 50-year-old
men posing as "Sally".
                --from a letter in the February 1999 issue of "Wired"
                about access to the Internet equalling better education

Humans are quick and easy pattern-matchers.  It's unfortunate when
we're wrong, but sometimes life-saving when we're right.  That's why
everyone is subject to prejudice and being prejudiced -- because all
the descendants of humans who weren't don't exist.
                                           --Russ Nelson <rn-sig@crynwr.com>

Windows has detected that a gnat has farted
near your computer.  Press any key to reboot.                 --unknown

10. "Read My Lips -- No New Interns"
           --Letterman's Top Ten "Hillary Clinton Campaign Slogans", 2/5/1999

9.  "Reward Me For Putting Up With Bill's Crap For So Long"
           --Letterman's Top Ten "Hillary Clinton Campaign Slogans", 2/5/1999

8.  "Isn't It Time You Were Disappointed By A Different Clinton?"
           --Letterman's Top Ten "Hillary Clinton Campaign Slogans", 2/5/1999

7.  "Ask Not What Your Country Can Do For You, Ask How You Can Illegally
    Contribute To My Campaign"
           --Letterman's Top Ten "Hillary Clinton Campaign Slogans", 2/5/1999

6.  "Vote For Me Or My Husband Will Nail Your Wife"
           --Letterman's Top Ten "Hillary Clinton Campaign Slogans", 2/5/1999

5.  "You Give Me A Vote, I'll Get Vernon Jordan To Give You A Job"
           --Letterman's Top Ten "Hillary Clinton Campaign Slogans", 2/5/1999

4.  "Still Not Indicted As Of Early '99!"
           --Letterman's Top Ten "Hillary Clinton Campaign Slogans", 2/5/1999

3.  "From Perjury To Albany"
           --Letterman's Top Ten "Hillary Clinton Campaign Slogans", 2/5/1999

2.  "Building A Bridge To The 21st Century, And Pushing My Husband Over It"
           --Letterman's Top Ten "Hillary Clinton Campaign Slogans", 2/5/1999

1.  "Oh Lord, Please Don't Make Me Go Back To Arkansas"
           --Letterman's Top Ten "Hillary Clinton Campaign Slogans", 2/5/1999

HONK! if you had SEX with the President
        --Clinton-era bumper sticker reportedly seen around the DC area

Clinton: We forgive you, Now Resign!
        --Clinton-era bumper sticker reportedly seen around the DC area

Al Gore: One Heart-throb from the Presidency
        --Clinton-era bumper sticker reportedly seen around the DC area

Adultery is not a "Family Value"
        --Clinton-era bumper sticker reportedly seen around the DC area

Does Character matter YET?
        --Clinton-era bumper sticker reportedly seen around the DC area

One More Whore And We Get Gore!
        --Clinton-era bumper sticker reportedly seen around the DC area

Bill Clinton: "Commander in Heat"
        --Clinton-era bumper sticker reportedly seen around the DC area

My President Fooled Around with Your Honor Student
        --Clinton-era bumper sticker reportedly seen around the DC area

JAIL to the CHIEF
        --Clinton-era bumper sticker reportedly seen around the DC area

Today, Your kids no longer play Doctor, they play President
        --Clinton-era bumper sticker reportedly seen around the DC area

The Clinton Creed: Take Credit, Not Responsibility
        --Clinton-era bumper sticker reportedly seen around the DC area

If his private life doesn't matter, let him date YOUR daughter
        --Clinton-era bumper sticker reportedly seen around the DC area

Three (3) Terms for Clinton: The 3rd one in JAIL
        --Clinton-era bumper sticker reportedly seen around the DC area

Clinton: Our Nation's "Fondling Father"
        --Clinton-era bumper sticker reportedly seen around the DC area

Save the President: Legalize Perjury
        --Clinton-era bumper sticker reportedly seen around the DC area

I admit I find it hard to focus lots of resources on trials and things
when the Internet is taking away our power every day.
                --Bill Gates, internal email, April 1995

Recreational Use of Viagra Dangerous           --UPI headline

Spoken by a programmer: "I've finally figured out why this whole
Year 2000 problem is causing so much trouble.  Fixing it depends on
programmers finding a date.  This isn't exactly one of our classic
strengths."

I like having a machine called 'elvis' on the network because that way,
I can say 'ping elvis' and have it come back with 'elvis is alive'.
                                                        --Carl Shipley

The day Microsoft makes something that doesn't suck
is the day they start making vacuums.                  --Mark Drummond

If you're a cowboy, and you're dragging a guy behind your horse,
I bet it would really make you mad if you looked back and the
guy was reading a magazine.                --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

Letterman's Top Ten Least Beloved Dr. Seuss Classics #10:
"Guns Is Funz"

Letterman's Top Ten Least Beloved Dr. Seuss Classics #9:
"The Cat in the Adults-Only Chat Room"

Letterman's Top Ten Least Beloved Dr. Seuss Classics #8:
"No, That Isn't A Wocket In My Pocket, But Keep Guessing Honey"

Letterman's Top Ten Least Beloved Dr. Seuss Classics #7:
"Thidwick The Big-Hearted Moose Is Shot By Charlton Heston"

Letterman's Top Ten Least Beloved Dr. Seuss Classics #6:
"Horton Hires A Hooker"

Letterman's Top Ten Least Beloved Dr. Seuss Classics #5:
"Watch Out, Steve, I'm Gonna Heave"

Letterman's Top Ten Least Beloved Dr. Seuss Classics #4:
"The Bigger The Cushion The Sweeter The Pushin'"

Letterman's Top Ten Least Beloved Dr. Seuss Classics #3:
"If I Have To Write One More Rhyme I'm Gonna Whack Somebody"

Letterman's Top Ten Least Beloved Dr. Seuss Classics #2:
"Oh, The Places You Would Have Gone If Only You'd Finished High School, Dumbass"

Letterman's Top Ten Least Beloved Dr. Seuss Classics #1:
"101 Ways To Cook Lorax"

If guns cause crime, pencils cause misspelled words.
                                --Mike Hall <mhall@riverside.org>

Never trust a dog to watch your food.
                                --Advice given by kids (Patrick, age 10)

When you want something expensive, ask your grandparents.
                                --Advice given by kids (Matthew, age 12)

Never smart off to a teacher whose eyes and ears are twitching.
                                --Advice given by kids (Andrew, age 9)

Wear a hat when feeding seagulls.    --Advice given by kids (Rocky, age 9)

Sleep in your clothes so you'll be dressed in the morning.
                                --Advice given by kids (Stephanie, age 8)

I've learned that our dog doesn't want to eat my broccoli either.
                                --Advice given by kids

Never try to hide a piece of broccoli in a glass of milk.
                                --Advice given by kids (Rosemary, age 7)

Don't flush the toilet when your dad's in the shower.
                                --Advice given by kids (Lamar, age 10)

Never ask for anything that costs more than five dollars
when your parents are doing taxes.    --Advice given by kids (Carrol, age 9)

Never bug a pregnant mom.       --Advice given by kids (Nicholas, age 11)

Don't ever be too full for dessert.    --Advice given by kids (Kelly, age 10)

When your dad is mad and asks you, "Do I look stupid?" don't answer him.
                                --Advice given by kids (Heather, age 16)

Never tell your mom her diet's not working.
                                --Advice given by kids (Michael, age 14)

Don't pick on your sister when she's holding a baseball bat.
                                --Advice given by kids (Joel, age 12)

When you get a bad grade in school, show it to your
mom when she's on the phone.         --Advice given by kids (Alyesha, age 13)

Never try to baptize a cat.        --Advice given by kids (Laura, age 13)

Never spit when on a roller coaster.   --Advice given by kids (Scott, age 11)

Never do pranks at a police station.     --Advice given by kids (Sam, age 10)

Beware of cafeteria food when it looks like it's moving.
                                --Advice given by kids (Rob, age 10)

Never tell your little brother that you're not going
to do what your mom told you to do.      --Advice given by kids (Hank, age 12)

Remember you're never too old to hold your father's hand.
                                --Advice given by kids (Molly, age 11)

Listen to your brain.  It has lots of information.
                                --Advice given by kids (Chelsey, age 7)

Stay away from prunes.           --Advice given by kids (Randy, age 9)

Never dare your little brother to paint the family car.
                                --Advice given by kids (Phillip, age 13)

Everyone assumes that all of Tipper Gore's kids are Al's.
    --Letterman's "10 Ways Bill Clinton is the Luckiest Man in the World" #10

New Air Force One will be equipped with a Mexican love hammock.
    --Letterman's "10 Ways Bill Clinton is the Luckiest Man in the World" #8

Can eat as much he as wants and not gain...well, he can eat as much
as he wants.
    --Letterman's "10 Ways Bill Clinton is the Luckiest Man in the World" #7

He's got a patient, understanding wife, and Hillary's never found
out about her.
    --Letterman's "10 Ways Bill Clinton is the Luckiest Man in the World" #6

The American people haven't drop-kicked his fat ass back to Arkansas.
    --Letterman's "10 Ways Bill Clinton is the Luckiest Man in the World" #2

Starting next week -- a fresh crop of interns.
    --Letterman's "10 Ways Bill Clinton is the Luckiest Man in the World" #1

Ah, yes, divorce, from the Latin word meaning to rip out a
man's genitals through his wallet.                        --Robin Williams

Women complain about premenstrual syndrome, but I think of it
as the only time of the month that I can be myself.        --Roseanne

Women need a reason to have sex.  Men just need a place.    --Billy Crystal

I just broke up with someone and the last thing she said to me was,
"You'll never find anyone like me again!"  I'm thinking, "I should
hope not!  If I don't want you, why would I want someone like you?"
                                                        --Larry Miller

If you want to say it with flowers, a single rose says: "I'm cheap!"
                                                        --Delta Burke

You can say any foolish thing to a dog, and the dog will give you this
look that says, "My God, you're right!  I never would've thought of that!"
                                                               --Dave Barry

According to a new survey, women say they feel more comfortable
undressing in front of men than they do undressing in front of
other women.  They say that women are too judgmental, where,
of course, men are just grateful.                              --Jay Leno

I am not the boss of my house.  I don't know when I lost it.  I don't know
if I ever had it.  But I have seen the boss's job and I do not want it.
                                                              --Bill Cosby

In the last couple of weeks I have seen the ads for the Wonder Bra.
Is that really a problem in this country?  Men not paying enough
attention to women's breasts?                                   --Jay Leno

My mom said the only reason men are alive is for
lawn care and vehicle maintenance.                            --Tim Allen

We have women in the military, but they don't put us in the
front lines.  They don't know if we can fight, if we can kill.
I think we can.  All the general has to do is walk over to the
women and say, "You see the enemy over there?  They say you
look fat in those uniforms."                              --Elayne Boosler

Men look at women the way men look at cars.  Everyone looks
at Ferraris.  Now and then we like a pickup truck, and we all
buy station wagons.                                          --Tim Allen

There's very little advice in men's magazines, because men don't
think there's a lot they don't know.  Women do.  Women want to learn.
Men think, "I know what I'm doing, just show me somebody naked."
                                                        --Jerry Seinfeld

Men are liars.  We'll lie about lying if we have to.  I'm an
algebra liar.  I figure two good lies make a positive.      --Tim Allen

AT&T is now offering a new service that allows you to pay your bills
through your TV screen by using your remote control.  So instead
of using, "The check's in the mail," people are going to say, "Hey,
I wanted to pay, but I couldn't find the remote."              --Jay Leno

You make the beds, you do the dishes,
and six months later you have to start all over again.      --Joan Rivers

A survey says that American workers work the first three hours every
day just to pay their taxes.  So that's why we can't get anything done
in the morning: We're government workers!                       --Jay Leno

Men do not like to admit to even momentary imperfection.  My husband
forgot the code to turn off the alarm.  When the police came, he wouldn't
admit he'd forgotten the code.  He turned himself in.        --Rita Rudner

If you can't beat them, arrange to have them beaten.      --George Carlin

That married couples can live together day after day is a
miracle that the Vatican has overlooked.                      --Bill Cosby

When I was in Boy Scouts, I slipped on the ice and hurt my ankle.
A little old lady had to help me across the street.         --Steven Wright

After making love I said to my girl, "Was it good for you too?"
And she said, "I don't think this was good for anybody."     --Gary Shandling

Instead of getting married again, I'm going to find a
woman I don't like and give her a house.                    --Lewis Grizzard

The problem with the designated driver program is, it's not a desirable
job.  But if you ever get sucked into doing it, have fun with it.  At the
end of the night, drop them off at the wrong house.         --Jeff Foxworthy

If Al Gore invented the Internet, I invented spell-check.
                                    --Former VP Dan Quayle

"Landlord Sentenced to Die for Eating Tenant"        --Reuters headline

You're just jealous because the voices only talk to me.    --Matthew Harrell

Include Your Children when Baking Cookies     --actual news headline, 1997

Something Went Wrong in Jet Crash, Expert Says   --actual news headline, 1997

Police Begin Campaign to Run Down Jaywalkers     --actual news headline, 1997

Safety Experts Say School Bus Passengers Should Be Belted
                                            --actual news headline, 1997

Drunk Gets Nine Months in Violin Case     --actual news headline, 1997

Survivor of Siamese Twins Joins Parents     --actual news headline, 1997

Iraqi Head Seeks Arms     --actual news headline, 1997

Prostitutes Appeal to Pope     --actual news headline, 1997

Panda Mating Fails; Veterinarian Takes Over     --actual news headline, 1997

British Left Waffles on Falkland Islands     --actual news headline, 1997

Lung Cancer in Women Mushrooms     --actual news headline, 1997

Eye Drops Off Shelf     --actual news headline, 1997

Teachers Strike Idle Kids     --actual news headline, 1997

Clinton Wins on Budget, But More Lies Ahead    --actual news headline, 1997

Enraged Cow Injures Farmer With Ax     --actual news headline, 1997

Plane Too Close to Ground, Crash Probe Told     --actual news headline, 1997

Miners Refuse to Work after Death     --actual news headline, 1997

Juvenile Court to Try Shooting Defendant     --actual news headline, 1997

Stolen Painting Found by Tree     --actual news headline, 1997

Two Sisters Reunited After 18 Years in Checkout Counter
                                                --actual news headline, 1997

Killer Sentenced to Die for Second Time in 10 Years
                                            --actual news headline, 1997

Never Withhold Herpes Infection from Loved One   --actual news headline, 1997

War Dims Hope for Peace     --actual news headline, 1997

If Strike Isn't Settled Quickly, It May Last a While
                                            --actual news headline, 1997

Cold Wave Linked to Temperatures          --actual news headline, 1997

Deer Kill 17,000                          --actual news headline, 1997

Enfields Couple Slain; Police Suspect Homicide   --actual news headline, 1997

Red Tape Holds Up New Bridges     --actual news headline, 1997

Typhoon Rips Through Cemetery; Hundreds Dead    --actual news headline, 1997

Man Struck By Lightning Faces Battery Charge    --actual news headline, 1997

New Study of Obesity Looks for Larger Test Group  --actual news headline, 1997

Astronaut Takes Blame for Gas in Spacecraft     --actual news headline, 1997

Kids Make Nutritious Snacks     --actual news headline, 1997

Chef Throws His Heart into Helping Feed Needy    --actual news headline, 1997

Arson Suspect Held in Massachusetts Fire     --actual news headline, 1997

Ban On Soliciting Dead in Trotwood          --actual news headline, 1997

Local High School Dropouts Cut in Half     --actual news headline, 1997

New Vaccine May Contain Rabies          --actual news headline, 1997

Hospitals sued by 7 Foot Doctors          --actual news headline, 1997

At a risk of being called sexist, ageist and French, if you put
multimedia, a leather skirt and lipstick on a grandmother and take her
to a nightclub, she's still not going to get lucky.
                 --Jean Louis Gassee, chairman of Be, responding to
                   Microsoft's newly-announced plans to retool Win 98
                   instead of just abandoning it when Win 2000 comes out.

Conversation, n.: A vocal competition in which the one who
is catching his breath is called the listener.              --unknown

Writing a new OS only for the 386 in 1991 gets you your second 'F'
for this term.
                   --Professor Andrew S. Tanenbaum (also the author of
                     Minix) on Linus' release of the first OS to require
                     the i386's MMU (memory management unit).

Yeah, yo mama dresses you funny and you need a mouse to delete files.
                                --Markus Stumpf <maex-qmail@Space.Net>

The whole of the Bill [of Rights] is a declaration of the right of the
people at large or considered as individuals...  It establishes some
rights of the individual as unalienable and which consequently, no
majority has a right to deprive them of.      --Albert Gallatin, Oct 7 1789

I don't like the idea that the police department seems bent on keeping a
pool of unarmed victims available for the predations of the criminal class.
               --David Mohler, 1989, on being denied a carry permit in NYC

Efficiency can magnify good, but it magnifies evil just as well.  So,
we should not be surprised to find that modern electronic communication
magnifies stupidity as *efficiently* as it magnifies intelligence.
                                                  --Robert A. Matern

So far as I can remember, there is not one word in the Gospels in praise
of intelligence.                                        --Bertrand Russell

There is no worse tyranny than to make a man pay for something he does
not want merely because you think it would be good for him.
                                                        --Benjamin Franklin

Honk if you love peace and quiet.  --bumper sticker

The early bird may get the worm, but the second mouse gets the cheese.
                                                                --unknown

I drive way too fast to worry about cholesterol.  --bumper sticker

If Barbie is so popular, why do you have to buy her friends?  --unknown

My mind is like a steel trap - rusty and illegal in 37 states.  --unknown

Quantum mechanics: The dreams stuff is made of.  --unknown

You never really learn to swear until you learn to drive.  --bumper sticker

Two wrongs are only the beginning.  --unknown

If you believe in telekinesis, raise my hand.  --unknown

As far as anyone knows we're a nice, normal family.
                --Homer Simpson, "There's No Disgrace Like Home"

It says it's for dogs, but she can't read.
                --Homer Simpson, "Simpson's Roasting on an Open Fire"

Lisa:  Remember, Dad.  The handle of the Big Dipper points to the North Star.
Homer: That's nice, Lisa, but we're not in astronomy class.  We're in
       the woods.
                --Homer Simpson, "The Call of the Simpsons"

Yeah.  Wait a minute.  It's the guy from TV.  My kid's hero...  Cruddy...
Crummy...  Krusty the Clown!         --Homer Simpson, "Krusty Gets Busted"

Uh, so.  Let's have a conversation.  Uh, I think we'll find that we have
very little in common.      --Homer Simpson, "The Last Temptation of Homer"

Don't go easy on each other just because you're brother and sister.  I
want to see you both fighting for your parents' love.
                                    --Homer Simpson, "Lisa on Ice"

I don't want to look like a weirdo.  I'll just go with a muumuu.
                                    --Homer Simpson, "King-Size Homer"

Oh my God!  Space aliens!  Don't eat me, I have a wife and kids!  Eat them.
                                --Homer Simpson, "Treehouse of Horror VII"

Marge, tell Bart I just want to drink a nice glass of syrup like I do
every morning.                       --Homer Simpson, "Lisa the Vegetarian"

You know, Moe, my mom once said something that really stuck with me.  She
said, "Homer, you're a big disappointment," and, God bless her soul, she
was really onto something.   --Homer Simpson, "There's No Disgrace Like Home"

Lisa:   So gambling makes a good thing even better?
Homer:  That's right.  My God, it's like there's some kind of bond between us.
                                --Homer Simpson, "Lisa the Greek"

You're everywhere.  You're omnivorous.
                --Homer Simpson, to God "There's No Disgrace Like Home"

I can understand how they wouldn't let in those wild jungle apes, but
what about those really smart ones who live among us who rollerskate
and smoke cigars?            --Homer Simpson, on Heaven "The Telltale Head"

You know something, folks, as ridiculous as this sounds, I would rather
feel the sweet breath of my beautiful wife on the back of my neck as I
sleep than stuff dollar bills into some stranger's G-string.
                                    --Homer Simpson, "Homer's Night Out"

Kirk:   One day your wife is making you your favorite meal, the next day
        you're thawin'a hot dog in a gas station sink.
Homer:  Oh, that's tough, pal.  But it's never gonna happen to me.
                                    --Homer Simpson, "A Milhouse Divided"

See these?  American donuts.  Glazed, powdered, and raspberry-filled.
Now, how's that for freedom of choice.
                                    --Homer Simpson, "The Crepes of Wrath"

The reason I look unhappy is that tonight I have to see a slide show
starring my wife's sisters -- or as I call them, "the gruesome twosome"
                                    --Homer Simpson, "Krusty Gets Busted"

I'm not a bad guy.  I work hard and I love my kids.  So why should I spend
half my Sunday hearing about how I'm going to Hell?
                                    --Homer Simpson, "Homer the Heretic"

Mmm...incapacitating.        --Homer Simpson, "The Springfield Connection"

Marge, try to understand.  There are two kinds of college students: jocks
and nerds.  As a jock, it is my duty to give nerds a hard time.
                --Homer Simpson, "Homer Goes to College"

Listen, you big, stupid space-creature.
Nobody, but nobody, eats the Simpsons!  --Homer Simpson, "Treehouse of Horror"

I wore my extra loose pants for nothing.  Nothing!
                --Homer Simpson, "New Kid on the Block"

You've been rubbing my nose in it since I got here!  Your family is better
than my family, your beer comes from farther away than my beer, you and
your son like each other, your wife's butt is higher than my wife's butt!
You make me sick!                   --Homer Simpson, "Dead Putting Society"

Son, this is the only time I'm ever gonna say this.  It is not okay to lose.
                                --Homer Simpson, "Dead Putting Society"

As I got up in front of them, I felt an intoxication that had nothing to
do with alcohol.  It was the intoxication of being a public spectacle.
                                             --Homer Simpson, "Dancin' Homer"

Homer:  What?!  Flanders!  You're the Devil?
Devil Flanders: Ho-oh, it's always the one you least suspect.
                                    --Homer Simpson, "Treehouse of Horror IV"

D'oh!  English!  Who needs that?  I'm never going to England. Come on,
let's smoke.
        --Homer Simpson, talking Barney into cutting class, "The Way We Was"

They don't call me Colonel Homer because I'm some dumb-ass army guy.
                                      --Homer Simpson, "Colonel Homer"

I want to share something with you -- the three little sentences that will
get you through life.  Number one, "Cover for me."  Number two, "Oh, good
idea, boss."  Number three, "It was like that when I got here."
                --Homer Simpson, "One Fish, Two Fish, Blowfish, Bluefish"

Always remember that you're representing our country.  I guess what I'm
saying is, don't mess up France the way you messed up your room.
                                      --Homer Simpson, "The Crepes of Wrath"

Barney: Boy, you never stop eating and you don't gain a pound.
Homer:  It's my metaba-ma-lism.  I guess I'm just one of the lucky ones.
                                      --Homer Simpson, "The Way We Was"

Marge, you're my wife and I love you very much.  But you're living in a
world of makebelieve.  With flowers and bells and leprechauns.  And magic
frogs with funny little hats...
                                    --Homer Simpson, "Blood Feud"

Did you hear that, Marge?  She called me a baboon!  The stupidest,
ugliest, smellist ape of them all!     --Homer Simpson, "Lisa's Substitute"

Holy Moly! The bastard's rich!  --Homer Simpson, "Oh Brother, Where Art Thou?"

Love isn't hopeless.  Look, maybe I'm no expert on the subject, but there
was one time I got it right.   --Homer Simpson, "Another Simpson's Clip Show"

First Bush invades my home turf, then he takes my pals, then he makes
fun of the way I talk -- probably -- now he steals my right to raise a
disobedient, smart-alecky son!  Well, that's it!
                                      --Homer Simpson, "Two Bad Neighbors"

If there was any justice, my face would be on a bunch of crappy merchandise!
                                      --Homer Simpson, "Flaming Moe's"

Keep brain from freezing.            --Homer Simpson, "Simpson and Delilah"

Lurleen, I can't get your song outta my mind.  I haven't felt this way
since "Funky Town"                        --Homer Simpson, "Colonel Homer"

Marge:  Homer, couldn't we pawn my engagement ring instead?
Homer:  Now, I appreciate that, honey, but we need one hundred and fifty
        dollars here.      --Homer Simpson, "There's No Disgrace Like Home"

Marge:  Homer, you're his father.  You've got to reason with him.
Homer:  Oh, that never works.  He's a goner!
                                    --Homer Simpson, "Bart the Daredevil"

I thought there was chocolate inside ... Well, why was it wrapped in foil?
                                    --Homer Simpson, "Mr. Plow"

I don't care if Ned Flanders is the nicest guy in the world.  He's a jerk;
end of story.                       --Homer Simpson, "When Flanders Failed"

Well, you know boys, a nuclear reactor is a lot like a woman.  You just
have to read the manual and press the right button.
                                    --Homer Simpson, "Homer Defined"

Homer:  Boy, you don't have to follow in my footsteps.
Bart:   Don't worry, I don't even like using the bathroom after you.
                                   --Homer Simpson, "Like Father Like Clown"

I wish for a turkey sandwich on rye bread with lettuce and mustard.
I don't want any zombie turkeys, I don't want to turn into a turkey
myself, and I don't want any other weird surprises -- you got it?
                                    --Homer Simpson, "Treehouse of Horror II"

Homer:  No TV and No Beer Make Homer ... something something.
Marge:  Go crazy?
Homer:  Don't mind if I do!         --Homer Simpson, "Treehouse of Horror V"

It all happened at the beginning of that turbulent decade known as the
eighties.  Those were idealistic days: the candidacy of John Anderson,
the rise of Supertramp.  It was an exciting time to be young.
                                       --Homer Simpson, "I Married Marge"

Twenty of the suckiest minutes of my life.
                                       --Homer Simpson, "Burns, Baby Burns"

Homer:  I don't want you to see me sitting on my worthless butt.
Bart:   We've seen it, Dad.               --Homer Simpson, "Homer at the Bat"

Marge, this ticket doesn't just give me a seat.  It also gives me the
right -- no, the duty -- to make a complete ass of myself.
                             --Homer Simpson, "Dancin' Homer"

Herb: I want you to help me design a car.  A car for all the Homer Simpsons
      out there!  And I want to pay you two hundred thousand dollars a year!
Homer:  And I want to let you!  --Homer Simpson, "Oh Brother, Where Art Thou?"

Homer:  There couldn't be heaven if there weren't a hell.
Bart:   Who's in there?
Homer:  Oh, uh ... Hitler's dog.  And that dog Nixon had, um, Chester ...
Lisa:   Checkers.
Homer:  Yeah!  One of the Lassies is in there, too.  The mean one -- the
        one that mauled Jimmy.
                             --Homer Simpson, "Dog of Death"

Losers!  Losers!  Kiss my big Springfield behind, Shelbyville!
                             --Homer Simpson, "Homer Loves Flanders"

The doll's trying to kill me, and the toaster's been laughing at me.
                             --Homer Simpson, "Treehouse of Horror III"

Karl:   You don't belong here.  You're a fraud and a phony and it's only
        a matter of time until they find you out.
Homer:  (gasps)  Who told you?       --Homer Simpson, "Simpson and Delilah"

Bart:   What'd you do?  Screw up like the Beatles and say you were bigger
        than Jesus?
Homer:  All the time.  It was the title of our second album.
                             --Homer Simpson, "Homer's Barbershop Quartet"

Kirk:   What makes you guys so special?
Homer:  Because Marge and I have one thing that can never be broken: a
        strong marriage built on a solid foundation of routine.
                                     --Homer Simpson, "A Milhouse Divided"

Ah, sweet pity: where would my love life have been without it?
                                     --Homer Simpson, "I Love Lisa"

Oh, honey, I didn't get drunk, I just went to a strange fantasy world.
                --Homer Simpson, "El Viaje Misterioso De Nuestro Jomer"

Bart:   So, like sometimes you can do stuff that you think is pretty bad
        so other kids will like you better?
Homer:  You're not talking about killing anyone, are you?
                                     --Homer Simpson, "The Telltale Head"

I'll get a bunck of monkeys, dress 'em up, and make 'em reenact the Civil
War!  Heh, heh, heh!                    --Homer Simpson, "Homer The Great"

Weaseling out of things is important to learn.  It's what separates us
from the animals.  Except the weasel.
                                --Homer Simpson, "Boy-Scoutz In The Hood"

Homer:  Your mother and I have been thinking about giving the puppies away.
Bart and Lisa: Noooooo!
Homer:  Mainly your mother.  --Homer Simpson, "Two Dozen and One Greyhounds"

Homer:  Okay, okay, don't panic.  To find Flanders, I just have to think
        like Flanders!
Homer's Brain: I'm a big four-eyed lame-o and I wear the same stupid sweater
        everyday, and --
Homer:  The Springfield River!
                        --Homer Simpson, "Home Sweet Homediddly-Dum-Doodily"

It was the most I ever threw up, and it changed my life forever.
                                --Homer Simpson, "Homer Goes To College"

We live in a society of laws.  Why do you think I took you to all those
"Police Academy" movies?  For fun?  Well, I didn't hear anybody laughin',
did you?                              --Homer Simpson, "Marge Be Not Proud"

Stealing?!  How could you?!  Haven't you learned anything from that
guy who gives those sermons at church?  Captain What's-his-name?
                                --Homer Simpson, "Marge Be Not Proud"

Aw, Dad, you've done a lot of great things, but you're a very old man, and
old people are useless.             --Homer Simpson, "Homer The Vigilante"

Homer:  Hey, Flanders, it's no use praying.  I already did the same thing,
        and we can't both win.
Flanders: Actually, Simpson, we were praying that no one gets hurt.
                                --Homer Simpson, "Dead Putting Society"

Asleep at the switch!  I wasn't asleep!  I was drunk!
                                --Homer Simpson, "Homer The Vigilante"

Hey!  Let's do that 2,000-pound man thing.  I'll be that Carl Reiner guy,
and you be what's-his-face.    --Homer Simpson, "Homer vs. Patty and Selma"

Don't let Krusty's death get you down, boy.  People die all the time.
Just like that.  Why, you could wake up dead tomorrow.  Well, good night.
                                --Homer Simpson, "Bart the Fink"

Hey, what's the big deal about going to some building every Sunday?
I mean, isn't God everywhere?          --Homer Simpson, "Homer the Heretic"

And anyone can be tooted?      --Homer Simpson, on tutoring "The Way We Was"

Flanders: Homer, affordable tract housing made us neighbors,
          but you made us friends.
Homer:  To Ned Flanders, the richest left-handed man in town.
                                    --Homer Simpson, "When Flanders Failed"

There's an empty spot I've always had inside me.  I tried to fill it with
family, religion, community service.  But those were all dead ends.  I
think this chair is the answer.
                         --Homer Simpson, "Brother Can You Spare Two Dimes?"

Bart:   Dad, you killed the Zombie Flanders!
Homer:  He was a zombie?         --Homer Simpson, "Treehouse of Horror III"

If it'll make you feel any better, I've learned that life is one crushing
defeat after another until you just wish Flanders was dead.
                                           --Homer Simpson, "Homer and Apu"

See you in hell, candy boys!!               --Homer Simpson, "Homer Badman"

All right.  His story checks out.
                --Homer Simpson, checking in the encyclopedia
                   under "Bush, George", in "Two Bad Neighbors"

I didn't want a hokey second wedding like those ones on TV!
This one's for real!                    --Homer Simpson, "A Milhouse Divided"

Hmmm, look at those eyes.  He's trying to hypnotize me,
but not in the good Las Vegas way.     --Homer Simpson, "Mountain of Madness"

Marge!  I'm two-thirty-nine, and I'm feeling fine!
                                       --Homer Simpson, "Brush With Greatness"

I know you're mad at me right now, and I'm kinda mad too ... I mean, we
could sit here and try to figure out who forgot to pick up who till the
cows come home.  But let's just say we're both wrong and that'll be that.
                             --Homer Simpson, "Brother From The Same Planet"

Well, if it isn't the leader of the weiner patrol,
boning up on his nerd lessons!       --Homer Simpson, "Boy-Scoutz N The Hood"

And, Lord, we're especially thankful for nuclear power, the cleanest, safest
energy source there is, except for solar, which is just a pipe dream.
                                   --Homer Simpson, "Bart Vs. Thanksgiving"

Marge, you being a cop makes you the man!  Which makes me the woman -- and
I have no interest in that, besides occasionally wearing the underwear,
which, as we discussed, is strictly a comfort thing.
                             --Homer Simpson, "The Springfield Connection"

Hello?  Yes?  Oh!  Heh, heh, uh ... if you're looking for that big donut
of yours ... um, Flanders has it.  Just smash open his house.  (Closing
the door.)  He came to life.  Good for him.
                             --Homer Simpson, "Treehouse Of Horror VI"

He may have come up with the recipe, but I came up with
the idea of charging $6.95 for it.            -- Moe Syzlak, "Flaming Moe's"

Wait a minute, Marge.  I saw "Mrs. Doubtfire."  This is a man in drag!
        --Homer Simpson, "Simpsoncalifragilisticexpiala(annoyed grunt)cious"

Abe:    I used to be "with it."  But then they changed what "it" was.  Now
        what I'm "with" isn't "it" and what's "it" seems weird and scary
        to me.  It'll happen to you.
Homer:  No way, man.  We're gonna keep on rockin' forever!
                                        --Homer Simpson, "Homerpalooza"

Yes!  Oh, yes!  Read it and weep!  In your face -- I got more chicken bone!
                                    --Homer Simpson, "When Flanders Failed"

Must destroy mankind!  (His watch alarm goes off)  Ooh, lunchtime!
                            --Homer Simpson, "Homer Goes To College"

Okay, Marge, as long as we're traumatizing the kids, I have a scandalous
story of my own.                --Homer Simpson, "Another Simpsons Clip Show"

Marge: Homer, is this the way you pictured married life?
Homer: Yup, pretty much.  Except we drove around in a van solving mysteries.
                                  --Homer Simpson, "A Milhouse Divided"

Out at five, catch General Sherman at five-thirty, clean him at six, eat
him at six-thirty, back in bed by seven with no incriminating evidence.
Heh heh heh, the perfect crime.   --Homer Simpson, "The War Of The Simpsons"

Pfft.  Now you tell me.
        --Homer Simpson, finding out that working at a nuclear
          plant can make one sterile, "I Married Marge"

I'll work from midnight to eight, come home, sleep for five minutes, eat
breakfast, sleep six more minutes, shower, then I have ten minutes to bask
in Lisa's love, then I'm off to the power plant fresh as a daisy.
                                  --Homer Simpson, "Lisa's Pony"

Just squeeze your rage into a bitter little ball and release it at an
appropriate time.  Like that day I hit that referee with a whiskey
bottle.  'Member that?                      --Homer Simpson, "Whacking Day"

Come here, you little raven!           --Homer Simpson, "Treehouse Of Horror"

Your mother seems really upset.  I better go have a talk with her --
during the commercial.
        --Homer Simpson, "Simpsoncalifragilisticexpiala(annoyed grunt)cious"

Homer:  The secret ingredient is --
Moe:    Homer, no!
Homer:  Cough syrup!  Nothing but plain, ordinary, over-the-counter
        children's cough syrup!            --Homer Simpson, "Flaming Moe's"

Hee, hee!  I can be a jerk and no one can stop me!
                                  --Homer Simpson, "Itchy & Scratchy Land"

I bet Einstein turned himself all sorts of colors
before he invented the lightbulb.         --Homer Simpson, "Bart The Genius"

It could be one of these chemicals here that makes him so smart.
Lisa, maybe you should try some of this.   --Homer Simpson, "Bart The Genius"

Dammit, I'm no supervising technician.  I'm a technical supervisor.
It's too late to teach this old dog new tricks.
                                  --Homer Simpson, "Homer's Odyssey"

That shot is impossible!  Jack Nicholson himself couldn't make it!
        --Homer Simpson, "Scenes From The Class Struggle In Springfield"

Homer:  I keep hearing this horrible irregular thumping noise.
Pump Jockey: It's your heart.  And I think it's on its last thump.
Homer:  Whew, I was afraid it was my transmission.
                                --Homer Simpson, "Homer's Triple Bypass"

Rock 'n' Roll had become stagnant.  "Achy Breaky Heart" was seven years
away.  Something had to fill the void, and that something was barbershop.
                                --Homer Simpson, "Homer's Barbershop Quartet"

Flanders!  My socks feel dirty!  Gimme some water to wash 'em!
                                --Homer Simpson, "Boy-Scoutz N The Hood"

Kent:   Well, what do you say to the accusation that your group has been
        causing more crimes than it's been preventing?
Homer:  Oh, Kent, I'd be lying if I said my men weren't committing crimes.
                                --Homer Simpson, "Homer The Vigilante"

Marge, there's just too much pressure, what with my job, the kids, traffic
snarls, polital strife at home and abroad.  But I promise you, the second
all of those things go away, we'll have sex.
                                --Homer Simpson, "Grampa Vs. Sexual Inadequacy"

It works on any Ayatollah!  Ayatollah Nakhbadeh, Ayatollah Zahedi ... Even
as we speak, Ayatollah Razmara and his cadre of fanatics are consolidating
their power!                             --Homer Simpson, "Two Bad Neighbors"

Um, it's like, uh ... did anyone see the movie "Tron"?
                                    --Homer Simpson, "Treehouse Of Horror VI"

I think Smithers picked me because of my motivational skills.
                                    --Homer Simpson, "Homer The Smithers"

You can't depend on me all your lives.  You have to learn that there's a
little Homer Simpson in all of us.          --Homer Simpson, "Homer Defined"

When will I learn?  The answers to life's problems aren't at the bottom of
a bottle.  They're on TV!    --Homer Simpson, "There's No Disgrace Like Home"

Homer:  This place is depressing.
Grampa: Hey!  I live here.
Homer:  Oh, well, I'm sure it's a blast once you get used to it.
                                     --Homer Simpson, "Bart Vs. Thanksgiving"

Lisa:   Dad, I think that's pretty spurious.
Homer:  Well, thank you, honey.
                --Homer Simpson, "Homer Vs. Lisa And The 8th Commandment"

Selma:  It's time to give away my love like so much cheap wine.
Homer:  Take it to the hoop, Selma!
                                     --Homer Simpson, "Principal Charming"

Burns:  Good Lord, Smithers!  You look atrocious.  I thought I told you to
        take a vacation.
Homer:  Uh, Smithers already left, sir.  I'm his replacement, Homer Simpson.
                                     --Homer Simpson, "Homer The Smithers"

Bart:   Oh, cheer up, Mom.  You can't buy publicity like that.  Thousands
        and thousands of people saw your pretzels injuring Whitey Ford.
Homer:  You can call them Whitey-whackers!
                --Homer Simpson, "The Twisted World Of Marge Simpson"

Oh, "no attitude," eh?  Not "in your face," huh?  Well, you can cram it
with walnuts, ugly!    --Homer Simpson, "The Itchy & Scratchy & Poochie Show"

Homer:  I'm sorry, Marge, but sometimes I think we're the worst family in
        town.
Marge:  Maybe we should move to a larger community.
                --Homer Simpson, "There's No Disgrace Like Home"

Two-hundred-thirty-nine pounds?!  I'm a blimp!  Why are all the good
things so tasty?                    --Homer Simpson, "Brush With Greatness"

And thank you most of all for nuclear power, which is yet to cause a
single proven fatality, at least in this country.
                              --Homer Simpson, "Oh Brother, Where Art Thou?"

Quiet, you kids!  If I hear one more word, Bart doesn't get to watch
cartoons and Lisa doesn't get to go to college.
                              --Homer Simpson, "Oh Brother, Where Art Thou?"

Bart:   I had a fight with Milhouse.
Homer:  That four-eyes with the big nose?  You don't need friends like that.
Lisa:   How Zen.
                                      --Homer Simpson, "Homer Defined"

Homer:  Well, the evening began at the Gentleman's Club, where we were
        discussing Wittgenstein over a game of backgammon.
Scully: Mr. Simpson, it's a felony to lie to the FBI.
Homer:  We were sitting in Barney's car eating packets of mustard.  Ya happy?
                                      --Homer Simpson, "The Springfield Files"

Flanders: They're not perfect, but the Lord says love they neighbor --
Homer:  Shut up, Flanders.
Flanders: Okely-dokely-do.               --Homer Simpson, "Hurricane Neddy"

Boy, when Marge first told me she was going to the Police Academy, I
thought it's be fun and exciting, like the movie "Spaceballs".  But
instead, it's been painful and disturbing, like the movie "Police Academy".
                --Homer Simpson, "The Springfield Connection"

Bart:   Wow, Dad, you took a baptismal for me.  How do you feel?
Homer:  Oh, Bartholomew, I feel like St. Augustine of Hippo after his
        conversion by Ambrose of Milan.
                --Homer Simpson, "Home Sweet Homediddly-Dum-Doodily"

That's fine for you, Marge.  But I used to rock and roll all night and
party every day.  Then it was every other day.  Now I'm lucky if I can
find half an hour a week in which to get funky.  I've got to get out of
this rut and back into the groove!           --Homer Simpson, "Homerpalooza"

Good morning, fellow employee.  You'll notice that I am now a model worker.
We should continue this conversation later, during the designated break
periods.  Sincerely, Homer Simpson.         --Homer Simpson, "Homer's Enemy"

A boy without mischief is like a bowling ball without a liquid center.
                                        --Homer Simpson, "Lisa The Breek"

Apu:    You look familiar, sir.  Are you on the television or something?
Homer:  Sorry, buddy.  You got me confused with Fred Flintstone.
                                        --Homer Simpson, "Homer's Night Out"

Now, son, you don't want to drink beer.  That's for daddys,
and kids with fake IDs.              --Homer Simpson, "The Springfield Files"

Marge:  Homer, remember you promised you'd try to limit pork to six
        servings a week?
Homer:  Marge, I'm only human.      --Homer Simpson, "Principal Charming"

Oh, look at me!  I'm making people happy.  I'm the magical man from
Happyland in a gumdrop house on Lollipop Laaane!  Oh, by the way,
I was being sarcastic.                   --Homer Simpson, "Flaming Moe's"

I may just quit my job at the plant to become a full-time stock market guy.
                        --Homer Simpson, "Burns Verkaufen Der Kraftwerke"

Why did this have to happen now, during prime time, when TV's
brightest stars come out to shine?
                        --Homer Simpson, "Brother Can You Spare Two Dimes?"

Oh my God, someone's trying to kill me!  Oh, wait, it's for Bart.
                                        --Homer Simpson, "Cape Feare"

It all happened during the magical summer of 1985.  A maturing Joe Piscopo
left "Saturday Night Live" to conquer Hollywood; People Express introduced
a generation of hicks to plane travel; and I was in a barbershop quartet.
                               --Homer Simpson, "Homer's Barbershop Quartet"

Burns:  I can't understand a word you're saying.
Homer:  My name is Homer Simpson!
Burns:  You're just babbling incoherently...
Homer:  Oh, you're a dead man, Burns.  Oh, you're dead!  You're dead, Burns!
                        --Homer Simpson, "Who Shot Mr. Burns (Part 1)"

Burns:  Oh, quit cogitating, Steinmetz, and use an open-faced club!  A
        sand wedge!
Homer:  Mmm ... open-faced club sandwich.
        --Homer Simpson, "Scenes From The Class Struggle In Springfield"

Woman:  Your son was trespassing on my property and destroyed a very
        valuable stone gargoyle, and -- Are you wearing a grocery bag?
Homer:  I have misplaced my pants.         --Homer Simpson, "Bart After Dark"

Anyway, we'd like to thank you for the occasional moments of peace and love
our family's experienced... well, not today.  You saw what happened.  Oh,
Lord, be honest.  Are we the most pathetic family in the universe, or what?
                                    --Homer Simpson, "Bart Vs. Thanksgiving"

Lisa, if you don't like your job you don't strike.  You just go in every
day and do it really half-assed.  That's the American way.
                                        --Homer Simpson, "The PTA Disbands"

Oh, I love your magazine.  My favorite section is "How to Increase Your
Word Power".  That thing is really, really, really... good.
                                --Homer Simpson, "Mr. Lisa Goes To Washington"

One day you may achieve something that we Simpsons have dreamed about for
generations.  You may outsmart someone.    --Homer Simpson, "Bart The Genius"

The code of the schoolyard, Marge!  The rules that teach a boy how to be
a man!  Let's see; don't tattle, always make fun of those different from
you, never say anything unless you're sure everyone feels exactly the same
way you do.                              --Homer Simpson, "Bart The General"

Homer:  Ooh, look at this one!  The Hammer of Thor!  (Reading)
        "It will send your pins to ... Valhalla?"  Lisa?
Lisa:   Valhalla is where vikings go when they die.
Homer:  Ooh, that's some ball.          --Homer Simpson, "The Telltale Head"

Marge:  Name one of your child's friends.
Homer:  Uh, let's see, Bart's friends ... Well, there's the fat kid
        with the thing; uh, the little wiener whose always got his
        hands in his pockets.        --Homer Simpson, "Saturdays Of Thunder"

Smithers: Next.  There's a problem with the reactor -- what do you do?
Homer:  There's a problem with the reactor??  We're all going to die!!
                                        --Homer Simpson, "I Married Marge"

Camping alone outside the theater.
    --Letterman's "Star Wars Fan Euphemisms For Not Having A Girlfriend" #10

My force is no longer with me.
    --Letterman's "Star Wars Fan Euphemisms For Not Having A Girlfriend" #9

The Death Star is not yet operational.
    --Letterman's "Star Wars Fan Euphemisms For Not Having A Girlfriend" #8

The Empire's striking out.
    --Letterman's "Star Wars Fan Euphemisms For Not Having A Girlfriend" #7

Shaking hands with the wookie.
    --Letterman's "Star Wars Fan Euphemisms For Not Having A Girlfriend" #6

Darth Vader has no place to put his helmet.
    --Letterman's "Star Wars Fan Euphemisms For Not Having A Girlfriend" #5

Oiling the droid.
    --Letterman's "Star Wars Fan Euphemisms For Not Having A Girlfriend" #4

Unable to set coordinates for the planet Babe.
    --Letterman's "Star Wars Fan Euphemisms For Not Having A Girlfriend" #3

Spending the night with Han Solo.
    --Letterman's "Star Wars Fan Euphemisms For Not Having A Girlfriend" #2

Tractor beam not powerful enough.
    --Letterman's "Star Wars Fan Euphemisms For Not Having A Girlfriend" #1

If people from Poland are called "Poles," why aren't people from Holland
called "Holes?

Why are a wise man and a wise guy opposites?

Why do overlook and oversee mean opposite things?

Why is a person who plays the piano called a pianist, but a person who
drives a race car not called a racist?

If a pig loses its voice, is it disgruntled?

Why do women wear evening gowns to nightclubs?  Shouldn't they be wearing
night gowns?

If love is blind, why is lingerie so popular?

Why is the man who invests all your money called a broker?

Why do croutons come in airtight packages?
It's just stale bread to begin with.

If you mixed vodka with orange juice and milk of magnesia, would you
get a Philips Screwdriver?

Why do we say something is out of whack?  What is a "whack"?

If lawyers are disbarred and clergymen defrocked, doesn't it follow that
electricians can be delighted, musicians denoted, cowboys deranged, models
deposed, tree surgeons debarked and dry cleaners depressed?

Diplomacy is about surviving until the next century.  Politics is about
surviving until Friday afternoon.                   --Sir Humphrey Appleby

You know you're trailer trash when the Halloween pumpkin on your front
porch has more teeth than your spouse.

You know you're trailer trash when you let your twelve-year-old daughter
smoke at the dinner table in front of her kids.

You know you're trailer trash when you've been married three times and
still have the same in-laws.

You know you're trailer trash when you think a woman who is "out of
your league" bowls on a different night.

You know you're trailer trash when Jack Daniels makes your list of
"Most Admired People".

You know you're trailer trash when you think Genitalia is an Italian airline.

You know you're trailer trash when you wonder how service stations keep
their restrooms so clean.

You know you're trailer trash when anyone in your family ever died
right after saying, "Hey, y'all watch this".

You know you're trailer trash when you've got more than one brother named
'Darryl.'

You know you're trailer trash when you think that Dom Perignon is
Mafia leader.

You know you're trailer trash when your wife's hairdo was once ruined
by a ceiling fan.

You know you're trailer trash when you go to your family reunion looking
for a date.

You know you're trailer trash when your Junior/Senior Prom had a Daycare.

You know you're trailer trash when you think the last words to The Star
Spangled Banner are, "Gentlemen, start your engines."

You know you're trailer trash when you lit a match in the bathroom and
your house exploded right off its wheels.

You know you're trailer trash when you had to remove a toothpick for
your wedding pictures.

You know you're trailer trash when the bluebook value of your truck
goes up and down, depending on how much gas it has in it.

You know you're trailer trash when you have to go outside to get
something out of the 'fridge.

You know you're trailer trash when one of your kids was born on a pool table.

You know you're trailer trash when your dad walks you to school because
you're both in the same grade.

You know you're trailer trash when you need one more hole punched in
your card to get a freebie at the House of Tattoos.

You know you're trailer trash when you have flowers planted in a bathroom
fixture in your front yard.

You know you're trailer trash when you can't get married to yer
sweetheart 'cause there's a law against it.

You know you're trailer trash when you dated one of your parents'
current spouses in high school.

You know you're trailer trash when you think loading the dishwasher
means getting your wife drunk.

You know you're trailer trash when your school fight song is "Dueling Banjos."

You know you're trailer trash when your toilet paper has page numbers on it.

"We're rudderless, directionless and in some cases, clueless."
           --Ken Johnson, aide to Rep Billy Tauzin (R-La), discussing GOP
             leadership, http://www.usatoday.com/news/e98/e155.htm

Sometimes it is said that man cannot be trusted with the government
of himself.  Can he, then, be trusted with the government of others?
                     --Thomas Jefferson, in his 1801 inaugural address

Honesty is the best policy, but insanity is a better defense.
                                                    --tomas@primenet.com

No more lengthy pauses while reciting alphabet.
     --Letterman's "Top 10 Ways Dan Quayle Is Trying To Prove He's Smart" #10

Claims he knew all along "Blair Witch" was fake.
     --Letterman's "Top 10 Ways Dan Quayle Is Trying To Prove He's Smart" #9

Begins every speech by naming all 27 states.
     --Letterman's "Top 10 Ways Dan Quayle Is Trying To Prove He's Smart" #8

Walks around with shoes untied just so he can show off and tie them
for photographers.
     --Letterman's "Top 10 Ways Dan Quayle Is Trying To Prove He's Smart" #7

Completing crossword puzzle on his Chuck E. Cheese place mat.
     --Letterman's "Top 10 Ways Dan Quayle Is Trying To Prove He's Smart" #6

Defeated a Mr. Coffee Machine in a chess match.
     --Letterman's "Top 10 Ways Dan Quayle Is Trying To Prove He's Smart" #5

Instead of saying, "I don't know," now answering, "That information
is currently missing from my cranium."
     --Letterman's "Top 10 Ways Dan Quayle Is Trying To Prove He's Smart" #4

Challenges reporters to give him two single-digit numbers to add.
     --Letterman's "Top 10 Ways Dan Quayle Is Trying To Prove He's Smart" #3

While all those other idiots campaign in Iowa, Dan's got Canada
all to himself.
     --Letterman's "Top 10 Ways Dan Quayle Is Trying To Prove He's Smart" #2

He's not voting for himself.
     --Letterman's "Top 10 Ways Dan Quayle Is Trying To Prove He's Smart" #1

You don't make decisions because they are easy; you don't make them because
they are cheap; you don't make them because they are popular; you make them
because they are right.  --Theodore Hesburgh, former president of Notre Dame

Electrocution, n.: Burning at the stake with all the modern improvements.
                                                                 --S. Toms

Both ogliarch and tyrant mistrust the people, and therefore deprive them
of arms.                                                      --Aristotle

Real Men Don't Waste Their Hormones Growing Hair       --seen on T-shirt

Frankly, Scallop, I Don't Give a Clam            --seen on Cape Cod T-shirt

Happiness Is Seeing Your Mother-in-law on a Milk Carton --seen on T-shirt

Procrastinate Now          --seen on T-shirt

Rehab Is for Quitters      --seen on T-shirt

My Dog Can Lick Anyone     --seen on T-shirt

West Virginia: One Million People, Fifteen Last Names   --seen on T-shirt

DISCOURAGE INBREEDING - Ban Country Music     --seen on T-shirt

MOOSEHEAD: A great beer and a new experience for a moose   --seen on T-shirt

They call it PMS because Mad Cow Disease was already taken  --seen on T-shirt

He who dies with the most toys is still dead      --seen on T-shirt

FOR SALE - Iraqi rifle.  Never fired.  Dropped once.     --seen on T-shirt

WELCOME TO KENTUCKY - Set your watch back 20 years.      --seen on T-shirt

Suicidal Twin Kills Sister By Mistake!    --seen on T-shirt

NyQuil -The stuffy, sneezy, why-the-hell-is-the-room-spinning medicine.
                                                     --seen on T-shirt

If you can read this, the bitch fell off again
   --seen on the back of a T-shirt with a Harley Davidson logo on the front

I'd rather see a sister in a whorehouse than a brother riding a Honda
   --seen on the back of a T-shirt with a Harley Davidson logo on the front

Sending junk email to my address constitutes your legally-binding acceptance
of my offer to remove both of your nipples with an orbital sander.
                              --spam warning seen in Andy Ihnatko's signature

My motorcycle
stands forlorn on Hurlbut Street.
The b*stard won't start.                        --Harley haiku

God made us sisters, Prozac made us friends         --seen on T-shirt

(worn by a pregnant woman) A man did this to me, Oprah     --seen on T-shirt

Princess, having had sufficient experience with Princes, seeks frog
                                                  --seen on T-shirt

No, it doesn't hurt             --T-shirt on a "well-tattooed gentleman"

Veni, Vedi, Visa: I came, I saw, I did a little shopping.   --seen on T-shirt

(on the front) Yale is just one big party
(on the back)  with a $25,000 cover charge         --seen on T-shirt

Coffee, chocolate, men: some things are just better rich   --seen on T-shirt

I predict future happiness for Americans if they can prevent the government
from wasting the labors of the people under the pretense of taking care
of them.                                                  --Thomas Jefferson

Don't sweat petty things and don't pet sweaty things.        --George Carlin

One tequila, two tequila, three tequila, floor.  --George Carlin

If man evolved from monkeys and apes, why do we still have monkeys and apes?
                                                      --George Carlin

The main reason Santa is so jolly is because he knows where all the
bad girls live.                                         --George Carlin

I went to a bookstore and asked the saleswoman, "Where's the self-help
section?"  She said if she told me, it would defeat the purpose.
                                              --George Carlin

Could it be that all those trick-or-treaters wearing sheets aren't going
as ghosts but as mattresses?                                 --George Carlin

If a mute swears, does his mother wash his hands with soap?  --George Carlin

If a man is standing in the middle of the forest speaking and there is
no woman around to hear him, is he still wrong?           --George Carlin

If someone with multiple personalities threatens to kill himself, is it
considered a hostage situation?                           --George Carlin

Isn't it a bit unnerving that doctors call what they do "practice?"
                                                      --George Carlin

Where do forest rangers go to "get away from it all?" --George Carlin

What do you do when you see an endangered animal eating an endangered plant?
                                                      --George Carlin

If a parsley farmer is sued, can they garnish his wages?  --George Carlin

Would a fly without wings be called a walk?  --George Carlin

If a turtle doesn't have a shell, is he homeless or naked?  --George Carlin

Why don't sheep shrink when it rains?  --George Carlin

Can vegetarians eat animal crackers?  --George Carlin

If the police arrest a mime, do they tell him
he has the right to remain silent?               --George Carlin

Why do they put Braille on the drive-through bank machines?  --George Carlin

How do blind people know when they are done wiping?  --George Carlin

How do they get the deer to cross at that yellow road sign?  --George Carlin

Is it true that cannibals don't eat clowns because they taste funny?
                                                          --George Carlin

What was the best thing before sliced bread?     --George Carlin

One nice thing about egotists: they don't talk about other people.
                                                --George Carlin

To be intoxicated is to feel sophisticated, but not be able to say it.
                                                      --George Carlin

Never underestimate the power of stupid people in large groups.
                                                      --George Carlin

Age is a very high price to pay for maturity.  --George Carlin

Procrastination is the art of keeping up with yesterday.  --George Carlin

Women like silent men, they think they're listening.  --George Carlin

Men are from Earth, women are from Earth.  Deal with it.  --George Carlin

Give a man a fish and he will eat for a day.  Teach him how to fish,
and he will sit in a boat and drink beer all day.  --George Carlin

Do pediatricians play miniature golf on Wednesdays?  --George Carlin

Before they invented drawing boards, what did we go back to?  --George Carlin

If God dropped acid, would he see people?  --George Carlin

If one synchronized swimmer drowns, do the rest have to drown too?
                                                      --George Carlin

If you ate pasta and antipasta, would you still be hungry?  --George Carlin

If you try to fail, and succeed, which have you done?  --George Carlin

Viagra, The quicker dicker upper.    --Top marketing slogans for Viagra #10

Viagra, One-a-day, like iron.   --Top marketing slogans for Viagra #9

Viagra, When it absolutely, positively has to be there tonight.
                                --Top marketing slogans for Viagra #8

Viagra, Home of the whopper.    --Top marketing slogans for Viagra #7

Viagra, It plumps when you take 'em.    --Top marketing slogans for Viagra #6

Viagra, Strong enough for a man, but made for a woman!
                                --Top marketing slogans for Viagra #5

Viagra, Tastes great, more filling!    --Top marketing slogans for Viagra #4

Viagra, Ten inches long... and growing.  --Top marketing slogans for Viagra #3

Viagra, We work harder, so you don't have to!
                                --Top marketing slogans for Viagra #2

This is your penis.  This is your penis on drugs.  Any questions?
                                --Top marketing slogans for Viagra #1

Dave Letterman Virtual Celibacy Booth
                --Letterman "Exhibits At The Erotica Trade Show" #10

Hall of Gifford Flight Attendants
                --Letterman "Exhibits At The Erotica Trade Show" #9

The "Clamma Sutra" Clam Stand
                --Letterman "Exhibits At The Erotica Trade Show" #8

Quaker Instant Erotic Oatmeal
                --Letterman "Exhibits At The Erotica Trade Show" #7

Oscar Meyer Battery-Powered Wiener
                --Letterman "Exhibits At The Erotica Trade Show" #6

Take Your Picture With A Naked Andy Griffith
                --Letterman "Exhibits At The Erotica Trade Show" #5

Support Group Meeting For Strippers Whose First And Last Names Don't Start
With The Same Letter    --Letterman "Exhibits At The Erotica Trade Show" #4

The Interactive Intern  --Letterman "Exhibits At The Erotica Trade Show" #3

Condom Bill Gates Carried In His Wallet 1986-1997
                --Letterman "Exhibits At The Erotica Trade Show" #2

Madeleine Albright Kissing Booth
                --Letterman "Exhibits At The Erotica Trade Show" #1

Ethics is using free will to choose good over evil.
                                        --Jace Crouch <1849@nethawk.com>

Never believe anything the government says until it is officially denied
three times.             --Former British Prime Minister Benjamin Disraeli

Clinton lied.  A man might forget where he parks or where he lives, but
he never forgets (oral sex) no matter how bad it is.
                        --attributed to former First Lady Barbara Bush

You're basically killing each other to see who's got the better imaginary
friend.                          --Rich Jeni, on going to war over religion

I got kicked out of Riverdance for using my arms.       --Gary Valentine

On the one hand, we'll never experience childbirth.  On the other hand,
we can open all our own jars.
                --Jeff Green, on the difference between men and women

And God said: "Let there be Satan, so people don't blame everything on Me.
And let there be lawyers, so people don't blame everything on Satan."
                                                               --John Wing

Three words guaranteed to humiliate men everywhere: "Hold my purse"
                                                         --Francois Morency

The Web brings people together because no matter what kind of a twisted
sexual mutant you happen to be, you've got millions of pals out there.
Type in "Find people that have sex with goats that are on fire" and
the computer will say, "Specify type of goat."       --Rich Jeni

Luge strategy?  Lie flat and try not to die.            --Tim Steeves

Women might be able to fake orgasms.
But men can fake whole relationships.              --Jimmy Shubert

There are only two reasons to sit in the back row of an airplane:
Either you have diarrhea, or you're anxious to meet people who do.
                                --attributed to Henry Kissinger

My girlfriend always laughs during sex, no matter what she's reading.
                                                           --Emo Philips

My cousin just died.  He was only 19.  He got stung
by a bee, the natural enemy of a tightrope walker.          --Emo Philips

I saw a woman wearing a sweatshirt with "Guess" on it.
I said, "Thyroid problem?"                               --Emo Philips

Honesty is the key to a relationship.  If you can fake that, you're in.
                                                        --Rich Jeni

Hockey is a sport for white men.  Basketball is a sport for black men.
Golf is a sport for white men dressed like black pimps.
                                --attributed to Tiger Woods

Things you'll never hear a woman say:
"My, what an attractive scrotum!"                         --Jeff Green

I read somewhere that 77% of all the mentally ill live in
poverty.  Actually, I'm more intrigued by the 23% who are
apparently doing quite well for themselves.                 --Emo Philips

My parents saw the president they loved get shot in the head.
I saw my president get head.                                --Elon Gold

I discovered I scream the same way whether I'm about to be devoured
by a Great White or if a piece of seaweed touches my foot.     --Kevin James

Capital punishment turns the state into a murderer.
Imprisonment turns the state into a gay dungeon-master.        --Emo Philips

My mother never saw the irony in calling me a son-of-a-bitch.
                                                              --Rich Jeni

We sleep safely in our beds because rough men with guns
stand ready in the night to do violence on our behalf.    --George Orwell

Mary had a little key
she kept it in escrow
and everything that Mary sent
the Feds were sure to know.         -- Andy Starritt, in sci.crypt

People don't seem to realize that the magnitude of heroism is the
difference between what you have and what someone is willing to give
you in a time of need.  The actual per unit value of the commodity
is unimportant.  That's why people sometimes don't fully accept that
their personal contribution may have been unusually important to others.
                        --Jerry Olivieri, NASA Jet Propulsion Laboratory

It is hoped the US DoJ will not coerce Microsoft Corporation into releasing
its source code to the competition; the national security of several large
states would be at risk, and paramedics aren't ready to deal with
hysterical giggling on a planetary scale.  --Phil Regnauld <regnauld@ftf.net>

It took the computing power of three Commodore 64 computers to fly to the
moon.  It takes a 486 66MHZ computer to run Windows 95.  Anything wrong?
                                                         --unknown

I've always seen military service as a plus.
            --Bill Clinton, equating the service of presidential
            hopefuls John McCain, a naval aviator who spent more than
            five years as a prisoner of war in the "Hanoi Hilton,"
            and Al Gore, who spent five months in Vietnam as an Army
            journalist shooting pictures.

Gun Control: The theory that a woman found dead in an alley, raped, and
strangled with her panty hose, is somehow morally superior to a woman
explaining to police how her attacker got that fatal bullet wound.
                                                             --David Codrea

Letterman's "Top 10 Signs You've Eaten Too Much" #1:
You're sweatin' gravy.

Letterman's "Top 10 Signs You've Eaten Too Much" #2:
Every escalator you step on immediately grinds to a halt.

Letterman's "Top 10 Signs You've Eaten Too Much" #3:
Getting off your couch requires help from the fire department.

Letterman's "Top 10 Signs You've Eaten Too Much" #4:
CBS tells you to lose weight or else.

Letterman's "Top 10 Signs You've Eaten Too Much" #5:
World's fattest man sends you a telegram, warning you to "back off"

Letterman's "Top 10 Signs You've Eaten Too Much" #6:
You decide to take a little nap and wake up in mid-July.

Letterman's "Top 10 Signs You've Eaten Too Much" #7:
Right this minute you're laughing up pie on the carpet.

Letterman's "Top 10 Signs You've Eaten Too Much" #8:
You're responsible for a slight but measurable shift in the earth's axis.

Letterman's "Top 10 Signs You've Eaten Too Much" #9:
Doctor tells you your weight would be perfect for a man 17 feet tall.

Letterman's "Top 10 Signs You've Eaten Too Much" #10:
Hundreds of volunteers have started to stack sandbags around you.

It's become fashionable in some societies (e.g., the USA) to vociferously
complain about "intolerance" and other such behaviors while studiously
ignoring the society-eroding activities that trigger such behaviors in others.
That fashion has had at least one general effect: of causing many to no
longer risk telling others when they *are* behaving badly, lest they be
upbraided for daring to "judge".                         --craig@jcb-sc.com

Vidiot: someone who gets all of their news
or other info from the television networks.         --Sam Odgers

Reintarnation: Coming back to life as a hillbilly.
                --Reader's reply to Washington Post Style Invitational

Foreploy: Any misrepresentation about yourself for the purpose of romance.
                --Reader's reply to Washington Post Style Invitational

Giraffiti: Vandalism spray painted very, very high.
                --Reader's reply to Washington Post Style Invitational

Sarchasm: The gulf between the author of sarcastic wit and the person who
doesn't get it.     --Reader's reply to Washington Post Style Invitational

Inoculatte: To take coffee intravenously when you're running late.
                --Reader's reply to Washington Post Style Invitational

Hipatitis: Terminal coolness.
                --Reader's reply to Washington Post Style Invitational

Osteopornosis: A degenerate disease.
                --Reader's reply to Washington Post Style Invitational

Karmageddon: It's like, when everybody is sending off all these really
bad vibes, right?  And then, like, the Earth explodes and it's like,
a serious bummer.  --Reader's reply to Washington Post Style Invitational

Glibido: All talk and no action.
                --Reader's reply to Washington Post Style Invitational

Dopeler effect: The tendency of stupid ideas to seem smarter when they come
at you rapidly.    --Reader's reply to Washington Post Style Invitational

Intaxication: Euphoria at getting a tax refund, which lasts until you
realize it was your money to start with.
                --Reader's reply to Washington Post Style Invitational

Ignoranus: A person who's both stupid and an *sshole.
                --Reader's reply to Washington Post Style Invitational

Mexico Church Calls Santa a Drunk        -- AP headline

Bill Clinton has all the steely resolve of a
kamikaze pilot on his 37th mission.               --Jerry Gardner

If you drink don't park, accidents cause people          --bumper sticker

If that phone was up your butt, maybe you could drive a little better
                                                --bumper sticker

My kid got your Honor Roll student pregnant          --bumper sticker

Impotence: nature's way of saying "no hard feelings"       --bumper sticker

If you can read this, I've lost my trailer          --bumper sticker

It's not how you pick your nose, but where you put the booger
                                                --bumper sticker

The face is familiar but I can't quite remember my name    --bumper sticker

Honk if anything falls off          --bumper sticker

He who hesitates is not only lost but miles from the next exit
                                                --bumper sticker

If you can read this, please flip me back over
                        --bumper sticker seen upside-down on a Jeep

Guys: no shirt, no service
Gals: no shirt, no charge            --bumper sticker seen on a restaurant

If walking is so good for you, then why does
my mailman look like Jabba the Hut?          --bumper sticker

Necrophillia: that uncontrollable urge to crack open a cold one
                                                        --bumper sticker

Body by Nautilus, brain by Mattel          --bumper sticker

Cat: the other white meat          --bumper sticker

Caution - driver legally blonde          --bumper sticker

Don't be sexist - broads hate that          --bumper sticker

Heart attacks: God's revenge for eating His animal friends   --bumper sticker

Honk if you've never seen an Uzi fired from a car window   --bumper sticker

Warning!  Driver only carries $20.00 in ammunition     --bumper sticker

PETA - People Eating Tasty Animals          --bumper sticker

Wherever they burn books they will also, in the end, burn human beings.
                                                --Heinrich Heine

I have a most peaceable disposition.  My desires are for a modest hut, a
thatched roof, a good bed, good food, very fresh milk and butter, flowers in
front of my window and a few pretty trees by my door.  And should the good
Lord wish to make me really happy, he will allow me the pleasure of seeing
about six or seven of my enemies hanged upon those trees.  --Heinrich Heine

But these are not inherent flaws in the operating system; they don't happen
by accident.
  --Mike Nash, Director of Microsoft's Infrastructure Systems, explaining
    why NT has so many patches to fix crashes caused by malicious net users.

The wireless telegraph is not difficult to understand.  The ordinary
telegraph is like a very long cat.  You pull the tail in New York, and
it meows in Los Angeles.  The wireless is the same, only without the cat.
                                                              --A. Einstein

:---(       Person who is sad because he or she has a large nose.
                                                   --Dave Barry's emoticons

:-D*        Person laughing so hard that he or she does not notice that a
            5-legged spider is hanging from his or her lip.
                                                   --Dave Barry's emoticons

>8-O-(&)    Person just realizing that he or she has a tapeworm.
                                                   --Dave Barry's emoticons

.-)         Person who can still smile despite losing an eyeball.
                                                   --Dave Barry's emoticons

:-0WW       Person vomiting a series of Slim Jims.
                                                   --Dave Barry's emoticons

:-Q   Person who just had cybersex and is now enjoying
      a post-coital cybercigarette.                --Dave Barry's emoticons

>:-Q -...   Person who just had cybersex and was enjoying a post-coital
            cybercigarette until he suddenly noticed, to his alarm,
            that there is some kind of discharge dribbling from
            his cybermember.                       --Dave Barry's emoticons

:-{8        Person who is unhappy with the results of her
            breast-enlargement surgery.            --Dave Barry's emoticons

:V:-|       Person who cannot figure out why nobody wants to talk to him
            or her, little suspecting that there is an alligator on
            his or her head.
                                                   --Dave Barry's emoticons

~oE]:-|     Fisherperson heading for market with a basket on his or her
            head containing a three-legged octopus that is giving off
            smell rays.
                                                   --Dave Barry's emoticons

>:-[ -{9    Person who is none too pleased to be giving birth to a squirrel.
                                                   --Dave Barry's emoticons

I think we have more machinery of government than is necessary, too
many parasites living on the labor of the industrious.   --Thomas Jefferson

I shouldn't be eating hamburgers, because the methane gas cows release
is the #1 contributor to the destruction of the ozone layer; and the #1
reason they destroy the rainforest is to make grazing ground for cattle.
So it's very ironic that I eat beef, being the environmentalist that
I am.  But then again, if I ordered the tuna sandwich, I would be
promoting the fact that they have large tuna nets that capture innocent
little dolphins...."
        -- Leo DiCaprio, Hollywonk and chair-lifeform of "Earth Day 2000"

Q:  How many Martians does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
A:  One and a half.                                     --Bill McClatchie

The scientific theory I like best is that the rings of Saturn
are composed entirely of lost airline luggage.            --Mark Russell

Last night I played a blank tape at full blast.
The mime next door went nuts.                          --Erich Zigler

I'm not one of those who think Bill Gates is the devil.
I simply suspect that if Microsoft ever met up with
the devil, it wouldn't need an interpreter.            --Nicholas Petreley

Stress is when you wake up screaming and you realize
you haven't fallen asleep yet.          --Markus Stumpf <maex-qmail@Space.Net>

One of the surprising privileges of intellectuals is that they are free
to be scandalously asinine without harming their reputations.  --Eric Hoffer

IRS: We've got what it takes to take what you've got.  --bumper sticker

I believe that the 16th amendment has created a system that is
economically destructive, impossibly complex, overly intrusive,
unprincipled, dishonest, unfair, and inefficient.
                                --Rep. Sam Johnson, R-Texas on April 10, 1997

Taxes should be proportioned to what may be annually spared by the individual.
                                          --Thomas Jefferson to James Madison

The IRS has 480 different tax forms, plus 280 more to explain how to
fill out the first 480.  The original Tax Code had 11,400 words; today
it has 7 million.               --Rep. Sam Johnson, R-Texas

Contrary to what some people claim, the tax laws have a lot of respect
for logic.  They use it so sparingly.  --Jeffrey L. Yablon

The best things in life are free, but sooner or later the government
will find a way to tax them.

I believe we should all pay our tax bill with a smile.
I tried but they wanted cash.

The difference between tax avoidance and tax evasion
is the thickness of a prison wall.                     --Denis Healey

There's nothing wrong with the younger generation
that becoming taxpayers won't cure.                --Dan Bennett

Our forefathers made one mistake.  What they should have fought for
was representation without taxation.                      --Fletcher Knebel

Our properties within our own territories [should not] be taxed or
regulated by any power on Earth but our own.
                   --Thomas Jefferson's Rights of British America, 1774

American workers spend more of their day working to pay taxes than they
do to feed, clothe, and house their families.  --The Tax Foundation 9/6/99

There is only one thing worse than the flu season; the tax season.
You can recover from the flu.

Excessive taxation will carry reason and reflection to every man's door,
and particularly in the hour of election.   --Thomas Jefferson to John Taylor

The politician's promises of yesterday are the taxes of today.
                                          --W.L. Mackenzie King

War involves in its progress such a train of unforeseen and unsupposed
circumstances that no human wisdom can calculate the end.  It has but
one thing certain, and that is to increase taxes.              --Thomas Paine

The art of taxation consists in so plucking the goose as to obtain the
largest possible amount of feathers with the smallest possible amount
of hissing.                                               --Jean B. Colbert

I like to pay taxes.  With them, I buy civilization.  --Oliver Wendell Holmes

Taxes are what we pay for civilized society.  A penalty on the other
hand is intended altogether to prevent the thing punished.
                                                 --Oliver Wendell Holmes

It would be an extreme if not an extravagant application of the Fifth
Amendment to say that it authorized a man to refuse to state the amount
of his income because it had been made in crime.    --Oliver Wendell Holmes

There is no art which one government sooner learns from another than
that of draining money from the pockets of the people.        --Adam Smith

There are two distinct classes of men: those who
pay taxes and those who receive and live upon taxes.        --Thomas Paine

In the matter of taxation, every privilege is an injustice.  --Voltaire

Income tax returns are the most imaginative fiction being written today.
                                                --Herman Wouk

The avoidance of taxes is the only pursuit that still carries any reward.
                                                --John Maynard Keynes

Of all debts, men are least willing to pay taxes.
What a satire is this on government!  --Ralph Waldo Emerson "Politics," 1844

I am proud to be paying taxes in the United States.  The only thing is,
I could be just as proud for half the money.            --Arthur Godfrey

For every $50 you earn, you get $10 and they get $40.
                                      --Jay Leno explaining Form 1040

Ideas of fairness in taxation are usually nebulous.
                                        --Roy Blough and Carl Shoup

Loophole: To liberals, any provision of the tax code that fails to claim
money earned, inherited, saved, or otherwise pocketed by known taxpayers.
                                          --The Conservative's Dictionary

The nation ought to have a tax system which
looks like someone designed it on purpose.             --William E. Simon

When everybody has got money they cut taxes, and when they're broke they
raise 'em.  That's statesmanship of the highest order.  --Will Rogers

In the end, when you're dealing with tax laws,
the pigs get fatter and the hogs get slaughtered.         --Gene Gavin

If the Lord had meant us to pay income taxes,
he'd have made us smart enough to prepare the return.  --Kirk Kirkpatrick

People who complain about taxes can be divided
into two classes: men and women.                      --anon

Justice: A commodity which is a more or less adulterated condition
the State sells to the citizen as a reward for his allegiance, taxes,
and personal service.            --Ambrose Bierce, The Devil's Dictionary

Censure is the tax a man pays to the public for being eminent.
                                                          --Jonathan Swift

The income tax created more criminals than
any other single act of government.              --Barry M. Goldwater

Thank God they're not doing brain surgery.
                                    --Fred Allen commenting about the IRS

Any bare necessity--with taxes added.
                                    --David Crown's reference to luxury tax

Idleness and pride tax with a heavier hand than kings and parliaments.
If we can get rid of the former, we may easily bear the latter.
                                              --Benjamin Franklin

My uncle claims that if he files his income tax wrong he'll go to jail,
and if he files it right he'll go to the poor house.          --Nonnee Coan

I have no intention of raising taxes.            --President Bill Clinton

It's a game.  We [tax lawyers] teach the rich how to play it so they
can stay rich--and the IRS keeps changing the rules so we can keep
getting rich teaching them.                                --John Grisham

We have long had death and taxes as the two standards of inevitability.
But there are those who believe that death is the preferable of the two.
'At least,' as one man said, 'there's one advantage about death; it
doesn't get worse every time Congress meets'.           --Erwin N. Griswold

Taxes are not levied for the benefit of the taxed.        --Robert Heinlein

There is no worse tyranny than to force a man to pay for what he
does not want merely because you think it would be good for him.
                                                        --Robert Heinlein

It is fairer to tax people on what they extract from the economy,
as roughly measured by their consumption, than to tax them on what
they produce for the economy, as roughly measured by their income.
                                                        --Thomas Hobbes

A society which turns so many of its best and brightest
into tax lawyers may be doing something wrong.         --Hoffman F. Fuller

I have trouble reconciling my net income with my gross habits.  --Errol Flynn

Taxes are the killing fields of Democrats.  --Grover Norquist

If the exercise of power of internal taxation by the Union should
be discovered on experiment to be really inconvenient, the federal
government may then forbear the use of it...  --Alexander Hamilton

The power of creating new funds upon new objects of taxation, by its own
authority, would enable the national government to borrow as far as its
necessities might require.
                --Alexander Hamilton, Federalist #30, Concerning the
                  General Power of Taxation, December 28, 1787

The best way for the Government to maintain its credit is to pay as it
goes-not by resorting to loans, but by keeping out of debt-through an
adequate income secured by a system of taxation, external or internal,
or both.  --Pres. William McKinley's First Inaugural Address, March 4, 1897

Your profits are going to be cut down to a reasonably low level by
taxation.  Your income will be subject to higher taxes.  Indeed in these
days, when every available dollar should go to the war effort, I do not
think that any American citizen should have a net income in excess of
$25,000 per year after payment of taxes.
                        --President Franklin Delano Roosevelt's Radio
                          Broadcast, April 28, 1942
                          (Referring to Seven-Point Program)

Your federal government needs your money so that it can perform vital
services for you that you would not think up yourself in a million years.
                                     --Dave Barry "Sweating Out Taxes"

[American tax laws] are constantly changing as our elected representatives
seek new ways to ensure that whatever tax advice we receive is incorrect.
                                                        --Dave Barry

I bet that if you actually read the entire vastness
of the US Tax Code, you'd find at least one sex scene.  --Dave Barry

The IRS spends God knows how much of your tax money on these toll-free
information hotlines staffed by IRS employees, whose idea of a dynamite
tax tip is that you should print neatly.  --Dave Barry "Sweating Out Taxes"

If Congress were to pass a flat tax, you'd simply pay a fixed percentage
of your income, and you wouldn't fill out any complicated forms,
and there would be no loopholes for politically connected groups,
and normal people would actually understand the tax laws, and giant
talking broccoli stalks would come around and mow your lawn for free,
because Congress is NOT going to pass a flat tax, you pathetic fool.
                                                        --Dave Barry

All taxation is an evil, but heavy taxes, indiscriminately levied on
everything are one of the greatest curses that can afflict a people.
                                                        --Brooks Adams

Nothing is so well calculated to produce a death-like torpor in the
country as an extended system of taxation and a great national debt.
                                                        --William Cobbett

You're acting like a thing from another tax bracket!
                                --Kimberly, "Buffy the Vampire Slayer" movie

It is the duty of a good shepherd to shear his sheep, not to skin them.
                                                        --Tiberius Caesar

The validity of a tax depends upon its nature, and not upon its name.
                                                        --Benjamin N. Cardozo

The federal income tax system is a disgrace to the human race.  --Jimmy Carter

Rulers do not reduce taxes to be kind.  Expediency and greed create high
taxation, and normally it takes an impending catastrophe to bring it down.
                                                        --Charles Adams

The current income tax code is the chief source of political corruption
in the nation's capitol.  Tax reform is not for the timid.
                                  --Rep. Richard K. Armey, R-Texas

[T]he tax code is the single greatest source of lobbying activity
in Washington.                  --Rep. Richard K. Armey, R-Texas

It's the kind of work that makes your hair hurt.
      --Daniel Mitchell on the need for more attention to transition
        rules in converting to a flat tax

In this world, nothing is certain but death and taxes.
          --Benjamin Franklin discussing the Stamp Act passed by
            the British Parliament on March 22, 1765

Now is the time for us to restore freedom to the American taxpayer.
                          --Rep. Sam Johnson, R-Texas

The IRS has had substantial success in Chicago.  Al Capone was convicted
on tax evasion here, and that was probably the last time a majority of
Americans applauded the IRS on anything.  --Sheldon L. Banoff

Unless we wish to hamper the people in their right to earn a living,
we must have tax reform.                      --President Calvin Coolidge

The only people helped by the death tax are lawyers, accountants,
and IRS agents.                            --Rep. Bob Schaffer, R-Colo.

The collection of any taxes which are not absolutely required, which
do not beyond reasonable doubt contribute to the public welfare, is
only a species of legalized larceny.  --President Calvin Coolidge

I don't see why a man shouldn't pay an inheritance tax.  If a country is
good enough to pay taxes to while you are living, it's good enough to pay
in after you die.                                            --Will Rogers

I want to be sure that he is a ruthless son of a bitch, that he will do
what he is told, that every income tax return I want to see, I see.
   --Richard Nixon commenting on the kind of IRS Commissioner he wanted

[W]e do not have, and never had, and could not have a 'voluntary'
tax system.                  --Donald C. Alexander, former tax Commissioner

Congress tried to soak the rich, but drenched the middle class instead.
                  --Sen. Connie Mack, R-Fla., during debate on HR 2264,
                  the 1993 budget reconciliation bill

Ripping out the system by its roots is a proposition we readily support.
     --W. Henson Moore during a July 31, 1996 Ways and Means Committee hearing

[Congress should] pull the current income tax code out by its roots
and throw it away.  --Rep. Bill Archer, R-Texas, at a Ways and Means
Committee hearing

You [senators] and the American people don't have a clue about how the
IRS does its job, and that's just the way they like it.
                                  --Shelley Davis, IRS Historian

The genius of our ruling class is that it has kept a majority of the people
from ever questioning the inequity of a system where most people drudge
along, paying heavy taxes for which they get nothing in return.  --Gore Vidal

It used to be that death and taxes alone were inevitable.
Now there's shipping and handling.                        --Bert Murray

Why does a slight tax increase cost you $200 and a
substantial tax cut saves you 30 cents?                 --Peg Bracken

Tax reform is taking the taxes off things that have been taxed in the
past and putting taxes on things that haven't been taxed.  --Art Buchwald

Taxation is, in fact, the most difficult function of government and that
against which their citizens are most apt to be refractory.  --President
Thomas Jefferson, Introduction to Tracy's "Political Economy," 1816

If Patrick Henry thought that taxation without representation was bad,
he should see how bad it is with representation.  --Farmer's Almanac

The taxpayer--that's someone who works for the federal government
but doesn't have to take the civil service examination.  --Ronald Reagan

I wouldn't mind paying taxes --if I knew they were going
to a friendly country.                                  --Dick Gregory

Death and taxes and childbirth.  There's never any convenient
time for any of them.                --Margaret Mitchell 'Gone With the Wind'

Income tax has made more liars out of the American people than golf.
                                                          --Will Rogers

The trouble with an income-tax reduction is that it will stimulate business
just enough to put everybody in a higher tax bracket.        --Harold Coffin

The history of congressional oversight of the IRS does not speak well for
how seriously lawmakers have been monitoring the operations of the agency.
                                                        --George Guttman

The hardest thing to understand in the world is the income tax.
                                                          --Albert Einstein

[The IRS] may take some solace in the fact that Matthew was a tax
collector before he became a saint.                  --Donald C. Alexander

Suggesting that the IRS outsource its enforcement activities is like
suggesting that the FBI outsource its manhunts and the Pentagon outsource
its wars.                                  --Tax Executives Institute

Anyone who's received a notice in the mail from the IRS knows how it can
cause the blood pressure to rise.  --Rep. James A. Traficant, D-Ohio

Taxation WITH representation ain't so hot either.  --Gerald Barzan

Inflation is the one form of taxation that can be imposed without legislation.
                                                        --Milton Friedman

You know it's a bad day when your income tax refund check bounces.  --unknown

Save our Trees.  Stop Printing Tax Forms!  --bumper sticker

All taxes paid over a lifetime by the average American are
spent by the government in less than a second.             --Jim Fiebig

The reward of energy, enterprise and thrift is taxes.  --William Feather

There is nothing more permanent than a temporary tax.  --unknown

There's only one way to kill capitalism--by taxes, taxes, and more taxes.
                                                  --Karl Marx

Bachelors should be heavily taxed.  It is not fair that
some men should be happier than others.                  --Oscar Wilde

Be wary of strong drink.  It can make you shoot at
tax collectors, and miss.           --Lazarus Long, "Time Enough for Love"

Another means of silently lessening the inequality of property is
to exempt all from taxation below a certain point, and to tax the
higher portions of property in geometrical progression as they rise.
                          --Thomas Jefferson to James Madison, 1785

The new technologies should not be used as justification to create
new taxes.                                              --Glen A. Kohl

Americans now get less from their federal government than they used to.
But most people pay about as much in taxes-or more-than they did in
the past.                                              --Robert S. McIntyre

Most voters would rather have their purse or wallet stolen than be
audited by the IRS.                                   --Frank Luntz

As a cop, the IRS has to balance customer service and law enforcement.
Stated another way, the agency's motto could be: We're your friend.
But if you push that friendship too far, we'll ruin your life and then
throw you in jail.                                   --Christopher Bergin

As a citizen, you have an obligation to the country's tax system, but you
also have an obligation to yourself to know your rights under the law.
                                          --Donald C. Alexander

Last year I had difficulty with my income tax.  I tried to take my analyst
off as a business deduction.  The Government said it was entertainment.
We compromised finally and made it a religious contribution.  --Woody Allen

Where there's a will, there's an Inheritance Tax.  --unknown

Old MacDonald had an agricultural real estate tax abatement.  --unknown

What we should have fought for was representation without taxation.
                                                  --Sam Levenson

Tariff: A scale of taxes on imports designed to protect the domestic
producer against the greed of his consumer.
                        --Ambrose Bierce, The Devil's Dictionary

A fine is a tax for doing something wrong.  A tax is a
fine for doing something right.                        --unknown

Today's American works half of every day to pay for the burden of
government.  His taxes are used to reward the lazy and the immoral.
                          --Ellen Sauerbrey, candidate for Governor
                            of Maryland in a campaign speech

Many of the opposition [to the new Federal Constitution] wish to take
from Congress the power of internal taxation.  Calculation has convinced
me that this would be very mischievous.  --President Thomas Jefferson
to William Carmichael, 1788

On the income tax 1040 it says 'Check this box if you are blind.'
I want to know the idiot that creates these forms.  --unknown

Born Free... Taxed to Death.             --unknown

Congress should take the IRS, hand-cuff them to a chain-link fence and
flog them with their own damn tax code.  --Rep. James A. Traficant, D-Ohio

Have you ever wondered if taxation without representation was cheaper.
                                                          --unknown

To steal from one person is theft.  To steal from many is taxation.
                                                          --Jeff Daiell

Unquestionably, there is progress.  The average American now pays out
twice as much in taxes as he formerly got in wages.  --H.L. Mencken

The politicians don't just want your money.  They want your soul.
They want you to be worn down by taxes until your are dependent and
helpless.  When you subsidize poverty and failure, you get more of both.
                                                  --James Dale Davidson

[I] shall never use profanity except in discussing house rent and
taxes.  Indeed, upon second thought, I will not use it then, for it is
unchristian, inelegant, and degrading--though to speak truly I do not
see how house rent and taxes are going to be discussed worth a cent
without it.  --Mark Twain

When Barbary Pirates demand a fee for allowing you to do business, it's
called 'tribute money.'  When the Mafia demands a fee for allowing you
to do business, it's called 'the protection racket.'  When the state
demands a fee for allowing you to do business, it's called 'sales tax.'
                                                  --Jeff Daiell

When the same man, or set of men, holds the sword
and the purse, there is an end of liberty.              --George Mason

When a new source of taxation is found, in practice, that an old source
is abandoned.  It merely means that the politicians have two ways of
milking the taxpayer where they had only one before.  --H.L. Mencken

There are two methods, or means, and only two, whereby man's needs
and desires can be satisfied.  One is the production and exchange of
wealth; this is the economic means.  The other is the uncompensated
appropriation of wealth produced by others; this is the political means.
                                                  --Albert Jay Nock

It's getting so that children have to be educated to realize
that 'Damn' and 'Taxes' are two separate words.  --unknown

In the matter of taxation, every privilege is injustice.  --Voltaire

The less people know about how sausages and laws are made,
the better they'll sleep at night.                 --Otto Von Bismarck

Nuclear physics is much easier than tax law.
It's rational and always works the same way.  --Jerold Rochwald

Blessed are the young, for they shall inherit the national debt.
                                                  --Herbert Hoover

All taxes are a drag on economic growth.  It's only a question of degree.
                                                  --Alan Greenspan

All the Congress, all the accountants and tax lawyers, all the judges, and a
convention of wizards all cannot tell for sure what the income tax law says.
                                                    --Walter B. Wriston

The wisdom of man never yet contrived a system of taxation that would
operate with perfect equality.                   --President Andrew Jackson

Due process requires some definite link, some minimum connection,
between a state and the person, property or transaction it seeks to tax.
                                                      --Robert H. Jackson

The apportionment of taxes on the various descriptions of property is an act
which seems to require the most exact impartiality; yet there is, perhaps,
no legislative act in which greater opportunity and temptation are given
to a predominant party to trample on the rules of justice.  Every shilling
with which they overburden the inferior numbers is a shilling saved to their
own pockets.                                                --James Madison

Revenue on the consumption of foreign articles is paid cheerfully by
those who can afford to add foreign luxuries to domestic comforts.
                          --President Thomas Jefferson to Samuel Smith, 1823

Since the content of tax policy is both complex and uninteresting to
most readers, the press prefers to write about corruption and lobbying.
The ideal story reports on a political campaign contribution to a member
of the tax committee who has gotten a special interest amendment adopted
for the contributor.  --Thomas J. Reese

Death: to stop paying taxes suddenly.  --unknown

A dollar saved is bound to be taxed.  --unknown

An unlimited power to tax involves, necessarily, the power to destroy.
                                                          --Daniel Webster

No one imagines that a law professing to tax will be permitted to destroy.
                                                            --John Marshall

[The states] have no power, by taxation or otherwise, to retard,
impede, burden or in any manner control the operations of the
constitutional laws enacted by Congress.                    --John Marshall

If a thousand men were not to pay their tax bills this year, that would
not be a violent and bloody measure, as it would be to pay them, and
enable the State to commit violence and shed innocent blood.  This is, in
fact, the definition of a peaceful revolution, if any such is possible.
                                          --Henry David Thoreau

When Congress talks about simplification, taxpayers may well be reminded
of Emerson's comments regarding an acquaintance; "the louder he talked
of his honor, the faster we counted our spoons".  --Michael J. Graetz

The Tax Code is a monstrosity and there's only one thing to do with it.
Scrap it, kill it, drive a stake through its heart, bury it and hope
it never rises again to terrorize the American people.  --Steve Forbes

In case you didn't know, ethanol is made by mixing corn with your tax dollars.
                                                               --Paul A. Gigot

The reality is that for the last quarter century, Congress and the
presidents have betrayed us by concocting tax laws that are insincere,
unfair, and convoluted.  We're just learning that when it comes to taxes,
Washington speaks with an accomplished forked tongue.  --Martin L. Gross

Since the 1980s, it seems as if every journalist writing on tax policy
is out to win a Pulitzer Prize by exposing some Watergate-type scandal
of corruption and greed lurking behind the provisions of the Tax Code.
                                                  --Sheldon D. Pollack

Hypocrisy...  raises its head every time the subject of tax
simplification comes up.  --Lee A. Sheppard

Nothing guarantees more applause and more support than the call to
abolish the IRS.  --Frank Luntz

The tax collector must love poor people--he's creating so many of them.
                                                          --Bill Vaughan

The only thing generally raised on city land is taxes.
                                          --Charles Dudley Warner

Never before have so many been taken for so much and left with so little.
                                          --Van Panopoulos

Taxes are the sinews of the state.  --Cicero

For every benefit you receive a tax is levied.  --Ralph Waldo Emerson

Compare [our tax system] to the plight of medieval serfs.  They only had to
give the lord of the manor a third of their output and they were considered
slaves.  So what does that make us?          --Daniel J. Mitchell, economist

> You appear to be absolutely incapable of realising that there are
> people in this world who can see more than one side to a question...
>
  On the contrary.  I see both sides, and I have evaluated both sides, and
  I have found that one side is vastly superior to the other.  This may seem
  ruthless, but that's how engineering works.
                                 --Daniel J. Bernstein, comp.security.unix

Q: Why is Bill Clinton so reluctant to decide the fate of Elian Gonzalez?
A: Because last time he made a decision about where to put a Cuban, he was
   almost impeached.

It will be of little avail to the people, that the laws are made by men of
their own choice, if the laws be so voluminous that they cannot be read,
or so incoherent that they cannot be understood; if they be repealed or
revised before they are promulgated, or undergo such incessant changes that
no man who knows that the law is today, can guess what it will be tomorrow.
Law is defined to be a rule of action; but how can that be a rule, which
is little known, and less fixed?             --James Madison, Federalist #62

I am not comfortable about Brits telling us how to deal with our Bill
of Rights.  I think we settled that in 1776, didn't we?
      --The NRA's Charlton Heston, responding to British-owned Smith &
        Wesson's decision to fold in the legal gambit with the Clintonistas

It's tough taking sides in an argument between Charlton Heston and Bill
Clinton.  On one side you have a classic actor trained to fake emotion
for the camera, trained to win you over with a well-rehearsed script
and then on the other side you have Charlton Heston.      --Allyson Smith

People often wonder why most feminists don't "get" the Second Amendment.
They haven't made it past the First one yet.            --Wendy McElroy

Clairvoyant, n:  A person, commonly a woman, who has the power of seeing
that which is invisible to her patron, namely, that he is a blockhead.
                                --"The Devil's Dictionary", Ambrose Bierce

The bugs you have to avoid are the ones that give the user not only
the inclination to get on a plane, but also the time.       --Kay Bostic

Statistically, more small children drown in mop buckets than die from
gun accidents.               --Columnist Holman Jenkins, Wall Street Journal

The essence of constitutionalism in a democracy is not merely to shape
and condition the nature of majorities, but also to stipulate that
certain things are impermissible, no matter how large and fervent a
majority might want them.                                      --George Will

...[T]he public good is promoted best by people pursuing their own private
interests.  This bothers some people because they're more concerned with
motives than with results.                            --Walter E. Williams

Moses led the Hebrew slaves to the Red Sea, where they made unleavened bread,
which is bread made without any ingredients.
                                  --actual answer on a 6th grade history test

Solomon had three hundred wives and seven hundred porcupines.
                                  --actual answer on a 6th grade history test

In the Olympic games, Greeks ran races, jumped, hurled biscuits,
and threw the Java.               --actual answer on a 6th grade history test

Joan of Arc was burnt to a steak and was canonized by Bernard Shaw.
                                  --actual answer on a 6th grade history test

The nineteenth century was a time of a great many thoughts and inventions.
People stopped reproducing by hand and started reproducing by machine.
                                  --actual answer on a 6th grade history test

I'm sure that my inferiority complex doesn't measure up to yours.  --anon

The difference between a southern zoo and a northern zoo: a southern zoo has
a description of the animal on the front of the cage, along with a recipe.
                                                                   --unknown

I must admit, you brought Religion into my life.
I never believed in Hell 'till I met you.       --rejected Hallmark Cards

Looking back over the years that we've been together, I can't
help but wonder: What the f#$* was I thinking?    --rejected Hallmark Cards

As the days go by, I think of how lucky I am
that you're not here to ruin it for me.           --rejected Hallmark Cards

Congratulations on your promotion.  Before you go though,
would you like to take this knife out of my back?
You'll probably need it again.                    --rejected Hallmark Cards

For every year that goes by, Mother, I just think of that
inheritance getting closer and closer...          --rejected Hallmark Cards

I always wanted to be rich, powerful, and well-respected.  And while I'm
dreaming, I wish you weren't so damn ugly.        --rejected Hallmark Cards

Sex with you is like using drugs: lots of people do it,
but nobody's stupid enough to admit it.          --rejected Hallmark Cards

The holidays are a great time to be with family.
Of course, your family won't be with you, since I'm taking
the kids and moving in with my sister, you cheating bastard.
                                               --rejected Hallmark Cards

I'm so miserable without you, it's almost like you're here.
                                                --rejected Hallmark Cards

Congratulations on your wedding day!  Too bad no one likes your wife.
                                               --rejected Hallmark Cards

How could two people as beautiful you have such an ugly baby?
                                               --rejected Hallmark Cards

I've always wanted to have someone to hold, someone to love.
After having met you, I've changed my mind.       --rejected Hallmark Cards

If I get only one thing for Christmas, I hope it's your sister.
                                               --rejected Hallmark Cards

Happy Birthday!  You look great for your age, almost lifelike.
                                               --rejected Hallmark Cards

When we were together, you always said you'd die for me.
Now that we've broken up, I think it's time you kept your promise.
                                               --rejected Hallmark Cards

I knew the day would come when you would leave me for my best friend.
So here's his leash, water bowl and chew toys.    --rejected Hallmark Cards

We've been friends for a long time, what say we call it quits.
                                               --rejected Hallmark Cards

Congratulations on your new bundle of joy.
Did you ever find out who the father was?      --rejected Hallmark Cards

You are such a good friend that if we were on a sinking ship and there
was only one life jacket, I'd miss you heaps and think of you often.
                                               --rejected Hallmark Cards

Your friends and I wanted to do something special for your birthday,
so we're having you put to sleep.              --rejected Hallmark Cards

Happy Birthday, Uncle Dad! (available only in Kentucky, Tennessee & Arkansas)
                                               --rejected Hallmark Cards

... It does not require a majority to prevail, but rather an irate,
tireless minority keen to set brush fires in people's minds...
                                                        --Samuel Adams

The evils of tyranny are rarely seen but by him who resists it.
                                --John Jay: Castilian Days, II, 1872

Most people, sometime in their lives, stumble across truth.  Most jump
up, brush themselves off, and hurry on about their business as if
nothing had happened.                            --Sir Winston Churchill

I am only one, but I am one.  I cannot do everything, but I can do
something.  And because I cannot do everything, I will not refuse to
do the something that I can do.  What I can do, I should do.  And what
I should do...  I will do.                         --Edward Everett Hale

The legislative powers of the government reach actions only, and not opinions.
                                                        --Thomas Jefferson

The system of private property is the most important guaranty of freedom,
not only for those who own property, but scarcely less for those who do not.
                                                        --F.A. Hayek

The only purpose for which power can be rightfully exercised over any
member of a civilized community, against his will, is to prevent harm to
others.  His own good, either physical or moral, is not sufficient warrant.
                                                         --John Stuart Mill

Janet Reno ... demonstrated at Waco that sometimes
you have to kill children to save them.                 --Wesley Pruden

You can tie it up with a rose-scented ribbon labeled 'parental rights'
and it still stinks.  The Clinton administration is willing to trade
Elian's freedom for Castro's cooperation.  The left, which can't conceive
of anyone choosing America over a progressive state, would sacrifice
Elian on the altar of its ideology.                           --Don Feder

Socialists are made, not born, and right now we
are creating an entire generation of them.                --Chuck Baldwin

The socialist state requires greater and greater degrees of force to make
it function.  If resources and wealth are allocated on the basis of need
rather than production, people will compete to be more needy rather than
more productive.                                              --Linda Bowles

Government control of private-sector industry used to be called fascism.
Today it is called the Clinton administration.               --Geoff Metcalf

I always thought that when evaluating the worth of a human being, race
shouldn't count.  It appears my government has other ideas.  --Greg Crosby

No doubt the folks at HCI [Handgun Control Incorporated] would
rather have women ask a rapist to use a condom [than defend
their lives and health with firearms].                --Dr. Michael S. Brown

We are here to protect the freedom of the American people,
not to make privacy invasion more efficient.                --Rep. Ron Paul

The Framers of the First Amendment were not concerned with preventing
government from abridging their freedom to speak about crops and
cockfighting, or with protecting the expressive activity of topless dancers,
which of late has found some shelter under the First Amendment.  Rather,
the Framers cherished unabridged freedom of political communication.
                                                            --George Will

If everyone had to own one of these as a first car as I did, there would
be no traffic jams anywhere.  At least half of us would be so turned off
by the experience of owning a car, that we would seek alternate means
of transportation.
      --a VW Bus owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

There was no heat--unless, that is, the auxiliary gas heater caught fire.
      --a VW Bus owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

The flower stickers were the only things that held the car together.
      --a VW Bus owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

The bus had no heat, blew over in the wind and used the driver's legs
as its first line of defense in an accident.
      --a VW Bus owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

It was a death trap on the highway -- you could never go fast enough.
The chances were good that you'd be hit from the rear.
      --a VW Bus owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

Truly unencumbered by the engineering process.
   --a Renault Dauphine owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

At the time, it cost about half the price of a Volkswagen, which was
half the price of everything else.  How could Renault do this?  Simple.
It had half as many parts.
   --a Renault Dauphine owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

This car topped out at 45 mph.  Since the minimum speed on the Florida
Turnpike is 40, patrol cars would follow me, waiting for me to hit a
hill so they could ticket me.
   --a Renault Dauphine owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

From a historical perspective, it's a shame that the French spent their
Marshall Plan dollars on automaking.
   --a Renault Dauphine owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

Chevy Cavalier, slap some Cadillac stuff on it, add an extra $5,000.00
and sell a bundle.  Tragically enough, they pulled it off-for a while.
      --a Cimarron owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

Hands down, worst car for the money spent.  Yugos were junk, but at
least they were cheap.  This heap had a Caddy price tag!
      --a Cimarron owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

A stupid marketing ploy.  Nothing more than a Chevrolet Cavalier,
which Roger Smith gussied up and called a Cadillac.
      --a Cimarron owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

When we traded it in my wife was upset because we didn't keep it long
enough for her to buy a gun and shoot it.
      --a Cimarron owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

This car began to rust while it was still in the showroom.
      --a Volare/Aspen owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

The stalling problem was so bad that I had to take a clockwise route
to work so I could make all right turns, and not risk stalling on a
left turn in front of oncoming traffic.
      --a Volare/Aspen owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

After the floor boards rusted out in the rear, they would fill up with
water and freeze.  I ended up putting soda crates on the floor in the
back to keep people from falling under the car.
      --a Volare/Aspen owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

The only useful purpose this car served was as the model for the car
used in National Lampoon's Vacation.
      --a Volare/Aspen owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

Owning a Volare was total ego death--the theme song, the vinyl Landau
roof, the inability to pass another car on the highway.
      --a Volare/Aspen owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

I'm convinced that the body metal for this car was supplied by Reynold's
Aluminum.
      --a Renault LeCar owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

Like any French restaurant in America, it was overpriced, noisy, moody,
and would put you in mortal danger if you had an accident with anything
larger than a croissant.
      --a Renault LeCar owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

Our Le Car couldn't climb a hill fully loaded, so the passengers had
to get out and walk up.
      --a Renault LeCar owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

I left it unlocked overnight, and it was finally stolen.  The insurance
check paid for a textbook.
      --a Renault LeCar owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

An engine surrounded by 4 pieces of drywall
          --a Chevette owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

The Chevette just reeked of dinky; even the ad shouted that this was the
dinky little car for you.  The ad didn't show the car going anywhere fast,
because it couldn't.
          --a Chevette owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

Plywood floor, printed circuit 'wiring' and no redeeming qualities.
It was a throw away, 'Saturday Night Special' from the word go.
          --a Chevette owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

If I got on the Interstate without being run over, the car would creep
towards 55.  About an hour later, I'd reach it.  Then, the shaking would begin.
          --a Chevette owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

The big winter of 82-83 froze all the Chevettes in my town like dumb
ducks on an icy lake.
          --a Chevette owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

It was entirely possible to read a Russian novel during the pause
between stepping on the gas and feeling any semblance of forward motion.
          --a Gremlin owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

The car had all the quality and safety of a cheap garden tractor.
          --a Gremlin owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

Dad had a baby-poop-orange Pinto the year that car thieves hit our
street.  Although a dozen cars were stolen in one night, ours was there
the next morning, on a strangely empty block.
          --a Pinto owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

Remember that great Pinto bumper sticker, "Hit Me and We Blow Up Together"?
          --a Pinto owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

The car would do 75 mph in 2nd gear, shaking apart and sounding like a bat
out of hell.  In fourth gear, the top speed was 70 mph.  What's wrong with
this picture?  You do the math.
          --a Pinto owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

I took this car to a high-crime shopping mall and left it unlocked with
the keys in the ignition.  I came back several days later and, much to my
disgust, it was still there.
          --a Pinto owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

When the rear end went on my Vega, the Chevy dealer accused me of racing it.
Racing who?  My grandfather in his wheelchair?
      --a Chevy Vega owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

As near as I could tell, the car was built from compressed rust.
      --a Chevy Vega owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

My Chevy Vega actually broke in half going over railroad tracks.  The whole
rear end came around slightly to the front, sort of like a dog wagging
its tail.   --a Vega owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

Burned so much oil, it was single handedly responsible for the formation
of OPEC.
      --a Chevy Vega owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

I once test drove a Yugo, during which the radio fell out, the gear shift
knob came off in my hand, and I saw daylight through the strip around
the windshield.
            --a Yugo owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

Any time we made a right hand turn, we all had to lean to the right to
prevent the driver's side rear tire from scraping against the wheel well.
            --a Yugo owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

At least it had heated rear windows, so your hands would stay warm while
you pushed.  --a Yugo owner, on "Car Talk's 10 worst cars of the millennium"

Top oxymorons #1:   Microsoft Works

Top oxymorons #2:   Exact estimate

Top oxymorons #3:   Working vacation

Top oxymorons #4:   Diet ice cream

Top oxymorons #5:   Twelve-ounce pound cake

Top oxymorons #6:   Pretty ugly

Top oxymorons #7:   Definite maybe

Top oxymorons #8:   Tight slacks

Top oxymorons #9:   Political science

Top oxymorons #10:  Computer security

Top oxymorons #11:  Terribly pleased

Top oxymorons #12:  Plastic glasses

Top oxymorons #13:  Computer jock

Top oxymorons #14:  Temporary tax increase

Top oxymorons #15:  Extinct Life

Top oxymorons #16:  Peace force

Top oxymorons #17:  Clearly misunderstood

Top oxymorons #18:  Taped live

Top oxymorons #19:  Passive aggression

Top oxymorons #20:  Synthetic natural gas

Top oxymorons #21:  "Now, then ..."

Top oxymorons #22:  Childproof

Top oxymorons #23:  Sweet sorrow

Top oxymorons #24:  New classic

Top oxymorons #25:  Software documentation

Top oxymorons #26:  Military Intelligence

Top oxymorons #27:  Butt Head

Top oxymorons #28:  Soft rock

Top oxymorons #29:  Business ethics

Top oxymorons #30:  Small crowd

Top oxymorons #31:  Living dead

Top oxymorons #32:  Silent scream

Top oxymorons #33:  Legally drunk

Top oxymorons #34:  Alone together

Top oxymorons #35:  Sanitary landfill

Top oxymorons #36:  Government organization

Top oxymorons #37:  Almost exactly

Top oxymorons #38:  Same difference

Top oxymorons #39:  Good grief

Top oxymorons #40:  Airline Food

Top oxymorons #41:  Genuine imitation

Top oxymorons #42:  Advanced BASIC

Top oxymorons #43:  Resident alien

Top oxymorons #44:  Found missing

Top oxymorons #45:  Act naturally

It's easy to sit there and say you'd like to have more money.  And I
guess that's what I like about it.  It's easy.  Just sitting there,
rocking back and forth, wanting that money.   --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

To me, it's always a good idea to always carry two sacks of something when
you walk around.  That way, if anybody says, "Hey, can you give me a hand?",
you can say, "Sorry, got these sacks."        --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

Instead of a Seeing Eye dog, what about a gun?  It's cheaper than a dog,
plus if you walk around shooting all the time people are going to get
out of the way.  Cars, too!              --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

Broken promises don't upset me.  I just think, why did they believe me?
                                         --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

If you're a circus clown, and you have a dog that you use in your act,
I don't think it's a good idea to also dress the dog up like a clown,
because people see that and they think, "Forgive me, but that's just
too much."                                --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

If you ever fall off the Sears Tower, just go real limp, because maybe
you'll look like a dummy and people will try to catch you because, hey,
free dummy.                                --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

I wish I could shrink down to the size of an ant.  And maybe there would
be thousands of other people shrunken down to ant-size, and we would get
together and dig tunnels down into the ground and live there.  But don't
ever call us "ants," because we hate that.  --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

If you go through a lot of hammers each month, I don't think it necessarily
means you're a hard worker.  It may just mean that you have a lot to learn
about proper hammer maintenance.            --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

I wish I lived on a planet that had two suns -- regular sun and "rogue" sun.
That way, when somebody asked me what time it was, I'd say, "Regular time?"
And they'd say, "Yeah."  And I'd say, "Sorry, all I have is rogue time."
It'd be fun to be a stuck-up rogue-time guy.  --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

As the light changed from red to green to yellow and back to red again,
I sat there thinking about life.  Was it nothing more than a bunch of
honking and yelling?  Sometimes it seemed that way.
                                            --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

I can picture in my mind a world without war, a world without hate.
And I can picture us attacking that world, because they'd never expect it.
                                            --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

Whether they ever find life there or not, I think Jupiter should be
considered an enemy planet.           --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

I think there probably should be a rule that if you're talking about
how many loaves of bread a bullet will go through, it's understood that
you mean lengthwise loaves.  Otherwise, it makes no sense.
                                        --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

Too bad you can't just grab a tree by the very tip-top and bend it clear
over the ground and then let her fly, because I bet you'd be amazed at
all the stuff that comes flying out.         --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

Whenever I see an old lady slip and fall on a wet sidewalk, my first instinct
is to laugh.  But then I think, what if I was an ant, and she fell on me.
Then it wouldn't seem quite so funny.      --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

I believe in making the world safe for our children, but not our
children's children, because I don't think children should be having sex.
                                        --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

Many people never stop to realize that a tree is a living thing, not
that different from a tall, leafy dog that has roots and is very quiet.
                                        --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

If you go flying back through time, and you see somebody else flying
forward into the future, it's probably best to avoid eye contact.
                                            --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

Earth Day and Vladimir Lenin's birthday both take place on April 22.
Coincidence?                              --http://www.enterstageright.com

That the majority shall prevail is a rule posterior to the formation of
government, and results from it.  It is not a rule binding upon mankind in
their natural state.  There, every man is independent of all laws, except
those prescribed by nature.  He is not bound by any institutions formed by
his fellowmen without his consent.
                         --CRUDEN v. NEALE, 2 N.C. 338 (1796) 2 S.E. 70.
                           (Supreme Court of North Carolina, 1796)

Last time I went to the movies I was thrown out for bringing my own food.
My argument was that the concession stand prices are outrageous.
Besides, I haven't had a barbeque in a long time.          --Steven Wright

As for stability, we have three Windows 98 boxes that crash so often that
my 3-year-old son now says "It crashed" when I switch a TV program off.
                --Nicholas Petreley, "The Open Source", InfoWorld 2000-03-03
      http://www.infoworld.com/articles/op/xml/00/03/06/000306oppetreley.xml

Frugal Tip #28: designate one day each week as "Nude Day"
to cut down on your laundry expenses.

Frugal Tip #44: Sell something you don't own to somebody
who doesn't know any better.

If there's going to be a Big Brother in the United States,
it's going to be us.  The FBI.
               -- FBI Supervisory Special Agent Paul George
                  4/6/2000 at a computer privacy meeting in Toronto Canada

A celibate clergy is an especially good idea, because it tends to suppress
any hereditary propensity toward fanaticism.        --Carl Sagan, "Contact"

Patriotism means to stand by the country.
It does not mean to stand by the president.     --Theodore Roosevelt

Applying the cattle prod of knowledge to the testicles of ignorance.

Top reasons to fear smart appliances #1:
The bathroom scale keeps telling the fridge to stop ordering food.

Top reasons to fear smart appliances #2:
Your smart pillow talks to your PC, which emails your boss with a
message that, yep, you've overslept again.

Top reasons to fear smart appliances #3:
Your dashboard computer insists on making blonde jokes about your driving.

Top reasons to fear smart appliances #4:
The perky "kitchen assistant," an animated onscreen spatula, keeps
calling your mobile phone and asking, "Is your refrigerator running?"

Top reasons to fear smart appliances #5:
Your mailbox keeps asking why you get so many plain brown packages.

Top reasons to fear smart appliances #6:
Your appliances secretly open a joint bank account for repairman kickbacks.

Top reasons to fear smart appliances #7:
Your Microsoft coffeemaker monopolizes the countertop.

The act of cowardice is all that matters;
the emotion of fear is, in itself, no sin.     --C.S. Lewis

Justice without strength is helpless, strength without justice is tyrannical.
Unable to make what is just strong, we have made what is strong just.
                                                            --Blaise Pascal

Liberty of thought is the life of the soul.                 --Voltaire

Justice, sir, is the great interest of man on earth.        --Daniel Webster

It is your concern when your neighbor's wall is on fire.    --Horace

If every person has the right to defend -- even by force -- his person, his
liberty, and his property, then it follows that a group of men have the right
to organize and support a common force to protect these rights constantly.
                                                        --Frederic Bastiat

When plunder becomes a way of life for a group of men in a society,
over the course of time they create for themselves a legal system that
authorizes it and a moral code that glorifies it.       --Frederic Bastiat

Though it be honest, it is never good to bring bad news.
                                                --William Shakespeare

There is no legitimate religion apart from truth.          --John Calvin

The [Elian Gonzales] raid on the two-bedroom house was almost worth it if
only to watch Jesse Jackson, on Tony Snow's Sunday show, defending an armed
pre-dawn raid by the US government on a minority household.   --Rich Galen

Ling-Ling, the panda from China, died about a year ago.  Some of the public
wanted to stuff and mount Ling-Ling, but the people at the Smithsonian did
not give in to pressure, and said no.  They said that if people want to see
a semi-lifelike gift from China to America, they're going to have to vote
for Al Gore.                                                   --Bill Maher

Today was "Take Your Daughter to Work" day, or as they call it in
the White House, "Back Off Bill, She's Only 16" day.        --Conan O'Brien

This whole controversy over whether or not Bill Clinton should be disbarred
has got me wondering what it means when a society sets a lower standard for
being president than it does for being a lawyer.
                --Bruce Tinsley's cartoon character, Mallard Fillmore

A lot of times, girls provoke violence...  I'm not saying it's right or
wrong, but if the shoe fits, it should fit for everybody.
                         --OJ Simpson, in an interview with "Sport Magazine"
I don't think you want to use that line about shoes fitting.
                         --reply from Simpson interviewer

Oh, kids are the greatest, Apu.  You teach them to hate the things you hate,
and they practically raise themselves, what with the Internet and all.
                                                            --Homer Simpson

If the opposition disarms, well and good.  If it refuses to disarm,
we shall disarm it ourselves.                              --Joseph Stalin

No legislative act contrary to the Constitution can be valid.  To deny this
would be to affirm that the servant is above the master, or that the
representatives of the people are superior to the people.
                                --Alexander Hamilton, Federalist Papers #78

A Constitution is, in fact, and must be regarded by judges as fundamental
law.  If there should happen to be a irreconcilable variance between the two,
the Constitution is to be preferred to the statute.
                                --Alexander Hamilton, Federalist Papers #78

Only when our arms are sufficient beyond doubt can we be certain beyond
doubt that they will never be employed.  --President John F. Kennedy

It is impossible to introduce into society a greater change and a greater
evil than this: the conversion of the law into an instrument of plunder.
                                                        --Frederic Bastiat

We demand of our political life greater certainty and greater perfection
than we demand of our personal life.                        --Max Lerner

Virtually every argument for more gun control laws is either based on
lies or is grossly misleading.  ...[H]ard data show that, on net balance,
gun control costs more lives than it saves.  --Thomas Sowell

Disarmed citizens encourage crime and violence.  Armed citizens encourage
criminals to find a safer line of work.                   --Harry Browne

So in the end, the Million Mom March turned out to be little more than a
superhyped Democratic Party campaign rally.                --New York Post

With all our looking back at the 20th century, we have missed some of
its most blatant and most horrifying lessons.  The worst horrors of this
century, under both the Nazis and the Communists, came from concentrations
of political power, brought about by heady rhetoric, powerful visions and
emotional manipulations.  Yet we remain as susceptible to all these things
as if none of these horrors had happened.                  --Thomas Sowell

History is to civilization what memory is to an individual: a source of
identity and meaning.                                   --National Review

Love and respect for the great American experiment
in free government does not appear out of thin air.      --Larry P. Arnn

Clinton has brought us face to face with who we are and what we are.
Simply put, we are witnessing the denouement of the sorry saga of the '60s,
the drugs, promiscuity, vulgarity and perversion.         --Linda Bowles

[The Clintons] have left our political process distorted and misshapen;
they have stopped good things from happening, and allowed bad things to
occur; when caught they have covered-up and dissembled, which in turn has
added a new level of sourness, cynicism and confusion to our politics and
our culture.                                               --Peggy Noonan

Clinton may not be the worst president America has had, but surely he is
the worst person to be president.  --George Will

Simplistic gun-control solutions to complex social problems, involving
everything from one-parent families to parental neglect to lousy schools,
divert attention from the real problems facing American families and contribute
to unjustified complacency in responding to them.   --The Washington Times

"He's doing fine."  That's the political professionals' code for,
"Get paid in advance.  This campaign is toast".
                         --Rich Galen on how Gore's handlers are
                           explaining his lag in virtually every poll

If it were written today in the decade of the victim, the Constitution
would probably read like a 12-step pamphlet.  --Debra Saunders

Theme of the Million Mom March: "I don't need a brain -- I've got a womb".
                                                             --Ann Coulter

Bill [Clinton] never needed Socks to turn the White House into a cat house or
Buddy to turn it into a dog house or anyone else to turn it into an outhouse.
                                                            --Lyn Nofziger

Before we legislate an end to gun abuse by outlawing guns, perhaps we
should legislate an end to drug abuse by outlawing drugs.

Friends don't let friends take home ugly men
                            --Women's restroom, Starboard, Dewey Beach, DE

Remember, it's not, "How high are you?" its "Hi, how are you?"
                            --Rest stop off Route 81, West Virginia

A Woman's Rule of Thumb: If it has tires or testicles, you're going to
have trouble with it.  --Women's restroom, Dick's Last Resort, Dallas, TX

Express Lane: Five beers or less.
            --Sign over one of the urinals, Ed Debevic's, Beverly Hills, CA

You're too good for him.
            --Sign over Women's room mirror, Ed Debevics, Beverly Hills, CA

No wonder you always go home alone.
            --Sign over Men's room mirror, Ed Debevic's, Beverly Hills, CA

The best way to a man's heart is to saw his breast plate open.
                            --Women's restroom, Murphy's, Champaign, IL

Beauty is only a light switch away.
                    --Perkins Library, Duke University, Durham, North Carolina

Don't trust anything that bleeds for 5 days and doesn't die.
                            --Men's restroom, Murphy's, Champaign, IL

What are you looking up here for? The joke is in your hands.
                            --Men's restroom, Lynagh's, Lexington, KY

Never take a beer to a job interview.  --Martha Stewart's tips for Rednecks

Always identify people in your yard before shooting at them.
                           --Martha Stewart's tips for Rednecks

It's considered tacky to take a cooler to church.
                           --Martha Stewart's tips for Rednecks

If you have to vacuum the bed, it's time to change the sheets.
                           --Martha Stewart's tips for Rednecks

Even if you're certain that you are included in the will, it is still
considered tacky to drive a U-Haul to the funeral home.
                           --Martha Stewart's tips for Rednecks

When decanting wine, make sure that you tilt the paper cup and pour slowly
so as not to "bruise" the fruit of the vine.
                           --Martha Stewart's dining-out tips for Rednecks

If drinking directly from the wine bottle, always hold it with your fingers
covering the label.        --Martha Stewart's dining-out tips for Rednecks

A centerpiece for the table should never be anything prepared by a taxidermist.
                           --Martha Stewart's entertaining tips for Rednecks

Do not allow the dog to eat at the table, no matter how good his manners are.
                           --Martha Stewart's entertaining tips for Rednecks

While ears need to be cleaned regularly, this is a job that should be done
in private using one's OWN truck keys.
                           --Martha Stewart's hygiene tips for Rednecks

Proper use of toiletries can forestall bathing for several days.  However,
if you live alone, deodorant is a waste of good money.
                           --Martha Stewart's hygiene tips for Rednecks

Dirt and grease under the fingernails is a social no-no, as they tend to
detract from a woman's jewelry and alter the taste of finger foods.
                           --Martha Stewart's hygiene tips for Rednecks

Always offer to bait your date's hook, especially on the first date.
           --Martha Stewart's tips for Rednecks dating outside the family

Be aggressive.  Let her know you're interested: "I've been wanting to go
out with you since I read that stuff on the bathroom wall two years ago,"
           --Martha Stewart's tips for Rednecks dating outside the family

Establish with her parents what time she is expected back.  Some will say
10pm, others might say "Monday."  If the latter is the answer, it is the
man's responsibility to get her to school on time.
           --Martha Stewart's tips for Rednecks dating outside the family

Crying babies should be taken to the lobby and picked up immediately after
the movie has ended.     --Martha Stewart's theater etiquette for Rednecks

Refrain from talking to characters on the screen.  Tests have proven
they can't hear you.     --Martha Stewart's theater etiquette for Rednecks

Livestock, usually, is a poor choice for a wedding gift.
                           --Martha Stewart's wedding etiquette for Rednecks

Kissing the bride for more than 5 seconds may get you shot.
                           --Martha Stewart's wedding etiquette for Rednecks

For the groom, at least, rent a tux.  A leisure suit with a cummerbund
and a clean bowling shirt can create a tacky appearance.
                           --Martha Stewart's wedding etiquette for Rednecks

Though uncomfortable, say "yes" to socks and shoes for this special occasion.
                           --Martha Stewart's wedding etiquette for Rednecks

Dim your headlights for approaching vehicles, even if the gun is loaded,
and the deer is in sight.  --Martha Stewart's driving etiquette for Rednecks

When approaching a four-way stop, the vehicle with the largest tires always
has the right of way.      --Martha Stewart's driving etiquette for Rednecks

Never tow another car using panty hose and duct tape.
                           --Martha Stewart's driving etiquette for Rednecks

When sending your wife down the road with a gas can, it is impolite to ask
her to bring back beer.    --Martha Stewart's driving etiquette for Rednecks

Do not lay rubber while traveling in a funeral procession.
                           --Martha Stewart's driving etiquette for Rednecks

Enlightened statesmen will not always be at the helm.    --James Madison

If you entrust me with the presidency, we can all come back here and it
won't cost much at all.  We're going to make meaningful campaign finance
reform the law of the land.  --Al Gore talking about campaign finance reform
                               at the biggest Demo cash-bash ever

It is foolish and wrong to mourn the men who died.
Rather we should thank God that such men lived.        --George S. Patton, Jr.

I'm afraid one of these days soon some fast operator will come along and
try to change Memorial Day into something else.  You know, a name change
due to a new sponsor.                                  --Col David Hackworth

One of the [Million Mom] marchers said "the hands that rock the cradle
rule this nation."  I thought, "No, madam, the hands that rock the cradle
rule our families and governments and corporations.  The hands that wrote
the Constitution rule this nation".         --NRA President Charlton Heston

This battle for "common-sense" gun control laws pits emotion and passion
against logic and reason.  All too often in such a contest, logic loses.
So, expect more meaningless, if not harmful, "gun control" legislation.
Good news if you're a crook.  --Larry Elder

The absurdity of mothers of crime victims demanding that the means of self
defense be removed from law abiding citizens, thus creating more potential
crime victims, is bizarre and would be laughable if it weren't so dangerous.
                                                        --Charles A. Morse

These liberties, ensured by our Bill Of Rights, were properly recognized by
our Founders as divine in origin, transcendent in nature, and beyond the
political manipulations of beings even so powerful as talk show hostesses.
                                                       --Rep. J.C. Watts Jr.

Mr. Gore thinks he can win if he frightens women with lies about guns,
then seduces them with promises about something called gun control.
Well, manipulating women may be the Clinton legacy, but it won't work.
                                                --NRA's Wayne La Pierre

The fundamental difference between a free society
and an unfree society is an armed citizenry.               --Charley Reese

Al Gore's problem is that he's acting as if he's desperate to be president,
but sounding as if he doesn't want to do anything new once elected.  Right now,
Bush's vision wins by default simply because it dares to be new and different.
                        --Clinton's former Labor Secretary, Robert Reich

Al Gore is Walter Mondale in Earth tones.  --Hardball's Chris Matthews

I want you all to know that I still love [ex-boyfriend] Darren very much.
      --Village celeb Tonya Harding, after spending three days in jail for
        assaulting Darren Silver with a hubcap and then punching him in
        the face.  She will now spend ten days cleaning up trash around
        Portland, OR.

I married the first man I ever kissed.
When I tell this to my children they just about throw up.     --Barbara Bush

None as cute as that.
        --George W., after being kissed on the cheek by a 77-year-old man,
        asked if any other men had kissed him during his campaign

As my father always said to me, no matter what they say about you, good or
bad, you're the one who's going to have to make those putts.  --Tiger Woods

NIXON 2000: He's not as stiff as Al Gore           --bumper sticker

Hillary Clinton is going to be your next Senator.  I think it's only
fair; I mean after 18 years of Bill, you ought to give somebody else
in the family a chance to embarrass the Clintons.       --Dave Letterman

A new report says girls begin experiencing sexual harassment as early
as high school.  I think that's a pretty good time to start learning
how our government works.                               --Craig Kilborn

A 404 of former websites      --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A balm of grandmothers        --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A beam of trekkies            --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A blather of chat-room participants   --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A blizzard of AOL disks          --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A brace of orthodontists        --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A brief of lawyers          --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A byte of programmers            --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A catch of jugglers              --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A cheat of lawyers          --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A circle of geometricians        --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A clique of computer mice        --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A clutch of mechanics            --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A codicil of lawyers            --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A confusion of multi-disk CD players   --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A conspiracy of traffic lights     --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A counting of accountants          --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A crop of plant scientists         --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A cylinder of CDs                  --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A dictionary of linguaphiles       --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A dissemblage of politicians       --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A drove of taxi cabs               --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A duke of URLs                     --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A dump of spammers                 --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A giggle of girls        --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A grab-bag of purse-snatchers     --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A greed of lawyers          --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A herd of hearing aids            --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A hindrance of tech-support people  --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A host of nameservers           --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A mass of priests               --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A matrix of mathematicians      --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A mercenary of lawyers          --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A monica of sins                --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A number of accountants         --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A passion of poets              --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A patience of tech support callers  --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A phile of lovers                  --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A plurality of group nouns       --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A portfolio of stock brokers     --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A purchase of senators           --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A remora of lawyers         --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A row of knitters                --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A segregation of racists         --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A silence of lambs               --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A silicone of Baywatch reruns    --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A slime of lawyers          --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A sneer of Mac users             --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A somephony of music critics     --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A spider of webmasters        --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A stack of newspapermen          --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A stoppit of parents             --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A succor of grandmas        --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A suite of chocolates            --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A sum of accountants             --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A tragedy of lawyers            --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A wad of gum-chewers             --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A whatever of teenagers        --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

A wildcard of hackers            --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

An array of programmers          --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

An ear of colonels               --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

An enterprise of trekkies        --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

An imelda of shoes               --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

An interference of mother-in-laws  --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

An intimidation of gargoyles      --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

An obfuscation of politicians     --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

An obfuscation of user manuals    --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

An objection of lawyers         --collective nouns, June 1999 LINGUIST

Is it any wonder why the approval ratings of the
Congress go up every time we go into recess?     --Sen. Robert C. Byrd

When our chief magistrate, successor to Washington and Lincoln, lies in
sworn testimony, haggles over the meaning of "is," disports himself with
an intern, bombs foreign countries at suspiciously convenient moments,
and prepares to toss a 6-year-old Cuban boy into the open jaws of Fidel
Castro (an unmistakably evil character), the mud sticks to us all.
                                                --William Murchison

Political correctness is tyranny with manners,
and cultural cancer is eating away at our society.     --Charlton Heston

Since the collectivists and statists have no faith in the individual or
individual responsibility, they have little faith in the Bill of Rights.
A document that places the individual and certain self-evident truths
above the needs of the state no longer seems relevant to them.
                                                        --Diane Alden

The week's events make pretty clear which of the lawyers in this battle,
Mr. Starr and Mr. Clinton, was the one with the ethical problems.
      --Washington Post on a judge's dismissal of a misconduct complaint
        against Kenneth Starr and an Arkansas judicial committee's
        recommendation that Bill Clinton be disbarred.

Former Los Angeles Dodger manager Tommy Lasorda says he didn't vote for
Clinton/Gore because "My father was a Republican, and his father was
a Republican".  When asked if his father was a thief, "would that make
you a thief?"  he said, "No, that would make me a Democrat."

This week Democrats raised $26 million in soft money.
They raised this money to try and stop this kind of thing.   --Jay Leno

Hillary Clinton did an interview with a New York hip hop radio station.
Many didn't know that it was Hillary because she used her rap name,
Queen Subpoena.                                             --Jay Leno

One man with a gun can control 100 without one...
Make mass searches and hold executions for found arms.     --V.I. Lenin

The spectre of a polity controlled by the fads and whims of voters who
actually believe that there are significant differences between Bud Lite
and Miller Lite, and who think that professional wrestling is for real,
is naturally alarming to people who don't.                --Neal Stephenson

A word to the wise: a credentials dicksize war is usually
a bad idea on the net.
            --David Parsons in c.o.l.development.system, about coding in C

Goest thee not unto the Usenet for advice, for thou will be told both
yea and nay (and quite a few things that have nothing at all to do
with the question).                                             --unknown

Abbreviation for PETA: Pernicious Egocentric Twits of America

Abbreviation for PETA: Politicos Eager To Appease

Abbreviation for PETA: People for the Elitist Treatment of Animals

Abbreviation for PETA: People Engaged in Total Absurdity

Abbreviation for PETA: People for the Edible Treatment of Animals

Abbreviation for PETA: People Eager for Tons of Attention

Abbreviation for PETA: Public Education's Thoughtless Alumni

Abbreviation for PETA: People Enamored of Total Absurdity

Abbreviation for PETA: People Exempt from Thoughtful Analysis

Abbreviation for PETA: People with Extra Terrestrial Addresses

Abbreviation for PETA: Pinheads Expressing Total Absurdity

You know you're a redneck if you take your dog for a walk and you both
use the same tree.

You know you're a redneck if you can entertain yourself for more than
an hour with a flyswatter.

You know you're a redneck if your property has been mistaken for a
recycling center.

You know you're a redneck if your boat has not left the driveway in 15 years.

You know you're a redneck if you burn your yard rather than mow it.

You know you're a redneck if you think the Nutcracker is something you
did off the high dive.

You know you're a redneck if the Salvation Army declines your mattress.

You know you're a redneck if your entire family ever sat around waiting
for a call from the governor to spare a loved one.

You know you're a redneck if you offer to give someone the shirt off
your back and they don't want it.

You know you're a redneck if you have the local taxidermist on speed dial.

You know you're a redneck if you come back from the dump with more than
you took.

You know you're a redneck if the trunk of your car is tied down and
you're not hauling anything.

You know you're a redneck if you keep a can of Raid on the kitchen table.

You know you're a redneck if your wife can climb a tree faster than your cat.

You know you're a redneck if your grandmother has "Ammo" on her
Christmas list.

You know you're a redneck if you've ever been kicked out of the zoo
for heckling the monkeys.

You know you're a redneck if you think a subdivision is part of a
math problem.

You know you're a redneck if you've ever bathed with flea and tick soap.

You know you're a redneck if you've ever been involved in a custody
fight over a hunting dog.

You know you're a redneck if your kids take a siphon hose to show and tell.

You know you're a redneck if you think a hot tub is a stolen bathroom fixture.

You know you're a redneck if you took a fishing pole to Sea World.

You know you're a redneck if you go to the stock car races and don't
need a program.

You know you're a redneck if you know how many hay bales your car will hold.

You know you're a redneck if you've ever been kicked out of the KKK
for being a bigot.

You know you're a redneck if you have a rag for a gas cap.

You know you're a redneck if you've ever hit on somebody in a V.D. clinic.

You know you're a redneck if your father executes the "Pull my finger"
trick during Christmas dinner.

You know you're a redneck if your house doesn't have curtains but your
truck does.

You know you're a redneck if you wonder how service stations keep their
restrooms so clean.

You know you're a redneck if you can spit without opening your mouth.

You know you're a redneck if you consider your license plate personalized
because your father made it.

You know you're a redneck if you think Dom Perigon is a Mafia leader.

You know you're a redneck if your lifetime goal is to own a fireworks stand.

You know you're a redneck if you stare at a can of orange juice because
it says "Concentrate".

You know you're a redneck if you sit on your roof at Christmas time
hoping to fill your deer quota.

You know you're a redneck if your richest relative buys a new house
and calls you to help him take the wheels off.

Experience should teach us to be most on our guard to protect liberty
when the government's purposes are beneficial.      --Justice Louis Brandeis

The ultimate result of shielding men from the effects
of folly is to fill the world with fools.                 --Herbert Spencer

Nationalism remains a dirty word used by internationalists to describe
backward nations who disagree with the interests set by global elites.
                                                        --Michael Patrick

A government without strict limits is tyrannical.  You'd think
conservative intellectuals would grasp this by now.          --Joseph Sobran

A federal judge [says] the Microsoft split must last for at least
10 years, or the length of time the average consumer has been put
on hold with Microsoft technical-help services--whichever is longer.
                                                        --Kenny Noble Cortes

The new Linux anthem will be "He's an idiot, but he's ok", as performed
by Monthy Python.  You'd better start practicing.
                           --Linus Torvalds, announcing another kernel patch

Carpe Aptenodytes! (Seize the Penguins!)                --unknown

I've discovered that using VMS is a lot like driving a nail with
your head: sure, you eventually get something practical done,
but it usually results in a headache and some blood loss.   --Sean A. Simpson

You know you're a redneck if you have a complete set of salad bowls
and they all say "Cool Whip" on the side.

You know you're a redneck if the biggest city you've ever been to
is Wal-Mart.

You know you're a redneck if your working TV sits on top of your
non-working TV.

You know you're a redneck if you thought the Unibomber was a wrestler.

You know you're a redneck if you've ever used your ironing board as a
buffet table.

You know you're a redneck if you think a quarter horse is that ride in
front of K-Mart.

You know you're a redneck if your neighbors think you're a detective
because a cop car always brings you home.

You know you're a redneck if a tornado hits your neighborhood and does
$100,000 worth of improvements.

You know you're a redneck if you've ever used a toilet brush as a
back scratcher.

You know you're a redneck if you missed 5th grade graduation because
you had jury duty.

You know you're a redneck if you think fast food is hitting a deer at 65 mph.

You know you're a redneck if somebody tells you that you've got something
in your teeth and you take them out to see what it is.

Nothing is more responsible for the good old days than a bad memory.
                                                --Franklin Pierce Adams

When law and morality contradict each other, the citizen has the
cruel alternative of either losing his moral sense or losing his
respect for the law.                            --Frederic Bastiat

While we have heard of stupid haste in war, we have not yet
seen a clever operation that was prolonged.                 --Sun Tzu

We made a great mistake in the beginning of our struggle, and I
fear, in spite of all we can do, it will prove to be a fatal mistake.
We appointed all our worst generals to command our armies, and all our
best generals to edit the newspapers.                     --Robert E. Lee

Good and evil both increase at compound interest.  That is why the little
decisions you and I make every day are of such infinite importance.
                                                             --C.S. Lewis

A sword is never a killer, it is a tool in the killer's hands.
                                        --Lucius Annaeus Seneca, circa 45 AD

When the history of the rise and fall of America is finally written, it may
well be recorded that the beginning of the end was signaled by the blind
submission of a pagan people to the tyranny of a 'nine-headed Caesar'.
                                                              --Linda Bowles

This film is about personal freedom -- which many people take for
granted today...  It's a good thing that historians are going to
harangue this and say, 'It's not accurate.'  Good.  It'll make
somebody pick up a book.                --Mel Gibson, about "The Patriot"

It comes from the Israel of the Bible: Sooner or later, the king unchecked
will come for your sons.  That should be a universal message, untied to any
ideology, since tyrants have come in all hues, shapes and sizes throughout
history.                                                    --John H. Fund

Revisiting the Revolutionary War is a bracing reminder that the fate of a
continent, and the shape of the modern world, turned on the free choices of
remarkably few Americans defying an empire.                 --George F. Will

Is it too much to ask late 20th century critics to grasp that people who
lived 200 years ago did not necessarily harbor quite the same superstitions
that we do?                                                --Samuel Francis

They don't need campaign funds.  They need spinal fluid.
        --Andrea Lafferty on the 13 Republican Senators who voted to make
          hate a federal crime for politically correct identity groups

To call Congress emasculated is to insult eunuchs.     --David C. Stolinsky

To compel a man to furnish contributions of money for the propagation
of opinions which he disbelieves and abhors is sinful and tyrannical.
                                                        --Thomas Jefferson

President Clinton told Democrats in California it's not necessary to
say anything bad about Republicans.  He said if Democrats just look
voters in the eye and tell the truth, they will win.  Of course, he's
just speculating.                                       --Argus Hamilton

...Bill Clinton wouldn't appreciate the Rule of Law
if it was wearing knee pads and a thong.                --Neal Boortz

Listening to Governor Cuomo identify what a Republican should do is
like listening to Evel Knievel talk about the space program.
                --Empower America's Jack Kemp on his CBS Early Show
                  co-pundit Mario Cuomo.

I've always said that if God gave me only 5 years to live, I'd spend it as
a member of Congress, because they've been the longest years of my life.
                                                    --Rep. J.C. Watts Jr.

Let's see if I understand this correctly: Government educational
systems, which teach situational ethics and teach that there are
no absolutes, preach zero tolerance on guns.            --The Federalist

I believe there is a limit beyond which free speech cannot go, but it's
a limit that's very seldom mentioned.  It's the point where free speech
begins to collide with the right to privacy...  I've got a right to say
and believe anything I please, but I haven't got a right to press it on
anybody else...  Nobody's got a right to be a nuisance to his neighbors.
                                                        --H. L. Mencken

One who is not acquainted with the designs of his
neighbors should not enter into alliances with them.         --Sun Tzu

Civilizations have ended in blood and even tears.
Ours may be the first to end in moronic laughter.          --Don Feder

The failure of the Fourth Estate to do its job -- to tell the
unvarnished truth and put aside political agendas -- is the real
scandal in [Washington, DC].                             --Paul Sperry

Whenever you hear, as you frequently will this year, politicians speaking
of 'values,' you are in the presence of America's problem, not its solution.
                                                             --George Will

What it boils down to is this: when Republicans give
Democrats everything they want, it's called 'bipartisanship.'
When they don't surrender, it's called 'partisan politics'.    --John Nowacki

Racial discrimination is now defended by our more advanced
thinkers -- if it's called 'affirmative action'.           --Paul Greenberg

Liberalism, which embraced statism in the Progressive Era, the
planned economy in the '30s, and outright redistributionism
in the 1960s, has become nothing more than state worship.    --Lew Rockwell

Sooner or later, the mainstream media and the white-man-done-me-wrong
black leadership must face the facts.  Black/white interracial crime is
almost entirely committed by blacks against whites.  ...  The President's
traveling Advisory Board on Race urged Americans to be candid with one
another on race.  Somebody tell the media.                    --Larry Elder

Today's politicians are hollow men who never meditate
and consequently never say anything memorable.            --Joseph Sobran

One of the reasons American children do so badly in international
tests of academic skills is that our schools are preoccupied with
politically correct social crusades.                        --Thomas Sowell

People have known that tobacco is injurious at least since its adoption
by the Europeans 400 years ago.  Any smoker today who tells you he
didn't know it was killing him is a liar or an idiot.     --John Strausbaugh

A thing moderately good is not so good as it ought to be.  Moderation in
temper is always a virtue; but moderation in principle is always a vice.
                                                        --Thomas Paine

Perhaps the solution is to do what my father taught me about bad systems.
Follow them exactly, to the letter, and they will fail faster.
                                     --David Hibbeln <dhibbeln@tccpa.net>

Don't think you're going to conceal faults by concealing evidence that
they ever existed.
      --Dwight D. Eisenhower, from his remarks at the Dartmouth College
        Commencement, June 14, 1953.  Courtesy of Dartmouth College Library

[People who believe differently] are part of America, and even if they
think ideas that are contrary to ours, their right to say them, their
right to record them, and their right to have them at places where
they're accessible to others is unquestioned or it's not America.
      --Dwight D. Eisenhower, from his remarks at the Dartmouth College
        Commencement, June 14, 1953.  Courtesy of Dartmouth College Library

[President Clinton] boasts about 186,000 people denied firearms under
the Brady Law rules.  The Brady Law has been in force for three years.
In that time, they have prosecuted seven people and put three of them
in prison.  You know, the President has entertained more felons than
that at fundraising coffees in the White House.
                        -- Charlton Heston, FOX News Sunday, 18 May 1997

You might be a redneck Jedi if you've ever heard the phrase, "May the
force be with y'all."

You might be a redneck Jedi if your Jedi robe is camouflage.

You might be a redneck Jedi if you've ever used your light saber to
open a can of Bud.

You might be a redneck Jedi if at least one wing of your X-Wing Fighter
is primer colored.

You might be a redneck Jedi if you can easily describe the taste of Ewok.

You might be a redneck Jedi if you've ever had a land-speeder up on
blocks in your yard.

You might be a redneck Jedi if the worst part of spending time on
Dagobah is the dadgum skeeters.

You might be a redneck Jedi if Wookiees are offended by your B.O.

You might be a redneck Jedi if any of your female relatives has more
chin hair than Yoda.

You might be a redneck Jedi if you've ever used the force to get
yourself another beer so you didn't have to wait for a commercial.

You might be a redneck Jedi if you've ever used the force while
fishing and/or bowling.

You might be a redneck Jedi if your father has ever said to you,
"Shoot, son--come on over to the dark side, it'll be a hoot."

You might be a redneck Jedi if you've ever had your R-2 unit use its
self-defense electro-shock thingy to get the barbecue grill to light.

You might be a redneck Jedi if you have a Confederate flag painted on
the hood of your land-speeder.

You might be a redneck Jedi if your light saber handle is covered in
duct tape.

You might be a redneck Jedi if you've ever fantasized about Princess
Leia wearing Daisy Duke shorts.

You might be a redneck Jedi if you have the doors of your X-wing welded
shut and you have to get in through the window.

You might be a redneck Jedi if (although you had to kill him) you
kinda thought that Jabba the Hutt had a pretty good handle on how to
treat his women.

You might be a redneck Jedi if you have a cousin who bears a strong
resemblance to Chewbacca.

You might be a redneck Jedi if you suggested that they outfit the
Millennium Falcon with redwood deck.

You might be a redneck Jedi if you were the only person drinking Wild
Turkey during the cantina scene.

You might be a redneck Jedi if you hear, "Luke, I am your father...and
your uncle."

A Republic, if you can keep it.
            --Ben Franklin, after the Constitutional Convention,
            when asked what sort of government had been decided upon

Why your PC might be possessed #1: That creepy Damian guy in the MIS
group just upgraded you to a Pentium-666.

Why your PC might be possessed #2: When you eject a CD, green pea soup
comes flying out the drive door.

Why your PC might be possessed #3: You try to print out a spreadsheet, but
all you get is ten pages of "All work and no play makes Jack a dull boy."

Why your PC might be possessed #4: When your laptop goes through airport
security, the machine picks up an outline of a cloven hoof.

Why your PC might be possessed #5: New screensaver is flying pentacles.

Why your PC might be possessed #6: Your computer monitor swivels a full
360 degrees every time you walk into the room.

Why your PC might be possessed #7: Your voice recognition software
starts speaking in tongues.

Why your PC might be possessed #8: You find a fresh stack of "Blair Witch"
crossed sticks by your CPU.

Why your PC might be possessed #9: It runs Windows without an error.

All government, in its essence, is organized exploitation, and
in virtually all of its existing forms it is the implacable
enemy of every industrious and well-disposed man.        --H. L. Mencken

Show me the man you honor and I will know what kind of a man
you are, for it shows me what your ideal of manhood is,
and what kind of a man you long to be.                          --Carlyle

The national interest of the United States does not
change in years divisible by four.                       --Henry Kissinger

It is the theory of all modern civilized governments that they protect
and foster the liberty of the citizen; it is the practice of all of them
to limit its exercise, and sometimes very narrowly.         --H. L. Mencken

Quidquid latine dictum sit, altum viditur
(Whatever is said in Latin, sounds profound)       --Ginger Houston-Ludlam

A man who once informed a Grand Jury that whether or not he had committed
perjury depended on the meaning of the word 'is' would surely be the
very saviour of any philosophy faculty.
          --Times of London on the possibility that Bill Clinton might
            join the Oxford teaching staff after leaving office

Oh, I'm a C programmer and I'm okay
I muck with indices and structs all day
And when it works, I shout hoo-ray
Oh, I'm a C programmer and I'm okay                 --Oliver Koch

I finished the Oreos.     --Bad things to say if your wife is pregnant #1

Not to imply anything, but I don't think the kid weighs 40 pounds.
                        --Bad things to say if your wife is pregnant #2

Y'know, looking at her, you'd never guess that Pamela Lee had two babies.
                        --Bad things to say if your wife is pregnant #3

Well, couldn't they induce labor?  The 25th is the Super Bowl.
                        --Bad things to say if your wife is pregnant #4

Darned if you ain't about five pounds away from a surprise visit from
that Richard Simmons fella.
                        --Bad things to say if your wife is pregnant #5

Fred at the office passed a stone the size of a pea.
Boy, that's gotta hurt.      --Bad things to say if your wife is pregnant #6

Are your ankles supposed to look like that?
                        --Bad things to say if your wife is pregnant #7

Get your own ice cream.    --Bad things to say if your wife is pregnant #8

Geez, you're awfully puffy looking today.
                        --Bad things to say if your wife is pregnant #9

Got milk?                --Bad things to say if your wife is pregnant #10

Maybe we should name the baby after my secretary, Tawney.
                        --Bad things to say if your wife is pregnant #11

Man, that rose tattoo on your hip is the size of Madagascar.
                        --Bad things to say if your wife is pregnant #12

The real object of all despotism is revenue.           --Thomas Paine

Facts do not cease to exist because they are ignored.  --Aldous Huxley

Socialist: A man suffering from an overwhelming
conviction to believe what is not true.            --H.L. Mencken

The history of liberty is a history of the limitation
of governmental power, not the increase of it.          --Woodrow Wilson

Man is not free unless government is limited....
As government expands, liberty contracts.         --Ronald Reagan

Among other causes of misfortune which your not being
armed brings upon you, it makes you despised....       --Macchiavelli

No man is entitled to the blessings of freedom unless
he be vigilant in its preservation.           --General Douglas MacArthur

Teachers' unions are going all-out to stop vouchers, because any
competition threatens to expose both the public schools' failures
and their excuses for failure.                             --Thomas Sowell

There are few more potent combinations than lawyers and journalists.
Together they can demonize, loot and even bankrupt the largest industry.
And do so based on the flimsiest evidence.                 --Doug Bandow

The ferocity of ... the contemporary leftist radical ... stems from
an initial denial of reality, a nourishing of the self on the mere wish
that human nature ... might be transformed by an act of naked will.
                                                --Thomas Bertonneau

Men rule everywhere and in everything, so why should we care that boys
do worse in high school?     --University of Virginia law professor Amy Wax

This case is not complicated, in spite of Ms. Reno's mumbo-jumbo.
Either Al Gore knew that he was attending a fund raiser or he didn't.
If he knew, he is lying.  If he did not know, he's too dumb to be president.
         --Las Vegas Review Journal's August 29th edition concerning Janet
           Reno's refusal to appoint a special counsel to investigate Al
           Gore's appearance at a Buddhist Temple

F u cn rd ths u cnt spl wrth a dm!                 --Oliver Koch

The power of accurate observation is commonly
called cynicism by those who have not got it.        --George Bernard Shaw

People constantly speak of 'the government' doing this or that, as they
might speak of God doing it.  But the government is really nothing but
a group of men, and usually they are very inferior men.    --H. L. Mencken

WANTED.  Alligator wrestlers.  Must be brave and a risk taker.
Males and females OK.  No experience needed.
                       --Job opening at Seminole Okalee Village and Museum

During the Middle Ages, probably one of the biggest mistakes was not
putting on your armor because you were 'just going down to the corner.'
                                           --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

I've yet to read about an ex-lesbian who, upon accepting Jesus Christ
as her personal savior, was seized by a sudden and overwhelming desire
to chew through Matt Damon's underpants.                     --Dan Savage

Things I've found in my keyboard #1:
Blood, sweat, and tears: before, during, and after IPO, respectively.

Things I've found in my keyboard #2:
My jaw, which dropped completely off when I saw the latest gas prices.

Things I've found in my keyboard #3:
DNA: have you seen "Gattaca"?

Things I've found in my keyboard #4:
Richard Hatch in his birthday suit.  This guy turns up everywhere.

If I didn't drink this beer, the brewery might close and the
dreams of the employees would be shattered.  Then I say to myself,
"It is better that I drink this beer and let their dreams come
true than be selfish and worry about my liver."          --Jack Handy

The problem with some people is that when they aren't drunk, they're sober.
                                                      --William Butler Yeats

Always do sober what you said you'd do drunk.
That will teach you to keep your mouth shut.            --Ernest Hemingway

Drinking provides a beautiful excuse to pursue the one activity that
truly gives me pleasure: hooking up with fat, hairy girls.    --Ross Levy

A woman drove me to drink and I didn't even have the decency to thank her.
                                                        --W.C. Fields

You can't be a real country unless you have a beer and an airline.
It helps if you have some kind of a football team, or some nuclear
weapons, but at the very least you need a beer.            --Frank Zappa

Always remember that I have taken more out of alcohol
than alcohol has taken out of me.                       --Winston Churchill

Beer is proof that God loves us and wants us to be happy.
                                                --Benjamin Franklin

If you ever reach total enlightenment while drinking beer,
I bet it makes beer shoot out your nose.                 --Jack Handy

The problem with the world is that everyone is a few drinks behind.
                                                        --Humphrey Bogart

Give me a woman who loves beer and I will conquer the world.
                                                        --Kaiser Wilhelm

Not all chemicals are bad.  Without chemicals such as hydrogen
and oxygen, for example, there would be no way to make water,
a vital ingredient in beer.                                --Dave Barry

All right, brain, I don't like you and you don't like me.
So let's just do this and I'll get back to killing you with beer.
                                                        --Homer Simpson

And God said, "Let there be vodka!"  And saw that it was good.  Then God
said, "Let there be light!"  And then said, "Whoa - too much light."

Beer: Helping ugly people have sex since 1862.

To some it's a six-pack, to me it's a support Group.

Scotch - Because one doesn't solve the world's problems over white wine.

An elected despotism is not the government we fought for.
                                                --Thomas Jefferson

Those who want their rights respected under the Constitution
and the law ought to set the example themselves of observing
the Constitution and the law.                   --Calvin Coolidge

Abstract language avoids creating unpleasant mental images that
might cause horror and shame; concrete language may remind us
of what we are really doing.                    --Joseph Sobran

The federal government has taken too much tax money from the
people, too much authority from the states, and too much liberty
with the Constitution.                          --Ronald Reagan

I married Miss Right.  I just didn't know that her first name was Always.

I haven't spoken to my wife for 18 months.  I don't like to interrupt her.

Why do men die before their wives?  Cause they want to.

A beggar walked up to a well dressed woman shopping on Rodeo Drive and
said, "I haven't eaten anything in four days."  She looked at him and
said, "Man, I wish I had your willpower."

Son: Is it true, Dad?  I heard that in some parts of Africa a man
     doesn't know his wife until he marries her!
Dad: That happens in every country, son.

If it weren't for marriage, men would go through life thinking they
had no faults at all.

The strength and powers of despotism consist wholly
in the fear of resisting it.                               --Thomas Paine

Three groups spend other people's money: children, thieves and
politicians.  All three need parental supervision.          --Dick Armey

It is general popular error to regard the loudest complainers for the
public to be the most anxious for its welfare.          --Edmund Burke

The more is given the less the people will work for themselves,
and the less they work the more their poverty will increase.    --Tolstoi

In US politics, compassion means giving money and privileges to well
organized interest groups at everyone else's expense.   --Paul Craig Roberts

The real evil...was their acceptance of the principle that the end
justifies the means.  This is how most human beings...are introduced
to evil.  They are not pushed into evil by a strong desire to do wicked
things, but by people who persuade them that evil is necessary to achieve
some greater good, and that the good justifies the evil.        --Alan Keyes

I haven't felt this way since I threw up on the Japanese prime minister.
       --President George Bush after eating salsa from radio host Don Imus

Look, Ma, 4299 accidents waiting to happen:
% find pine4.21 -type f | xargs egrep '(sprintf|strcpy|strcat)' | wc -l
    4299

Bertha Belch, a missionary from Africa will be speaking tonight at
Calvary Memorial Church in Racine.  Come tonight and hear Bertha
Belch all the way from Africa.               --seen in a church bulletin

The cost for attending the Fasting and Prayer conference includes meals.
          --church announcement for National Prayer & Fasting Conference

Our youth basketball team is back in action Wednesday at 8pm in the
recreation hall.  Come out and watch us kill Christ the King.
                                                --seen in a church bulletin

Miss Charlene Mason sang "I will not pass this way again",
giving obvious pleasure to the congregation.     --seen in a church bulletin

Ladies, don't forget the rummage sale.  It's a chance to get rid of those
things not worth keeping around the house.  Don't forget your husbands.
                                                --seen in a church bulletin

Next Sunday is the family hayride and bonfire at the Fowlers'.
Bring your own hot dogs and guns.  Friends are welcome!
Everyone come for a fun time.                   --seen in a church bulletin

The peacemaking meeting scheduled for today has been
canceled due to a conflict.                     --seen in a church bulletin

The sermon this morning: "Jesus Walks on the Water".
The sermon tonight: "Searching for Jesus".      --seen in a church bulletin

Next Thursday there will be tryouts for the choir.
They need all the help they can get.            --seen in a church bulletin

Barbara remains in the hospital and needs blood donors for more
transfusions.  She is also having trouble sleeping and requests
tapes of Pastor Jack's sermons.                 --seen in a church bulletin

Smile at someone who is hard to love.  Say hell to someone who
doesn't care much about you.                    --seen in a church bulletin

Irving Benson and Jessie Carter were married on October 24th in
the church.  So ends a friendship that began in their school days.
                                                --seen in a church bulletin

Eight new choir robes are currently needed, due to the addition
of several new members and to the deterioration of some older ones.
                                                --seen in a church bulletin

The senior choir invites any member of the congregation
who enjoys sinning to join the choir.           --seen in a church bulletin

Scouts are saving aluminum cans, bottles, and other items to
be recycled.  Proceeds will be used to cripple children.
                                                --seen in a church bulletin

The Lutheran men's group will meet at 6pm.  Steak, mashed
potatoes, green beans, bread and dessert will be served
for a nominal feel.                              --seen in a church bulletin

Please place your donation in the envelope along with
the deceased person(s) you want remembered.      --seen in a church bulletin

Attend and you will hear an excellent speaker and heave a healthy lunch.
                                                --seen in a church bulletin

The church will host an evening of fine dining,
superb entertainment, and gracious hostility.   --seen in a church bulletin

This evening at 7pm there will be a hymn sing in the park across
from the Church.  Bring a blanket and come prepared to sin.
                                                --seen in a church bulletin

Ladies Bible Study will be held Thursday morning at 10.  All ladies
are invited to lunch in the Fellowship Hall after the B.S. is done.
                                                --seen in a church bulletin

Mrs. Johnson will be entering the hospital this week for testes.
                                                --seen in a church bulletin

Our next song is "Angels We Have Heard Get High".     --announced in church

Q: What has enormous boobs and stands on the sidelines?
A: The Oregon State Coaching Staff.

Q: What does the average Minnesota football player get on his SAT's?
A: Drool.

Q: What do you get when you put 32 Arkansas cheerleaders in one room?
A: A full set of teeth.

Q: How do you get a Wisconsin cheerleader into your dorm room?
A: Grease her hips and push like hell.

Q: How do you get a Michigan State graduate off your porch?
A: Pay him for the pizza.

Q: Why do the University of Oklahoma cheerleaders wear bibs?
A: To keep the tobacco juice off their uniforms.

Q: Why do they no longer serve ice at Pitt football games?
A: The senior who knew the recipe graduated.

Q: Why is the Indiana football team like a possum?
A: Because they play dead at home, and get killed on the road.

Q: What are the longest three years of a Michigan football player's life?
A: When he's a freshman.

Q: Why did Kansas State replace natural grass with Astroturf?
A: To discourage the cheerleaders from grazing during games.

Q: How many Ohio State freshmen does it take to change a light bulb?
A: None.  That's a sophomore course at OSU.

Q: Why did O.J. want to move to Blacksburg, VA?
A: Everyone there has the same DNA.

Q: Why did Tennessee choose orange as their team color?
A: You can wear it to the game on Saturday, hunting on Sunday, and picking
   up trash the rest of the week.

Man: Haven't I seen you someplace before?
Woman: Yeah, that's why I don't go there anymore.       --bad pickup lines

Man: Is this seat empty?
Woman: Yes, and this one will be too if you sit down.   --bad pickup lines

Man: So, wanna go back to my place?
Woman: I don't know. Will two people fit under a rock?    --bad pickup lines

Man: Hey cutie, how 'bout you and I hitting the hot spots?
Woman: Sorry, I don't date outside my species.          --bad pickup lines

Any American who is prepared to run for president should automatically,
by definition, be disqualified from ever doing so.           --Gore Vidal

'Tis our true policy to steer clear of permanent alliances
with any portion of the foreign world.               --George Washington

We live contentedly with things our ancestors
would have crossed oceans to escape.                 --Joe Sobran

Bill Clinton promised the most ethical administration in history.
He's fallen about 41 presidents short.                   --George W. Bush

A man who pushes an old lady out of the way of an oncoming bus should not
be likened to a man who pushes an old lady into the way of an oncoming bus
on the grounds that both men are pushing old ladies around.
                         --William F. Buckley on "moral equivalency" and
                           the suggestion that Clinton friends and foes
                           are equally responsible for his predicament

If the personal freedoms guaranteed by the Constitution inhibit the
government's ability to govern the people, we should look to limit
those guarantees.    --unverified, President Bill Clinton, August 12, 1993

The only thing that stops God from sending
another flood is that the first one was useless.            --Chamfort

Managing is getting paid for home runs someone else hits.  --Casey Stengel

All I ask is that you bust your heiny on that field.  --Casey Stengel

Amazing strength, amazing power - he (Ron Swoboda) can grind the dust
out of the bat.  He will be great, super even wonderful.  Now, if he
can only learn to catch a fly ball.  --Casey Stengel

As great as the other men were on the ball club, there comes
a time when you get a weakness and it might be physical.  --Casey Stengel

Been in this game one-hundred years, but I see new ways
to lose 'em I never knew existed before.              --Casey Stengel

Can't anybody here play this game?  --Casey Stengel

Don't cut my throat, I may want to do that later myself.  --Casey Stengel

Don't drink in the hotel bar, that's where I do my drinking.  --Casey Stengel

Good pitching will always stop good hitting and vice-versa.  --Casey Stengel

He (Babe Ruth) was very brave at the plate.  You rarely saw him fall
away from a pitch.  He stayed right in there.  No one drove him out.
                                                        --Casey Stengel

He'd (Yogi Berra) fall in a sewer and come up with a gold watch.
                                                        --Casey Stengel

He (Gil Hodges) fields better on one leg than anybody else I got on two.
                                                        --Casey Stengel

He (Lyndon B. Johnson) wanted to see poverty,
so he came to see my team (64 Mets).                 --Casey Stengel

He (Mickey Mantle) has it in his body to be great.       --Casey Stengel

He (Mickey Mantle) should lead the league in everything.  With his
combination of speed and power he should win the triple batting
crown every year.  In fact, he should do anything he wants to do.
                                                        --Casey Stengel

He (Satchel Paige) threw the ball as far from the bat
and as close to the plate as possible.                  --Casey Stengel

He's throwing grounders.                                --Casey Stengel

I came in here and a fella asked me to have a drink.  I said I don't
drink.  Then another fella said hear you and Joe DiMaggio aren't speaking
and I said I'll take that drink.                      --Casey Stengel

I couldna done it without my players.  --Casey Stengel

I don't know if he throws a spitball but he sure spits on the ball.
                                                        --Casey Stengel

I don't like them fellas who drive in two runs and let in three.
                                                        --Casey Stengel

If anyone wants me tell them I'm being embalmed.        --Casey Stengel

I feel greatly honored to have a ballpark named after me,
especially since I've been thrown out of so many.        --Casey Stengel

If this keeps up (four game winning streak) I'm
about to manage until I'm a hundred.                    --Casey Stengel

If we're going to win the pennant, we've got to
start thinking we're not as good as we think we are.  --Casey Stengel

If you're playing baseball and thinking about managing, you're crazy.
You'd be better off thinking about being an owner.         --Casey Stengel

If you're so smart, let's see you get out of the Army.  --Casey Stengel

I got players with bad watches - they can't tell midnight from noon.
                                                        --Casey Stengel

It's high time something was done for the pitchers.  They put up
the stands and take down fences to make more home runs and plague
the pitchers.  Let them revive the spitter and help the pitchers
make a living.                                            --Casey Stengel

It's wonderful to meet so many friends that I didn't used to like.
                                                          --Casey Stengel

I was such a dangerous hitter I even got
intentional walks during batting practice.              --Casey Stengel

Kid (Phil Rizzuto) you're too small.  You ought to go out and shine shoes.
                                                        --Casey Stengel

Look at him (Bobby Richardson) - he doesn't drink, he doesn't smoke,
he doesn't chew, he doesn't stay out late, and he still can't hit .250.
                                                        --Casey Stengel

Most ball games are lost, not won.                      --Casey Stengel

Mister, that boy couldn't hit the ground if he fell out of an airplane.
                                                        --Casey Stengel

My health is good enough about the shoulders.  --Casey Stengel

Nobody ever had too many of them (pitchers).  --Casey Stengel

No, even my players aren't players.  --Casey Stengel

Say, I've got a tip on the market for you fellows (29 Toledo Mudhens) -
buy Pennsylvania Railroad because by tomorrow night about a dozen of
you bums will be riding on it.                           --Casey Stengel

Son, we'd like to keep you around this season
but we're going to try and win a pennant.            --Casey Stengel

There comes a time in every man's life, and I've had plenty of them.
                                                        --Casey Stengel

The secret of managing is to keep the guys who
hate you away from the guys who are undecided.          --Casey Stengel

The trouble with women umpires is that I couldn't argue with one.
I'd put my arms around her and give her a little kiss.     --Casey Stengel

The Yankees don't pay me to win every day, just two out of three.
                                                        --Casey Stengel

They got a lot of kids now whose uniforms are so tight, especially the
pants, that they cannot bend over to pick up ground balls.  And they
don't want to bend over in television games because in that way there
is no way their face can get on the camera.             --Casey Stengel

They say he's (Yogi Berra) funny.  Well, he has a lovely wife and family,
a beautiful home, money in the bank, and he plays golf with millionaires.
What's funny about that?                                --Casey Stengel

They say some of my stars drink whiskey, but I have found that ones
who drink milkshakes don't win many ball games.          --Casey Stengel

They told me my services were no longer desired because they wanted
to put in a youth program as an advance way of keeping the club going.
I'll never make the mistake of being seventy again.       --Casey Stengel

This club (69 Mets) plays better baseball now.
Some of them look fairly alert.                           --Casey Stengel

Wake up muscles, we're in New York now.                   --Casey Stengel

We (the Mets) are a much improved ball club, now we lose in extra innings.
                                                        --Casey Stengel

Well, that's baseball.  Rags to riches one day and riches to rags
the next.  But I've been in it thirty-six years and I'm used to it.
                                                        --Casey Stengel

We've (62 Mets) got to learn to stay out of triple plays.  --Casey Stengel

What do you (Mickey Mantle) think [demonstrating a play
off Ebbets Field], I was born old?                          --Casey Stengel

Why has our pitching been so great?  Our catcher (Yogi Berra)
that's why.  He looks cumbersome but he's quick as a cat.    --Casey Stengel

You can't go out to the mound,
hobbling and take a pitcher out with a cane.                 --Casey Stengel

You got to get twenty-seven outs to win.                    --Casey Stengel

You have to go broke three times to learn how to make a living.
                                                            --Casey Stengel

You have to have a catcher or you'll have all passed balls.  --Casey Stengel

You put the whammy on his butt when he's (Sandy Koufax)
pitching, the whammy tends to go on vacation.           --Casey Stengel

I'll never forget September 6, 1950.  I got a letter threatening me, Hank
Bauer, Yogi Berra and Johnny Mize.  It said if I showed up in uniform
against the Red Sox I'd be shot.  I turned the letter over to the FBI
and told my manager Casey Stengel about it.  You know what Casey did?
He gave me a different uniform and gave mine to Billy Martin.  Can you
imagine that!  Guess Casey thought it'd be better if Billy got shot.
                                                        - Phil Rizzuto

I'm probably the only guy who worked for Stengel
before and after he was a genius.                        --Warren Spahn

What country can preserve its liberties if its rulers are not warned
from time to time that their people preserve the spirit of resistance?
Let them take arms.  The remedy is to set them right as to facts,
pardon and pacify them.
                        --Thomas Jefferson to William Stephens Smith, 1787
                          ME 6:373, Papers 12:356

Why Trick or Treating is Better than Sex #10:
  You are guaranteed to get at least a little something in the sack.

Why Trick or Treating is Better than Sex #9:
  If you get tired, you can wait 10 minutes and go at it again.

Why Trick or Treating is Better than Sex #8:
  The uglier you look, the easier it is to get some.

Why Trick or Treating is Better than Sex #7:
  You don't have to compliment the person who gives you some.

Why Trick or Treating is Better than Sex #6:
  It's OK when the person you're with fantasizes you're someone else,
  because you are.

Why Trick or Treating is Better than Sex #5:
  Forty years from now you'll still enjoy candy.

Why Trick or Treating is Better than Sex #4:
  If you don't like what you get, you can always go next door.

Why Trick or Treating is Better than Sex #3:
  It doesn't matter if the kids hear you moaning and groaning.

Why Trick or Treating is Better than Sex #2:
  Less guilt the morning after.

Why Trick or Treating is Better than Sex #1:
  You can do the *whole neighborhood*

When you breath, you inspire.  When you do not breath, you expire.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

H2O is hot water, and CO2 is cold water
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

To collect fumes of sulphur, hold a deacon over a flame in a test tube
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

When you smell an oderless gas, it is probably carbon monoxide
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

Water is composed of two gins, Oxygin and Hydrogin.  Oxygin is pure gin.
Hydrogin is gin and water.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

Three kinds of blood vessels are arteries, vanes and caterpillars.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

Blood flows down one leg and up the other.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

Respiration is composed of two acts, first inspiration, and then
expectoration.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

The moon is a planet just like the earth, only it is even deader.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

Artifical insemination is when the farmer does it to the cow instead
of the bull.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

Dew is formed on leaves when the sun shines down on them and makes
them perspire.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

A super-saturated solution is one that holds more than it can hold.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

Mushrooms always grow in damp places and so they look like umbrellas.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

The body consists of three parts - the brainium, the borax and the
abominable cavity.  The brainium contains the brain, the borax contains
the heart and lungs, and the abominable cavity contains the bowls,
of which there are five - a, e, i, o, and u.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

The pistol of a flower is its only protections agenst insects.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

The alimentary canal is located in the northern part of Indiana.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

The skeleton is what is left after the insides have been taken out
and the outsides have ben taken off.  The purpose of the skeleton is
something to hitch meat to.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

A permanent set of teeth consists of eight canines, eight cuspids,
two molars, and eight cuspidors.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

The tides are a fight between the Earth and moon.  All water tends
towards the moon, because there is no water in the moon, and nature
abhors a vacuum.  I forget where the sun joins in this fight.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

A fossil is an extinct animal.  The older it is, the more extinct it is.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

Germinate: To become a naturalized German.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

Liter: A nest of young puppies.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

Magnet: Something you find crawling all over a dead cat.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

Momentum: What you give a person when they are going away.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

Planet: A body of Earth surrounded by sky.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

Rhubarb: A kind of celery gone bloodshot.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

Vacumm: A large, empty space where the pope lives.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

Before giving a blood transfusion, find out if the blood is affirmative
or negative.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

To remove dust from the eye, pull the eye down over the nose.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

For a nosebleed: Put the nose much lower then the body until the
heart stops.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

For drowning: Climb on top of the person and move up and down to make
artifical perspiration.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

For fainting: Rub the person's chest or, if a lady, rub her arm above
the hand instead.  Or put the head between the knees of the nearest
medical doctor.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

For dog bite: put the dog away for sevral days.  If he has not recovered,
then kill it.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

For asphyxiation: Apply artificial respiration until the patient is dead.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

For head cold: use an agonizer to spray the nose untill it drops in
your throat.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

To keep milk from turning sour: Keep it in the cow.
        --submitted to science and health teachers, Jr High thru college

Why You Might Be Living an Internet Lifestyle #1:
You have a double-wide office chair to accommodate your growing
Internet-lifestyle behind.

Why You Might Be Living an Internet Lifestyle #2:
You've legally changed your middle name to "dot," as in John.Doe.

Why You Might Be Living an Internet Lifestyle #3:
You're petitioning the Post Office to change your street address
to an IP address.

Why You Might Be Living an Internet Lifestyle #4:
The homeless people in your neighborhood live in Gateway cow-print boxes.

Why You Might Be Living an Internet Lifestyle #5:
You use the phrase "dropped packets" to explain your state of mind,
as in, "I'm dropping packets all over the place today."

Why You Might Be Living an Internet Lifestyle #6:
The tattoos on your knuckles spell out "Born to Code."

Dad always thought laughter was the best medicine, which I guess is
why several of us died of tuberculosis.     --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

Unfortunately, since I went on the wagon,
the wagon went and got a liquor license.                --unknown

I plan to consume as many Mai-tai's as possible in Hawaii, in
the hope that I'll kill the portion of my brain which allows
me to recall I ever took my current job.                --unhappy employee

On seeing a girl with a pierced tongue, he thought, "Just like Microsoft.
Can't do the job right, so throw hardware at it."       --Sean Reifschneider

The reason that [the media] make up these horrific headlines... is just
so they can sell f***ing papers.    --Actor Jason Priestley, during a live
                                   interview on Fox News Channel, 20 Sep 2000
He's really jet-lagged.
                       --Spokeswoman for Priestley, a short time later

Signs it's time to turn off the TV and go to bed #1:
Those nice people at QVC say you've reached your limit.

Signs it's time to turn off the TV and go to bed #2:
Letterman's over, but you're still hanging out at Dave's Online Clubhouse.

Signs it's time to turn off the TV and go to bed #3:
You never realized it before, but that Gilligan is one hot-looking fella.

Signs it's time to turn off the TV and go to bed #4:
The toddler who woke you up is begging to go back to sleep.

Signs it's time to turn off the TV and go to bed #5:
Following Martha Stewart's lead, you're painting your own toleware.

Signs it's time to turn off the TV and go to bed #6:
You're taking notes during the infomercials.

Signs it's time to turn off the TV and go to bed #7:
The drool trail's more than an inch long.

Signs it's time to turn off the TV and go to bed #8:
The TV's off, but you're still seeing pictures on the screen and
hearing little voices.

Pascal, n.: A programming language named after a man
who would turn over in his grave if he knew about it.
                                --The Chartered Institution of C Programmers

Hitting your workstation with an aluminum baseball bat is only
going to get you electrocuted.  Try a wooden one.            --Lynn Marshall

Why You Might Be Living an Internet Lifestyle #7:
You and your spouse celebrate your anniversary by logging on to
the chat room where you first met.

Why You Might Be Living an Internet Lifestyle #8:
You haven't been outside in days because you work at home, all
your friends are on ICQ, you can order all your food online, you've
just downloaded a copy of "The Matrix," and you're waiting for your
eBay auction to end.

Why You Might Be Living an Internet Lifestyle #9:
You have enough frequent flyer miles on your credit card to go around
the world 11 times, but you haven't left your apartment in two years.

Why You Might Be Living an Internet Lifestyle #10:
You'll spend ten hours searching the Net for the perfect desktop icon,
but going five steps down the street for food is too much bother.

Why You Might Be Living an Internet Lifestyle #11:
When your five-year-old daughter asks a question, you tell her to go
"Ask Jeeves."

Isn't having a smoking section in a restaurant
kind of like having a peeing section in a swimming pool?   --David Broadfoot

If my family didn't want me to write about them,
they should've behaved better.                           --Anne Lamott

It's no coincidence that people who blindly rely on
computers and drugs are both called "users".             --unknown

"But minister, it isn't like this film is the first troublesome thing
     to come out of Canada.  Let us not forget Bryan Adams."
"No, no.  The Canadian government has apologized for Bryan Adams on
     several occasions."        --"South Park, Bigger, Longer, and Uncut"

What would Brian Boitano do?      --"South Park, Bigger, Longer, and Uncut"

Those who cast the votes decide nothing.
Those who count the votes decide everything.             --Josef Stalin

Voting Curse #1: May all of the pregnant, dimpled, hanging, two-corner,
three-corner, and completely unfettered chads be transported to your house,
along with an army of lawyers demanding endless recounts of your possessions.

So in the future, one 'client' at a time or you'll be spending
CPU time with lots of little 'child processes'.
        --Kevin Bealer, commenting on the private life of a Linux nerd

Japan sent us 50,000,000 cases of Viagra.
They heard that our entire country can't get an election.

Sounds like the guy was dropped as a baby, beaten up in grammar school,
and caught his prom date doing another chick in the back seat of his car.
                                            --Gregg <barley@pacific.net>

A dying culture invariably exhibits personal rudeness.  Bad manners.
Lack of consideration for others in minor matters.  A loss of politeness,
of gentle manners, is more significant than a riot.  This symptom is
especially serious in that an individual displaying it never thinks of
it as a sign of ill health but as proof of his/her strength.
                                                    --Robert A. Heinlein

One of the big toys this year is the Al Gore doll.  You wind
it up and it refuses to count the votes of the GI Joe dolls.  --Jay Leno

If you think we can't vote, wait'll you see us drive.  --new Florida slogan

We count more than you do.                       --new Florida slogan

If you don't like the way we count, then take I-95
and visit one of the other 56 states.              --new Florida slogan

Relax, Retire, ReVote.                       --new Florida slogan

Viagra voters do it again and again!         --new Florida slogan

Where your vote counts and counts and counts.         --new Florida slogan

This is what you get for taking Elian away from us.   --new Florida slogan

We're number one!  Wait!  Recount!                --new Florida slogan

Palm Beach County: So nice, we let you vote twice.  --new Florida slogan

Sign on I-95: Florida this way, no that way, 5 miles, wait 10 miles.
                                                --new Florida slogan

If the Democrats wanted Gore to be President,
they should have voted for impeachment.         --overheard

Q. What's the difference between Al Gore and a puppy?
A. After five weeks, the puppy will open its eyes and stop whining.

This is boring!  Now I know what people went through when my Bronco
was going up the freeway.      --O.J. Simpson on the presidential contest

I'm not picking my nose, that's just chad.
        --Fox News reporter Carl Cameron's unintentional open mike
          report from Palm Beach

There is so much sand in Northern Africa that if it were
spread out, it would completely cover the Sahara Desert.    --Eric Bossard

Oregano, n.: The ancient Italian art of pizza folding.

If you really want something in life you have to work for it.
Now quiet, they're about to announce the lottery numbers.  --Homer Simpson

We would be de-lighted if you send in your bill.
However, if you don't, you will be.         --sign at the electric company

Be back in 5 minutes.  Sit!  Stay!    --sign in a vet's waiting room

No appointment necessary.  We hear you coming.  --sign at a muffler shop

The best way to get back on your feet: miss a car payment.
                                                --sign at a car dealership

Salesmen welcome.  Dog food is expensive.                 --seen on a fence

Time wounds all heels.                       --sign in a podiatrist's office

We really know our stuff.                   --sign on a taxidermist's window

If you don't see what you're looking for, you've come to the right place.
                                           --sign at an optometrist's office

Push. Push. Push.                            --sign on a maternity room door

If we see smoke, we will assume you are on fire and take appropriate action.
                                                 --sign in a nonsmoking area

Let us remove your shorts.                  --sign on an electrician's truck

How about we refund your money, send you a new one at no charge, close
the store and have the manager shot.  Would that be satisfactory?
                                                     --sign at a laundry shop

Hello. Can we pick your nose?            --sign at a plastic surgeon's office

Invite us to your next blowout.            --sign at a tire shop in Milwaukee

7 days without pizza makes one weak.                   --sign at a pizza shop

Don't sleep with a drip.  Call your plumber.
                                --plumbing company in NE Pennsylvania

Thank heaven for little grills.           --sign at a propane filling station

Drive carefully.  We'll wait.      --sign in the front yard of a funeral home

Don't stand there and be hungry; come on in and get fed up.
                                                --sign in a restaurant window

To expedite your visit, please back in.       --sign at a proctologist's door

Yesterday's Meals on Wheels                     --sign on a septic tank truck

Dr. Jones at your cervix.                 --sign over a gynecologist's office

We repair what your husband fixed.                 --sign on a plumbers truck

Rubber bands last longer when refrigerated.
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

Peanuts are one of the ingredients of dynamite.
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

There are 293 ways to make change for a dollar.
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

The average person's left hand does 56% of the typing.
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

A shark is the only fish that can blink with both eyes.
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

There are more chickens than people in the world.
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

Two-thirds of the world's eggplant is grown in New Jersey.
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

The longest one-syllable word in the English language is "screeched."
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

On a Canadian two dollar bill, the flag flying over the
Parliament building is an American flag.    --item for a lull in conversation

All of the clocks in the movie "Pulp Fiction" are stuck on 4:20.
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

No word in the English language rhymes with
month, orange, silver, or purple.        --item for a lull in conversation

"Dreamt" is the only English word that ends in the letters "mt".
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

All 50 states are listed across the top of the Lincoln
Memorial on the back of the $5 bill.      --item for a lull in conversation

Almonds are a member of the peach family.  --item for a lull in conversation

Winston Churchill was born in a ladies' room during a dance.
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

Maine is the only state where the name is just one syllable.
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

There are only four words in the English language which end in
"dous": tremendous, horrendous, stupendous, and hazardous.
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

Los Angeles' full name is "El Pueblo de Nuestra Senora la
Reina de los Angeles de Porciuncula"      --item for a lull in conversation

A cat has 32 muscles in each ear.         --item for a lull in conversation

An ostrich's eye is bigger than its brain.
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

Tigers have striped skin, not just striped fur.
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

In most advertisements, the time displayed on a watch is 10:10.
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

Al Capone's business card said he was a used furniture dealer.
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

The characters Bert and Ernie on Sesame Street were named
after Bert the cop and Ernie the taxi driver in Frank Capra's
"It's a Wonderful Life."                 --item for a lull in conversation

A dragonfly has a life span of 24 hours.
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

A goldfish has a memory span of three seconds.
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

A dime has 118 ridges around the edge.     --item for a lull in conversation

It's impossible to sneeze with your eyes open.
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

The giant squid has the largest eyes in the world.
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

In England, the Speaker of the House is not allowed to speak.
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

The microwave was invented after a researcher walked by a radar tube and a
chocolate bar melted in his pocket.       --item for a lull in conversation

Mr. Rogers was an ordained minister.        --item for a lull in conversation

The average person falls asleep in seven minutes.
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

There are 336 dimples on a regulation golf ball.
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

No free man shall ever be debarred the use of arms.  The strongest
reason for the people to retain the right to keep and bear arms is, as
a last resort, to protect themselves against tyranny in government.
      --Thomas Jefferson, proposed Virginia constitution, June 1776.
        Thomas Jefferson Papers, 334 (C. J. Boyd, Ed., 1950)

Laws that forbid the carrying of arms disarm only those who are neither
inclined nor determined to commit crimes.  Such laws make things worse
for the assaulted and better for the assailants; they serve rather to
encourage than prevent homicides, for an unarmed man may be attacked with
greater confidence than an armed man.
      --Thomas Jefferson, quoting 18th century criminologist Cesare
        Beccaria in On Crimes and Punishment, 1764

When the government fears the people, there is liberty.
When the people fear the government, there is tyranny.   --Thomas Jefferson

And what country can preserve its liberties, if the rulers are not warned
from time to time that this people preserve the spirit of resistance?
Let them take up arms.  The tree of liberty must be refreshed from time
to time with the blood of patriots and tyrants.
      --Thomas Jefferson, Letter to William S. Smith, 1787

The Constitution of most of our states, and the United States, assert
that all power is inherent in the people; that they may exercise it by
themselves: that it is their right and duty to be at all times armed;
that they are entitled to freedom of person, freedom of religion,
freedom of property, and freedom of the press.
      --Thomas Jefferson, Proposed Virginia Constitution, 1776

Among the natural rights of the colonists are these: first, a right
to life, secondly to liberty, thirdly to property; together with the
right to defend them in the best manner they can.         --Samuel Adams

The Constitution shall never be construed to prevent the people of the
United States who are peaceable citizens from keeping their own arms.
      --Samuel Adams, During the Massachusetts US Constitution
        ratification convention, 1788

If you love wealth better than liberty, the tranquillity of servitude
better than the animating contest of freedom, go home from us in peace.
We ask not your counsels or arms.  Crouch down and lick the hands which
feed you.  May your chains set lightly upon you and may posterity forget
that ye were our countrymen.                       --Samuel Adams, 1776

Those who would give up essential Liberty, to purchase a little
temporary Safety, deserve neither Liberty nor Safety.
      --Benjamin Franklin (1706-1790), reply of the Pennsylvania Assembly
        to the governor, November 11, 1755

Before a standing army can rule, the people must be disarmed; as they
are in almost every kingdom of Europe.  the supreme power in America
cannot enforce unjust laws by the sword; because the whole body of
the people are armed, and constitute a force superior to any bands of
regular troops that can be, on any pretense, raised in the United States.
      --Noah Webster, An Examination into the Leading Principles of
        the federal Constitution (1787) in Pamphlets to the Constitution
        of the United States (P. Ford, 1888).

Arms in the hands of citizens may be used at the individual's discretion,
in private self-defense.
      --John Adams, A Defense of the Constitutions of Government of
        the United States of America, 1787-88

The best we can hope for concerning the people at large is that they be
properly armed.     --Alexander Hamilton, The Federalist Papers at 184-8

A militia when properly formed are in fact the people themselves and
include all men capable of bearing arms.  To preserve liberty it is
essential that the whole body of people always possess arms and be
taught alike, especially when young, how to use them.
      --Richard Henry Lee, Initiator of the Declaration of Independence,
        and member of the first Senate, which passed the Bill of Rights.
        Additional Letters From the Federal Farmer 53, 1788

Guard with jealous attention the public liberty.  Suspect everyone who
approaches that jewel.  Unfortunately, nothing will preserve it but
downright force.  Whenever you give up that force, you are ruined.
      --Patrick Henry, During Virginia's ratification convention, 1788

The great object is that every man be armed.  Every man who is able
may have a gun.
      --Patrick Henry, During Virginia's ratification convention, 1788

The Constitution preserves the advantage of being armed which Americans
possess over the people of almost every other nation.. where the governments
are afraid to trust the people with arms.  --James Madison, Federalist #46

The right of the people to keep and bear arms shall not be infringed.
A well-regulated militia, composed of the body of people, trained in
arms, is the best and most natural defense of a free country.
      --James Madison, I Annuals of Congress 434 (June 8, 1789)

I ask sir, what is the militia?  It is the whole people.  To disarm
the people is the best and most effectual way to enslave them.
      --George Mason, during Virginia's ratification convention, 1788

Arms discourage and keep the invader and plunderer in awe, and preserve
order in the world as well as property.  Horrid mischief would ensue
were the law-abiding deprived the use of them.
      --Thomas Paine, Thoughts on Defensive War, 1775

A free people ought to be armed.  When firearms go, all goes, we need
them by the hour.  Firearms stand next to importance to the Constitution
itself.  They are the American people's liberty teeth and keystone
under independence.
      --George Washington, Boston Independence Chronicle, January 14, 1790

To ensure peace, security, and happiness, the rifle and pistol are
equally indispensable.  The very atmosphere of firearms everywhere
restrains evil interference - they deserve a place of honor with all
that is good.                         --George Washington, Federalist #53

The handcuffs are tight because they're new.
They'll stretch out after you wear them awhile.           --police quotes

If you run, you'll only go to jail tired.                 --police quotes

So, you don't know how fast you were going.  I guess that
means I can write anything I want on the ticket, huh?     --police quotes

Yes sir, you can talk to the shift supervisor, but I don't think it will
help.  Oh, did I mention that I am the shift supervisor?  --police quotes

Warning?  You want a warning?  OK, I'm warning you not to
do that again or I'll give you another ticket.            --police quotes

The answer to this last question will determine whether
you are drunk or not.  Was Mickey Mouse a cat or dog?     --police quotes

Yeah, we have a quota.  Two more tickets and my wife gets a toaster oven.
                                                          --police quotes

You know, stop lights don't come any redder than the one you just
went through.                                             --police quotes

If you take your hands off the car, I'll make your birth certificate
a worthless document.                                     --police quotes

Can you run faster than 1200 feet per second?  Because that's the
speed of the bullet that'll be chasing you.               --police quotes

In God we trust, all others we run through NCIC.          --police quotes

I'm glad to hear that the Chief of Police is a personal friend of yours.
So you know someone who can post your bail.               --police quotes

You didn't think we give pretty women tickets?
You're right, we don't.  Sign here.                       --police quotes

No sir, we don't have quotas anymore.  We used to have quotas,
but now we're allowed to write as many tickets as we want.  --police quotes

Just how big were those 'two beers' you say you had?        --police quotes

Don't shake too much when you run, don't wear false eyelashes
in the water, and always smile.
                                --Yasmine Bleeth, on the etiquette learned
                                  during her stint on "Baywatch"

Fired because I fought for lower pay.    --from a list of resume' blunders

Size of employer: Very tall, probably over 6'5".
                                        --from a list of resume' blunders

Finished 8th in my high school graduating class of 10.
                                        --from a list of resume' blunders

Qualifications: No education or experience.
                                        --from a list of resume' blunders

I am relatively intelligent, obedient and loyal as a puppy.
                                        --from a list of resume' blunders

My compensation should be at least equal to my age.
                                        --from a list of resume' blunders

Reason for Leaving: It had to do with the IRS, FBI, and SEC.
                                        --from a list of resume' blunders

Reason for Leaving: My boss said the end of the world is near.
                                        --from a list of resume' blunders

Assisted in daily preparation of large quantities of consumable items
in a fast-paced setting.  (Translation: Short-order cook)
                                        --from a list of resume' blunders

How complicated and mysterious he is.  He's also a pseudo-intellectual,
which is really interesting.
            --Melanie Griffith, when asked what she loves about her
              husband Antonio Banderas

I probably wouldn't need any help, since I'm a member of MENSA.
            --Geena Davis, when asked who she would choose as a lifeline if
              she were a contestant on "Who Wants to Be a Millionaire?"

Husband's note to his wife: "Doctor called, said Pabst beer is normal"
                                                        --unknown

$:-o        I'm an Elvis impersonator, thankyaverymuch.

____
~o/         I'm Olga Korbut on the uneven parallel bars.
 |==

 o__,
<|          Talk to the hand!
 /\

:-.)        Hi, I'm Cindy Crawford.

&:-)        I'm having a really bad hair day.

=8-}        I'm Drew Carey.

My kid got your honor student pregnant         --bumper sticker

Necrophilia: That uncontrollable urge to crack open a cold one
                                                --bumper sticker

Ax me about Ebonics                     --bumper sticker

Cat: The other white meat               --bumper sticker

Saw it, wanted it, had a fit, got it    --bumper sticker

My hockey mom can beat up your soccer mom       --bumper sticker

So you're a feminist.  Isn't that precious.     --bumper sticker

I went on a space vacation and all I got
was this lousy incremental bone loss.      --Space shuttle souvenir T-shirt

When we get to heaven, can we sit on your couch?
Or is it the same old story?             --dog letters to God

If a dog barks his head off in the forrest and no human hears him,
is he still a bad dog?             --dog letters to God

When my foster mom's friend comes over to our house,
he smells like musk.  What's he been rolling in?   --dog letters to God

Is it true in heaven dining room tables have on-ramps?   --dog letters to God

If we come back as humans is that good or bad?    --dog letters to God

More meatballs, less spaghetti, please.             --dog letters to God

When we get to the Pearly Gates, do we have to shake hands to get in?
                                                --dog letters to God

Are there dogs on other planets, or are we alone?  I have been howling
at the moon and stars for a long time, but all I ever hear back is the
beagle across the street.                          --dog letters to God

Are there mailmen in heaven?  If there are, will I have to apologize?
                                                --dog letters to God

Is it true that dogs are not allowed in restaurants because we can't
make up our minds what not to order?  Or is it the carpets again?
                                                --dog letters to God

The new terrier I live with just peed on the Oriental rug and I
have a feeling my family might blame me 'cuz they think I'm jealous.
Since they have no sense of smell, how can I convince them I'm innocent?
Does PetsMart sell lie detectors?             --dog letters to God

Gingko Viagra: to help you remember what the f*** you're doing.

One of the common failings among honorable people is a failure to
appreciate how thoroughly dishonorable some other people can be,
and how dangerous it is to trust them.                   --Thomas Sowell

Games for when you're old #9: Spin the Bottle of Mylanta

Games for when you're old #8: Hide and go pee

Games for when you're old #7: Simon says something incoherent

Games for when you're old #6: Doc Goose

Games for when you're old #5: Red Rover, Red Rover, the nurse says Bend Over

Games for when you're old #4: Kick the bucket

Games for when you're old #3: 20 questions shouted into your good ear

Games for when you're old #2: Pin the Toupee on the bald guy.

Games for when you're old #1: Sag, you're it!

You know you're old when a sexy babe catches your fancy and
your pacemaker opens the garage door.

You know you're old when "getting a little action" means you don't
need to take any fiber today.

You know you're old when "getting lucky" means you find your car
in the parking lot.

The strength of the Constitution lies entirely in the determination of
each citizen to defend it.  Only if every single citizen feels duty bound
to do his share in this defense are the constitutional rights secure.
                                                --Albert Einstein

Toot 'n Tell or Go to Hell        --sign on a drive-through confessional

Don't try to out-weird me.  I get stranger things than you
free with my breakfast cereal.                --Button seen at I-CON XVII

The cry has been that when war is declared, all opposition should
therefore be hushed.  A sentiment more unworthy of a free country could
hardly be propagated.  If the doctrine be admitted, rulers have only to
declare war and they are screened at once from scrutiny ...  In war,
then, as in peace, assert the freedom of speech and of the press.
Cling to this as the bulwark of all our rights and privileges.
                                                --William Ellery Channing

As I've gotten older, I've learned that you cannot make someone love you.
All you can do is stalk them and hope they panic and give in.    --unknown

As I've gotten older, I've learned that no matter how you try
to protect your children, they will eventually get arrested
and end up in the local paper.                                   --unknown

When I'm feeling down, I like to whistle.  It makes the
neighbor's dog run to the end of his chain and gag himself.    --unknown

If you can't be kind, at least have the decency to be vague.    --unknown

It's mathematical: (uNsTable - NT) = usable.       --Mike Hall

Golfer: "I've played so poorly all day, I think I'm going to drown
         myself in that lake."
 Caddy: "I don't think you could keep your head down that long, sir."

Golfer: "You've got to be the worst caddy in the world!"
 Caddy: "I doubt it, sir, that would be too much of a coincidence."

Golfer: "I'd move heaven and earth to break 100 on this course".
 Caddy: "Try heaven, you've already moved most of the earth."

Golfer: "Do you think I can get there with a 5-iron?"
 Caddy: "Eventually."

Golfer: "This is the worst golf course I've ever played."
 Caddy: "This isn't the golf course, sir.  We left that an hour ago."

Golfer: "Please stop checking your watch all the time."
 Caddy: "This isn't a watch, sir; it's a compass."

Things you should never say to a woman during an argument #1:
Don't you have some laundry to do or something?

Things you should never say to a woman during an argument #2:
Ooooh, you are so *cute* when you get all pissed off.

Things you should never say to a woman during an argument #3:
You're just upset because your ass is beginning to spread.

Things you should never say to a woman during an argument #4:
Oh, I understand now.  What time of the month is it?

Things you should never say to a woman during an argument #5:
You sure you don't want to consult the great Oprah on this one?

Things you should never say to a woman during an argument #6:
Sorry.  I was just picturing you naked.

Things you should never say to a woman during an argument #7:
Time out, honey, football's on.

Things you should never say to a woman during an argument #8:
Looks like someone had an extra bowl of Bitch Flakes this morning.

Things you should never say to a woman during an argument #9:
Is there any way we can do this via e-mail?

Things you should never say to a woman during an argument #10:
Who are you kidding?  We both know that thing ain't loaded.

Handy engineering conversions:
Ratio of an igloo's circumference to its diameter = Eskimo Pi

Handy engineering conversions: 2000 pounds of Chinese soup = Won ton

Handy engineering conversions: 1 millionth of a mouthwash = 1 microscope

Handy engineering conversions:
Time between slipping on a peel and smacking the pavement = 1 bananosecond

Handy engineering conversions:
Weight an evangelist carries with God = 1 billigram

Handy engineering conversions:
Time it takes to sail 220 yards at 1 nautical mile per hour = Knot-furlong

Handy engineering conversions: 16.5 feet in the Twilight Zone = 1 Rod Serling

Handy engineering conversions: Half of a large intestine = 1 semicolon

Handy engineering conversions: 1000 aches = 1 kilohurtz

Handy engineering conversions: Basic unit of laryngitis = 1 hoarsepower

Handy engineering conversions:
Shortest distance between two jokes = A straight line

Handy engineering conversions: 453.6 graham crackers = 1 pound cake

Handy engineering conversions: 1 million microphones = 1 megaphone

Handy engineering conversions: 1 million bicycles = 2 megacycles

Handy engineering conversions: 2000 mockingbirds = two kilomockingbirds

Handy engineering conversions: 365.25 days = 1 unicycle

Handy engineering conversions: 52 cards = 1 decacards

Handy engineering conversions: 1 kilogram of falling figs = 1 Fig Newton

Handy engineering conversions:
1000 cubic centimeters of wet socks = 1 literhosen

Handy engineering conversions:
1 millionth of a fish = 1 microfiche

Handy engineering conversions: 1 trillion pins = 1 terrapin

Handy engineering conversions: 10 rations = 1 decoration

Handy engineering conversions: 100 rations = 1 C-ration

Handy engineering conversions: 2 monograms = 1 diagram

Handy engineering conversions: 8 nickels = 2 paradigms

Handy engineering conversions: 100 Senators = Not 1 decision

Handy engineering conversions: 365.25 days of drinking
low-calorie beer because it's less filling = 1 light-year

Handy engineering conversions: 3 statute miles of intravenous
surgical tubing at Yale University Hospital = 1 IV League

If you're a horse, and someone gets on you, and falls off, and then
gets right back on you, I think you should buck him off right away.
                                        --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

If at first you don't succeed, call in an airstrike.  --Murphy's Laws of Combat

If you are forward of your position, your artillery will fall short.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Never share a foxhole with anyone braver than yourself.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Never go to bed with anyone crazier than yourself.  --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Never forget that your weapon was made by the lowest bidder.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

If your attack is going really well, it's an ambush.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

The enemy diversion you're ignoring is their main attack.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Five second fuzes always burn three seconds.      --Murphy's Laws of Combat

A retreating enemy is probably just falling back and regrouping.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

The easy way is always mined.                   --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Teamwork is essential; it gives the enemy other people to shoot at.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Don't look conspicuous; it draws fire.  For this reason, it is not at
all uncommon for aircraft carriers to be known as bomb magnets.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Never draw fire; it irritates everyone around you.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

If you are short of everything but the enemy, you are in the combat zone.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Incoming fire has the right of way.             --Murphy's Laws of Combat

No combat ready unit has ever passed inspection.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

No inspection ready unit has ever passed combat.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

If the enemy is within range, so are you.       --Murphy's Laws of Combat

The only thing more accurate than incoming enemy fire
is incoming friendly fire.                       --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Radios will fail as soon as you need fire support.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Radar tends to fail at night and in bad weather, and especially during both.
                                                     --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Anything you do can get you killed, including nothing.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Make it too tough for the enemy to get in, and you won't be able to get out.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Tracers work both ways.                         --Murphy's Laws of Combat

If you take more than your fair share of objectives, you will get more
than your fair share of objectives to take.       --Murphy's Laws of Combat

When both sides are convinced they're about to lose, they're both right.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Professional soldiers are predictable;
the world is full of dangerous amateurs.         --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Military Intelligence is a contradiction.        --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Fortify your front; you'll get your rear shot up.  --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Weather ain't neutral.                            --Murphy's Laws of Combat

If you can't remember, the Claymore is pointed towards you.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Air defense motto: shoot 'em down; sort 'em out on the ground.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

'Flies high, it dies; low and slow, it'll go.    --Murphy's Laws of Combat

The Cavalry doesn't always come to the rescue.    --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Napalm is an area support weapon.                 --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Mines are equal opportunity weapons.              --Murphy's Laws of Combat

B-52s are the ultimate close support weapon.      --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Sniper's motto: reach out and touch someone.      --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Killing for peace is like screwing for virginity.  --Murphy's Laws of Combat

The one item you need is always in short supply.    --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Interchangeable parts aren't.                       --Murphy's Laws of Combat

It's not the one with your name on it; it's the one addressed "to whom
it may concern" you've got to think about.          --Murphy's Laws of Combat

When in doubt, empty your magazine.                 --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Combat will occur on the ground between two adjoining maps.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Anything you do can get you shot, including nothing.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

The most dangerous thing in the combat zone is an officer with a map.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

If you really need an officer in a hurry, take a nap.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

If your sergeant can see you, so can the enemy.    --Murphy's Laws of Combat

You'll only remember your hand grenades when the
sound is too close to use them.                    --Murphy's Laws of Combat

The side with the simplest uniform wins.           --Murphy's Laws of Combat

The spare batteries for the PRC-whatever your troops have been carrying
are either nearly dead or for the wrong radio.     --Murphy's Laws of Combat

The ping you heard was the antenna snapping off at 6 inches above the
flexmount, while a fire mission was being called in on a battalion of
hostiles who know your position.                   --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Why is it the CO sticks his head in your radio hooch to see if anything
has come down from DIV when you are listening to the VOA broadcasting
the baseball games?                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

How come you are on one frequency when everyone else is on another?
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Why does your 500-watt VRC-26 (real old) not make it across 200 miles
while a ham with 50 watts on the same MARS frequency can be heard
from Stateside?                                  --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Army training areas exist in a constant state of weather flux controlled
by a deity with a truly cruel sense of humor -- how do you think we got
them so cheap?                                   --Murphy's Laws of Combat

The peak of Mt Everest would flood if an Army unit was told to set up on it.
                                                 --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Hell really would freeze over if someone decided
to conduct an exercise there.                    --Murphy's Laws of Combat

The Port-a-Potty Postulate states that the likelihood of a hurricane,
sandstorm, tsunami, or blizzard occurring immediately over your location
is directly related to how bad you need to get to the portajohns at the
other side of the campsite in the middle of the night.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Markets are self-correcting.  That's why I trust markets more than
governments.  Governments usually aren't self-correcting until too late.
                --Interview with Walter Wriston as reported in Wired 4.10

The bearing of arms is the essential medium through which the individual
asserts both his social power and his participation in politics as a
responsible moral being...
        --J.G.A. Pocock, describing the beliefs of the founders of the USA

The closest I ever got to a 4.0 in high school was my blood alcohol content.

I live in my own little world, but it's ok, they know me here.

Dyslexia means never having to say that you're yrros.

If flying is so safe, why do they call the airport the 'terminal'?

I have learned there is little difference in spouses, you might as well
keep the first.

Travel is very educational.  I can now say "Kaopectate" in seven languages.

My date took me horseback riding.  It was fun until we ran out of quarters.

I love being married.  It's so great to find that one special person
you want to annoy for the rest of your life.

Women should not have children after 35.  35 kids are enough.

Shopping tip: You can get shoes for 85 cents at bowling alleys.

No one ever says "It's only a game" when their team is winning.

I gave my son a hint.  On his room door I put a sign: CHECKOUT TIME IS 18.

Ever notice that people who spend money on beer, cigarettes, and lottery
tickets are always complaining about being broke and not feeling well?

How long a minute is depends on what side of the bathroom door you're on.

On my first day of school my parents dropped me off at the wrong nursery.
There I was, surrounded by trees and bushes.

Marriage changes passion; suddenly you're in bed with a relative.

Why is it that most nudists are people you don't want to see naked?

I earn a seven-figure salary.  Unfortunately, there's a decimal point involved.

The next time you feel like complaining, remember: Your garbage disposal
probably eats better than thirty percent of the people in this world.

My wife and I were happy for twenty years.  Then we met.

Every time I walk into a singles bar I can hear Mom's wise words:
"Don't pick that up, you don't know where it's been.

The developers' kit for Windows 95 came out on 12 CDs.  The entire human
genome fits on one CD.  You can't tell me [software] needs to be that
complicated.
     --Jim Kent, UCSC doctoral candidate working on the Human Genome Project

I think someone should have had the decency to tell me the luncheon
wasn't free.  To make someone run out with potato salad in his hand,
pretending he's throwing up, is not what I call hospitality.  --Jack Handy

He came racing up on our yard and we ran and ran.  Thank goodness nobody
was home to beef to.  Both my folks worked.
                          --Bill Clinton on how he got away with
                            throwing rocks at cars when he was a child.

I calculated that for every dollar I made on a book, I'd have to spend
$2 on therapy for just reliving it, so I'm not writing a book.
                          --Joe Lockhart, former Clinton spokesman,
                            scuttling talk of writing a tell-all book

Timothy McVeigh was voted off the planet!  McVeigh refused to
meet with his lawyer on the day of his execution.  I guess he
knew he'd be meeting enough of them later on.                 --Jay Leno

Americans have confused tolerance and relativism; often, they assume that
tolerance means not merely respecting people's right to their opinions
but refusing to make any reasoned judgments about those opinions.
                                                        --William Bennett

If you teach a child how to use a condom, you're promoting safety, not usage.
Why, then, doesn't the same logic apply to guns?          --Michelle Malkin

The idea that Bill Gates has appeared like a knight in shining armor to
lead all customers out of a mire of technological chaos neatly ignores
the fact that it was he who, by peddling second-rate technology, led
them into it in the first place.                        --Douglas Adams

In every country and in every age, the priest has been hostile to
liberty.  He is always in alliance with the despot, abetting his
abuses in return for protection to his own.       --Thomas Jefferson, 1814

I want all the kids to do what I do, to look up to me.  I want all the
kids to copulate me.
              --Chicago Cubs outfielder Andre Dawson on being a role model

I want to rush for 1,000 or 1,500 yards, whichever comes first.
   --New Orleans Saint RB George Rogers, when asked about the upcoming season

I'd run over my own mother to win the Super Bowl.   --Joe Jacobi, Redskins
To win, I'd run over Joe's Mom, too.    --Response by Raider's Matt Millen

Nobody in football should be called a genius.  A genius is a guy like
Norman Einstein.
              --Football commentator and former player Joe Theismann, 1996

I'm going to graduate on time, no matter how long it takes.
                      --Senior basketball player, University of Pittsburgh

You guys line up alphabetically by height.
                      --Bill Peterson, a Florida State football coach

You guys pair up in groups of three, then line up in a circle.
                      --Bill Peterson, a Florida State football coach

Why would anyone expect him to come out smarter?  He went to prison
for three years, not Princeton.
                      --Boxing promoter Dan Duva, on Mike Tyson
                        hooking up again with promoter Don King

That's so when I forget how to spell my name, I can still find my clothes.
              --Stu Grimson, Chicago Blackhawks left wing, explaining why
                he keeps a color photo of himself above his locker

I can't really remember the names of the clubs that we went to.
                      --Shaquille O'Neal, on whether he had visited
                        the Parthenon during his visit to Greece

I've won at every level, except college and pro.
                      --Shaquille O'Neal, on his lack of championships

He's a guy who gets up at six o'clock in the morning regardless of what
time it is.           --Lou Duva, veteran boxing trainer, on the Spartan
                        training regime of heavyweight Andrew Golota

We can't win at home.  We can't win on the road.  As general manager,
I just can't figure out where else to play.
                      --Pat Williams, Orlando Magic general manager,
                        on his team's 7-27 record in 1992

My sister's expecting a baby, and I don't know if I'm going to be an uncle
or an aunt.
          --Chuck Nevitt, North Carolina State basketball player, explaining
            to Coach Jim Valvano why he appeared nervous at practice

I'm not allowed to comment on lousy, no good officiating.
                      --Jim Finks, New Orleans Saints General Manager,
                        when asked after a loss what he thought of the refs

It's basically the same, just darker.
                      --Alan Kulwicki, stock car racer, on racing
                        Saturday nights as opposed to Sunday afternoons

I was going to write myself in, but I was afraid I'd get shot.
      --Lincoln Kennedy, Oakland Raiders tackle, on his decision not to vote

I told him, "Son, what is it with you?  Is it ignorance or apathy?"
He said, "Coach, I don't know and I don't care."
                      --Frank Layden, Utah Jazz president, on a former player

I can go to my left or right, I'm amphibious.  --Charles Shackelford, NC State

Son, looks to me like you're spending too much time on one subject.
                      --Shelby Metcalf, basketball coach at Texas A&M,
                        to a player who received four F's and one D

Because she's too damn ugly to kiss good-bye.
                      --Oiler coach Bum Phillips, when asked by Bob
                        Costas why he takes his wife on all road trips

Jack and Jill went up the hill
to have a little fun.
Stupid Jill forgot the pill,
and now they have a son.                       --updated nursery rhymes

Jack and Jill went up the hill
to fetch a pail of water.
Jack fell down on top of Jill
and now they have a daughter.                  --updated nursery rhymes

Mary had a little lamb
Her father shot it dead
Now it goes to school with her
Between two hunks of bread.                  --updated nursery rhymes

Little Miss Muffet sat on a tuffet,
Her clothes all tattered and torn.
It had not been the spider that crept up beside her
But Little Boy Blue and his horn.                    --updated nursery rhymes

Simple Simon met a Pieman Going to the fair
Said Simple Simon to the Pieman
"What have you got there?"
Said the Pieman unto Simon, "Pies, dumbass!"         --updated nursery rhymes

There was a little girl, who had a little curl
right in the middle of her forehead.
And when she was good, she was very very good.
But when she was bad
she got a fur coat, jewels, a new car...        --updated nursery rhymes

Humpty Dumpty sat on a wall,
Humpty Dumpty had a great fall.
All the kings horses and all the kings men
Had scrambled eggs on toast for breakfast.       --updated nursery rhymes

Hickory dickory dock, three mice ran up the clock.
the clock struck one,
and the others got away with minor injuries.       --updated nursery rhymes

Hey diddle, diddle, the cat did a piddle
all over the bedside clock.
The little dog laughed to see such fun
Then it died of electric shock.                    --updated nursery rhymes

Mary had a little lamb,
that walked into a pylon.
10,000 volts went up it's bum,
And turned its wool to nylon.                      --updated nursery rhymes

Georgie Porgy pudding and pie
Kissed the girls and made them cry.
When the boys came out to play
He kissed them too 'cause he was gay.              --updated nursery rhymes

I'm not the person your mother warned you about.
Her imagination isn't that good.                    --Amy Gorin

The New Geek Dating Game: Our three bachelorettes, Lara Croft, Aki Ross
of "Final Fantasy," and Carmen Sandiego, try to distinguish 12-year-old
boys from wealthy 30-somethings in an AOL chat room.

"Vultures... flesh-eating bacteria...  Microsoft."
"I know!  Things that devour other things!"
                                --heard on "The New Geek $100,000 Pyramid"

Q. Why did the melon get married in a church?
A. She can't elope.

Viagra, when it absolutely, positively has to be there tonight.

A few years ago, Louis Farrakhan organized the Million Man March.  I dream
about holding National Boycott Stupidity Day and getting the same kind
of turnout -- throngs of citizens tired of popular culture's celebration
of idiocy and ignorance as greater virtues than logical analysis and
knowledgeable discourse.                              --Bob Lewis, columnist

During times of universal deceit, telling the truth
becomes a revolutionary act.                            --George Orwell

In my humble opinion, law schools teach students how to lie to one person
at a time, while journalism schools teach students how to lie to everybody
at once.                                                  --Norman Liebmann

The Group of Eight Summit was besieged Friday by thousands of rioters
who looted local stores.  It was ugly.  Store fronts were smashed and
computers came flying out of several offices, but then no one's happy
with the new Windows 2000.                              --Argus Hamilton

Suggested names for Walmart Wine #15: Box O' Grapes

Suggested names for Walmart Wine #14: Chateau Traileur Doublewide

Suggested names for Walmart Wine #13: White Trashfindel

Suggested names for Walmart Wine #12: Big Red Gulp

Suggested names for Walmart Wine #11: Grape Expectations

Suggested names for Walmart Wine #10: Domaine Walmart "Merde du Pays"

Suggested names for Walmart Wine #9: NASCARbernet

Suggested names for Walmart Wine #8: Chef Boyardeaux

Suggested names for Walmart Wine #7: Peanut Noir

Suggested names for Walmart Wine #6: Stagger Home

Suggested names for Walmart Wine #5: Chateau des Moines

Suggested names for Walmart Wine #4: Martha Stewart's Sour Grapes

Suggested names for Walmart Wine #3: I Can't Believe It's Not Vinegar!

Suggested names for Walmart Wine #2: World Championship Wriesling

Suggested names for Walmart Wine #1: Nasti Spumante

You know you've joined a cheap HMO if your annual breast exam is
conducted at Hooters.

You know you've joined a cheap HMO if directions to your doctor's office
include, "take a left when you enter the trailer park."

You know you've joined a cheap HMO if the tongue depressors taste faintly
of Fudgesicles.

You know you've joined a cheap HMO if the only proctologist in the plan is
"Gus" from Roto-Rooter.

You know you've joined a cheap HMO if the only item listed under Preventive
Care coverage is "an apple a day."

You know you've joined a cheap HMO if your "primary care physician" is
wearing the pants you gave to Goodwill last month.

You know you've joined a cheap HMO if "The patient is responsible for 200%
of out-of-network charges" is not a typo.

You know you've joined a cheap HMO if the only expense covered 100%
is embalming.

You know you've joined a cheap HMO if your Prozac comes in different
colors with little "m's" on them.

You know you've joined a cheap HMO if you ask for Viagra and you get
a Popsicle stick with duct tape.

If men ruled the world #1: The victors in any athletic competition
would get to kill and eat the losers.

If men ruled the world #2: Birth control would come in ale or lager.

If men ruled the world #3: Tanks would be far easier to rent.

If men ruled the world #4: Instead of beer belly, you'd get "beer biceps."

If men ruled the world #5: "Sorry I'm late, but I got hammered last night"
would be an acceptable excuse for tardiness.

If men ruled the world #6: Any fake phone number a girl gave you would
automatically forward your call to her real number.

If men ruled the world #7: When your wife really needed to talk to you during
the game, she would type into a little box in the corner of the screen.

If men ruled the world #8: Each year, your raise would be pegged to the
fortunes of the NFL team of your choice.

If men ruled the world #9: The funniest guy in the office would get to be CEO.

If men ruled the world #10: It'd be considered harmless fun to gather
30 friends, put on horned helmets, and go pillage a nearby town.

If men ruled the world #11: Lifeguards could remove citizens from
beaches for violating the "Public Ugliness" ordinance.

If men ruled the world #12: Instead of wasting money on an expensive
engagement ring, your fiancee would get a giant foam hand that said,
"You're #1!"

If men ruled the world #13: Valentine's Day would be moved to February
29th so it would only occur in leap years.

If men ruled the world #14: The 'Cops' program would be broadcast live
so that you could phone in advice to the cops -- or crooks.

If men ruled the world #15: People would never again talk about how
fresh they felt.

If men ruled the world #16: Telephones would automatically cut off
after 30 seconds of conversation.

If men ruled the world #17: The only show opposite Monday Night Football
would be Monday Night Football from a different camera angle.

If men ruled the world #18: It would be perfectly legal to steal a sports
car, as long as you returned it the following day with a full tank of gas.

If men ruled the world #19: Every man would receive three "get out of jail
free" cards per year.

If men ruled the world #20: The Statue of Liberty would be nude.

Do fish say "Dam!" when they hit a concrete wall?

Do pampered cows give spoiled wilk?

What kind of coffee was served on the titanic?  Sanka.

What goes "clop, clop, clop, BANG, clop, clop, clop"?
An Amish drive-by shooting.

How are a Texas tornado and an Arkansas divorce the same?
Somebody's gonna lose a trailer.

Linux is like wigwam: no windows, no gates, Apache inside.    --Brian Hatch

The most basic moral/ethical question is who gets to use
force, and when.                                            --Eric Raymond

One of the reasons Arnie (Arnold Palmer) is playing so well is that,
before each tee-shot, his wife takes out his balls and kisses them...
Oh my God, what have I just said?                     --US TV commentator

Andrew Mehrtens loves it when Darryl Gibson comes inside of him.
                                      --New Zealand Rugby commentator

This is Gregorieva from Bulgaria.  I saw her snatch this morning and
it was amazing.                     --Pat Glenn, weightlifting commentator

This is really a lovely horse, I once rode her mother.
                                       --Ted Walsh, Horse Racing Commentator

He's pulling him off!  The Spanish manager is pulling his captain off!
          --Soccer commentator George Hamilton on Spain manager Luis
          Suarez's substitution of Butragueno during their world cup
          qualifier with Ireland in Seville, 1992

I've never had major knee surgery on any other part of my body.
                                            --Winston Bennett, ex-NBA player

The lead car is absolutely unique, except for the one behind it
which is identical.                      --Murray Walker, racing commentator

I owe a lot to my parents, especially my mother and father.   --Greg Norman

Sure there have been injuries and deaths in boxing,
but none of them serious.                                --Alan Minter

The racecourse is as level as a billiard ball.  --John Francombe

If history repeats itself, I should think we can expect
the same thing again.                            --Terry Venables

I would not say he (David Ginola) is the best left winger
in the Premiership, but there are none better.             --Ron Atkinson

He dribbles a lot and the opposition don't like it;
you can see it all over their faces.                       --Ron Atkinson

Ah, isn't that nice, the wife of the Cambridge president is kissing
the cox of the Oxford crew.  --Harry Carpenter, BBC TV Boat Race, 1977

Morcelli has four fastest 1500-metre times ever.
And all those times are at 1500 metres.                  --David Coleman

Julian Dicks is everywhere.  It's like they've got
eleven Dicks on the field.              --Metro Radio sports commentator

...  and later we will have action from the men's coxless pairs...
                                                        --Sue Barker

Well, either side could win it, or it could be a draw.     --Ron Atkinson

Strangely, in slow motion replay, the ball seemed to
hang in the air for even longer.      --David Acfield, football commentator

What will you do when you leave football, Jack,
will you stay in football?                      --Stuart Hall, Radio 5 live

There goes Juantorena down the back straight,
opening his legs and showing his class.   --David Coleman, Montreal Olympics

Don't cry, there's enough water in the goulash already.      --Jimmy Cagney

Microsoft and Burger King introduce The Whopper XP: You can have it
our way, since the pickles are embedded in every burger.
                                --High-tech ad partnerships from hell

Microsoft and McDonalds: Over 20 billion served, whether you like it or not.
                                --High-tech ad partnerships from hell

Talk about ironic: the same people always urging us to not
blame the victim in rape cases are now saying Uncle Sam wore
a short skirt and asked for it.                         --Jonathan Alter

Moderation in war is imbecility.                   --Admiral John Fisher

The greatest tragedy in mankind's entire history may be the hijacking of
morality by religion.  However valuable -- even necessary -- that may have
been in enforcing good behavior on primitive peoples, their association
is now counterproductive.  Yet at the very moment when they should be
decoupled, sanctimonious nitwits are calling for a return to morals based
on superstition.                                         --Arthur C. Clarke

It's a mistake to ask where the lemming in front of you just disappeared to,
and run to catch up to him.             --Russell Nelson <nelson@crynwr.com>

Never raise your hands to your kids.  It leaves your groin unprotected.

I'm in shape.  Round is a shape.

A lady came up to me on the street, pointed at my suede jacket and said,
"Don't you know a cow was murdered for that jacket?"  I said, "I didn't
know there were any witnesses.  Now I'll have to kill you too."

Future historians will be able to study at the Jimmy Carter Library,
the Gerald Ford Library, the Ronald Reagan Library, and the Bill Clinton
Adult Bookstore.

The only purpose for which power can be rightfully exercised over any member
of a civilised community, against his will, is to prevent harm to others.
His own good, either physical or moral, is not a sufficient warrant.
He cannot rightfully be compelled to do or forbear because it will be better
for him to do so, because it will make him happier, because, in the opinions
of others, to do so would be wise, or even right.  These are good reasons
for remonstrating with him, or reasoning with him, or persuading him,
or entreating him, but not for compelling him, or visiting him with any
evil in case he do otherwise.  Over himself, over his own body and mind,
the individual is sovereign.                              --John Stuart Mill

For mere vengeance I would do nothing.  This nation is too great to look for
mere revenge.  But for the security of the future I would do everything.
                                                        --James A. Garfield

Birds of a feather flock together and usually crap on your car.

When I'm feeling down, I like to whistle.  It makes the neighbor's dog
run to the end of his chain and gag himself.

If you can't be kind, at least have the decency to be vague.

Don't assume malice for what stupidity can explain.

The real art of conversation is not only to say the right thing at the
right time, but also to leave unsaid the wrong thing at the tempting
moment.

The sole purpose of a child's middle name is so he can tell when he's
really in trouble.

Remember, when you put "The" and "IRS" together it spells "THEIRS".

Letterman's Top 10 things that will get you booted from the Taliban #8:
Lighting up in a smoke-free cave

Letterman's Top 10 things that will get you booted from the Taliban #7:
Questioning strategy of battling Stealth bombers with a stick

Letterman's Top 10 things that will get you booted from the Taliban #6:
Overdrawing your checking account at Talibank

Letterman's Top 10 things that will get you booted from the Taliban #5:
Nominating Al Gore for membership because he has a beard

Letterman's Top 10 things that will get you booted from the Taliban #4:
After President Bush speech, remarking, "You know, the guy has some
valid points about us being completely insane"

Letterman's Top 10 things that will get you booted from the Taliban #3:
Shaving your beard just to see if the Gillette Mach 3 with patented
comfort edges really does give you the cleanest, smoothest shave possible

Letterman's Top 10 things that will get you booted from the Taliban #2:
Parking your camel in the Supreme Leader's space

Letterman's Top 10 things that will get you booted from the Taliban #1:
Calling Osama Bin Laden by his real first name, "Earl"

The art of war is simple enough.  Find out where your enemy is.  Get at
him as soon as you can.  Strike him as hard as you can, and keep moving.
                                                        --Ulysses S. Grant

We've got to teach history based not on what's in fashion but what's
important: Why the Pilgrims came here, who Jimmy Doolittle was, and what
those thirty seconds over Tokyo meant.                       --Ronald Reagan

The truth of a proposition has nothing to do
with its credibility, and vice versa.                   --Robert A. Heinlein

I believe there are more instances of the abridgment of freedoms of the
people by gradual and silent encroachment of those in power than by violent
and sudden usurpations.       --James Madison, Founding Father, US President

I'm walking home from school, and I'm watching some men building
a new house, and the guy hammering on the roof calls me a paranoid
little weirdo... in Morse code.                            --Emo Philips

Magnocartic, adj.: Any automobile that, when left unattended,
attracts shopping carts.                -- Sniglets, "Rich Hall & Friends"

An appeaser is one who feeds a crocodile hoping it will eat him last.
                                                        --Winston Churchill

When Hitler attacked the Jews I was not a Jew, therefore I was not
concerned.  And when Hitler attacked the Catholics, I was not a Catholic,
and therefore, I was not concerned.  And when Hitler attacked the unions and
the industrialists, I was not a member of the unions and I was not concerned.
Then Hitler attacked me and the Protestant church - and there was nobody
left to be concerned.
          --Martin Niemoller, Congressional Record, 14 October 1968, p31636

If trees could scream, would we be so cavalier about cutting them down?
We might, if they screamed all the time, for no good reason.
                                        --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

Every citizen should be a soldier.  This was the case with the Greeks
and Romans, and must be that of every free state.  --Thomas Jefferson

Coffee (n.), a person who is coughed upon.
                 --Washington Post "alternate definitions" contest

Flabbergasted (adj.), appalled over how much weight you have gained.
                 --Washington Post "alternate definitions" contest

Abdicate (v.), to give up all hope of ever having a flat stomach.
                 --Washington Post "alternate definitions" contest

Esplanade (v.), to attempt an explanation while drunk.
                 --Washington Post "alternate definitions" contest

Willy-nilly (adj.), impotent  --Washington Post "alternate definitions" contest

Negligent (adj.), describes a condition in which you absentmindedly
answer the door in your nightie.
                 --Washington Post "alternate definitions" contest

Lymph (v.), to walk with a lisp.
                 --Washington Post "alternate definitions" contest

Gargoyle (n.), an olive-flavored mouthwash.
                 --Washington Post "alternate definitions" contest

Flatulence (n.)  the emergency vehicle that picks you up after you're run
over by a steamroller.    --Washington Post "alternate definitions" contest

Balderdash (n.), a rapidly receding hairline.
                 --Washington Post "alternate definitions" contest

Testicle (n.), a humorous question on an exam.
                 --Washington Post "alternate definitions" contest

Rectitude (n.), the formal, dignified demeanor assumed by a proctologist
immediately before he examines you.
                 --Washington Post "alternate definitions" contest

Oyster (n.), person who sprinkles his conversation with Yiddish expressions.
                 --Washington Post "alternate definitions" contest

Circumvent (n.), an opening in the front of boxer shorts worn by Jewish men.
                 --Washington Post "alternate definitions" contest

Frisbeetarianism (n.), The belief that, when you die, your soul goes
up on the roof and gets stuck there.
                 --Washington Post "alternate definitions" contest

Pokemon (n), A Jamaican proctologist.
                 --Washington Post "alternate definitions" contest

If you give a man a fish he will eat for a day.
If you teach a man to fish he will buy an ugly hat.  --Scott Adams, "Dilbert"

A rattlesnake loose in the living room tends to end all discussion of
animal rights.
          --Time magazine's Lance Morrow on Middle East relations after 9/11

For a religion that is said to respect human rights and equality, Islam
does a rather thorough job of trampling the former and denying the latter,
from Africa's west coast to East Asia.  While they're voluble in demanding
tolerance for their faith, when it comes to the suffering of minorities
in Islamic countries, American Moslems are mute.                 --Don Feder

The only "intuitive" interface is the nipple.  After that, it's all learned.
               --Bruce Ediger <bediger@teal.csn.org> on computer interfaces

Consider the daffodil.  And while you're doing that, I'll be over here,
looking through your stuff.                 --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

She has no rigors or shaking chills, but her husband states
she was really hot in bed last night.      --actual comment on hospital chart

Patient has chest pain if she lies on her left side for over a year.
                                     --actual comment on hospital chart

On the second day the knee was better, and on the
third day it disappeared.               --actual comment on hospital chart

The patient is tearful and crying constantly.
She also appears to be depressed.        --actual comment on hospital chart

The patient has been depressed since she began seeing me in 1993.
                                     --actual comment on hospital chart

Discharge status: alive but without my permission.
                                     --actual comment on hospital chart

Healthy appearing decrepit 69 year old male, mentally alert but forgetful.
                                     --actual comment on hospital chart

The patient refused autopsy.            --actual comment on hospital chart

The patient has no previous history of suicides.
                                     --actual comment on hospital chart

Patient has left white blood cells at another hospital.
                                     --actual comment on hospital chart

Patient's medical history has been remarkably insignificant with only
a 40 pound weight gain in the past 3 days.
                                     --actual comment on hospital chart

Patient had waffles for breakfast and anorexia for lunch.
                                     --actual comment on hospital chart

She is numb from the toes down.          --actual comment on hospital chart

While in ER, she was examined, x-rated and sent home.
                                     --actual comment on hospital chart

The skin was moist and dry.              --actual comment on hospital chart

Occasional, constant infrequent headaches.  --actual comment on hospital chart

Patient was alert and unresponsive.        --actual comment on hospital chart

Rectal examination revealed a normal size thyroid.
                                     --actual comment on hospital chart

She stated that she had been constipated for most of
her life until she got a divorce.          --actual comment on hospital chart

I saw your patient today, who is still under our car for physical therapy.
                                     --actual comment on hospital chart

Both breasts are equal and reactive to light and accommodation.
                                     --actual comment on hospital chart

Examination of genitalia reveals that he is circus sized.
                                     --actual comment on hospital chart

The lab test indicated abnormal lover function.
                                     --actual comment on hospital chart

The patient was to have a bowel resection.  However, he took
a job as a stock broker instead.         --actual comment on hospital chart

Skin: somewhat pale but present.          --actual comment on hospital chart

The pelvic exam will be done later on the floor.
                                     --actual comment on hospital chart

Patient was seen in consultation by Dr. __, who felt we
should sit on the abdomen and I agree.     --actual comment on hospital chart

Large brown stool ambulating in the hall.  --actual comment on hospital chart

Patient has two teenage children, but no other abnormalities
                                     --actual comment on hospital chart

No trees were killed in the sending of this message.  However, a large
number of electrons were terribly inconvenienced.

He felt that institutions such as schools, churches, governments and
political organizations of every sort all tended to direct thought for
ends other than truth, for the perpetuation of their own functions and
for the control of individuals in the service of these functions.
               --Robert Pirsig, "Zen and the Art of Motorcycle Maintenance"

What it lies in our power to do, it lies in our power not to do.  --Aristotle

"A free people ought to be armed..."
                  --George Washington, speech of January 7, 1790,
                    Boston Independent Chronicle, January 14, 1790

Firmness based on strong defense capability is not provocative.  Weakness can
be provocative simply because it is tempting to a nation whose imperialist
ambitions extend to the ends of the earth.                    --Ronald Reagan

We seem not to have learned a basic lesson of history: Capitalism harnesses
self-interest; socialism exhausts itself trying to kill it.  --Linda Bowles

Nothing opens the closed minds of college administrators
more than the sounds of pocketbooks snapping shut.      --Walter Williams

I want to thank you for taking time out of your day to come and witness
my hanging.  Fortunately it's my portrait.
                --Gee Dubya at the Texas Capitol unveiling of his
                  official gubernatorial portrait

Politicians are wonderful people as long as they stay away from things they
don't understand, such as working for a living.              --P.J. O'Rourke

[NYC] Mayor Bloomberg has announced that he thinks the city should cut
the pay of the firefighters and police department.  This guy is a public
relations genius.                                          --David Letterman

The FBI said the white powder in an envelope mailed to Tom Daschle last week
was only talcum powder.  The letter writer was just trying to be helpful.
The Democrats have been chafing like mad since President Bush's approval
rating hit 90 percent.                                     --Argus Hamilton

It is a general popular error to suppose the loudest complainers for
the public to be the most anxious for its welfare.         --Edmund Burke

He who puts up with insult invites injury.               --Jewish Proverb

The people never give up their liberties, but under some delusion.
                                                         --Edmund Burke

If the American people ever allow the banks to control the issuance of
their currency, first by inflation and then by deflation, the banks and
corporations that will grow up around them will deprive the people of all
property until their children will wake up homeless on the continent their
fathers occupied.                                         --Thomas Jefferson

In my long political career, the one thing I genuinely regret is my
part in getting the banking and currency legislation enacted into law.
   --William Jennings Bryan, Democratic Party Whip during the passage
     of the Federal Reserve Act

A great industrial nation is controlled by its system of credit.  Our system
of credit is concentrated in the Federal Reserve System.  The growth
of the nation, therefore, and all our activities are in the hands of
a few men.  We have come to be one of the worst ruled, one of the most
completely controlled and dominated governments in the civilized world --
no longer a government by conviction and the vote of the majority, but
a government by the opinion and duress of small groups of dominant men.
                            --President Woodrow Wilson, three years after
                              signing the Federal Reserve Act into law

This act establishes the most gigantic trust on earth.  When the president
signs the bill, the invisible government by the monetary power will be
legalized.  The worst legislative crime of the ages is perpetrated by this
banking and currency bill.  The caucus and the party bosses have again
operated and prevented the people from getting the benefits of their own
government.
     --Rep. Charles Lindbergh Sr., on the passage of the Federal Reserve Act

We pass worthy laws through the House and Senate, and the president signs.
We attach a large penalty for violation and congratulate ourselves that
we have expressed the will of the people in laws.  But you, the Federal
Reserve banking system, you hold in your hand a mightier power, the power
of money; for by this power you control God Almighty's first law, the law
of self-preservation.  You, by the power of money, can turn back the clock
of time from civilization to dark past.  For no power on Earth to man for
evil or for good can equal the power of money.
   --Rep. Charles G. Binderup (D-Neb.), on the floor of the House, Oct 6 1938

Mr. Chairman, we have in this country one of the most corrupt institutions
the world has ever known.  I refer to the Federal Reserve Board and
the Federal Reserve banks.  The Federal Reserve Board has cheated
the government of the United States out of enough money to pay the
national debt.  --Rep. Louis T. McFadden, during the Great Depression

The best defense against usurpatory government is an assertive citizenry.
                                                    --William F. Buckley

We are all free to go beyond the requirements of ethics at any time.
But that excess of 'goodness' doesn't create ethical obligations for
other people.        --Carlton Vogt, Infoworld "Ethics Matters" columnist,
                       talking about the limitations of the Golden Rule

I wish I would have a real tragic love affair and get so depressed that I'd
just quit my job and become a bum for a few years, because I was thinking
about doing that anyway.                        --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

Remember: "silly" is a state of mind, "stupid" is a way of life.  --Dave Butler

I do not object to people looking at their watches when I am speaking.
But I strongly object when they start shaking them to make certain
they are still going.                             --Lord Birkett 1883-1962

Si hoc legere scis nimium eruditionis habes
(Translation: If you can read this, you're overeducated)

In one century we went from teaching Latin and Greek in
high school to offering remedial English in college.       --Joseph Sobran

Immigration policy must now be considered a matter of national security.
America has the same sovereign right to defend itself against enemies
when the enemy attacks us from within.                     --Rep. Ron Paul

Liberals love victims.  They just don't have much emotional energy left
over to be certain that sound results are achieved (from the perspective
of the needy).  In fact, when people actually become less needy, liberals
lose their reason for being, and their base of support.      --Michael Novak

The fashionable idiocy that haters must have justifications is one of
those ideas that George Orwell said only an intellectual could believe,
because no one else could be such a fool.                   --Thomas Sowell

Neither philosophy, nor religion, nor morality, nor wisdom, nor interest
will ever govern nations or parties against their vanity, their pride,
their resentment or revenge, or their avarice or ambition.  Nothing but
force and power and strength can restrain them.               --John Adams

Minimizing the consequences of folly maximizes the amount of folly.
                                                              --George Will

I'm starting to like muggers more than congressmen.
At least the muggers don't claim they're doing you a favor.     --Paul Jacob

After a shooting spree, they always want to take
the guns away from the people who didn't do it.         --William Burroughs

It's hard to find people in society who can administer UNIX and
professionally carry a weapon.
              --Jim Williams, former FBI Computer Intrusion Squad agent

Nor is the people's judgment always true:
the most may err as grossly as the few.            --John Dryden

It may be true that you can't fool all the people all the time,
but you can fool enough of them to rule a large country.  --William J. Durant

Gun control?  It's the best thing you can do for crooks and gangsters.
I want you to have nothing.  If I'm a bad guy, I'm always gonna have a gun.
Safety locks?  You will pull the trigger with a lock on, and I'll pull
the trigger.  We'll see who wins.  --Sammy "The Bull" Gravano, mob informant

"It's a summons."
"What's a summons?"
"It means summon's in trouble."          --Rocky and Bullwinkle

I was married by a judge.  I should have asked for a jury.   --Groucho Marx

Government big enough to supply everything you need is big enough to
take everything you have...  The course of history shows that as a
government grows, liberty decreases.                  --Thomas Jefferson

There is a very fine line between "hobby" and "mental illness."  --Dave Barry

When God decides to deliver a message to humanity, He WILL NOT
use as His messenger a person on cable TV with a bad hairstyle.  --Dave Barry

When trouble arises and things look bad, there is always one
individual who perceives a solution and is willing to take
command.  Very often, that individual is crazy.                  --Dave Barry

You should never say anything to a woman that even remotely
suggests that you think she's pregnant unless you can see an
actual baby emerging from her at that moment.                    --Dave Barry

There comes a time when you should stop expecting other people to
make a big deal about your birthday.  That time is age eleven.   --Dave Barry

The one thing that unites all human beings, regardless of age,
gender, religion, economic status or ethnic background, is that
deep down inside, we ALL believe we are above-average drivers.   --Dave Barry

A person who is nice to you but rude to the waiter is not a nice person.
                                                                 --Dave Barry

Remember that a lone amateur built the Ark, and a large group of
professionals built the Titanic.                                 --Dave Barry

I had one guy from the FDA tell me "if we wanted to make carrots (be)
against the law, we could do it."
   --Kerry Nielson, former director of operations at Sunrider International,
     discussing the 1985 FDA raid of his company

The difference between a duck and a copilot?  The duck can fly.

It only takes two things to fly: airspeed and money.

The three most dangerous things in aviation:
* A Doctor or Dentist in a Cessna.
* Two captains in a DC-9.
* A flight attendant with a chipped tooth.

Aircraft identification:
* If it's ugly, it's British
* If it's weird, it's French.
* If it's ugly and weird, it's Russian.

Without ammo, the USAF would be just another very expensive flying club.

The three best things in life are a good landing, a good orgasm, and a good
bowel movement.  The night carrier landing is one of the few opportunities
to experience all three at the same time.

The similarity between air traffic controllers and pilots?
If a pilot screws up, the pilot dies.
If the ATC screws up, the pilot dies.

The difference between flight attendants and jet engines?
The engines usually quit whining when they get to the gate.

New FAA motto: "We're not happy until *you're* not happy."

A copilot is a knothead until he spots opposite direction traffic at 12
o'clock, after which he's a goof-off for not seeing it sooner.

Basic Flying Rules:
* Try to stay in the middle of the air.
* Do not go near the edges, it's much more difficult to fly there.
* The edges of the air can be recognized by the appearance of ground,
  buildings, sea, trees and interstellar space.

Unknown ATC to carrier pilot after his 6th unsuccessful landing attempt:
"You've got to land here, son.  This is where the food is."

If both sides are convinced they're about to lose, they're both right.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

If the enemy is in range, so are you.           --Murphy's Laws of Combat

If your ambush is properly set, the enemy won't walk into it.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

If your flank march is going well, the enemy expects you to outflank him.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

If your opponents didn't have the courtesy to "Count Off!"
before beginning, assume that there's one more somewhere.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

If your positions are firmly set and you are prepared to take the enemy
assault on, he will bypass you.                 --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Never assume your opponent is out of ammo.         --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Never turn your back on an armed bad guy, even if he's down.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Once you've secured an area, don't forget to tell the enemy.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

One enemy soldier is never enough, but two is entirely too many.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

The enemy diversion you are ignoring is the main attack.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Whenever you lose contact with the enemy, look behind you.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

For every action, there is an equal and opposite criticism.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

If you receive two contradictory orders, obey them both.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

If you whine about the weather, someone else will always whine louder.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Never tell the Platoon Sergeant you have nothing to do.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

The more stupid the leader is, the more important missions
he is ordered to carry out.                     --Murphy's Laws of Combat

The most dangerous thing in the world is a
second lieutenant with a map and a compass.      --Murphy's Laws of Combat

The perfect officer for the job will transfer in the day
after that billet is filled by someone else.      --Murphy's Laws of Combat

The tough part about being an officer is that the troops don't know
what they want, but they know for certain what they DON'T want.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Field experience is something you don't get until just after you need it.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Cavalry doesn't always come to the rescue.        --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Fortify your front and you'll get your rear shot up.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

If you build yourself a bunker that's tough for the enemy to get into
quickly, then you won't be able to get out of it quickly either.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

It is generally inadvisable to eject directly over
the area you just bombed.                        --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Neutral countries aren't.                        --Murphy's Laws of Combat

The easy way is always mined.                    --Murphy's Laws of Combat

The trucks will be on the drop zone.             --Murphy's Laws of Combat

There's no such thing as "unfair advantage."     --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Density of fire increases proportionally to the
curiousness of the target.                       --Murphy's Laws of Combat

If it's stupid but works, it isn't stupid.       --Murphy's Laws of Combat

If you don't care where you are, you ain't lost.  --Murphy's Laws of Combat

No matter which way you have to march, it's always uphill.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

The enemy invariably attacks on two occasions: (1) when you're
ready for them and (2) when you're not.           --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Exceptions prove the rule, and destroy the battle plan.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

No plan survives the first contact intact.         --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Professionals are predictable, it's the amateurs that are dangerous.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

No combat ready unit ever passed an inspection.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

No inspection ready unit ever passed combat.       --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Communications will fail as soon as you desperately need fire support.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Every command which can be misunderstood, will be.  --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Radios will fail as soon as you need fire support.  --Murphy's Laws of Combat

The degree to which you overreact to information
will be in inverse proportion to its accuracy.     --Murphy's Laws of Combat

The enemy never monitors your radio frequency
until you broadcast on an unsecured channel.       --Murphy's Laws of Combat

The enemy never watches until you make a mistake.  --Murphy's Laws of Combat

To steal information from a person is called plagiarism.
To steal information from the enemy is called gathering intelligence.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Everything always works in your HQ,
everything always fails in the Colonel's HQ.       --Murphy's Laws of Combat

If you can keep your head while those around you are losing theirs,
you may have misjudged the situation.              --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Never draw fire.  It irritates everyone around you.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Suppression fire won't.                          --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Teamwork is essential.  It gives the enemy other people to shoot at.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

A grenade with a 7-second fuse will always burn down in four seconds.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Anything you do can get you shot, including doing nothing.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Don't quit just because you're hit; GET EVEN!     --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Drop the one with the shotgun first.              --Murphy's Laws of Combat

If you can't remember, then the Claymore IS pointed at you.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

It's not the one with your name on it, it's the one addressed
"to whom it may concern" that you should be worried about.
                                                --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Mines are an equal opportunity weapon.            --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Odd objects attract fire.  Never lurk behind one.  --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Smart bombs have bad days too.                    --Murphy's Laws of Combat

The bursting radius of a hand grenade is always
one foot greater than your jumping range.         --Murphy's Laws of Combat

The crucial round is a dud.                       --Murphy's Laws of Combat

The weapon that usually jams when you need it the most is the M60.
                                                 --Murphy's Laws of Combat

There is nothing more satisfying than having
someone take a shot at you and miss.             --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Those who hesitate under fire usually do not end up KIA or WIA.
                                                 --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Tracers work BOTH ways.                          --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Try to look unimportant.  The enemy may be low on ammo.
                                                 --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Whenever you drop your equipment in a fire-fight, your ammo and grenades
always fall the farthest away, and your canteen always lands at your feet.
                                                 --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Whenever you have plenty of ammo, you never miss.  Whenever you are
low on ammo, you can't hit the broad side of a barn.
                                                 --Murphy's Laws of Combat

You'll only remember your hand grenades
when the sound is too close to use them.         --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Air defense motto: shoot 'em all down; sort 'em out on the ground.
                                                 --Murphy's Laws of Combat

B-52s are the ultimate close support weapon.     --Murphy's Laws of Combat

If at first you don't succeed, call in an air-strike.
                                                 --Murphy's Laws of Combat

When in doubt, empty your magazine.              --Murphy's Laws of Combat

I want to find a voracious, small-minded predator and name it after the IRS.
                                              --Robert Bakker, paleontologist

In a recent conversation with an official at the Internal Revenue Service,
I was amazed when he told me that "If the taxpayers of this country ever
discover that the IRS operates on 90% bluff, the entire system will collapse."
                                            --Henry Bellmon, Senator (1969)

We are in the process of creating what deserves to be called the
idiot culture.  Not an idiot sub-culture, which every society has
bubbling beneath the surface and which can provide harmless fun; but
the culture itself.  For the first time, the weird and the stupid and
the coarse are becoming our cultural norm, even our cultural ideal.
                                                        --Carl Bernstein

We don't charge an arm and a leg.  We want tows.   --sign at a towing company

If sometimes you feel yourself little, useless, offended and depressed,
always remember that you were once the fastest and most victorious
sperm out of hundreds of millions.

We have now sunk to a depth at which restatement of
the obvious is the first duty of intelligent men.         --George Orwell

Justice Department studies show that armed citizens are much less likely
to suffer losses or personal injury from thieves.
                                    --The Washington Post, January 7, 1992

Civil liberty can be established on no foundation of human reason which
will not at the same time demonstrate the right to religious freedom.
                                                        --John Quincy Adams

The belief that public opinion or international public opinion,
unbacked by force, had the slightest effect in restraining a powerful
military nation in any course of action ... has been shown to be a
pathetic fallacy.                                     --Theodore Roosevelt

Law not served by power is an illusion; but power not ruled by law is
a menace which our nuclear age cannot afford.         --Arthur J. Goldberg

There is nothing that makes more cowards and
feeble men than public opinion.                       --Henry Ward Beecher

It is sad that being a good patriot often means being
the enemy of the rest of mankind.                           --Voltaire

We do not admire a man of timid peace.         --Theodore Roosevelt

Self-government means self-support.            --Calvin Coolidge

If crime and disease are to be regarded as the same thing, it follows
that any state of mind which our masters choose to call "disease" can be
treated as a crime, and compulsorily cured.                    --C.S. Lewis

The "lesson of appeasement" is not that appeasement is futile.  Appeasement
is not futile, it is dangerous -- appeasement doesn't merely fail to
prevent catastrophe, it provokes catastrophe.              --David Gelernter

In the reported words of one survivor of the Holocaust, when asked what
lesson he had taken from his experience of the 1940s, "If someone tells
you that he intends to kill you, believe him".         --Wall Street Journal

Well, you've heard our news reports, now what are the facts
concerning Anaconda?              --ABC's Sam Donaldson to Gen. Tommy Franks

If nearly two-thirds of the Arabic world believe that Arabs were not
involved in 9/11, why should any American believe anything that two
out of three people from that region say?               --Victor Davis Hanson

To put it in philosophical terms, why not nuke the bastards?  Why should
American lives be sacrificed in land battles if this terrorist cancer
could be treated with a little radioactive therapy?         --Paul Greenberg

As long as Russia didn't back the Arabs, Saudi Arabia could be occupied
in about five minutes by Papua-New Guinea, the Boy Scouts, or three Marines.
                                                              --Fred Reed

Debate: What you load de question with to catch de opponent.
                                      --Johnny Hart in the comic strip "B.C."

A "good" landing is one from which you can walk away.
A "great" landing is one after which they can still use the plane.
                                                 --Rules of the Air #8

After a shooting spree, they always want to take the guns away from
the people who didn't do it.                               --William Burroughs

Since 1934, only one legally owned machine gun has been used in a crime of
murder, and a law enforcement officer committed that crime.
  --The History Channel, "Modern Marvels, Weapons at War: The Machine Gun"

America has many more guns than England, and a lower violent crime rate.
Switzerland has many more guns than Germany, and a lower violent
crime rate.  England had much less crime in 1900, when the nation had
no gun laws, than it does in 2000, when England has some of the most
repressive gun laws in Europe.  Gun prohibition leads to boldness by
criminals, and passivity by the innocent - and therefore to many more
violent crimes committed against the innocent.
                  --David B. Kopel, in an interview with Carlo Stagnaro
                    for Zola Times, Oct 23, 2000

Since Florida has enacted their concealed carry law, the Florida murder
rate has dropped by 29%. Nationwide, the murder rate rose 11% over the same
period.
          --ABC News, March 12, 1995, reporting on 1994 FBI crime statistics

One of the shrewdest ways for human predators to conquer their stronger
victims is to steadily convince them with propaganda that they're still free.
                                                        --Dr. N. A. Scott

We won't dispassionately investigate or rationally debate which drugs
do what damage and whether or how much of that damage is the result
of criminalisation.  We'd rather work ourselves into a screaming fit of
puritanism and then go home and take a pill.              --P. J. O'Rourke

Single acts of tyranny may be ascribed to the accidental opinion of
a day; but a series of oppressions, begun at a distinguished period,
and pursued unalterably thro' every change of ministers, too plainly
prove a deliberate, systematical plan of reducing us to slavery.
                 --Thomas Jefferson, July 1774, Papers 1:121-135,
                   A Summary View of the Rights of British America

We will bankrupt ourselves in the vain search for absolute security.
                                                  --Dwight D. Eisenhower

Political tags - such as royalist, communist, democrat, populist,
fascist, liberal, conservative, and so forth - are never basic criteria.
The human race divides politically into those who want people to be
controlled and those who have no such desire.            --Robert Heinlein

Of all tyrannies a tyranny exercised for the good of its victims may
be the most oppressive.  It may be better to live under robber barons
than under omnipotent moral busybodies.  The robber baron's cruelty
may sometimes sleep, his cupidity may at some point be satiated; but
those who torment us for our own good will torment us without end for
they do so with the approval of their own conscience.  --C.S. Lewis

When a well-packaged web of lies has been sold gradually to the masses
over generations, the truth will seem utterly preposterous and its
speaker a raving lunatic.                                 --Dresden James

Things we'd love to say at work #1:
I can see your point, but I still think you're full of sh*t.

Things we'd love to say at work #2:
I see you've set aside this special time to humiliate yourself in public.

Things we'd love to say at work #3:
I'll try being nicer if you'll try being smarter.

Things we'd love to say at work #4:
How do I set a laser printer to stun?

Things we'd love to say at work #5:
I like you.  You remind me of me when I was young and stupid.

Things we'd love to say at work #6:
You are validating my inherent mistrust of strangers.

Things we'd love to say at work #7:
Thanks, we're all refreshed and challenged by your unique point of view.

Things we'd love to say at work #8:
The fact that no one understands you doesn't mean you are an artist.

Things we'd love to say at work #9:
What am I, flypaper for freaks?

Things we'd love to say at work #10:
I'm not being rude.  You're just insignificant.

Things we'd love to say at work #11:
Yes, I am an agent of Satan, but my duties are largely ceremonial.

Things we'd love to say at work #12:
Did you dress like that on purpose, or did you roll around in the hamper
until something stuck?

Things we'd love to say at work #13:
Sarcasm is just one more service we offer.

Things we'd love to say at work #14:
Chaos, panic and disorder; my work here is done.

Things we'd love to say at work #15:
I don't know what your problem is, but I'll bet it's a long word
that's hard to pronounce.

Things we'd love to say at work #16:
How about never?  Is never good for you?

Things we'd love to say at work #17:
It's nice to see you've set aside this special time to humiliate yourself.

Things we'd love to say at work #18:
I thought I wanted a career, turns out I just wanted paychecks.

Things we'd love to say at work #19:
Ah, I see the f*ck-up fairy paid us another visit.

Things we'd love to say at work #20:
Nice perfume.  Must you marinate in it?

Things we'd love to say at work #21:
I don't work here.  I'm just a consultant.

Things we'd love to say at work #22:
I think it's English, it sounds like English, but I can't understand
a word you're saying.

Things we'd love to say at work #23:
I have plenty of talent and vision.  I just don't give a damn.

Things we'd love to say at work #24:
I'm already visualizing the duct tape over your mouth.

Things we'd love to say at work #25:
I will always cherish the initial misconceptions I had about your competence.

Things we'd love to say at work #26:
Any connection between your reality and mine is purely coincidental.

Things we'd love to say at work #27:
Too many freaks, not enough circuses.

Things we'd love to say at work #28:
It's a thankless job, but I've got a lot of Karma to burn off.

Things we'd love to say at work #29:
And just what would your crybaby whiny-ass opinion be?

Things we'd love to say at work #30:
Do I look like a people person?

Things we'd love to say at work #31:
This isn't an office, it's Hell with fluorescent lighting.

Things we'd love to say at work #32:
I started out with nothing & still have most of it left.

Things we'd love to say at work #33:
If I throw a stick, will you leave?

Things we'd love to say at work #34:
Errors have been made.  Others will be blamed.

Things we'd love to say at work #35:
Whatever kind of look you were going for, you missed.

Things we'd love to say at work #36:
I'm trying to imagine you with a personality.

Things we'd love to say at work #37:
A cubicle is just a padded cell without a door.

Things we'd love to say at work #38:
Can I trade this job for what's behind door #1?

Things we'd love to say at work #39:
I'm going to pop out for some lunch.  If I can't then I have to resort to
cannibalism, and dealing with HR afterwards is a headache I just don't need.

Among the many misdeeds of British rule in India, history will look
upon the Act which deprived a whole nation of arms as the blackest.
                           --Mahatma Gandhi, An Autobiography, p446

The people can always be brought to the bidding of the leaders.
All you have to do is to tell them they are being attacked and
denounce the pacifists for lack of patriotism.        --Hermann Goering

How about trying it with your tongue stuck in the hard drive?
        --ctcgag@hotmail.com, in response to an apparently offensive
          test suggestion in the perl-users mailing list

Before we set our hearts too much upon anything, let us examine how
happy those are who already possess it.       --Francois de La Rochefoucauld

When money is going down in value, you want to have it
in something besides a bank.                               --Will Rogers

I read recipes the same way I read science fiction.
I get to the end and think, 'Well, that's not going to happen.'   --unknown

If you're playing a poker game and you look around the table
and can't tell who the sucker is, it's you.                  --Paul Newman

The Palestinian strategy will continue to work until the Western
governments, and this means mostly the United States, back away and
allow Israel to teach the terrorists, and those who harbor terrorists,
that acts have consequences, and mortal acts have mortal consequences.
                                                          --Wesley Pruden

Letterman's Top April Fool's Pranks in Afghanistan #9:
Short-sheeted burqas

Letterman's Top April Fool's Pranks in Afghanistan #8:
A fake beard over your real beard

Letterman's Top April Fool's Pranks in Afghanistan #7:
Saying you're wife #4, when you're really wife #2

Letterman's Top April Fool's Pranks in Afghanistan #6:
Offering someone a can of peanut brittle and a goat jumps out

Letterman's Top April Fool's Pranks in Afghanistan #5:
Painting giant bull's-eye on roof of friend's cave

Letterman's Top April Fool's Pranks in Afghanistan #4:
Rocket launchers that shoot out little flag that reads "Bang"

Letterman's Top April Fool's Pranks in Afghanistan #3:
Replacing secret stockpiles of weaponized Anthrax with Folger's Crystals

Letterman's Top April Fool's Pranks in Afghanistan #2:
Writing "Wash me" on Osama's camel

Letterman's Top April Fool's Pranks in Afghanistan #1:
Writing "Wash me" on Osama

All societies must be governed in some way or other.  The less they
may have stringent state government, the more they must have individual
self-government.  Men, in a word, must necessarily be controlled either
by a power within them, or by a power without them.     --Robert C. Winthrop

Dogs need to sniff the ground; it's how they keep abreast of current
events.  The ground is a giant dog newspaper, containing all kinds
of late-breaking dog news items, which, if they are especially urgent,
are often continued in the next yard.           --Dave Barry

Anybody who doesn't know what soap tastes like never washed a dog.
                                                --Franklin Jones

I wonder what goes through a dog's mind when he sees us
peeing in his water bowl.                       --Penny Ward Moser

A dog teaches a boy fidelity, perseverance,
and to turn around three times before lying down.      --Robert Benchley

No animal should ever jump up on the dining-room furniture unless
absolutely certain that he can hold his own in the conversation.
                                                --Fran Lebowitz

I wonder if other dogs think poodles are members
of a weird religious cult.                      --Rita Rudner

My dog is worried about the economy because Alpo is up to
$3.00 a can.  That's almost $21.00 in dog money.        --Joe Weinstein

Don't accept your dog's admiration as
conclusive evidence that you are wonderful.             --Ann Landers

Ever consider what dogs must think of us?  I mean, here we come back from
a grocery store with the most amazing haul: chicken, pork, half a cow.
They must think we're the greatest hunters on earth!    --Anne Tyler

If I have any beliefs about immortality, it is that certain dogs I have
known will go to heaven, and very, very few persons.    --James Thurber

Women and cats will do as they please, and men and dogs
should relax and get used to the idea.                  --Robert Heinlein

Politicians are interested in people.  Not that this is a good thing.
Fleas are interested in dogs.                           --P. J. O'Rourke

If it is believed that...  elementary schools will be better managed
by the governor and council, the commissioners of the literary fund or
any other general authority of the government than by the parents within
each ward, it is a belief against all experience.  Try the principle one
step further, and...  commit to the governor and council the management
of all our farms, our mills and merchants' stores...  No, my friend,
the way to have good and safe government is not to trust it all to one,
but to divide it among the many, distributing to every one exactly the
functions he is competent to.                           --Thomas Jefferson

Letterman's top signs your cat is trying to kill you #1:
 You find a .22 buried in the litter box

Letterman's top signs your cat is trying to kill you #2:
 "Fluffy" has been scratched into your will

Letterman's top signs your cat is trying to kill you #3:
 As he rubs against your leg, you feel the sting of a hypodermic needle

Letterman's top signs your cat is trying to kill you #4:
 The threatening meows on your answering machine

Letterman's top signs your cat is trying to kill you #5:
 He's on the episode of Springer titled "I Want My Owner Dead"

Letterman's top signs your cat is trying to kill you #6:
 He's been seen hanging out with the dog who's trying to kill you

Letterman's top signs your cat is trying to kill you #7:
 Newspaper calls to confirm obituary for next week, "Hated pet owner
 meets violent end"

Letterman's top signs your cat is trying to kill you #8:
 Top step of basement stairs is covered with slippery layer of Fancy Feast

Letterman's top signs your cat is trying to kill you #9:
 To tune of Meow Mix song sings, "Kill kill kill kill, kill kill kill kill"

Letterman's top signs your cat is trying to kill you #10:
 You overheard him on the phone with Robert Blake's cat

A strict observance of the written law is doubtless one of the high
duties of a good citizen, but it is not the highest.  The laws of
necessity, of self-preservation, of saving our country when in danger,
are of higher obligation.                              --Thomas Jefferson

Free Yorkshire Terrier.
8 Years Old.  Hateful Little Dog.                   --actual classified ad

Free Puppies: 1/2 Cocker Spaniel, 1/2 Sneaky Neighbor's Dog
                                                    --actual classified ad

Free Puppies: Part German Shepherd, Part Stupid Dog    --actual classified ad

German Shepherd 85 lbs, neutered, speaks German. Free.  --actual classified ad

Full sized mattress. 20 yr. warranty.
Like new, slight urine smell.                   --actual classified ad

For Sale By Owner: Complete set of Encyclopedia Britannica.  45 volumes.
Excellent condition.  $1,000.00 or best offer, no longer needed.
Got married last weekend, wife knows everything.     --actual classified ad

Faith is a cop-out.  It is intellectual bankruptcy.  If the only way you can
accept an assertion is by faith, then you are conceding that it can't be
taken on its own merits.      --Dan Barker, Former evangelist, author, critic

Against logic there is no armor like ignorance.        --Laurence J. Peter

Sin lies only in hurting other people unnecessarily.
All other "sins" are invented nonsense.               --Robert A. Heinlein

Your file was so big.
It might have been quite useful.
But now it is gone.             --Zen error messages in Haiku

The Web site you seek
Cannot be located, but
Countless more exist.           --Zen error messages in Haiku

Chaos reigns within.
Reflect, repent, and reboot.
Order shall return.             --Zen error messages in Haiku

Program aborting:
Close all that you have worked on.
You ask far too much.           --Zen error messages in Haiku

Windows NT crashed.
I am the Blue Screen of Death.
No one hears your screams.              --Zen error messages in Haiku

Yesterday it worked.
Today it is not working.
Windows is like that.           --Zen error messages in Haiku

First snow, then silence.
This thousand-dollar screen dies
So beautifully.                         --Zen error messages in Haiku

With searching comes loss
And the presence of absence:
"My Novel" not found.           --Zen error messages in Haiku

The Tao that is seen
Is not the true Tao, until
You bring fresh toner.          --Zen error messages in Haiku

Stay the patient course.
Of little worth is your ire.
The network is down.            --Zen error messages in Haiku

A crash reduces
Your expensive computer
To a simple stone.              --Zen error messages in Haiku

Three things are certain:
Death, taxes and lost data.
Only one has occurred.          --Zen error messages in Haiku

You step in the stream,
But the water has moved on.
This page is not here.          --Zen error messages in Haiku

Out of memory.
We wish to hold the whole sky,
But we never will.              --Zen error messages in Haiku

Having been erased,
The document you're seeking
Must now be retyped.            --Zen error messages in Haiku

Serious error.
All shortcuts have disappeared.
Screen.  Mind.  Both are blank.         --Zen error messages in Haiku

The contest, for ages, has been to rescue liberty
from the grasp of executive power.                   --Daniel Webster

Nowadays, for the sake of the advantage which is to be gained from
the public revenues and from office, men want to be always in office.
                                                        --Aristotle

Those who generate spam ought to suffer some appropriate punishment in
the hereafter - perhaps having a demon devoted to stuffing flaming pine
cones up their personal inbox.        --Associated Press article, 7/22/2002

Bodacious ta-tas
My kingdom for her outfit
Hail, sweater kittens!               --haiku for Britney Spears

Men are like a fine wine.  They start out as grapes and it's up to women
to stomp the sh*t out of them until they turn into something acceptable
to have with dinner.

Love is grand; divorce is several hundred grand.

When it appears that you have killed the monster, never check
to see if it's really dead.             --how to survive a horror movie

Never read a book on demon-summoning aloud.  Even as a joke.
                                        --how to survive a horror movie

Do not search the basement, especially if the power has just gone out.
                                        --how to survive a horror movie

Never accept invitations from strangers, especially individuals
who inexplicably live in isolated areas and have no contact
with society.                          --how to survive a horror movie

As a general rule, don't solve puzzles that open portals to Hell.
                                        --how to survive a horror movie

If you're searching for the cause of a ghastly noise and find out that it's
not the cat, leave the area immediately.    --how to survive a horror movie

If appliances start operating by themselves, move out.
                                        --how to survive a horror movie

Do not take anything from the dead.     --how to survive a horror movie

If you find a town which is deserted,
it's probably for a reason.  Take the hint.  --how to survive a horror movie

Don't fool with recombinant DNA technology unless you're *really*
sure you know what you're doing.             --how to survive a horror movie

Avoid certain geographical locations, including the following: Amityville,
Elm Street, Transylvania, Nilbog, remote jungles in Central America, upscale
subdivisions built on old cemetaries, the Bermuda Triangle, or any small
town in Maine.                               --how to survive a horror movie

If you run out of gas at night on a lonely road, do NOT go to the nearby
deserted-looking house to phone for help.    --how to survive a horror movie

Beware of strangers bearing tools such as chainsaws, staple guns, hedge
trimmers, electric carving knives, combines, lawnmowers, butane torches,
soldering irons, band saws, or any device made from deceased companions.
                                            --how to survive a horror movie

If you hear a voice telling you to get out, then get out.
                                        --how to survive a horror movie

1971:  skinny dipping
2021:  chunky dunking

1971:  Long hair
2021:  Longing for hair

1971:  The perfect high
2021:  The perfect high yield mutual fund

1971:  KEG
2021:  EKG

1971:  Acid rock
2021:  Acid reflux

1971:  Moving to California because it's cool
2021:  Moving to California because it's warm

1971:  Growing pot
2021:  Growing pot belly

1971:  Trying to look like Marlon Brando or Liz Taylor
2021:  Trying NOT to look like Marlon Brando or Liz Taylor

1971:  Seeds and stems
2021:  Roughage

1971:  Popping pills, smoking joints
2021:  Popping joints

1971:  Killer weed
2021:  Weed killer

1971:  Hoping for a BMW
2021:  Hoping for a BM

1971:  The Grateful Dead
2021:  Dr. Kevorkian

1971:  Going to a new, hip joint
2021:  Receiving a new hip joint

1971:  Rolling Stones
2021:  Kidney Stones

1971:  Disco
2021:  Costco

1971:  Parents begging you to get your hair cut
2021:  Children begging you to get their heads shaved

1971:  Taking acid
2021:  Taking antacid

1971:  Passing the drivers' test
2021:  Passing the vision test

1971:  Whatever
2021:  Depends

BLAME STORMING: Sitting around in a group, discussing why a deadline was
missed or a project failed, and who was responsible.

SEAGULL MANAGER: A manager who flies in, makes a lot of noise, craps on
everything, and then leaves.

ASSMOSIS: The process by which some people seem to absorb success and
advancement by kissing up to the boss rather than working hard.

SALMON DAY: The experience of spending an entire day swimming upstream only
to get screwed and die in the end.

CUBE FARM: An office filled with cubicles.

PRAIRIE DOGGING: When someone yells or drops something loudly in a cube farm,
and people's heads pop up over the walls to see what's going on.

MOUSE POTATO: The on-line, wired generation's answer to the couch potato.

SITCOMs: Single Income, Two Children, Oppressive Mortgage.  What yuppies turn
into when they have children and one of them stops working to stay home with
the kids.

STRESS PUPPY: A person who seems to thrive on being stressed out and whiny.

SWIPEOUT: An ATM or credit card that has been rendered useless because the
magnetic strip is worn away from extensive use.

XEROX SUBSIDY: Euphemism for swiping free photocopies from one's workplace.

IRRITAINMENT: Annoying entertainment and media spectacles that you can't
stop watching.  The O.J. trials were a prime example.

PERCUSSIVE MAINTENANCE: The fine art of whacking the crap out of an electronic
device to get it to work again.

ADMINISPHERE: The rarefied organizational layers beginning just above the
rank and file.  Decisions that fall from the adminisphere are often profoundly
nappropriate or irrelevant to the problems they were designed to solve.

404: Someone who's clueless.  From the World Wide Web error message
"404 Not Found," meaning that the requested document could not be located.

GENERICA: Features of the American landscape that are exactly the same no
matter where one is, such as fast food joints, strip malls, and subdivisions.

OHNOSECOND: That minuscule fraction of time in which you realize that you've
just made a BIG mistake.

WOOFYS: Well Off Older Folks.

CROP DUSTING: Surreptitiously farting while passing through a cube farm,
then enjoying the sounds of dismay and disgust.

The reason computer chips are so small is that computers don't eat much.

I'm curious; where does this statistic come from?  Does its home, perchance,
ever see sunlight?         --Jason Williams <jason+usenet@compsoc.man.ac.uk>

If you have ten thousand regulations you destroy all respect for the law.
                                                        --Winston Churchill

If life deals you lemons, why not go kill someone with the lemons, maybe by
shoving them down his throat.                --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

I wish outer space guys would conquer the Earth and make people their pets,
because I'd like to have one of those little beds with my name on it.
                                             --Deep Thoughts, by Jack Handy

Television is to news as bumper stickers are to philosophy.  --Richard Nixon

Bozone (n.) The substance surrounding stupid people that stops bright ideas
from penetrating.     --Reader's reply to Washington Post Style Invitational

Cashtration (n.): The act of buying a house, which renders the subject
financially impotent for an indefinite period.
                --Reader's reply to Washington Post Style Invitational

Decaflon (n.): The grueling event of getting through the day consuming only
things that are good for you.
                --Reader's reply to Washington Post Style Invitational

Arachnoleptic fit (n.): The frantic dance performed just after you've
accidentally walked through a spider web.
                --Reader's reply to Washington Post Style Invitational

Beelzebug (n.): Satan in the form of a mosquito that gets into your bedroom
at 3 in the morning and cannot be cast out.
                --Reader's reply to Washington Post Style Invitational

Caterpallor (n.): The color you turn after finding half a grub in the fruit
you're eating.      --Reader's reply to Washington Post Style Invitational

The human race divides politically into those who want people to be controlled
and those who have no such desire.  The former are idealists acting from
highest motives for the greatest good of the greatest number.  The latter
are surly curmudgeons, suspicious and lacking in altruism.  But they are
more comfortable neighbors than the other sort.            --Robert Heinlein

ZIPLOC BAGS - male because they hold everything in, but you can always
see right through them.             --from the "What gender are they?" list

SWISS ARMY KNIFE - male, because even though it appears useful for a wide
variety of work, it spends most of its time just opening bottles.
                                --from the "What gender are they?" list

KIDNEYS - female, because they always go to the bathroom in pairs.
                                --from the "What gender are they?" list

SHOE - male, because it's usually unpolished, with its tongue hanging out.
                                --from the "What gender are they?" list

COPIER - female, because once turned off, it takes a while to warm up.
                                --from the "What gender are they?" list

TIRE - male, because it goes bald and is often over-inflated.
                                --from the "What gender are they?" list

HOT AIR BALLOON - male, because to get it to go anywhere you have to light
a fire under it.  And, of course, there's the hot air part.
                                --from the "What gender are they?" list

SPONGES - female, because they're soft and squeezable and retain water.
                                --from the "What gender are they?" list

WEB PAGE - female, because it's always getting hit on.
                                --from the "What gender are they?" list

SUBWAY - male, because it uses the same old lines to pick people up.
                                --from the "What gender are they?" list

HOURGLASS - female, because over time, the weight shifts to the bottom.
                                --from the "What gender are they?" list

HAMMER - male, because it hasn't evolved much over the last 5,000 years,
but it's handy to have around.    --from the "What gender are they?" list

REMOTE CONTROL - female, because it gives a man pleasure, he'd be lost
without it, and while he doesn't always know the right buttons to push,
he keeps trying.                   --from the "What gender are they?" list

Whenever the legislators endeavor to take away and destroy the property of
the people, or to reduce them to slavery under arbitrary power, they put
themselves into a state of war with the people, who are thereupon absolved
from any further obedience.
                   --John Locke, 2nd Treatise on Government Ch. 19 par. 222

An honest man can feel no pleasure in the exercise
of power over his fellow citizens.                    --Thomas Jefferson

"Violence never solves problems."  This is manifestly not true.
Violence helped to end the regimes of Adolf Hitler and Benito Mussolini.
Violence proved equally effective against the Taliban.     --Dinesh D'Souza

"But you can't impose democracy at the point of a bayonet."  This is another
liberal shibboleth.  In reality, at the end of World War II, America imposed
democracy at the point of a bayonet on Japan and Germany, and it has proved
a resounding success in both countries.  The problem with liberals is that
they never give bayonets a chance.                          --Dinesh D'Souza

Lately, the only thing keeping me from becoming a serial killer
is my distaste for manual labor.                             --Dilbert

I told my doctor I got all the exercise I needed being a pallbearer for all
my friends who run and do exercises.                     --Winston Churchill

If you get away from the debt and fraud, this is a tremendous company
with tremendous assets.             --WorldCom CEO John Sidgmore, Oct 2002

After spending the last 24 hours sorting through more than a billion
"Returned Undeliverable" messages, I've come to the conclusion that nobody
stays on AOL past that free trial period.  --from Top-5 mailing list moderator

The Rolling Stones: "You Can't Always Pee When You Want"
                                    --Re-released hits for an aging audience

Paul Simon: "Fifty Ways to Lose Your Liver"
                                    --Re-released hits for an aging audience

Carly Simon: "You're So Varicose Vein"
                                    --Re-released hits for an aging audience

The Bee Gees: "How Can You Mend a Broken Hip?"
                                    --Re-released hits for an aging audience

Roberta Flack: "The First Time Ever I Forgot Your Face"
                                    --Re-released hits for an aging audience

Johnny Nash: "I Can't See Clearly Now"
                                    --Re-released hits for an aging audience

The Temptations: "Papa's Got a Kidney Stone"
                                    --Re-released hits for an aging audience

Nancy Sinatra: "These Boots Give Me Arthritis"
                                    --Re-released hits for an aging audience

ABBA: "Denture Queen"               --Re-released hits for an aging audience

Leo Sayer: "You Make Me Feel Like Napping"
                                    --Re-released hits for an aging audience

Commodores: "Once, Twice, Three Trips to the Bathroom"
                                    --Re-released hits for an aging audience

Procol Harem: "A Whiter Shade of Hair"
                                    --Re-released hits for an aging audience

The Beatles: "I Get By with a Little Help From Depends"
                                    --Re-released hits for an aging audience

Credence Clearwater Revival: "Bad Prune a-Rising"
                                    --Re-released hits for an aging audience

Marvin Gaye: "I Heard It Through the Grape Nuts"
                                    --Re-released hits for an aging audience

The Who: "Talkin' 'Bout My Medication"
                                    --Re-released hits for an aging audience

Fairy tales do not tell children that monsters exist.  Children already
know monsters exist.  Fairy tales tell children the monsters can be killed.
                                            --G.K. Chesterton, paraphrased

Once "our people" get themselves into a position to make policy,
they cease being "our people".                         --M. Stanton Evans

A little government and a little luck are necessary in life,
but only a fool trusts either of them.                    --P.J. O'Rourke

I do not believe in a fate that falls on men however they act; but
I do believe in a fate that falls on them unless they act.  --G.K. Chesterton

A man's most valuable trait is a judicious sense of what not to believe.
                                                                --Euripides

It requires as much caution to tell the truth as to conceal it.
                                                        --Baltasar Gracian

Duty is not collective, it is personal.  Let every individual make known
his determination to support law and order.  That duty is supreme.
                                                        --Calvin Coolidge

There is no nation so poor that it cannot afford free speech, but there are
few elites which will put up with the bother of it.     --Daniel P. Moynihan

Those who have given themselves the most concern about the happiness of
peoples have made their neighbors very miserable.           --Anatole France

Most of the energy of political work is devoted to correcting the
effects of mismanagement of government.                  --Milton Friedman

Democrats raise taxes.  It's their way of paying for programs that buy
votes from people who don't pay high taxes.                --Pete Waldmeir

I have never in my life seen a faster and bigger 180 on the death penalty
than among white liberals in Virginia, Maryland, and the DC area.
                                                        --Rush Limbaugh

The Brain: We're going to a place where the sun never sets, the size of
           your wallet matters, and actors and actresses slave all day!
    Pinky: We're going to Denny's?

He who praises you for what you lack wishes to take from you what you have.
                                                        --Don Juan Manuel

When a man says it's a silly, childish game, it's probably
something his wife can beat him at.                       --Epperson's law

Never go to a doctor whose office plants have died.
                                                --Bombeck's Rule of Medicine

What is wanted is not the will to believe, but the will to find out,
which is the exact opposite.  --Bertrand Russell, "Skeptical Essays", 1928

You don't have to love yourself, you can just hate a lot of other people
and then grade yourself on a curve.

Radioactive cats have 18 half-lives.

Rejected James Bond movie title #1: Brownfinger

Rejected James Bond movie title #2: From Arkansas With Love

Rejected James Bond movie title #3: Rubies Are For A Little While

Rejected James Bond movie title #4: Tomorrow Never Comes

Rejected James Bond movie title #5: Moneypenny Strikes Back

Rejected James Bond movie title #6:
The Spy Who Loved Me Then Left Me, That Freaking Bastard

Rejected James Bond movie title #7:
The Action Packed Movie Full Of Explosions And STDs

Rejected James Bond movie title #8: James Bond And The Chamber Of Secrets

Rejected James Bond movie title #9: GoldLargeIntestine

Rejected James Bond movie title #10: Dr. yes, Yes, OH GOD YES

Rejected James Bond movie title #11:
Chicken Soup For The Undercover Agent's Soul

Rejected James Bond movie title #12: Octoanus

Rejected James Bond movie title #13: The Man With The Golden Phallus

Rejected James Bond movie title #14: The Spy Who Loved My Wife! TWICE!

Rejected James Bond movie title #15: Only Say Never Again A Few Times

Rejected James Bond movie title #16: Silverthumb

Rejected James Bond movie title #17: Tomorrow Comes All Too Soon

Rejected James Bond movie title #18: Dude, We're Getting A Dell!

Rejected James Bond movie title #19: Casino Proletariat

Rejected James Bond movie title #20: The World Spins Only Once Per Day

Rejected James Bond movie title #21: You Only Die One More Time

Rejected James Bond movie title #22: The Spy Who Cried When He Got A Boo-Boo

Rejected James Bond movie title #23: Don't Die Another Day, Please Die Now

Top Things We Want To Hear Yoda Say In The Next "Star Wars" Movie #1:
"Mmmm, your daddy I am... yes."

Top Things We Want To Hear Yoda Say In The Next "Star Wars" Movie #2:
"Making it up as he goes along, Lucas is."

Top Things We Want To Hear Yoda Say In The Next "Star Wars" Movie #3:
"Die you will, Jar Jar.  You have unbalanced the Force."

Top Things We Want To Hear Yoda Say In The Next "Star Wars" Movie #4:
"Mmm...DUDE, Getting a DELL, you are..."

Top Things We Want To Hear Yoda Say In The Next "Star Wars" Movie #5:
"Wrinkled it may be, but powerful in the force it is."

Top Things We Want To Hear Yoda Say In The Next "Star Wars" Movie #6:
"Intestine large is mine, hmm?"

Top Things We Want To Hear Yoda Say In The Next "Star Wars" Movie #7:
"A sexy beast be I, hmm?"

Top Things We Want To Hear Yoda Say In The Next "Star Wars" Movie #8:
"Anakin, your father's roommate's drinking buddy am I."

Top Things We Want To Hear Yoda Say In The Next "Star Wars" Movie #9:
"A tighter leash on your padawan you must keep, Obi Wan."

Top Things We Want To Hear Yoda Say In The Next "Star Wars" Movie #10:
"Kick your ass, I will."

Top Things We Want To Hear Yoda Say In The Next "Star Wars" Movie #11:
"Me love you long time, Jedi."

Top Things We Want To Hear Yoda Say In The Next "Star Wars" Movie #12:
"The smack down upon you, will from me come."

Top Things We Want To Hear Yoda Say In The Next "Star Wars" Movie #13:
"Anakin, to complete your training, kill Jar Jar and do Amidala you must."

The States can best govern our home concerns and the general government our
foreign ones.  I wish, therefore...never to see all offices transferred to
Washington, where, further withdrawn from the eyes of the people, they may
more secretly be bought and sold at market.             --Thomas Jefferson

It is customary in democratic countries to deplore expenditures on armament
as conflicting with the requirements of the social services.  There is a
tendency to forget that the most important social service that a government
can do for its people is to keep them alive and free.
                                        --RAF Air Marshall Sir John Slessor

Inside every older person is a younger person
wondering what the hell happened.                --Cora Harvey Armstrong

I refuse to think of them as chin hairs.
I think of them as stray eyebrows.           --Janette Barber

Whoever thought up the word Mammogram?  Every time I hear it, I think I'm
supposed to put my breast in an envelope and send it to someone.  --Jan King

A few weeks after my surgery, I went out to play catch with my golden
retriever.  When I bent over to pick up the ball, my prosthesis fell out.
The dog snatched it, and I found myself chasing him down the road yelling
"Hey, come back here with my breast!"                      --Linda Ellerbee

You know the hardest thing about having cerebral palsy and being a woman?
It's plucking your eyebrows.  That's how I originally got pierced ears.
                                                        --Geri Jewell

A male gynecologist is like an auto mechanic who never owned a car.
                                                        --Carrie Snow

My second favorite household chore is ironing.  My first being,
hitting my head on the top bunk bed until I faint.        --Erma Bombeck

The phrase "working mother" is redundant.                 --Jane Sellman

If you can't be a good example,
then you'll just have to be a horrible warning.          --Catherine Aird

When I was young, I was put in a school for retarded kids for two years
before they realized I actually had a hearing loss.  And they called ME slow!
                                                           --Kathy Buckley

I'm not offended by all the dumb blonde jokes because I know I'm not dumb.
I'm also not blonde.                                       --Dolly Parton

If high heels were so wonderful, men would still be wearing them.
                                                        --Sue Grafton

I think, therefore I'm single.                         --Lizz Winstead

Behind every successful man is a surprised woman.      --Maryon Pearson

In politics, if you want anything said, ask a man.
If you want anything done, ask a woman.           --Margaret Thatcher

I never married, because there was no need.  I have three pets at home which
answer the same purpose as a husband.  I have a dog that growls every morning,
a parrot that swears all afternoon, and a cat that comes home late every night.
                                                              --Marie Corelli

If men can run the world, why can't they stop wearing neckties?
How intelligent is it to start the day by tying a noose around your neck?
                                                        --Linda Ellerbee

A universal peace, it is to be feared, is in the catalogue of events,
which will never exist but in the imaginations of visionary philosophers,
or in the breasts of benevolent enthusiasts.             --James Madison

Entry #10 in Bill Gates's diary: Steve Jobs started work today.  The silverware
looks great, but he doesn't do windows -- yet.

Entry #9 in Bill Gates's diary: The baby cries constantly.  Maybe I'll buy
Fisher-Price.

Entry #8 in Bill Gates's diary: Bought my first Macintosh.  It's sooooo cute!

Entry #7 in Bill Gates's diary: Good day; found over 15 bucks' worth of
soda cans in the trash bins outside Microsoft headquarters.

Entry #6 in Bill Gates's diary: Bad day; Ellison sent back the heads of two of
the three hitmen I hired, along with a note saying he ate the third one whole.

Entry #5 in Bill Gates's diary: Still ahead of Murdoch and Eisner.  Yes!

Entry #4 in Bill Gates's diary: Note to self: Next time my wife says we need
to buy china, she means dishes.

Entry #3 in Bill Gates's diary: Invited entire tech-support department to
play golf.  Brought Melissa to complete the foursome.

Entry #2 in Bill Gates's diary: Ran into Demi and Ashton.  Upped my offer
to a billion dollars.

Entry #1 in Bill Gates's diary: Seventh day: rested.

I almost had a psychic girlfriend but she left me before we met.
                                                        --Steven Wright

I'd kill for a Nobel Peace Prize.                     --Steven Wright

A raccoon tangled with a 23,000 volt line today.  The results blacked
out 1400 homes and, of course, one raccoon.            --Steel City News

Wouldn't it be better if you could schedule this event for the weekend or
the school holidays so that more people could get up here to see it?
                --Actual comment from tourist watching a total eclipse
                  in the outback region of South Australia, 4 Dec 2002

I had no shoes and I pitied myself.  Then I met a man
who had no feet, so I took his shoes.                         --Dave Barry

I would therefore like to posit that computing's central challenge, viz. "How
not to make a mess of it," has /not/ been met.  --Edsger Dijkstra, 1930-2002

You may have heard that a dean is to faculty as a hydrant is to a dog.
                                                        --Alfred Kahn

There is nothing wrong with Southern California
that a rise in the ocean level wouldn't cure.           --Ross MacDonald

Faith: When I'm fighting, it's like the whole world goes away.  I only
       know one thing: that I'm gonna win, and they're gonna lose.  I like
       that feeling.
Buffy: Well, sure beats that 'dead' feeling you get when they
       win and you lose.                                         --BtVS

The cry has been that when war is declared, all opposition should therefore
be hushed.  A sentiment more unworthy of a free country could hardly be
propagated.  If the doctrine be admitted, rulers have only to declare war
and they are screened at once from scrutiny... In war, then, as in peace,
assert the freedom of speech and of the press.  Cling to this as the bulwark
of all our rights and privileges.                  --William Ellery Channing

I know who I am.  No one else knows who I am.  If I was a giraffe, and
someone said I was a snake, I'd think, no, actually I'm a giraffe.
         --Richard Gere, given the "Foot in Mouth" award by
           Britain's Plain English Campaign

Monica Lewinsky turned 28 this week.  It seems like only yesterday she was
crawling around the White House on her hands and knees.
                                --anonymous, week of Monday, 27 Jan 2003

His "analysis" of the economy is as about as perceptive as a drunk falling
for a transvestite who's forgotten to shave.  --"Daily Reckoning", 3 Feb 2003

"Discharge of a nuclear weapon shall be deemed a warlike act,
even if accidental."              --Taken from a homeowners insurance policy

I took a course in speed reading and was able to read
"War and Peace" in twenty minutes.  It's about Russia.    --Woody Allen

Letterman's Top 10 Drawbacks to "Working in a Cubicle" #10:
Being told to "Think Outside The Box" when you're in a damn box all day long.

Letterman's Top 10 Drawbacks to "Working in a Cubicle" #9:
Not being able to check e-mail attachments without turning around to
see who's behind you.

Letterman's Top 10 Drawbacks to "Working in a Cubicle" #8:
Fabric cubicle walls do not offer much protection from any kind of gunfire.

Letterman's Top 10 Drawbacks to "Working in a Cubicle" #7:
That nagging feeling that if you press the right button, you'll get a
piece of cheese.

Letterman's Top 10 Drawbacks to "Working in a Cubicle" #6:
Lack of roof rafters for the noose.

Letterman's Top 10 Drawbacks to "Working in a Cubicle" #5:
The walls are too close together for the hammock to work right.

Letterman's Top 10 Drawbacks to "Working in a Cubicle" #4:
23 power cords, 1 outlet.

Letterman's Top 10 Drawbacks to "Working in a Cubicle" #3:
Prison cells are not only bigger, they also have beds.

Letterman's Top 10 Drawbacks to "Working in a Cubicle" #2:
When tours come through, they don't even bother to throw peanuts at you.

Letterman's Top 10 Drawbacks to "Working in a Cubicle" #1:
You can't slam the door when you quit and walk out.

Crack Found on Governor's Daughter.  --actual news headline, 2002

Is There a Ring of Debris around Uranus?  --actual news headline, 2002

Miners Refuse to Work after Death.  --actual news headline, 2002

New Study of Obesity Looks for Larger Test Group.  --actual news headline, 2002

Teacher Strikes Idle Kids.  --actual news headline, 2002

From the moment I picked your book up until I put it down I was convulsed
with laughter.  Some day I intend reading it.
                                    --Groucho Marx, "The Book of Insults"

Q: How many French troops does it take to defend Paris?
A: No one knows - it's never been tried.

Q: What would going to war against Iraq without help from France be like?
A: World War II.

"And Abraham Lincoln was short."
    --response by Defense Sec'y Donald Rumsfeld when asked to respond to
      Saddam Hussein's claim that Iraq has no ties with al-Qa'ida

Today's network excuse: excessive collisions & not enough packet ambulances
                                                         --Geoff Lane

Evolution doesn't take prisoners.

A gun doesn't smoke till it's fired.  And then it'll be too late.
                                                        --Paul Greenberg

There is a rank due to the United States, among nations, which will be
withheld, if not absolutely lost, by the reputation of weakness.  If we desire
to avoid insult, we must be able to repel it; if we desire to secure peace,
one of the most powerful instruments of our rising prosperity, it must be
known that we are at all times ready for war.             --George Washington

Find Amelia Earhart yet?  --actual comment from patient undergoing colonoscopy

Can you hear me NOW?    --actual comment from patient undergoing colonoscopy

Are we there yet?  Are we there yet?  Are we there yet?
                --actual comment from patient undergoing colonoscopy

You know, in Arkansas, we're now legally married.
                --actual comment from patient undergoing colonoscopy

Any sign of the trapped miners, Chief?
                --actual comment from patient undergoing colonoscopy

You put your left hand in, you take your left hand out.  You do the
HokeyPokey....       --actual comment from patient undergoing colonoscopy

Hey!  Now I know how a Muppet feels!
                --actual comment from patient undergoing colonoscopy

If your hand doesn't fit, you must acquit!
                --actual comment from patient undergoing colonoscopy

Hey, Doc, let me know if you find my dignity.
                --actual comment from patient undergoing colonoscopy

You used to be an executive at Enron, didn't you?
                --actual comment from patient undergoing colonoscopy

Could you write me a note for my wife, saying that my head is not,
in fact, up there?      --actual comment from patient undergoing colonoscopy

Although golf was originally restricted to wealthy, overweight Protestants,
today it's open to anybody who owns hideous clothing.         --Dave Barry

Beer.  Now there's a temporary solution.           --Homer Simpson

Going to war without France is like going duck hunting
without your accordion.        --Donald Rumsfeld, US Secretary of Defense

As far as I'm concerned, war always means failure.
                                --Jacques Chirac, President of France
As far as France is concerned, you're right.   --Rush Limbaugh

They've taken their own precautions against al-Qa'ida.  To prepare for
an attack, each Frenchman is urged to keep duct tape, a white flag, and a
three-day supply of mistresses in the house.              --Argus Hamilton

The French will only agree to go to war when we've proven
we've found truffles in Iraq.                       --Dennis Miller

What do you expect from a culture and a nation that exerted more of its
national will fighting against DisneyWorld and Big Macs than the Nazis?
                                        -- Dennis Miller

Q. Why are there so many tree-lined boulevards in France?
A. Germans like to march in the shade.

I don't know why people are surprised the French don't want to help us get
Saddam out of Iraq.  After all, France wouldn't help us get the Germans
out of France.                                                   --Jay Leno

Q.  What did the mayor of Paris say to the
    German Army as they entered the city in WWII?
A.  Table for 100,000, m'sieur?

The last time the French asked for 'more proof',
it came marching into Paris under a German flag.      --David Letterman

Do you know it only took Germany three days to conquer France in WWII?
And that's because it was raining.       --John Xereas, Manager, DC Improv

'Tis time to fear when tyrants seem to kiss.         --William Shakespeare

Do not trust governments more than governments trust their own people.
                                                        --Andrei Sakharov

There is no safety for honest men except by
believing all possible evil of evil men.              --Edmund Burke

One ought never to turn one's back on a threatened danger and try to run
away from it.  If you do that, you will double the danger.  But if you meet
it promptly and without flinching, you will reduce the danger by half.
                                                         --Winston Churchill

When you stop a dictator there are always risks.
But there are greater risks in not stopping a dictator.  --Margaret Thatcher

Let us be grateful to the French for what they have done for us, but let us
think for ourselves.  And, if need be, let us act for ourselves.
                                        --John Jay to Benjamin Franklin

France was long a despotism tempered by epigrams.         --Thomas Carlyle

The Supreme Court is divided almost in half on the decisions.  Talk about
an international court.  How would we ever agree with a lot of foreigners
when we can't even agree among our own judges?              --Will Rogers

Timid men prefer the calm of despotism to the tempestuous sea of liberty.
                                                        --Thomas Jefferson

A just fear of an imminent danger, though there be no blow given,
is a lawful cause of war.                              --Sir Francis Bacon

France has neither winter nor summer nor morals.
Apart from these drawbacks it is a fine country.  --Mark Twain

I just love the French, they taste like chicken.  --Hannibal Lecter

The only time France wants us to go to war is when the German Army is
sitting in Paris sipping coffee.                       --Regis Philbin

You know, the French remind me a little bit of an aging 1040s actress who
was still trying to dine out on her looks but doesn't have the face for it.
                                                    --Senator John McCain

Replacement for the French national anthem #1: "Runaway", Del Shannon

Replacement for the French national anthem #4: "Running Scared", Roy Orbison

Replacement for the French national anthem #6: "Surrender", Elvis Presley

Replacement for the French national anthem #7: "Live and Let Die", Wings

Q: How many Frenchmen does it take to change a light bulb?
A: One.  He holds the bulb and all of Europe revolves around him.

The power cowardliness prefers to conspire with is time, because neither
time nor cowardliness finds that there is any reason to hurry.
                                                --Soren Kierkegaard

Mercy but murders, pardoning those that kill.   --William Shakespeare

To insist on strength is not war-mongering.  It is peace-mongering.
                                                --Barry Goldwater

Victory will never be found by taking the path of least resistance.
                                                --Winston Churchill

A brave man is a man who dares to look the Devil in the face and tell him
he is a Devil.                                       --James A. Garfield

Don't expect to build up the weak by pulling down the strong.
                                                --Calvin Coolidge

I knew it!  I knew it!  Well, not in the sense of having the slightest idea,
but I knew there was something I didn't know.
                                        --Willow, "Buffy the Vampire Slayer"

You know, some days even my lucky rocket ship underpants don't help.
                                        --Calvin of "Calvin & Hobbes"

May God bless all of our friends.  And may God also bless our enemies,
and turn their hearts so that they will become our friends.  And if he
won't turn their hearts, may he turn their ankles, so we shall know them
by their limping.                                             --Irish toast

It's always darkest before the dawn, so if you're going to steal the
neighbor's newspaper, that's the time to do it.

History does not long entrust the care of freedom to the weak or the timid.
                                     --General Dwight D. Eisenhower

Only someone completely distrustful of all government would be opposed to
what we are doing with surveillance cameras.
                        --NYC Police Commissioner Howard Safir, 27 July 1999

Magnificent promises are always to be suspected.          --Theodore Parker

Individual rights are not subject to a public vote; a majority has no
right to vote away the rights of a minority; the political function of
rights is precisely to protect minorities from oppression by majorities
(and the smallest minority on earth is the individual).         --Ayn Rand

The most fundamental fact about the ideas of the political left is that
they do not work.  Therefore we should not be surprised to find the left
concentrated in institutions where ideas do not have to work in order
to survive.                                                 --Thomas Sowell

The consequences of being at war, and therefore in danger, makes the
handing-over of all power to a small caste seem the natural, unavoidable
condition of survival.                                 --George Orwell, 1984

Republican Guard
Accustomed to all power
Now just a pink mist                   --Iraqi haiku

"I now inform you that you are too far from reality."
     --Baghdad Bob's last known remark to John Burns of NY Times, 9 Apr 2003

"There are no American infidels in Baghdad.  Never!"
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #1

"My feelings - as usual - we will slaughter them all."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #2

"Our initial assessment is that they will all die."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #3

"I blame Al-Jazeera - they are marketing for the Americans!"
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #4

"God will roast their stomachs in hell at the hands of Iraqis."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #5

"They're coming to surrender or be burned in their tanks."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #6

"No I am not scared, and neither should you be!"
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #7

"Be assured.  Baghdad is safe, protected."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #8

"Who are in control, they are not in control of anything - they don't
even control themselves!"    --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #9

"We are not afraid of the Americans.  Allah has condemned them.  They are
stupid.  They are stupid" (dramatic pause) "and they are condemned."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #10

"The Americans, they always depend on a method what I call ...  stupid,
silly.  All I ask is check yourself.  Do not in fact repeat their lies."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #11

"I can say, and I am responsible for what I am saying, that they have
started to commit suicide under the walls of Baghdad.  We will encourage
them to commit more suicides quickly."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #12

"I can assure you that those villains will recognize, will discover
in appropriate time in the future how stupid they are and how they are
pretending things which have never taken place."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #13

"We have destroyed 2 tanks, fighter planes, 2 helicopters and their shovels -
We have driven them back."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #14

"The authority of the civil defense ...  issued a warning to the civilian
population not to pick up any of those pencils because they are booby traps."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #15

"We have them surrounded in their tanks."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #16

"The American press is all about lies!  All they tell is lies, lies
and more lies!"              --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #17

"Because we will behead you all."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #18

"Let the American infidels bask in their illusion."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #19

"I triple guarantee you, there are no American soldiers in Baghdad."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #20

Britain "is not worth an old shoe."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #21

"We have given them a sour taste."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #22

Of US troops: "They are most welcome.  We will butcher them."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #23

"We will welcome them with bullets and shoes."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #24

"We are in control.  They are in a state of hysteria.  Losers, they think
that by killing civilians and trying to distort the feelings of the people
they will win.  I think they will not win, those bastards."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #25

"We have placed them in a quagmire from which they can never emerge
except dead."                --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #26

"Washington has thrown their soldiers on the fire."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #27

"I speak better English than this villain Bush."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #28

"These cowards have no morals.  They have no shame about lying."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #29

"They're not even [within] 100 miles [of Baghdad].  They are not in
any place.  They hold no place in Iraq."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #30

"We will kill them all........most of them."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #31

"They are like a snake and we are going to cut it in pieces."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #32

"They do not even have control over themselves!  Do not believe them!"
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #33

"I would like to clarify a simple fact here: How can you lay siege to a
whole country?  Who is really under siege now?  Baghdad cannot be besieged.
Al-Nasiriyah cannot be besieged.  Basra cannot be besieged."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #34

"They are trapped in Umm Qasr.  They are trapped near Basra.  They are
trapped near Nasiriyah.  They are trapped near Najaf.  They are trapped
everywhere."                 --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #35

Called Americans and Brits "Tarateer", which (in Iraqi slang) means a guy
full of farts (hot air)      --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #36

"They are nowhere near the airport... they are lost in the desert...
they can not read a compass... they are retarded."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #37

"They tried to bring a small number of tanks and personnel carriers in
through al-Durah but they were surrounded and most of their infidels had
their throats cut."          --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #38

"Our estimates are that none of them will come out alive unless they
surrender to us quickly."    --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #39

"We made them drink poison last night and Saddam Hussein's soldiers and
his great forces gave the Americans a lesson which will not be forgotten
by history.  Truly."         --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #40

"We're giving them a real lesson today.  Heavy doesn't accurately describe
the level of casualties we have inflicted."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #41

"Their infidels are committing suicide by the hundreds on the gates
of Baghdad.  Be assured, Baghdad is safe, protected."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #42

"These images are not the suburbs of Baghdad.  From what I glimpsed,
these gardens with rows of palm trees on the side, which you saw in the
images, are located in the south of Abu Ghreib, where we have surrounded
the Americans and British."  --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #43

"The situation is excellent, they are going to try to approach
Baghdad... and I believe their grave will be there."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #44

"We have retaken the airport.  There are NO Americans there.  I will
take you there and show you.  IN ONE HOUR!"
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #45

"They will be burnt.  We are going to tackle them."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #46

"We blocked them inside the city.  Their rear is blocked."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #47

"Desperate Americans."       --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #48

"Today we slaughtered them in the airport.  They are out of Saddam
International Airport.  The force that was in the airport, this force
was destroyed."              --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #49

"We went into the airport and crushed them, we cleaned the WHOOOLE place out,
they were slaughtered."      --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #50

"Yes, the American troops have advanced further.  This will only make it
easier for us to defeat them."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #51

"Their casualties and bodies are many."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #52

(On surrenders) "Those are not Iraqi soldiers at all.  Where did they
bring them from?"            --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #53

"You can go and visit those places.  Nothing there, nothing at all.
There are Iraqi checkpoints.  Everything is okay."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #54

"The fact is that as soon as they reach Baghdad gates, we will besiege them
and slaughter them....Wherever they go they will find themselves encircled."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #55

"They (the U.S.) are deceiving their soldiers and their officers that
aggressing against Iraq and invading Iraq will be like a picnic.  This is
a very stupid lie they are telling their soldiers, what they are facing
is a definite death."        --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #56

"Indeed, concerning the fighting waged by the heroes of the Arab Socialist
Baath Party yesterday, one amazing thing really is the cowardice of the
American soldiers.  We had not anticipated this."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #57

"We will slaughter them, Bush Jr. and his international gang of bastards!"
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #58

"The shock has backfired on them.  They are shocked because of what they
have seen.  No one received them with roses.  They were received with bombs,
shoes and bullets."          --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #59

"It has been rumored that we have fired scud missiles into Kuwait.  I am
here now to tell you, we do not have any scud missiles and I don't know
why they were fired into Kuwait."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #60

"There are no Iraqis disguising themselves."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #61

"They are retreating on all fronts.  Their military effort is a subject
of laughter throughout the world."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #62

About Bush and Rumsfeld: "Those only deserve to be hit with shoes."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #63

"The capital, especially the commandos, are getting ready to wipe them out."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #64

"We are surrounding them and pounding them.  The whole trend has changed
and we are going to finalize this very soon."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #65

"After we finish defeating all of those animals we will disclose that
with facts and figures."     --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #66

"Bush, Blair and Rumsfeld.  They are the funny trio."
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #67

"Don't believe anything!  We will chase the rascals back to London!"
                             --Baghdad Bob's Treasury of Deathless Quotes #68

You know the world is going crazy when the best rapper is a white guy,
the best golfer is a black guy, the tallest guy in the NBA is Chinese,
the Swiss hold the America's Cup, France is accusing the US of arrogance,
Germany doesn't want to go to war, and the three most powerful men in
America are named 'Bush', 'Dick', and 'Colon.'                 --Chris Rock

The time for action has passed.  Now is the time for senseless bickering.

All snakes who wish to remain in Ireland will please raise their right hands.
                                                        --Saint Patrick

Here in a nutshell is the classic modern-day misunderstanding of freedom:
Freedom means not just the right to be free from government sanction,
but also to be free from consequences.                     --David Hogberg

If the US departed the UN, the UN would
have left only real estate in New York.           --William F. Buckley, Jr.

I just neutered my cat.  Now he's a liberal            --seen on a T-shirt

It's not the size of the key, it's the implementation of the algorithm.
                                                       --Natasha Smith

Anything important is never left to the vote of the people.
We only get to vote on some man; we never get to vote on what he is to do.
                                                             --Will Rogers

Those who profess to favor freedom, and yet deprecate agitation, are men
who want rain without thunder and lightning.  They want the ocean without
the roar of its many waters.                          --Frederick Douglass

It would be an absurdity for jurors to be required to accept the judge's
view of the law, against their own opinion, judgment, and conscience.
                                                        --John Adams

Witches parking only: all others will be toad        --bumper sticker

Gee, what a terrific party.  Later on we'll get some fluid and embalm
each other.                                                 --Neil Simon

Freedom is the right to tell people what they don't want to hear.
                                                     --George Orwell

If a nation expects to be ignorant and free in a state of civilization,
it expects what never was and never will be.            --Thomas Jefferson

My server has more fans than Britney.
                --Steve Warwick, from a posting at questions@freebsd.org

Age no more confers adulthood than a high school degree guarantees literacy.
                                                          --Kathleen Parker

Johnny, finding life a bore, drank some H2SO4.
Johnny's father, an MD, gave him CaCO3.
Now he's neutralized, it's true, but he's full of CO2.

Well, I've wrestled with reality for over thirty five years, doctor, and
I'm happy to say I've finally won out over it.    --Jimmy Stewart, "Harvey"

cornea gumbo: a web page, ad, or other graphic piece that is an overdesigned,
jumbled, soup of colors, fonts, and images.
                                      --http://www.wordspy.com/TechWordSpy/

hit-and-run page: a web page that gets a huge number of hits and then
disappears a week later, usually because it's a porn site.
                                      --http://www.wordspy.com/TechWordSpy/

tag wrestling: a popular, new sport, usually accompanied by grunting,
slaps to the head, and cries of "I'm sure I put in that end tag" and
"They must have changed the syntax of HTML on me."
                                      --http://www.wordspy.com/TechWordSpy/

arachnerd: a person who spends way too much time either surfing the Web
or screwing around with their home page.
                                      --http://www.wordspy.com/TechWordSpy/

bagonize, verb: to wait anxiously for your suitcase to appear on the
airport baggage carousel.             --http://www.wordspy.com/TechWordSpy/

I'd move to Los Angeles if New Zealand and Australia were swallowed up by
a tidal wave, if there was a bubonic plague in England, and if the
continent of Africa disappeared from some Martian attack.  --Russell Crowe

People who make careers out of helping others -- sometimes at great
sacrifice, often not -- usually don't like to hear that those others might
get along fine, might even get along better, without their help.  --John Holt

Let us speak courteously, deal fairly, and keep ourselves armed and ready.
                                                        --Theodore Roosevelt

Well, I like to do my own research so I think what I would say is that we
haven't found Saddam Hussein and I don't know anyone who's running around
saying he didn't exist.  It takes time.  Does that sound reasonable?
             --Defense Secretary Donald Rumsfeld on the continuing search
               for Iraq's WMD and their previous owner

anatidaephobia: the fear that wherever you are, a duck is watching.
                                      --http://www.wordspy.com/TechWordSpy/

Remember officers and Soldiers, that you are Freemen,
fighting for the blessings of Liberty.                 --George Washington

Computer games don't affect kids; I mean if Pac-Man affected us as kids,
we'd all be running around in darkened rooms, munching magic pills and
listening to repetitive electronic music.
                                   --Kristian Wilson, Nintendo, Inc., 1989

You will never know how much it has cost my generation to preserve
your freedom.  I hope you will make good use of it.     --John Quincy Adams

phrasemonger, noun: a person who uses phrases or quotes that
were coined by other people.          --http://www.wordspy.com/TechWordSpy/

go commando, verb: to wear trousers without putting on underwear.
                                      --http://www.wordspy.com/TechWordSpy/

Lawyers are the only persons for whom ignorance of the law is not punished.
                                                           --Jeremy Bentham

It was so cold in Montana that the lawyers had their hands
in their own pockets.                                      --David Crombie

Conferences are just like the poor and the Democrats,
they'll always be with us.                               --Will Rogers

How can there possibly be liberty and justice for all, when, in the name
of justice, people claim rights to income, food, housing, education,
health care, transportation, ad infinitum?  There can't.    --Gary Galles

The most serious doubt that has been thrown on the authenticity of the
biblical miracles is the fact that most of the witnesses in regard to them
were fishermen.                                          --Arthur Binstead

percussive maintenance, noun: attempting to solve a mechanical or electrical
problem by hitting or kicking the failed device.

A general State education is a mere contrivance for molding people to be
exactly like one another; and as the mold in which it casts them is that which
pleases the dominant power in the government, whether this be a monarch,
an aristocracy, or a majority of the existing generation; in proportion as
it is efficient and successful, it establishes a despotism over the mind,
leading by a natural tendency to one over the body.  --John Stuart Mill, 1859

We laugh in the face of danger, we drop icecubes down the vest of fear.
                                                 --Edmond Blackadder III

Smartness runs in my family.  When I went to school,
I was so smart my teacher was in my class for five years.  --George Burns

ignorami, n.: The BOFH art of folding problem lusers into
representational shapes.

alpha mom, n.: The dominant woman in a group of mothers.

The fact that an opinion has been widely held is no evidence whatever that
it is not utterly absurd; indeed in view of the silliness of the majority
of mankind, a widespread belief is more likely to be foolish than sensible.
                                                          --Bertrand Russell

egosurfing, present participle: Scouring the Internet's archives and search
engines for mentions of your own name or your business name.

Letterman's Polite Ways To Say Your Zipper Is Down #10:
The cucumber has left the salad.

Letterman's Polite Ways To Say Your Zipper Is Down #9:
Quasimodo needs to go back in the tower and tend to his bells.

Letterman's Polite Ways To Say Your Zipper Is Down #8:
You need to bring your tray table to the upright and locked position.

Letterman's Polite Ways To Say Your Zipper Is Down #7:
Paging Mr. Johnson... Paging Mr. Johnson.

Letterman's Polite Ways To Say Your Zipper Is Down #6:
Elvis has left the building.

Letterman's Polite Ways To Say Your Zipper Is Down #5:
The Buick is not all the way in the garage.

Letterman's Polite Ways To Say Your Zipper Is Down #4:
Our next guest is someone who needs no introduction.

Letterman's Polite Ways To Say Your Zipper Is Down #3:
You've got a security breach at Los Pantalones.

Letterman's Polite Ways To Say Your Zipper Is Down #2:
Men may be from Mars, but I see something that rhymes with Venus.

Letterman's Polite Ways To Say Your Zipper Is Down #1:
You've got your fly set for "Monica" instead of "Hillary".

"sucker rally", noun: A short-lived gain in the stock market.

I will mount the usual weekly cross and let you drive the nails.
                  --President Eisenhower at the start of a press conference

I don't deserve this award, but I have arthritis
and I don't deserve that either.                    -- Jack Benny

Two peanuts walk into a bar.  One was a salted.

A jumper cable walks into a bar.
The barman says "I'll serve you, but don't start anything."

A dyslexic man walks into a bra.

A man walks into a bar with a slab of asphalt under his arm and says:
"A beer, please, and one for the road."

Two aerials meet on a roof, fall in love, and get married.
The ceremony wasn't much, but the reception was beautiful.

Two cannibals are eating a clown.
One says to the other: "Does this taste funny to you?"

An invisible man marries an invisible woman.
The kids were nothing to look at either.

Deja Moo: The feeling that you've heard this bullsh*t before.

I went to a seafood disco rave last week.  I pulled a mussel.

Two termites walk into a bar.  One asked, "Is the bar tender here?"

The few things they told us that were right, I already was familiar with,
and I didn't have the necessary pitchfork & hip waders for the rest.
       --Heather James <heatherj at yhti dot net> on education dept classes

I'll believe that 20 same-age children should be in a classroom when women
start bearing litters about that size.
                         --Le Sellers <lesellers at rocketmail dot com>

rumortism, noun: A pathological social condition in which rumor and
innuendo are passed off as facts.

Imagine a school with children that can read and write, but with teachers
who cannot, and you have a metaphor of the Information Age in which we live.
                                                           --Peter Cochrane

beat sweetener, noun: A flattering, non-critical profile of a public figure
written by a reporter whose regular beat includes coverage of that person.

Freedom from prices is freedom from responsibility.  You can simply pass
laws, using the magic wand of government to satisfy your own desires
at unspecified costs to be paid by others.        --Thomas Sowell, Aug 2000

Natives who beat drums to drive off evil spirits are objects of scorn to
smart Americans who blow horns to break up traffic jams.  --Mary Ellen Kelly

You know you've had too much caffeine if you ski ... uphill.

You know you've had too much caffeine if you short out motion detectors.

You know you've had too much caffeine if you help your dog chase its tail.

You know you've had too much caffeine if you chew on other people's
fingernails.

You know you've had too much caffeine if your eyes stay open when you sneeze.

You know you've had too much caffeine if you grind your coffee beans
in your mouth.

You know you've had too much caffeine if you can jump-start your car
without cables.

You know you've had too much caffeine if Starbucks owns the mortgage
on your house.

"I dropped the toothpaste", said Tom, crestfallenly.

"More Wiener schnitzel, please", said Tom, revealingly.

Those who have been intoxicated with power can never willingly abandon it.
                                                        --Edmund Burke

Distrust all those who love you extremely upon a very slight acquaintance
and without any visible reason.  --Lord Philip Dormer Stanhope Chesterfield

Freedom can't be kept for nothing.  If you set a high value on liberty,
you must set a low value on everything else.              --Lucius Annaeus

Political language -- and with variations this is true of all political
parties, from Conservatives to Anarchists -- is designed to make lies
sound truthful and murder respectable.                      --George Orwell

Liberals observe certain flaws in human nature that make them distrust the
spontaneous order ... conservatives recognize that these same flaws are
present in political authorities and can just as easily doom government
solutions to problems.                                 --W. James Antle III

The societies of "Old Europe" remind Americans of the Arab Street.
Preferring comforting delusions to challenging realities, Europeans talk a
great deal, do very little, and blame the United States for homegrown ills.
                                                        --Ralph Peters

The difference between Congress and drunken sailors is that drunken sailors
are spending their own money.                 --Florida Rep. Tom Feeney (R)

If guns are outlawed, only the government will have guns.  Only the police,
the secret police, the military, the hired servants of our rulers.  Only
the government -- and a few outlaws.  I intend to be among the outlaws.
                                                --Edward Abbey (1927-1989)

I would rather be exposed to the inconveniences attending too much liberty
than to those attending too small a degree of it.        --Thomas Jefferson

Deck of cards: $1.29
Card table: $14.99
"101 Solitaire Variations" book: $6.59
Finding a cheaper replacement for the one thing Windows does well: priceless

To announce that there must be no criticism of the President, or that we
are to stand by the President, right or wrong, is not only unpatriotic
and servile, but is morally treasonable to the American public.
                      --Theodore Roosevelt, 26th US President (1858-1919)

The powers delegated by the proposed Constitution to the federal government
are few and defined.                        --James Madison, Federalist #45

I like when the enemy shoots at me; then I know where the bastards are
and can kill them.                                     --Gen. George Patton

A vacuum is a hell of a lot better than
some of the stuff that nature replaces it with.         --Tennessee Williams

A fanatic is someone who works on the result at all costs, irrespective of
its value.    --Nobel Prize-winner and Bell Labs chief scientist Arno Penzias

How do I love thee?  My accumulator overflows.        --geek poetry

Jesus saves.  Buddha forgives.  Cthulu thinks you'd make a nice sandwich.

Fifty years ago, they taught Latin and Greek in high schools.
Today, they teach remedial English in colleges.
            --Butler Shaffer, on the state of learning in our society today

No matter how good she looks, some other guy is sick and tired
of putting up with her sh*t.
                        --Men's room, Linda's Bar and Grill, Chapel Hill, NC

Make love, not war.  What the hell, do both; GET MARRIED!
                        --Women's restroom, The Filling Station, Bozeman, MT

Express Lane: Five beers or less
                    --Sign over one of the urinals, Ed Debevic's, Phoenix, AZ

Random act of violence against bread: whole pint.
                               --extract from "Hawk the Slayer" drinking game

Need a good screw?   --rejected slogan for Ace Hardware

We'd love to be sitting on your face.  --rejected slogan for Ray-Ban

I did WHAT with my sister?  --rejected slogan for Jack Daniels

We'd love to handle your package.  --rejected slogan for FedEx

I think, therefore I thwim.        --Descartes wannabe

There is SCO-owned IP all over the Linux kernel.  SCO will hunt them.
Free software infidels are liars.  We will kill them all, and roast their
stomach in hell.  Our estimates show that all slash-dot viewers will die.
      --Mohammad Al-Sahhaf, SCO Spokesman, Former Iraqi information minister

"Are we at last brought to such a humiliating and debasing degradation,
that we cannot be trusted with arms for our own defense?  Where is the
difference between having our arms in our own possession and under our
own direction, and having them under the management of Congress?  If our
defense be the real object of having those arms, in whose hands can they
be trusted with more propriety, or equal safety to us, as in our own hands?"
          --Patrick Henry June 9, 1788, in the Virginia Convention on the
             ratification of the Constitution.

A democracy is nothing more than mob rule, where fifty-one percent of the
people may take away the rights of the other forty-nine.   --Thomas Jefferson

Academies that are founded at public expense are instituted not so much to
cultivate men's natural abilities as to restrain them.
                                        --Baruch Spinoza (1632-1677)

It should be your care, therefore, and mine, to elevate the minds of our
children and exalt their courage; to accelerate and animate their industry and
activity; to excite in them an habitual contempt of meanness, abhorrence of
injustice and inhumanity, and an ambition to excel in every capacity, faculty,
and virtue.  If we suffer their minds to grovel and creep in infancy, they
will grovel all their lives.  --John Adams, Dissertation on the Canon and
Feudal Law, 1756

Let our pupil be taught that he does not belong to himself, but that he
is public property.  Let him be taught to love his family, but let him
be taught at the same time that he must forsake and even forget them when
the welfare of his country requires it.                    --Benjamin Rush

A native American who cannot read or write is as rare an appearance...as a
comet or an earthquake.  -- John Adams, 1765

Necessity is the plea for every infringement of human freedom.  It is the
argument of tyrants; it is the creed of slaves.  -- William Pitt, 1783

Children should be educated and instructed in the principles of freedom.
                            --John Adams, Defense of the Constitutions, 1787

It is better to tolerate the rare instance of a parent refusing to let his
child be educated, than to shock the common feelings and ideas by forcible
asportation and education of the infant against the will of the father.
                                                        --Thomas Jefferson

Government is not reason; it is not eloquence; it is force.  Like fire,
it is a dangerous servant and a fearful master.          --George Washington

Men had better be without education than be educated by their rulers.
                                                --Thomas Hodgskin, 1823

A general State education is a mere contrivance for moulding people to
be exactly like one another; and as the mould in which it casts them is
that which pleases the dominant power in the government, whether this be
a monarch, an aristocracy, or a majority of the existing generation; in
proportion as it is efficient and successful, it establishes a despotism
over the mind, leading by a natural tendency to one over the body.
                                        --John Stuart Mill, On Liberty, 1859

I freed thousands of slaves.  I could have freed thousands more if they
had known they were slaves.                                --Harriet Tubman

The knowledge of the world is only to be acquired in the world,
and not in a closet.                                    --Lord Chesterfield

Government will not fail to employ education, to strengthen its hands and
perpetuate its institutions.                               --William Godwin

[T]he child should be taught to consider his instructor...superior to the
parent in point of authority....  The vulgar impression that parents have a
legal right to dictate to teachers is entirely erroneous....  Parents have no
remedy as against the teacher.
     --John Swett, Superintendent of California Public School System (1860s)

We are opposed to state interference with parental rights and rights of
conscience in the education of children as an infringement of the fundamental
Democratic doctrine that the largest individual liberty consistent with
the rights of others insures the highest type of American citizenship and
the best government.    --From the Democratic National Platform of 1892
                          (in opposition to compulsory attendance laws)

Wherever is found what is called a paternal government, there is found
state education.  It has been discovered that the best way to insure
implicit obedience is to commence tyranny in the nursery.
                                --Benjamin Disraeli, British Prime Minister

We who are engaged in the sacred cause of education are entitled to look upon
all parents as having given hostages to our cause.
                        --Horace Mann, first secretary of education in the
                           Commonwealth of Massachusetts

[The children's] parents know not how to instruct them....  The state, in the
warmth of her affection and solicitude for their welfare, must take charge of
those children and place them in school where their minds can be enlightened
and their hearts trained to virtue.
        --Archibald D. Murphey, founder of the North Carolina public schools

The education of all children, from the moment that they can get along without
a mother's care, shall be in state institutions at state expense.  --Karl Marx

The teacher is engaged not simply in the training of individuals, but in the
formation of the proper social life....  In this way, the teacher always is
the prophet of the true God and the usherer-in of the true Kingdom of God.
                                        --John Dewey, American educator

Children who know how to think for themselves spoil the harmony of the
collective society which is coming where everyone is interdependent.
                                        --John Dewey, American educator

The individual has always had to struggle to keep from being overwhelmed by
the tribe.  To be your own man is hard business.  If you try it, you will be
lonely often, and sometimes frightened.  But no price is too high to pay for
the privilege of owning yourself.                       --Rudyard Kipling

The only time my education was interrupted was when I was in school.
                                                --George Bernard Shaw

I have never let my schooling interfere with my education.  --Mark Twain

Loyalty to petrified opinion never yet broke a chain or freed a human soul.
                                                        --Mark Twain

Often, the less there is to justify a traditional custom,
the harder it is to get rid of it.                      --Mark Twain

[Factories] in which raw products, children, are to be shaped and formed into
finished products...  manufactured like nails, and the specifications for
manufacturing will come from government and industry.
   --Ellwood P. Cubberley (Dean, Stanford University School of Education),
     on the purpose of schools, from his Columbia Teachers College
     Dissertation (1905)

That erroneous assumption is to the effect that the aim of public education is
to fill the young of the species with knowledge and awaken their intelligence,
and so make them fit to discharge the duties of citizenship in an enlightened
and independent manner.  Nothing could be further from the truth.  The aim of
public education is not to spread enlightenment at all, it is simply to reduce
as many individuals as possible to the same safe level, to breed and train a
standardized citizenry, to put down dissent and originality.  That is its aim
in the United States, whatever the pretensions of politicians, pedagogues and
other such mountebanks, and that is its aim everywhere else.  --H.L. Mencken

The urge to save humanity is almost always a false-face
for the urge to rule it.                                --H.L. Mencken

I suppose it is because nearly all children go to school nowadays and have
things arranged for them that they seem so forlornly unable to produce their
own ideas.                                              --Agatha Christie

Education rears disciples, imitators, and routinists, not pioneers of new
ideas and creative geniuses.  The schools are not nurseries of progress and
improvement, but conservatories of tradition and unvarying modes of thought.
                                                        --Ludwig von Mises

What's the difference between a bright, inquisitive five-year-old, and a dull,
stupid nineteen-year-old?  Fourteen years of the British educational system.
                                                --Bertrand Russell

A really efficient totalitarian state would be one in which the all-powerful
executive of political bosses and their army of managers control a population
of slaves who do not have to be coerced, because they love their servitude.
To make them love it is the task assigned, in present-day totalitarian states,
to ministries of propaganda, newspaper editors and schoolteachers....  The
greatest triumphs of propaganda have been accomplished, not by doing
something, but by refraining from doing.  Great is truth, but still greater,
from a practical point of view, is silence about truth.
                --Aldous Huxley, forward to Brave New World, 1946 edition

Of all tyrannies, a tyranny exercised for the good of its victims may be the
most oppressive.  It may be better to live under robber barons than under
omnipotent moral busybodies.  The robber baron's cruelty may sometimes sleep,
his cupidity may at some point be satiated; but those who torment us for our
own good will torment us without end, for they do so with the approval of
their own conscience.                                   --C.S. Lewis

My grandmother wanted me to have an education, so she kept me out of school.
                                                        --Margaret Mead

Never doubt that a small group of thoughtful citizens can change the world.
Indeed, it's the only thing that ever has.              --Margaret Mead

Give me four years to teach the children and the seed I have sown will never
be uprooted.                                            --Vladimir Lenin

It is the State which educates its citizens in civic virtue, gives them a
consciousness of their mission, and welds them into unity.
    --Benito Mussolini, "The Political and Social Doctrine of Fascism," 1932

At every hour of every day, I can tell you on which page
of which book each school child in Italy is studying.   --Benito Mussolini

Education is a weapon, whose effect depends on who holds it
in his hands and at whom it is aimed.                   --Joseph Stalin

Schools have not necessarily much to do with education...  they are mainly
institutions of control, where basic habits must be inculcated in the young.
Education is quite different and has little place in school.
                                                        --Winston Churchill

The more subsidized it is, the less free it is.  What is known as "free
education" is the least free of all, for it is a state-owned institution;
it is socialized education - just like socialized medicine or the socialized
post office - and cannot possibly be separated from political control.
                --Frank Chodorov, "Why Free Schools Are Not Free," 1948

The central task of education is to implant a will and facility for learning;
it should produce not learned but learning people.  The truly human society is
a learning society, where grandparents, parents, and children are students
together.                                               --Eric Hoffer

To be nobody but yourself -- in a world which is doing it's best, night and
day, to make you like everybody else -- means to fight the hardest battle
which any human being can fight, and never stop fighting.  --e.e. cummings

Public educators, like Soviet farmers, lack any incentive to produce results,
innovate, to be efficient, to make the kinds of of difficult changes that
private firms operating in a competitive market must make to survive.
                                                        --Carolyn Lochhead

I don't want my children fed or clothed by the state, but if I had to choose,
I would prefer that to their being educated by the state.  --Max Victor Belz

"Parent choice" proceeds from the belief that the purpose of education is to
provide individual students with an education.  In fact, educating the
individual is but a means to the true end of education, which is to create a
viable social order to which individuals contribute and by which they are
sustained.  "Family choice" is, therefore, basically selfish and anti-social
in that it focuses on the "wants" of a single family rather than the "needs"
of society.             --Association of California School Administrators

Historically, much of the motivation for public schooling has been to stifle
variety and institute social control.                           --Jack Hugh

The conventional view serves to protect us from the painful job of thinking.
                                                --John Kenneth Galbraith

If the only motive was to help people who could not afford education,
advocates of government involvement would have simply proposed tuition
subsidies.              --Milton Friedman, Economist and 1976 Nobel Laureate

The first goal and primary function of the U.S. public school is not to
educate good people, but good citizens.  It is the function which we call -
in enemy nations - "state indoctrination."              --Jonathan Kozol

If it would be wrong for the government to adopt an official religion, then,
for the same reasons, it would be wrong for the government to adopt official
education policies.  The moral case for freedom of religion stands or falls
with that for freedom of education.  A society that champions freedom of
religion but at the same time countenances state regulation of education has a
great deal of explaining to do.                         --James R. Otteson

School is the advertising agency which makes you believe
that you need the society as it is.                     --Ivan Illich

It is the duty of a citizen in a free country
not to fit into society, but to make society.           --John Holt

Far from failing in its intended task, our educational system is in fact
succeeding magnificently, because its aim is to keep the American people
thoughtless enough to go on supporting the system.  --Richard Mitchell

Do you think nobody would willingly entrust his children to you or pay you for
teaching them?  Why do you have to extort your fees and collect your pupils by
compulsion?                                             --Isabel Paterson

Most of the harm in the world is done by good people, and not by accident,
lapse, or omission.  It is the result of their deliberate actions, long
persevered in, which they hold to be motivated by high ideals toward virtuous
ends.                                                   --Isabel Paterson

Those in society who are in charge of schools must never forget that the
parents have been appointed by God himself as the first and principal
educators of their children and that their right is completely inalienable.
                                                        --Pope John Paul II

When school children start paying union dues, that's when I'll start
representing the interests of school children.
  --Albert Shanker (Former President of the American Federation of Teachers)

It's time to admit that public education operates like a planned economy,
a bureaucratic system in which everybody's role is spelled out in advance
and there are few incentives for innovation and productivity.  It's no
surprise that our school system doesn't improve: It more resembles the
communist economy than our own market economy.             --Albert Shanker

In all countries, in all centuries, the primary reason for government to set
up schools is to undermine the politically weak by convincing their children
that the leaders are good and their policies are wise.  The core is religious
intolerance.  The sides simply change between the Atheists, Catholics,
Protestants, Unitarians, etc., depending whether you are talking about the
Soviet Union, the Austro-Hungarian Empire, America, etc.  A common second
reason is to prepare the boys to go to war and the girls to cheer them on.
   --Marshall Fritz (Founder, Alliance for the Separation of School & State)

Charter schools are just public schools on a slightly longer leash.
A dog on a long leash is still a dog on a leash.        --Marshall Fritz

As we all learned from the sorry experience of state-sanctioned bureaucracies
in Eastern Europe and the Soviet Union, decentralization [in education] is
crucial to both freedom and excellence.    --Jerry Brown (Mayor, Oakland, CA)

If you suppose that good intentions justify intruding on the lives and
properties of your fellow citizens: Do you appreciate being the target of
somebody else's good intentions, or haven't you had that particular dubious
pleasure yet?                                           --Cat Farmer

A democratic despotism is like a theocracy: it assumes its own correctness.
                                                        --Walter Bagehot

No matter how disastrously some policy has turned out, anyone who criticizes
it can expect to hear: 'But what would you replace it with?' When you put out
a fire, what do you replace it with?                    --Thomas Sowell

In a time of drastic change it is the learners who inherit the future.  The
learned usually find themselves equipped to live in a world that no longer
exists.                                                 --Eric Hoffer

Nothing enrages me more than when people criticize my criticism of school by
telling me that schools are not just places to learn maths and spelling, they
are places where children learn a vaguely defined thing called socialization.
I know.  I think schools generally do an effective and terribly damaging job
of teaching children to be infantile, dependent, intellectually dishonest,
passive and disrespectful to their own developmental capacities.
                                                        --Seymour Papert

There has never in the history of the civilized world been a cohort of kids
that is so little affected by adult guidance and so attuned to a peer world.
We have removed grown-up wisdom and allowed them to drift into a
self-constructed, highly relativistic world of friendship and peers.
                --William Damon, Stanford University Center on Adolescence

Government schooling is the most radical adventure in history.  It kills the
family by monopolizing the best times of childhood and by teaching disrespect
for home and parents.
        --John Taylor Gatto, New York State Teacher of the Year (1990, 1991)

Home schooling programs cannot provide the student with a comprehensive
educational experience.         --National Education Association Resolution

The present homeschooling laws are, at best, a poor compromise between a
highly structured, two hundred billion dollar a year industry and the
principles and beliefs of a handful of parents.
                                --Helen Hegener, The Homeschool Reader

Our tightly controlled educational system mocks the promise of democracy.
With a closed educational system we simply cannot have an open political
system.  The current situation allows the government and big business to
manufacture and maintain our culture for us, and in turn, control remains in
the hands of the experts and institutions.  The ability to change this
situation is in the hands of the individuals and families who understand why
change is necessary.            --Helen Hegener, Alternatives in Education

Why is it that millions of children who are pushouts or dropouts amount to
business as usual in the public schools, while one family educating a child at
home becomes a major threat to universal public education and the survival of
democracy?                              --Stephen Arons (Compelling Belief)

Reaching consensus in a group is often confused with finding the right answer.
                                                        --Norman Mailer

A family member asked my wife, "Aren't you concerned about his (our son's)
socialization with other kids?" My wife gave this response: "Go to your local
middle school, junior high, or high school, walk down the hallways, and tell
me which behavior you see that you think our son should emulate."
                                                        --Manfred B. Zysk

Education is unique among consumer products -- when it fails to
work as advertised, it's the customer that gets labelled as defective.
                                                        --Kevin Killion

The Constitution is a written instrument.  As such, its meaning
does not alter.  That which it meant when it was adopted, it means now.
                        --SOUTH CAROLINA v. US, 199 U.S. 437, 448 (1905)

Laissez faire does not mean let soulless mechanical forces operate.  It means
let each individual choose how he wants to cooperate in the social division
of labor; let the consumers determine what the entrepreneurs should produce.
Planning means let the government alone choose and enforce its rulings by
the apparatus of coercison and compulsion.                --Ludwig von Mises

When a government has ceased to protect the lives, liberty, and property
of the people...and...becomes an instrument in the hands of evil rulers
for their oppression...it is a...sacred obligation to their posterity to
abolish such government, and create another in its stead.     --Sam Houston

We are reluctant to admit that we owe our liberties to men of a type that
today we hate and fear - unruly men, disturbers of the peace, men who resent
and denounce what Whitman called "the insolence of elected persons" - in a
word, free men.     --Gerald W. Johnson, American Freedom and the Press, 1958

Those who want the government to regulate matters of the mind and spirit
are like men who are so afraid of being murdered that they commit suicide.
                                                              --Harry Truman

Reality is the leading cause of stress amongst those in touch with it.
                                                              --Lily Tomlin

Knowing, not guessing, about what you can risk is often the critical
difference between getting away with it or drilling a fifty-foot hole
in mother earth.             --General Chuck Yeager, former USAF test pilot

You can take all the sincerity in Hollywood, place it in the navel of
a fruit fly and still have room enough for three caraway seeds and a
producer's heart.                                             --Fred Allen

To think that government, i.e., bureaucrats and politicians, will
confiscate money to pay for something without imposing limits, mandates,
and controls on it, is to demonstrate that you have been bareheaded in
the sun too long.                  --Le Sellers <lesellers@rocketmail.com>

My doctor told me to stop having intimate dinners for four,
unless there are three other people.                        --Orson Welles

This space intentionally has nothing but text explaining why this space
has nothing but text explaining that this space would otherwise have
been left blank, and would otherwise have been left blank.

There is no room for the arbitrary in any activity of man, least of all
in his method of cognition, and just as he has learned to be guided by
objective criteria in making his physical tools, so he must be guided by
objective criteria in forming his tools of cognition: his concepts. --Ayn Rand

There can be no such thing, in law or in morality,
as actions forbidden to an individual, but permitted to a mob.  --Ayn Rand

America's abundance was not created by public sacrifices to the common good,
but by the productive genius of free men who pursued their own personal
interests and the making of their own private fortunes.           --Ayn Rand

The idea that 'the public interest' supersedes private interests and rights
can have but one meaning: that the interests and rights of some individuals
take precedence over the interests and rights of others.          --Ayn Rand

The smallest minority on earth is the individual.  Those who deny
individual rights, cannot claim to be defenders of minorities.  --Ayn Rand

Thinking men cannot be ruled.                                   --Ayn Rand

Don't work for my happiness, my brothers- show me yours- show me that
it is possible- show me your achievement- and the knowledge will give
me courage for mine.                            --Ayn Rand, The Fountainhead

Happiness is that state of consciousness which proceeds from the
achievement of one's values.                                    --Ayn Rand,

Force and mind are opposites; morality ends where the gun begins.  --Ayn Rand

Satellite Safety Tip #14:
  If you see a bright streak in the sky coming at you, duck.

Why you can't find your system administrator:
  There's more caffeine than blood in his veins, and he was last seen
  hopping down the hall pretending he was a pogo stick.

There is no history of mankind, there are only many histories of all
kinds of aspects of human life.  And one of these is the history of
political power.  This is elevated into the history of the world.
                        --Karl Popper, "The Open Society and its Enemies"

One of the common failings among honorable people is a failure to appreciate
how thoroughly dishonorable some other people can be, and how dangerous
it is to trust them.                                          --Thomas Sowell

If you think it's wrong to kill someone who is about to kill you,
you're too stupid to be allowed to vote.                 --Michael James

This is a farce confidential disclaimer intended to make you aware that
even though this may be priveledged information, being it will become
Google cache in the future, my original intentions of keeping this
message restricted and/or private are thrown out the door.  If you have
received this e-mail in error, please enjoy this signature and destroy
this message by dousing it in gasoline.

Who was the first person to look at a cow and say, "I think I'll squeeze
these dangly things there, and drink whatever comes out?"

There had to be a first time someone said, "See that chicken?  I'm gonna
eat the next thing that comes outta it's butt."

Why is there a light in the fridge and not in the freezer?

Can a hearse carrying a corpse drive in the car pool lane?

If the professor on Gilligan's Island can make a radio out of coconut,
why can't he fix a hole in a boat?

Why do people point to their wrist when asking for the time, but don't
point to their butt when they ask where the bathroom is?

If Wile E. Coyote had enough money to buy all that Acme crap,
why didn't he just buy dinner?

If quizzes are quizzical, what are tests?

Is Disney World the only people-trap operated by a mouse?

Corruption is not the #1 priority of the Police Commissioner.
His job is to enforce the law and fight crime.  --PBA President E.J. Kiernan

We made [an album], and it sounds like a group of people who have been
given powerful but unfamiliar instruments as a therapy for a degenerative
nerve disease.                                    --Dave Barry, "The Snake"

Posterity -- you will never know how much it has cost my generation to
preserve your freedom.  I hope you will make good use of it.
                                                        --John Quincy Adams

Before you say, "There should be a law", stop and think.  All laws
authorize government to use lethal force, at the end of a gun, to see
them carried out.  Is the issue REALLY important enough that you want
to enable the government to kill people over it?

Being generous is inborn; being altruistic is a learned perversity.
No resemblance.                                      --Robert Heinlein

Book (n): a utensil used to pass time while waiting for the TV repairman.

I never submitted the whole system of my opinion to the creed of any party
of men whatever, in religion, in philosophy, in politics, or in anything
else, where I was capable of thinking for myself.  Such an addiction is
the last degradation of a free and moral agent.  If I could not go to
heaven but with a party, I would not go at all.
              --Thomas Jefferson in a letter to Francis Hopkinson in 1789

I have always wished that my computer would be as easy to use as my
telephone.  My wish has come true; I no longer know how to use my telephone.
                                                          --Bjarne Stroustrup

Idealism is the noble toga that political
gentlemen drape over their will to power.        --Aldous Huxley

Q: How else can someone reliably measure your tool's effectiveness?
A: How about a dB meter to profile the groans?
                                        --best innuendo on a techie list

Yes, of course liberalism is a mental defect.  Liberals are wracked by
self-loathing as the result of some traumatic incident -- say, driving drunk
off a bridge with your mistress passed out in the back seat and letting
the poor girl drown because you're a married man and a US senator, just
to take one utterly random, hypothetical example off the top of my head.
                                                            --Ann Coulter

Irrationality is the square root of all evil.          --Douglas Hofstadter

The people can always be brought to the bidding of the leaders.  All you
have to do is to tell them they are being attacked and denounce the
pacifists for lack of patriotism.                         --Hermann Goering

I wouldn't be surprised if you just attracted every stray cat in Texas.
                                --Simon Cowell critique on "American Idol"

I would ban you from singing in the shower.
                                --Simon Cowell critique on "American Idol"

If I were to say you were mediocre, it would be the biggest compliment
you've ever been paid.          --Simon Cowell critique on "American Idol"

That was a 1.5 out of 10, at most.  --Simon Cowell critique on "American Idol"

You are like musical cheesecake... quite hard work to get through, and
once you finish, you don't want much more.
                                   --Simon Cowell critique on "American Idol"

With sufficient thrust, pigs fly just fine.  However, this is not necessarily
a good idea.  It is hard to be sure where they are going to land, and it
could be dangerous sitting under them as they fly overhead.       --RFC 1925

Love may be beautiful, love may be bliss
But I only slept with you because I was pissed.
                   --entries to a Washington Post romantic rhyme competition

I thought that I could love no other
Until, that is, I met your brother.
                   --entries to a Washington Post romantic rhyme competition

Roses are red, violets are blue,
Sugar is sweet and so are you.
But the roses are wilting, the violets are dead,
The sugar bowl's empty and so is your head.
                   --entries to a Washington Post romantic rhyme competition

In loving beauty you float with grace
If only you could hide your face.
                   --entries to a Washington Post romantic rhyme competition

Kind, intelligent, loving and hot
This describes everything you are not.
                   --entries to a Washington Post romantic rhyme competition

I want to feel your sweet embrace
But don't take that bag off your face.
                   --entries to a Washington Post romantic rhyme competition

I love your smile, your face, and your eyes
Damn, I'm good at telling lies!
                   --entries to a Washington Post romantic rhyme competition

My darling, my lover, my beautiful wife:
Marrying you screwed up my life.
                   --entries to a Washington Post romantic rhyme competition

I see your face when I am dreaming.
That's why I always wake up screaming.
                   --entries to a Washington Post romantic rhyme competition

My love, you take my breath away.
What have you stepped in to smell this way?
                   --entries to a Washington Post romantic rhyme competition

My feelings for you no words can tell
Except for maybe "go to hell."
                   --entries to a Washington Post romantic rhyme competition

What inspired this amorous rhyme?
Two parts vodka, one part lime.
                   --entries to a Washington Post romantic rhyme competition

Commercial operating systems breed commerce, whereas free operating systems
breed freedom, the only thing more dangerous and confusing than commerce.
                                --Michael R. Jinks, redhat-list, circa 1997

The problem with people who have no vices is that generally you can be
pretty sure they're going to have some pretty annoying virtues.
                                                        --Elizabeth Taylor

Once a government is committed to the principle of silencing the voice
of opposition, it has only one way to go, and that is down the path of
increasingly repressive measures, until it becomes a source of terror to
all its citizens and creates a country where everyone lives in fear.
                                                          --Harry S. Truman

Have you ever tried simply turning off the TV,
sitting down with your children, and hitting them?      --Bender, "Futurama"

It was a hard sell, since he's a database person, and as far as I've
seen, once those database worms eat into your brain, it's hard to ever
get anything practical done again.  To a database person, every nail
looks like a thumb.  Or something like that.
                      --Jamie Zawinski, http://www.jwz.org/doc/mailsum.html

Q:  How many existentialists does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
A:  Two.  One to screw it in and one to observe how the lightbulb itself
    symbolizes a single incandescent beacon of subjective reality in a
    netherworld of endless absurdity reaching out toward a maudlin cosmos
    of nothingness.

I feel like those Jewish people in Germany in 1942.
            --Ted Turner, on being prevented from buying another TV station

If a man speaks in the forest and there is no woman
there to hear him, is he still wrong?                     --Unknown Heroine

Men are like a fine wine.  They all start out like grapes, and it's our
job to stomp on them and keep them in the dark where they will mature
into something you'd want to have dinner with.            --Unknown Heroine

A woman needs four animals in her life: a mink in the closet, a jaguar
in the garage, a tiger in bed, and an ass to pay for it all.  --Anne Slater

An editor should have a pimp for a brother,
so he'd have someone to look up to.                           --Gene Fowler

I read this and I think "I'm a relay" (and then go poopie).
              --Dave Richardson <isp@derdev.com>, on the qmail mailing list

True education makes for inequality; the inequality of individuality, the
inequality of success, the glorious inequality of talent, of genius; for
inequality, not mediocrity, individual superiority, not standardization,
is the measure of the progress of the world.
                        --Felix E. Schelling (1858-1945), American educator

Toilet out of order. please use floor below       --sign in a London office

Did you ever hear anyone say 'that work had better be banned because
I might read it and it might be very damaging to me'?
                     --Joseph Henry Jackson, American Journalist, 1894-1946

As long as an economic system provides an acceptable degree of security,
growing material wealth and opportunity for further increase for the
next generation, the average American does not ask who is running things
or what goals are being pursued.      --Daniel R. Fusfeld, "Friendly Fascism"

Transvestite: A guy who likes to eat, drink and be Mary.

The difference between the Pope and your boss: The Pope only expects you
to kiss his ring.

I hate sex in the movies.  Tried it once, the seat folded up.

A husband is someone who, after taking out the trash, gives the impression
that he just cleaned the whole house.

I signed up for an exercise class and was told to wear loose-fitting
clothing.  If I HAD any loose-fitting clothing, I wouldn't have signed up
in the first place.

The early bird still has to eat worms.

Brain cells come and go, fat cells live forever.

Avoid revolution or expect to get shot.  Mother and I will grieve, but
we will gladly buy a dinner for the National Guardsman who shot you.
                       --Dr. Paul Williamson, father of a Kent State student

There is danger from all men.  The only maxim of a free government ought
to be to trust no man living with power to endanger the public liberty.
                                               --John Adams, Journal, 1772

Make no laws whatever concerning speech and, speech will be free; so
soon as you make a declaration on paper that speech shall be free, you
will have a hundred lawyers proving that "freedom does not mean abuse, nor
liberty license", and they will define and define freedom out of existence.
                                           --Voltarine de Cleyre (1866-1912)

The centralization of power in Washington, which nearly all members
of Congress deplore in their speech and then support by their votes,
steadily increases.                                       --Calvin Coolidge

If Tyranny and Oppression come to this land,
it will be in the guise of fighting a foreign enemy.        --James Madison

No man has a natural right to commit aggression on the equal rights of
another, and this is all from which the laws ought to restrain him.
                                                         --Thomas Jefferson

Let us recollect that peace or war will not always be left to our
option; that however moderate or unambitious we may be, we cannot count
upon the moderation, or hope to extinguish the ambition of others.
                                                       --Alexander Hamilton

The world's becoming a museum of socialist failures.      --John Dos Passos

The unforgivable crime is soft hitting.  Do not hit at all if it can be
avoided; but never hit softly.                         --Theodore Roosevelt

While the people are virtuous they cannot be subdued; but when once they
lose their virtue then will be ready to surrender their liberties to the
first external or internal invader.                         --Samuel Adams

Education never helped morals.  The smarter the guy, the bigger the rascal.
                                                            --Will Rogers

Eternal vigilance is only part of the price of freedom.  The maturity to
live with imperfections is another crucial part of the price of freedom.
                                                         --Thomas Sowell

HE:  Let's end it all, bequeathin' our brains to science.
SHE: What?  Science got enough trouble with their OWN brains.  --Walt Kelley

DAMNITOL: Take 2 and the rest of the world can go to hell for up to 8
full hours.

ST. MOMMA'S WORT: Plant extract that treats mom's depression by
rendering preschoolers unconscious for up to two days.

EMPTYNESTROGEN: Suppository that eliminates melancholy and loneliness by
reminding you of how awful they were as teenagers and how you couldn't
wait till they moved out.

PEPTO-BIMBO: Liquid silicone drink for single women.  Two full cups
swallowed before an evening out increases breast size, decreases
intelligence, and prevents conception.

DUMBEROL: When taken with Pepto-bimbo, can cause dangerously low IQ,
resulting in enjoyment of country music and pickup trucks.

FLIPITOR: Increases life expectancy of commuters by controlling road
rage and the urge to flip off other drivers.

BUYAGRA: Injectable stimulant taken prior to shopping.  Increases
potency, duration, and credit limit of spending spree.

JACKASSPIRIN: Relieves headache caused by a man who can't remember your
birthday, anniversary or phone number

ANTI-TALKSIDENT: A spray carried in a purse or wallet to be used on
anyone too eager to share their life stories with total strangers
in elevators.

NAGAMET: When administered to a husband, provides the same irritation
level as nagging him all weekend, saving the wife the time and trouble
of doing it herself.

I've found that nurturing one's Zen nature is vital to dealing with
technology.  Violence is pretty damn useful too.      --Lionel Lauer, A.S.R.

By trying we can easily learn to endure adversity.   Another man's, I mean.
                                                        --Mark Twain

Q. Why did John Kerry cross the road?
A. It doesn't matter.  He's already on the other side.

Matter cannot be created or destroyed, nor can it be returned without a
receipt.

What color is a chameleon on a mirror?

Government does not solve problems; it subsidizes them.       --R. Reagan

Are you entitled to the fruits of your own labor or does government
have some presumptive right to spend and spend and spend?     --R. Reagan

The federal government has taken too much tax money from the people, too
much authority from the states, and too much liberty with the Constitution.
                                                               --R. Reagan

The best view of big government is in the rearview mirror as you're
driving away from it.     --R. Reagan

Nations crumble from within when the citizenry asks of government those
things which the citizenry might better provide for itself.    --R. Reagan

We were poor when I was young, but the difference then was that the
government didn't come around telling you you were poor.       --R. Reagan

To those who are fainthearted and unsure, I have this message: If you're
afraid of the future, then get out of the way, stand aside.  The people
of this country are ready to move again.                       --R. Reagan

Don't be afraid to see what you see.  --R. Reagan

I don't believe in a government that protects us from ourselves.  --R. Reagan

No arsenal or no weapon in the arsenals of the world is so formidable
as the will and moral courage of free men and women.  --R. Reagan

The West won't contain Communism.  It will transcend it.  It will
dismiss it as some bizarre chapter in human history whose last pages
are even now being written.  --R. Reagan

Communism is neither an economic or a political system -- it is a form
of insanity -- a temporary aberration which will one day disappear from
the earth because it is contrary to human nature.  I wonder how much
more misery it will cause before it disappears.  --R. Reagan

Those who say that we're in a time when there are no heroes just don't
know where to look.  You can see heroes every day going in and out of
factory gates.  Others, a handful in number, produce enough food to
feed all of us and then the world beyond.  [...]  Their patriotism is
quiet but deep.  Their values sustain our national life.   --R. Reagan

Before I refuse to take your questions, I have an opening statement...
                                                        --R. Reagan

Here's my strategy on the Cold War: We win, they lose.   --R. Reagan

Status quo, you know, that is Latin for 'the mess we're in.'   --R. Reagan

Government's view of the economy could be summed up in a few short
phrases: If it moves, tax it.  If it keeps moving, regulate it.  And if
it stops moving, subsidize it.   --R. Reagan

Recession is when your neighbor loses his job.  Depression is when
you lose yours.  And recovery is when Jimmy Carter loses his.   --R. Reagan

I've laid down the law, though, to everyone from now on about anything
that happens: no matter what time it is, wake me...even if it's in the
middle of a cabinet meeting.   --R. Reagan

The trouble with our liberal friends is not that they're ignorant;
it's just that they know so much that isn't so.   --R. Reagan

I will not exploit my opponent's youth and inexperience.   --R. Reagan

And I also remember something that Thomas Jefferson once said:
'We should never judge a president by his age, only by his works.'
And ever since he told me that...   --R. Reagan

History's no easy subject.  Even in my day it wasn't,
and we had so much less of it to learn then.               --R. Reagan

Honey, I forgot to duck.   --R. Reagan

The nearest thing to eternal life we will ever see on this earth is
a government program.                                      --R. Reagan

I heard one presidential candidate say that what this country needed was
a president for the nineties.  I was set to run again.  I thought he said
a president IN his nineties.                                  --R. Reagan

Most people would like to be delivered from temptation, but would
also like it to keep in touch.                            --Robert Orben

Bill Clinton's book has already sold more than 600,000 copies.  All of
them to women who want to see if their name is mentioned.   --Craig Kilborn

Why has government been instituted at all?  Because the passions of men
will not conform to the dictates of reason and justice without constraint.
                                                        --Alexander Hamilton

There never was a bad man that had ability for good service. --Edmund Burke

Real valor consists not in being insensible to danger,
but in being prompt to confront and disarm it.             --Sir Walter Scott

Bill Clinton's autobiography came out today.  It's based on a true story.
                                                          --Jay Leno

Bill Clinton is everywhere now promoting his new book.  I believe the
last time Clinton did a media blitz like this it was to deny everything
that's in this book.                                     --David Letterman

Bill Clinton's book went on sale today at long last.  Earlier today
hundreds of people waited outside of Barnes and Noble in the pouring
rain for a chance to meet Bill Clinton.  When asked if she minded the
rain, one woman said, "I'm meeting Bill Clinton.  I just assumed my
dress would get ruined."                                 --Conan O'Brien

I just read Bill Clinton's book.  Hundreds of affairs, thousands of lies,
lawsuits, subpoenas and then I got to page two.          --Craig Kilborn

Oprah asked Bill Clinton if he's talked to Monica Lewinsky since the affair.
Clinton said, "Are you kidding?  I didn't talk to her during the affair."
                                                         --Conan O'Brien

A thousand people waited in line for an autographed copy of Bill
Clinton's book.  There was pushing, there was shoving, there was groping
and that's just when Bill signed your book.              --Craig Kilborn

Bill Clinton was on "Oprah" talking about the book.  I guess tomorrow
he's on Maury Povich doing one of those paternity test shows...  In two
days he's been on "60 Minutes", he's been on "Oprah," tomorrow he's on
"Larry King".  The only thing he hasn't been on lately is Hillary.
                                                         --Jay Leno

I loved it when Bill Clinton told Dan Rather the worst day of his
life was the day he told Hillary the truth.  Well, of course, it was.
The first time you try anything it's always going to be difficult.
                                                         --Jay Leno

Liberty has never come from the government.  Liberty has
always come from the subjects of the government.         --Woodrow Wilson

The history of liberty is the history of the limitation
of government, not the increase of it.                   --Woodrow Wilson

They couldn't hit an elephant at this dist...
         --Final words of General John Sedgwick, Union Commander, d. 1864

Liberty not only means that the individual has both the opportunity and
the burden of choice; it also means that he must bear the consequences
of his actions...  Liberty and responsibility are inseparable.
                --Friedrich von Hayek, The Constitution of Liberty (1960)

Laws are made for men of ordinary understanding and should, therefore,
be construed by the ordinary rules of common sense.  Their meaning is
not to be sought for in metaphysical subtleties which may make anything
mean everything or nothing at pleasure.                 --Thomas Jefferson

The measure of a man's character is what he would do
if he knew he never would be found out.                  --Thomas Babington

The hardest thing about any political campaign is how to
win without proving that you are unworthy of winning.    --Adlai Stevenson

Bring your desires down to your present means.
Increase them only when your increased means permit.     --Aristotle

When an actor comes to me and wants to discuss his character, I say,
"It's in the script."  If he says, "But what's my motivation?," I say,
"Your salary."                                            --Alfred Hitchcock

"Jesus Christ and the Terrible, Horrible, No Good, Very Bad Day" by Mel Gibson
                   --Children's books written by celebrities, Conan O'Brian

Why is the Pen mightier than the Sword?  Because no one ever takes up a
sword until a pen has first convinced them that something is worth killing
or dying for.

Victory goes to the player who makes the next-to-last mistake.
                               --Chessmaster Savielly Gricorievitch Tatrtak

Democracy extends the sphere of individual freedom, Democracy attaches
all possible value to each man, while socialism makes each man a mere
agent, a mere number.  Democracy and socialism have nothing in common
but one word: equality.  But notice the difference: while democracy seeks
equality in liberty, socialism seeks equality in restraint and servitude.
                                                --Alexis de Tocqueville, 1848

No one can read our Constitution without concluding that the people who
wrote it wanted their government severely limited; the words 'no' and 'not'
employed in restraint of government power occur 24 times in the first seven
articles of the Constitution and 22 more times in the Bill of Rights.
                                                           --Edmund A. Opitz

The left takes its vision seriously -- more seriously than it takes the
rights of other people.  They want to be our shepherds.  But that requires
us to be sheep.                                              --Thomas Sowell

An act that is inherently evil does not become moral simply because
there's a majority consensus.                              --Walter Williams

When I read the list of people who are supporting Kerry, if I wasn't already
a Bush supporter, I would have immediately switched.  Linda Ronstadt?
Don Henley?  Geez, that's a good reason right there to vote for Bush.
                                                     --Rock star Alice Cooper

We did have a completely different class of people in 1776.  When this
country was formed you couldn't find 10 people on the continent who thought
that it was the responsibility of the federal government to provide them
with a job or health care...  transport today's average American back to
1776 and the Revolutionary War would never have happened.     --Neal Boortz

Cogito ergo I'm right and you're wrong.                    --Blair Houghton

Flanders: They're not perfect, but the Lord says love thy neighbor-
Homer: Shut up, Flanders.
Flanders: Okely-dokely-do.                 --The Simpsons, "Hurricane Neddy"

Would you rather arrive at the grave safely in a well-preserved body,
or skid in sideways yelling "holy shit, what a ride!"?

France has neither winter nor summer nor morals.  Apart from these drawbacks
it is a fine country.  France has usually been governed by prostitutes.
                                                               --Mark Twain

Going to war without France is like going deer hunting
without your accordion.                               --Norman Schwartzkopf

We can stand here like the French, or we can do something about it.
                                                            --Marge Simpson

"As far as I'm concerned, war always means failure."
                                      --Jacques Chirac, President of France
"As far as France is concerned, you're right."
                                      --Rush Limbaugh

Next time there's a war in Europe, the loser has to keep France.

Raise your right hand if you like the French.
Raise both hands if you are French.

You know why the French don't want to bomb Saddam Hussein?  Because he hates
America, he loves mistresses and wears a beret.  He is French, people.
                                                        --Conan O'Brien

I don't know why people are surprised that France won't
help us get Saddam out of Iraq.  After all, France wouldn't
help us get the Germans out of France!                  --Jay Leno

The last time the French asked for 'more proof'
it came marching into Paris under a German flag.        --David Letterman

Possible replacement for the French national anthem #12:
"Runaway" by Del Shannon

Possible replacement for the French national anthem #11:
"Walk Right In" by the Rooftop Singers

Possible replacement for the French national anthem #10:
"Everybody's Somebody's Fool" by Connie Francis

Possible replacement for the French national anthem #9:
"Running Scared" by Roy Orbison

Possible replacement for the French national anthem #8:
"I Really Don't Want to Know" by Tommy Edwards

Possible replacement for the French national anthem #7:
"Surrender" by Elvis Presley

Possible replacement for the French national anthem #6:
"Save It For Me" by The Four Seasons

Possible replacement for the French national anthem #5:
"Live and Let Die" by Wings

Possible replacement for the French national anthem #4:
"I'm Leaving It All Up To You" by Donny and Marie Osmond

Possible replacement for the French national anthem #3:
"What a Fool Believes" by the Doobie Brothers

Possible replacement for the French national anthem #2:
"Don't Worry, Be Happy" by Bobby McFerrin

Possible replacement for the French national anthem #1:
"Raise Your Hands" by Jon Bon Jovi

How many Frenchmen does it take to change a light bulb?
One.  He holds the bulb and all of Europe revolves around him.

The French are always reticent to surrender to the wishes of their
friends and always more than willing to surrender to the wishes of
their enemies.                                            --Dennis Miller

Should we dig up the graves of American soldiers in Normandy, too,
and take them home?
     --response by Secretary of State Dean Rusk when France pulled out of
       NATO and declared Americans must close down their bases in France

You can always count on the French to be there when they need us.

Polymer physicists are into chains.

You know, some of these stories are pretty good.
I never knew mice lived such interesting lives.
                                --Homer Simpson, "Itchy & Scratchy & Marge"

The same prudence which in private life would forbid our paying our
own money for unexplained projects, forbids it in the dispensation of
the public moneys.                                      --Thomas Jefferson

Never do anything against conscience even if the state demands it.
                                                         --Albert Einstein

If all that Americans want is security, they can go to prison.
They'll have enough to eat, a bed and a roof over their heads.
                                           --President Dwight D. Eisenhower

The real freedom of any individual can always be measured by the amount
of responsibility which he must assume for his own welfare and security.
                                                             --Robert Welch

There is nothing that gives a man consequence, and renders him fit for
command, like a support that renders him independent of everybody but
the State he serves.                                    --George Washington

Out of the darkness a voice spake unto me, saying "Smile, things could
be worse".  And lo, I smiled, and behold, things became worse.

One single object...[will merit] the endless gratitude of the society:
that of restraining the judges from usurping legislation.  --Thomas Jefferson

The things that will destroy America are prosperity-at-any-price,
peace-at-any-price, safety-first instead of duty-first, the love of
soft living, and the get-rich-quick theory of life.      --Theodore Roosevelt

On every question of construction carry ourselves back to the time when
the Constitution was adopted, recollect the spirit manifested in the
debates and instead of trying what meaning may be squeezed out of the
text or invented against it, conform to the probable one in which it
was passed.  --Thomas Jefferson

When no risk is taken there is no freedom.  It is thus that, in an
industrial society, the plethora of laws made for our personal safety
convert the land into a nursery, and policemen hired to protect us
become self-serving busybodies.  --Alan Watts

Liberty is often a heavy burden on a man.  It involves the necessity
for perpetual choice which is the kind of labor men have always dreaded.
                                                 --Oliver Wendell Holmes, Sr.

America...they are trying to weaken you; they are trying to disarm
your strong and magnificent country...  I call upon you, ordinary
working men of America... do not let yourselves become weak.
                                                    --Alexander Solzhenitsyn

The deterioration of every government begins with the decay of the
principles on which it was founded.              --Charles-Louis De Secondat

There is something that smacks of tyranny about being forced to carry a
national ID card.  Persons who love freedom and are fearful of losing it
will oppose any effort to impose one on them.                 --Lyn Nofziger

National ID cards are not proper in a free society.  This is America,
not Soviet Russia.  The federal government should never be allowed
to demand papers from American citizens, and it certainly has no
constitutional authority to do so.                           --Rep. Ron Paul

What have you done to the cat?  It looks half-dead.    --Schroedinger's wife

If the government can take a man's money without his consent, there is no
limit to the additional tyranny it may practise upon him; for, with his money,
it can hire soldiers to stand over him, keep him in subjection, plunder him
at discretion, and kill him if he resists.         --Lysander Spooner, 1852

The children who know how to think for themselves spoil the harmony of the
collective society that is coming, where everyone would be interdependent.
                                                          --John Dewey, 1899

Although the Buddhists will tell you that desire is the root of suffering,
my personal experience leads me to point the finger at system administration.
                                                           --Philip Greenspun

The PHP API is so huge and hideous that it appears to have been assembled
by a hundred monkeys sitting at keyboards, each equipped with the Perl man
page and an amphetamine tablet.           --Dan Sandler, http://dsandler.org

Oh, my darlin' had bronchitis, and she barfed up half a lung,
what came up looked quite amazing when she rolled it on her tongue.
                              --sung to the tune of "My Darling Clementine"

There can be but little liberty on earth while men worship a tyrant in heaven.
                                                   --Robert Green Ingersoll

Here I sit at work
Monitor, again, again
To keep our net safe                            --Security haiku, Judy Mead

Intruder Alert
Black channels of unknown song
Whisper through your walls                      --Security haiku, Mark Wood

Incident Response
How systems are compromised
Own the teacher's box                   --Security haiku, Willie Kupersanin

Think like a hacker
Enter the mind of darkness
To secure ourselves                      --Security haiku, Kerry Vosswinkel

UNIX and Windows
So secure, yet so open.
Which one gets hacked?                     --Security haiku, Carol Lee Rand

Packets swarming in
Configuration in doubt
Firewall class brings calm                     --Security haiku, Paul Ewing

The more corrupt the state, the more numerous the laws.           --Tacitus

Well, gentlemen, you are about to see a baked Appel.
                        --George Appel, executed in NY electric chair, 1928

I did not get my Spaghetti-Os.  I got spaghetti.  I want the press to
know this.        --G.W. Green, executed by lethal injection, Oklahoma, 1991

How about this for tomorrow's headline?  "French Fries".
                --James French, executed in Oklahoma electric chair, 1966

It is poor civic hygiene to install technologies that could someday
facilitate a police state.              --Bruce Schneier, "Secrets and Lies"

You can safely assume you've created God in your own image when it
turns out that God hates all the same people you do.             --unknown

Courage is not the absence of fear, but rather the judgment that
something else is more important than fear.               --Ambrose Redmoon

Students are finding out the hard way that online privacy is much like the
Chicago Bears' defense: just when you need it most, it completely disappears.
                                                          --Nate Anderson

The first step of emancipation is to learn to recognize when your
emotions are being manipulated for profit.                    --Loren Cobb

Would you rather go hunting with Dick Cheney or driving with Ted Kennedy?
                                              --Rush Limbaugh, 13 Feb 2006

I eat cotton wool to stay in shape.  I have slept with everyone on the planet.
There's a photograph of me doing unfortunate things with vegetables.
            --Kate Beckinsale, on Internet rumors she's seen written about her

50 Cent Says He Sees Eminem As Role Model   --actual news headline, 2006

People who relieve others of their money with guns are called robbers.
It does not alter the immorality of the act when the income transfer is
carried out by government.

People, we're not picking out furniture here, find a seat and get in it!
        --Southwest airlines flight attendant (SW has no assigned seating)

Ladies and gentlemen, we've reached cruising altitude and will be turning
down the cabin lights.  This is for your comfort and to enhance the
appearance of your flight attendants.                   --Continental pilot

Please be sure to take all of your belongings.  If you're going to leave
anything, please make sure it's something we'd like to have.
                                         --attributed to a flight attendant

Thank you for flying Delta Business Express.  We hope you enjoyed giving
us the business as much as we enjoyed taking you for a ride.
                                         --attributed to a flight attendant

Whoa, big fella. WHOA!      --attributed to a pilot landing at Ronald Reagan

Please take care when opening the overhead compartments because after that
landing, sure as hell everything has shifted.
                       --Northwest flight attendant, after a rough landing

To operate your seat belt, insert the metal tab into the buckle, and pull
tight.  It works just like every other seat belt; and, if you don't know
how to operate one, you probably shouldn't be out in public unsupervised.
                                              --Southwest Airlines employee

In the event of a sudden loss of cabin pressure, masks will descend from
the ceiling.  Stop screaming, grab the mask, and pull it over your face.
If you have a small child traveling with you, secure your mask before
assisting with theirs.  If you are traveling with more than one small
child, pick your favorite.               --attributed to a flight attendant

Weather at our destination is 50 degrees with some broken clouds, but we'll
try to have them fixed before we arrive.  Thank you, and remember, nobody
loves you, or your money, more than Southwest Airlines.
                                          --attributed to a Southwest pilot

Your seat cushions can be used for flotation; in the event of an emergency
water landing, please paddle to shore and take them with our compliments.
                                          --attributed to a flight attendant

As you exit the plane, make sure to gather all of your belongings.
Anything left behind will be distributed evenly among the flight attendants.
Please do not leave children or spouses.  --attributed to a flight attendant

We'd like to thank you folks for flying with us today.  And, the next time
you get the insane urge to go blasting through the skies in a pressurized
metal tube, we hope you'll think of US Airways.
                              --flight attendant's arrival announcement

Ladies and Gentlemen, if you wish to smoke, the smoking section on this
flight is on the wing and if you can light 'em, you can smoke 'em.
                                                  --Southwest Airline pilot

Q. Gary, all your responses must be oral, ok?
A. Oral.
Q. How old are you?
A. Oral.                                  --supposedly heard in a courtroom

She is not a "babe", she is a "breasted American."

She is not a "screamer", she is "vocally appreciative."

She is not "easy", she is "horizontally accessible."

She is not a "dumb blonde", she is a "light-haired detour off the
Information Superhighway."

She has not "been around", she is a "previously-enjoyed companion."

She is not an "airhead", she is "reality impaired."

She does not get "drunk", she gets "chemically inconvenienced"

She does not have "breast implants", she is "medically enhanced."

She does not "nag" you, she becomes "verbally repetitive."

She is not a "two-bit hooker", she is a "low-cost provider."

Leonardo diCaprio in Titanic: Despite acting like a plank of wood,
he still can't float.  --"Top Ten Most Welcome Movie Deaths", Stylus Magazine

Her face looks like it was gnawed out of wood by the
inhabitants of Easter Island.                             --Cintra Wilson

Leadership in a democratic society requires a willingness and ability to
challenge and change public opinion when it is based on misinformation,
no information, prejudice or stupidity.              --Robert J. Samuelson

Lawyers have feelings too, allegedly.  --bumper sticker

Knowledge is power, and power corrupts.  So study hard and be evil.
                                                             --bumper sticker

The last time politics and religion were mixed,
people were burned at the stake.                             --bumper sticker

If God is within, I hope he likes enchiladas.            --bumper sticker

Jesus saves.  He uses double coupons.            --bumper sticker

Jesus loves you.  But I'm his favorite.            --bumper sticker

I found Jesus.  He was behind the sofa the whole time.     --bumper sticker

Therapy is expensive.  Popping bubble wrap is cheap.  You choose.
                                                           --bumper sticker

Does the name Pavlov ring a bell?            --bumper sticker

Is it time for your medication or mine?            --bumper sticker

Dyslexics are teople poo.            --bumper sticker

People like you are the reason people like me need medication.  --bumper sticker

I doubt, therefore I might be.            --bumper sticker

I fish, therefore I lie.            --bumper sticker

Whenever I feel blue, I start breathing again.            --bumper sticker

On the journey of life, I choose the psycho path.            --bumper sticker

Carpe Diem: Seize the day.  Carp In Denim: Fish in pants.     --bumper sticker

Veni, Vidi, Velcro.  I came, I saw, I got stuck.            --bumper sticker

Practice safe lunch: Use a condiment.            --bumper sticker

Frankly, Scallop, I don't give a clam.            --bumper sticker

I can't remember if I'm the good twin or the evil one.        --bumper sticker

I need someone real bad.  Are you real bad?            --bumper sticker

If you're happy and you know it see a shrink.            --bumper sticker

If you can read this, I've lost the trailer.            --bumper sticker

Stoplights timed for 30 mph are also timed for 60 mph.    --bumper sticker

Follow that car, Godzilla - and step on it!            --bumper sticker

Don't honk or flash your lights, I'm deaf and blind.      --bumper sticker

Driver carries no cash.  He's married.            --bumper sticker

Save the trees, wipe your butt with an owl.            --bumper sticker

Vegetarian: Indian word for lousy hunter.            --bumper sticker

The government lies, and the press lies,
but in a democracy they aren't the same lies.           --Alexis A. Gilliland

A nation that draws too broad a difference between its scholars and its
warriors will have its thinking done by cowards, and its fighting done
by fools.                                                        --Thucydides

DMCA: Don't Make Content Accessible

No amount of artificial reinforcement can offset the natural
inequalities of human individuals.                     --Henry P. Fairchild

To fully express my feelings on the matter of the NTL customer service
voicemail system would require the invention of several new words.
                                                       --Daniel Barlow

I view Jesus the way I view Elvis.  I love the guy,
but some of the fan clubs scare me.                    --John Fugelsang

Q: How many people with ADD does it take to change a lightbulb?
A: HEY! Let's ride bikes!

I detest the word "blog."  It sounds like the
noise a bulimic makes after a hearty meal.     --Adam Penenberg, "Wired News"

You can turn a smart person into an idiot just by overworking him.
        --Prof. Peter Capelli, The Wharton School, University of Pennsylvania

God killed himself on the cross to save his own creation from his own wrath?
                                                                  --unknown

I have 10 chinese kids in my basement memorizing 0's and 1's.
                       --Favorite backup solutions on Slashdot, 31 May 2006

I've thought about becoming a defeatist, but I figure it can't possibly work.

Dig a moat the length of the US border with Mexico.  Use the dirt to shore
up the levees in New Orleans.  Fill the moat with Florida alligators.
Are there any other problems you'd like me to solve?
            --an email read by radio host Paul Harvey on the air, 23 May 2006

Mangled song lyric: All my luggage, I will send to you.
Actual lyric: All my loving, I will send to you.  (Beatles)

Mangled song lyric: Are you going to starve an old friend?
Actual lyric: Are you going to Scarborough Fair?  (Simon & Garfunkel)

Mangled song lyric: A weenie wack a weenie wack
Actual lyric: ooh wim-o-weh, ooh wim-o-weh  ("The Lion Sleeps Tonight")

Mangled song lyric: Baby come back, you can play Monopoly.
Actual lyric: Baby come back, you can blame it all on me.  ("Baby Come Back")

Mangled song lyric: Baking carrot biscuits.
Actual lyric: Taking care of business.  ("Takin Care Of Business")

Mangled song lyric: Tape it to a biscuit.
Actual lyric: Taking care of business.  ("Takin Care Of Business")

Mangled song lyric: Bald headed woman.
Actual lyric: More than a woman.  (Bee Gees)

Mangled song lyric: Four-legged woman.
Actual lyric: More than a woman.  (Bee Gees)

Mangled song lyric: Big girl, small fry.
Actual lyric: Big girls don't cry.  (The Four Seasons)

Mangled song lyric: Big ole Jed had a light on.
Actual lyric: Big old jet airliner.  (Steve Miller Band)

Mangled song lyric: Pick out Jed from the line-up.
Actual lyric: Big old jet airliner.  (Steve Miller Band)

Mangled song lyric: Dirty deeds and the thunder chiefs.
Actual lyric: Dirty deeds and they're done dirt cheap.  (ACDC)

Mangled song lyric: Dirty deeds and they're done to sheep.
Actual lyric: Dirty deeds and they're done dirt cheap.  (ACDC)

Mangled song lyric: Do the lucky lady.
Actual lyric: Dude looks like a lady.  (Aerosmith)

Mangled song lyric: Donuts make my brown eyes blue.
Actual lyric: Don't it make my brown eyes blue.  (Crystal Gale)

Mangled song lyric: Ghost man so close to me.
Actual lyric: Don't stand so close to me.  (The Police)

Mangled song lyric: Give me the Beach Boys and free my soul.
Actual lyric: Give me the beat, boys, and free my soul. ("Drift Away")

Mangled song lyric: Goin' to the Jack-O-Lantern, gonna get married.
Actual lyric: Goin' to the chapel and we're gonna get married.

Mangled song lyric: Ham on rye.
Actual lyric: I'm alright.  (Kenny Loggins)

Mangled song lyric: Hope the city voted for you.
Actual lyric: Hopelessly devoted to you.  (Grease soundtrack)

Mangled song lyric: I can't climb this ceiling any more.
Actual lyric: I can't fight this feeling anymore.  (REO Speedwagon)

Mangled song lyric: I, I, I, I sing in the light, sing in the light.
Actual lyric: Stayin' Alive, Stayin' alive.  (Bee Gees)

Mangled song lyric: I shot the Sheriff, but I didn't shoot him dead you see.
Actual lyric: I shot the Sheriff, but I didn't shoot the deputy. (Eric Clapton)

Mangled song lyric: I wonder, wonder, who rode the moo-cow now?
Actual lyric: I wonder, wonder, who wrote the book of love?
Mangled song lyric: (The Monotones "Book of Love")

Mangled song lyric: I'll never leave your pizza burning.
Actual lyric: I'll never be your beast of burden.  (Rolling Stones)

Mangled song lyric: I'm a pool hall ace.
Actual lyric: My poor heart aches.  (The Police "Every Step You Take")

Mangled song lyric: I'm just a squirrel.
Actual lyric: I'm just a girl.  (No Doubt)

Mangled song lyric: Just brush my teeth before you leave me, baby.
Actual lyric: Just touch my cheek before you leave me, baby.  (Juice Newton)

Mangled song lyric: Knee deep in doughnuts, children at your feet.
Actual lyric: Lady Madonna, children at your feet.  (The Beatles)

Mangled song lyric: Let Milo open the door.
Actual lyric: Let my love open the door.  (Pete Townsend, The Who)

Mangled song lyric: Life in the Vaseline.
Actual lyric: Life in the fast lane.  (Eagles)

Mangled song lyric: Looks like tomatoes
Actual lyric: Looks like we made it.  (Barry Mannilow)

Mangled song lyric: My woman is Okay-O.
Actual lyric: My woman from Tokyo.  (Deep Purple "Woman From Tokyo")

Mangled song lyric: Oh my darling lemon pie.
Actual lyric: Oh my darling, Clementine.  (traditional song)

Mangled song lyric: Only the good Tyrone.
Actual lyric: Only the good die young.  (Billy Joel)

Mangled song lyric: Pay for my Chrysler.
Actual lyric: Paperback writer.  (Beatles)

Mangled song lyric: Pretty Woman, won't you lick my leg.
Actual lyric: Pretty Woman, won't you look my way.  (Roy Orbison)

Mangled song lyric: Searching for my lost singer from Mars.
Actual lyric: Searching for my last shaker of salt. ("Margaritaville")

Mangled song lyric: She loved Cheez-Its, and America too.
Actual lyric: She loved Jesus, and America too.  (Tom Petty, "Free Fallin")

Mangled song lyric: She's got a chicken to ride.
Actual lyric: She's got a ticket to ride.  (Beatles)

Mangled song lyric: She's got a tick in her eye.
Actual lyric: She's got a ticket to ride.  (Beatles)

Mangled song lyric: Slow walkin' Walter.
Actual lyric: Smoke on the water.  (Deep Purple)

Mangled song lyric: Snow covered horses.
Actual lyric: Smoke on the water.  (Deep Purple)

Mangled song lyric: Stand on the rug.
Actual lyric: Band on the run.  (Wings)

Mangled song lyric: Stick your head in lotion.
Actual lyric: I second that emotion.  (Smokey Robinson & The Miracles)

Mangled song lyric: Sugar fried honey butt.
Actual lyric: Sugar Pie, Honey Bunch.  (Four Tops "Can't Help Myself")

Mangled song lyric: Sweet dreams are made of cheese.
Actual lyric: Sweet dreams are made of this.  (The Eurythmics)

Mangled song lyric: The ants are my friends, they're blowing in the wind.
Actual lyric: The answer, my friend, is blowing in the wind.  (Bob Dylan)

Mangled song lyric: The girl with colitis goes by.
Actual lyric: The girl with kaleidoscope eyes.  (Beatles)

Mangled song lyric: Then I saw her face, now I'm gonna leave her.
Actual lyric: Then I saw her face, now I'm a believer.  (The Monkees)

Mangled song lyric: There's a bathroom on the right.
Actual lyric: There's a bad moon on the rise.  (CCR)

Mangled song lyric: You made the rice, I made the gravy.
Actual lyric: You may be right, I may be crazy.  (Billy Joel)

Mangled song lyric: Wrapped up like a douche.
Actual lyric: Revved up like a deuce.  (Manfred Mann)

WARNING: The consumption of alcohol may leave you wondering what the
hell happened to your bra and panties.

I feel sorry for people who don't drink.  When they wake up in the
morning, that's as good as they're going to feel all day.  --Frank Sinatra

WARNING: The consumption of alcohol may create the illusion that you
are tougher, smarter, faster and better looking than most people.

When I read about the evils of drinking, I gave up reading.  --Henny Youngman

WARNING: The consumption of alcohol may lead you to think people are
laughing WITH you.

WARNING: The consumption of alcohol may cause you to think you can sing,
or dance, or both.

WARNING: The consumption of alcohol may cause you to tell your friends
over and over again that you love them.

WARNING: The consumption of alcohol may make you think you can logically
converse with prospective sexual partners without spitting.

Her face was a perfect oval, like a circle that had its two sides gently
compressed by a ThighMaster.  --bizarre expressions found in English papers

His thoughts tumbled in his head, making and breaking alliances like
underpants in a dryer without Cling Free.
                      --bizarre expressions found in English papers

She grew on him like she was a colony of E. coli, and he was room-temperature
Canadian beef.                  --bizarre expressions found in English papers

She had a deep, throaty, genuine laugh, like that sound a dog makes
just before it throws up.  --bizarre expressions found in English papers

He was as tall as a six-foot, three-inch tree.
                      --bizarre expressions found in English papers

The little boat gently drifted across the pond exactly the way a bowling
ball wouldn't.             --bizarre expressions found in English papers

McBride fell 12 stories, hitting the pavement like a Hefty bag filled
with vegetable soup.       --bizarre expressions found in English papers

The whole scene had an eerie, surreal quality, like when you're on
vacation in another city and Jeopardy comes on at 7:00 instead of 7:30.
                      --bizarre expressions found in English papers

Her hair glistened in the rain like a nose hair after a sneeze.
                      --bizarre expressions found in English papers

The hailstones leaped from the pavement, just like maggots when you
fry them in hot grease.     --bizarre expressions found in English papers

The star-crossed lovers raced across the grassy field toward each other
like two freight trains, one having left Cleveland at 6:36 pm traveling
at 55 mph, the other from Topeka at 4:19 pm at a speed of 35 mph.
                      --bizarre expressions found in English papers

They lived in a typical suburban neighborhood with picket fences that
resembled Nancy Kerrigan's teeth.
                      --bizarre expressions found in English papers

John and Mary had never met.  They were like two hummingbirds who had
also never met.             --bizarre expressions found in English papers

He fell for her like his heart was a mob informant, and she was the
East River.                 --bizarre expressions found in English papers

The plan was simple, like my brother-in-law Phil.  But unlike Phil,
this plan just might work.   --bizarre expressions found in English papers

The young fighter had a hungry look, the kind you get from not eating
for a while.                --bizarre expressions found in English papers

He was as lame as a duck.  Not the metaphorical lame duck, either,
but a real duck that was actually lame, maybe from stepping on a land
mine or something.          --bizarre expressions found in English papers

The ballerina rose gracefully en Pointe and extended one slender leg
behind her, like a dog at a fire hydrant.
                      --bizarre expressions found in English papers

It was an American tradition, like fathers chasing kids around with
power tools.                --bizarre expressions found in English papers

He was deeply in love.  When she spoke, he thought he heard bells,
as if she were a garbage truck backing up.
                      --bizarre expressions found in English papers

"Stewardesses" is the longest word typed with only the left hand and
"lollipop" with only the right.         --item for a lull in conversation

Our eyes are always the same size from birth, but our
nose and ears never stop growing.       --item for a lull in conversation

There are two words in the English language that have all five vowels in
order: "abstemious" and "facetious."    --item for a lull in conversation

"Typewriter" is the longest word that can be made using the letters
only on one row of the keyboard.        --item for a lull in conversation

A "jiffy" is an actual unit of time for 1/100th of a second.
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

A snail can sleep for three years.      --item for a lull in conversation

Babies are born without kneecaps.  They don't appear until the child
reaches 2 to 6 years of age.            --item for a lull in conversation

February 1865 is the only month in recorded history
not to have a full moon.                --item for a lull in conversation

In the last 4,000 years, no new animals have been domesticated.
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

If China's population walked past you, 8 abreast, the line would never end
because of the rate of reproduction.    --item for a lull in conversation

An average American will spend about 6 months of their entire life
waiting at red lights.                    --item for a lull in conversation

Leonardo Da Vinci invented the scissors.  --item for a lull in conversation

The cruise liner, QE2, moves only six inches for
each gallon of diesel that it burns.       --item for a lull in conversation

The winter of 1932 was so cold that Niagara Falls froze completely solid.
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

Women blink nearly twice as much as men.  --item for a lull in conversation

There are four boxes to be used in defense of liberty:
soap, ballot, jury, and ammo.  Please use in that order.    --Ed Howdershelt

I piss excellence and crap patriotism.
                               --Will Ferrell, on his NASCAR movie character

All parts should go together without forcing.  Therefore, if you can't
get them together again, there must be a reason.  By all means, do not
use a hammer.                                --IBM maintenance manual, 1975

Where I grew up, the population never changed.
Whenever a woman got pregnant, someone left town.                 --unknown

My strength is as the strength of 10 men,
for I am wired to the eyeballs on espresso.                       --unknown

Bumper-sticker on Mel Gibson's car: "Swerve If You Love Jesus"

Whenever I see a dog salivate I get an insatiable urge to ring a bell.

You don't help the poor by looking at their list of options and eliminating
the one they actually chose.

I contend that we are both atheists.  I just believe in one fewer god
than you do.  When you understand why you dismiss all the other possible
gods, you will understand why I dismiss yours.   --Sir Stephen Henry Roberts

He has all the virtues I dislike and none of the vices I admire.
                                                          --Winston Churchill

A modest little person, with much to be modest about.     --Winston Churchill

I have never killed a man, but I have read many obituaries
with great pleasure.                                      --Clarence Darrow

He has never been known to use a word that might send a reader to
  the dictionary.               --William Faulkner (about Ernest Hemingway)
Poor Faulkner.  Does he really think big emotions come from big words?
                                --Ernest Hemingway (about William Faulkner)

Thank you for sending me a copy of your book;
I'll waste no time reading it.                                 --Moses Hadas

He can compress the most words into the smallest idea of any man I know.
                                                             --Abraham Lincoln

I've had a perfectly wonderful evening.  But this wasn't it.  --Groucho Marx

He has no enemies, but is intensely disliked by his friends.  --Oscar Wilde

I am enclosing two tickets to the first night of my new play, bring a
  friend if you have one.         --George Bernard Shaw to Winston Churchill
Cannot possibly attend first night, will attend second if there is one.
                                  --Winston Churchill, in reply

Why doesn't Google have a logo change for Memorial Day?  Why do they choose
to do logos for other non-international holidays, but nothing for Veterans?
Maybe they forgot who made that choice possible.

Vodka + orange juice + milk of magnesia = Phillips Screwdriver

(_!_)       a regular ass
(__!__)     a fat ass                       --Ken Garen's emoticons for asses

(_!_)       a regular ass
(!)         a tight ass                     --Ken Garen's emoticons for asses

(_!_)       a regular ass
(_*_)       a sore ass                      --Ken Garen's emoticons for asses

(_!_)       a regular ass
(_o_)       an ass that's been around       --Ken Garen's emoticons for asses

(_!_)       a regular ass
(_x_)       kiss my ass                     --Ken Garen's emoticons for asses

(_!_)       a regular ass
(_X_)       leave my ass alone              --Ken Garen's emoticons for asses

(_!_)       a regular ass
(_zzz_)     a tired ass                     --Ken Garen's emoticons for asses

(_!_)       a regular ass
(_E=mc2_)   a smart ass                     --Ken Garen's emoticons for asses

(_!_)       a regular ass
(_$_)       money coming out of his ass     --Ken Garen's emoticons for asses

(_!_)       a regular ass
(_?_)       a dumb ass                      --Ken Garen's emoticons for asses

There are people, when given a task and a sheet of blank graph paper,
will flip it over expecting to find the instructions on the back side.
Finding none, they'll flip it back and ask for another sheet.     --unknown

"Sports fan names newborn son ESPN"               --AP headline, 7 Oct 2006

Cute Celebrity Couple Names #1:
Condoleeza Rice + actor Aaron Eckhart = RiceAaronE

Cute Celebrity Couple Names #2:
The Rock + Star Jones = RockStar

Cute Celebrity Couple Names #3:
Comedian Rita Rudner + actor David Duchovny = R2D2

Cute Celebrity Couple Names #4:
Naomi Watts + Paul Newman = WattsNew

Cute Celebrity Couple Names #5:
Rob Lowe + Winona Ryder = Lowryder

Cute Celebrity Couple Names #6:
Lance Armstrong + Ivanka Trump = Armstump

Cute Celebrity Couple Names #7:
Madonna + Marilyn Manson = MadMan

Cute Celebrity Couple Names #8:
Heath Ledger + Barbra Streisand = HeathBar

Cute Celebrity Couple Names #9:
Mira Sorvino + Macauley Culin = Myracul

Cute Celebrity Couple Names #10:
Paris Hilton + Andrew "Dice" Clay =  PariDice

Cute Celebrity Couple Names #11:
Courtney Love + rapper Warren G = LovenWar

Cute Celebrity Couple Names #12:
Orlando Bloom + Penelope Cruz = LanCruzer

I drank nine lattes.
I could bench press a tractor.
I must tinkle NOW!                          --haiku from Aunt Calamity

Piece of crap printer
Soars like a sparrow as I
Heave it off the bridge.                    --haiku from Aunt Calamity

Twenty billion gigs
Of brand new SCSI hard drive
Still won't be enough.                      --haiku from Aunt Calamity

Chattering deejay,
Drool is running down your chin.
You love your own voice.                    --haiku from Aunt Calamity

Velvet black, like coal,
Supper incinerated.
I could burn water.                         --haiku from Aunt Calamity

So you wear a tie.
Stop whining you big sissy.
You want pain? Try hose.                    --haiku from Aunt Calamity

Cursor skips and hops!
Is my workstation dying?
Nope, just some toast crumbs.               --haiku from Aunt Calamity

Ack! Blue screen of death.
My spreadsheet vanishes, poof.
Time for some straight gin.                 --haiku from Aunt Calamity

Powerful boss man,
We joke about your toupee
When you leave the room.                    --haiku from Aunt Calamity

Oh anchor bimbo,
The gleam from your whitened teeth
Gives me a migraine.                        --haiku from Aunt Calamity

Hot new hammer drill.
Solid granite turns to dust!
Sinus infection.                            --haiku from Aunt Calamity

Once, the web was grey.
No formatting to speak of.
Such peace and quiet.                       --haiku from Aunt Calamity

iPod changed my life.
Earbuds made me look so cool!
Now I am stone deaf.                        --haiku from Aunt Calamity

Naked man arrested for concealed weapon       --AP headline, 4 Nov 2006

He inherited some good instincts from his Quaker forebearers, but by
diligent hard work, he overcame them.    --James Reston, about Richard Nixon

Why is Santa so jolly?  He knows where all the bad girls live.

Whose cruel idea was it for the word "Lisp" to have "S" in it?

Liberty is the only thing you cannot have unless
you are willing to give it to others.                --William Allen White

Having a family is like having a bowling alley installed in your brain.
                                                       --Martin Mull

It is an established maxim and moral that he who makes an assertion
without knowing whether it is true or false is guilty of falsehood,
and the accidental truth of the assertion does not justify or excuse him.
                                                   --Abraham Lincoln

Much of the social history of the Western world, over the past three
decades, has been a history of replacing what worked with what sounded
good.                                              --Thomas Sowell (2006)

Managers would rather live with a problem they can't solve than with a
solution they don't fully understand or control.
                               --Eric Bonabeau, founder/CTO of Icosystems

One of the penalties for refusing to participate in politics
is that you end up being governed by your inferiors.              --Plato

To fly 7 million light years to O'Hare and then have to turn around and go
home because your gate was occupied is simply unacceptable.
                    --O'Hare tower controller, after UFO sighting 1 Jan 2007

If we got one-tenth of what was promised to us in these acceptance speeches,
there wouldn't be any inducement to go to heaven.              --Will Rogers

Fix reason firmly in her seat and call to her tribunal every fact,
every opinion.  Question with boldness even the existence of a God;
because, if there is one, he must more approve of the homage of reason,
than that of blindfolded fear.                           --Thomas Jefferson

If I had done everything they said I've done, I'd be dead.   --Ozzy Osbourne

It is not Unix's job to stop you from shooting your foot.  If you so
choose, then it's UNIX's job to deliver Mr. Bullet to Mr. Foot in
the most efficient way it knows.                             --Terry Lambert

Mathematicians stand on each other's shoulders while computer scientists
stand on each other's toes.                                  --R. W. Hamming

Those who can make you believe absurdities can make you commit atrocities.
                                                                 --Voltaire

Being a humanist means trying to behave decently without expectation
of rewards or punishment after you are dead.                --Kurt Vonnegut

His mother should have thrown him away and kept the stork.      --Mae West

Man, once surrendering his reason, has no remaining guard against absurdities
the most monstrous, and like a ship without rudder, is the sport of every
wind.  With such persons, gullibility, which they call faith, takes the helm
from the hand of reason and the mind becomes a wreck.     --Thomas Jefferson

As we enjoy great Advantages from the Inventions of others we should
be glad of an Opportunity to serve others by any Invention of ours,
and this we should do freely and generously.              --Ben Franklin

The people responsible for IE need to be shot, buried, dug up, shot again,
hung, drawn, quartered, cut up into tiny bits, stomped on, the bits sewn
back together, then shot once more.  For starters.
                --from a Kuroshin page describing Firefox and CSS problems

Apparently, your mother smoked, drank, and dropped acid during her pregnancy.
                                                  --seen on a bumper sticker

Nick: "Who brings a gun to a knife fight?"
Grissom: "The winner?"                            --seen on the original CSI

Brown's Law: If the shoe fits, it's ugly.

The only good bureaucrat is one with a pistol at his head.
Put it in his hand and it's goodbye to the Bill of Rights.    --H.L. Mencken

When you've got an elephant by the hind leg, and he's trying to run away,
it's best to let him run.                                  --Abraham Lincoln

I installed a Unix box at home, and now I get laid
about as often as I reboot.                                 --anonymous geek

There are no stupid questions, but there are a LOT of inquisitive idiots.

Our Father, who art in Heaven, how didja know my name?
                        --Lord's Prayer according to nursery school student

Transported to a surreal landscape, a young girl kills the first woman
she meets, and then teams up with three complete strangers to kill again.
                      --Rick Polito, describing the movie "The Wizard of Oz"

Not only is life a bitch, it has puppies.               --Adrienne E. Gusof

He has one of those goatees that tells you, "I am either a perverted madman,
the leader of a suicidal cult, or terrified you will not notice me."
                                  --Roger Ebert, reviewing "Death Sentence"

Do not separate text from historical background.  If you do, you will have
perverted and subverted the Constitution, which can only end in a distorted,
bastardized form of illegitimate government.                 --James Madison

On every question of construction [of the Constitution] let us carry
ourselves back to the time when the Constitution was adopted, recollect the
spirit manifested in the debates, and instead of trying what meaning may be
squeezed out of the text, or intended against it, conform to the probable
one in which it was passed.                               --Thomas Jefferson

Q: Why don't blind people go skydiving?
A: It scares the hell out of the dog.

Anal glaucoma: when you can't see your ass coming into work today.

I Hate Every Bone In Her Body 'Cept Mine   -- #12 Country song for 2006/2007

It's Hard to Kiss the Lips At Night That Chewed My Ass All Day
                                            -- #11 Country song for 2006/2007

If the Phone Don't Ring, You'll Know It's Me -- #10 Country song for 2006/2007

I Liked You Better Before I Got to Know You So Well
                                            -- #9 Country song for 2006/2007

I Still Miss You Baby, But My Aim's Gettin' Better
                                            -- #8 Country song for 2006/2007

I Wouldn't take her to a Dog Fight Cause I'm Afraid She'd Win
                                            -- #7 Country song for 2006/2007

I'll Marry You Tomorrow, But Let's Honeymoon Tonight
                                            -- #6 Country song for 2006/2007

I'm So Miserable Without You, It's like You're Still Here
                                            -- #5 Country song for 2006/2007

If I Had Shot You When I First Wanted To, I'd Be Out Of Prison By Now
                                            -- #4 Country song for 2006/2007

My Wife Ran Off With My Best Friend and I Sure Do Miss Him
                                            -- #3 Country song for 2006/2007

She Got the Ring and I Got the Finger       -- #2 Country song for 2006/2007

I Ain't Never Gone to Bed with Ugly Women But I've Sure Woke Up With a Few
                                            -- #1 Country song for 2006/2007

Concrete enemas a bad idea, doctors warn         --Weekly World News headline

Space aliens are sending their kids to earth's universities, and they're
making our top students look like idiots!        --Weekly World News headline

200 elves laid off as Santa moves operation to Honduras sweatshop!
                                                 --Weekly World News headline

Kitten accused of murder - sign the petition or Fluffy dies!
                                                 --Weekly World News headline

Why Moses wandered in the desert for 40 years - he lost the map!
                                                 --Weekly World News headline

Osama and Saddam adopt shaved baby ape           --Weekly World News headline

Meek sue to inherit the Earth!                   --Weekly World News headline

Aliens passing gas caused hole in ozone layer!   --Weekly World News headline

Loch Ness monster surfaces in Jersey bathtub     --Weekly World News headline

Carpal Tuna Syndrome - computer user's fingers turning into fish!
                                                 --Weekly World News headline

Q: What's the difference between a drunk and a stoner?
A: A drunk runs through the stop sign, a stoner waits for it to turn green.

There comes a time in the history of any project when it becomes
necessary to shoot the engineers and begin production.    --MacUser, Nov 1990

Gun Control: Belief that violent predators willing to ignore laws against
robbery, kidnapping, rape, and murder will obey a law telling them that
they cannot do so with a gun.

The great question, which I have not been able to answer,
is "What does a woman want?"                               --Sigmund Freud

Some people ask the secret of our long marriage.  We take time to go
to a restaurant two times a week.  A little candlelight, dinner, soft
music and dancing.  She goes Tuesdays, I go Fridays.        --Henny Youngman

I don't worry about terrorism.  I was married for two years.    --Sam Kinison

There's a way of transferring funds that is even faster
than electronic banking.  It's called marriage.          --James Holt McGavran

I've had bad luck with both my wives.
The first one left me, and the second one didn't.          --Patrick Murray

You know what I did before I married?  Anything I wanted.    --Henny Youngman

My wife and I were happy for 20 years.  Then we met.      --Rodney Dangerfield

A good wife always forgives her husband when she's wrong.      --Milton Berle

It's amazing being married to Victoria, because I'm in love with her...
and I can also go into her room and use all the body and facial creams.
                                                              --David Beckham

My mom had 10 kids.  It is therefore safe to assume that
she has had sex exactly 10 times in her life.
          --sarahhepola.com, "Second Interview With Mormon Teens", 10/24/2007

According to one park ranger, there is considerable overlap between the
intelligence of the smartest bears and the dumbest tourists.

What's the difference between a bright, inquisitive 5-year-old, and a dull,
stupid 19-year-old?  14 years of the British educational system.
                                                          --Bertrand Russell

There are only two places in the world where time takes
precedence over the job to be done: school and prison.    --William Glasser

What I resent is that the range of your vision
should be the limit of my action.                          --Henry James

Aim towards the Enemy.           --instruction printed on US Rocket Launcher

You, you, and you, panic.  The rest of you, come with me.
                                               --US Marine Corp Gunnery Sgt.

Any ship can be a minesweeper.  Once.               --Murphy's Laws of Combat

If you see a bomb technician running, follow him.           --USAF Ammo Troop

Though I Fly Through the Valley of Death, I Shall Fear No Evil,
For I am at 80,000 Feet and Climbing.
             --At the entrance to the old SR-71 operating base, Kadena, Japan

You've never been lost until you've been lost at Mach 3.
                                              --Paul F. Crickmore, test pilot

Progress in airline aviation: now a flight attendant can get a pilot pregnant.

I remember when sex was safe and flying was dangerous.

The Piper Cub is the safest airplane on Earth.  It can just barely kill you.
                              --Attributed to Max Stanley, Northrop test pilot

There is no reason to fly through a thunderstorm in peacetime.
                 --Sign over squadron ops desk at Davis-Monthan AFB, AZ, 1970

You know that your landing gear is up and locked when it takes
full power to taxi to the terminal.

Politicians cannot tell the truth.  The truth is always going to gain one
vote while losing another, and they want both votes.           --Jack L. Kane

"Programmers are from Mars, Customers are from Venus,
Project Managers are from Uranus".                    --title of blog posting

Postscript is an underappreciated yet superb general purpose computing
language.  It also excels at dirtying up otherwise clean sheets of paper.
                                                              --Don Lancaster

To take from one, because it is thought his own industry and that of
his fathers has acquired too much, in order to spare to others, who,
or whose fathers, have not exercised equal industry and skill, is to
violate arbitrarily the first principle of association, the guarantee to
everyone the free exercise of his industry and the fruits acquired by it.
                                                          --Thomas Jefferson

Tyranny is always better organized than freedom.        --Thomas Paine

Play "World of Warcraft" - keeping your virginity is worth $15.00 per month.

All the perplexities, confusions, and distresses in America arise, not
from defects in the Constitution or confederation, not from want of honor
or virtue, as much as from downright ignorance of the nature of coin,
credit, and circulation.                                       --John Adams

Keeping the yes-men and promoting group-think never killed anyone,
except a bunch of astronauts.          --discussion of ALF ERP failure

Darned confusing, unless you have that magic ingredient coffee, of which
I can pay you Tuesday for a couple pounds of extra-special grind today.
                                              --John Mitchell, 11 Jan 1999

Difference between airplanes and women #1:
Airplanes can kill you quickly; a woman takes her time.

Difference between airplanes and women #2:
Airplanes can be turned on by a flick of a switch.

Difference between airplanes and women #3:
Airplanes don't get mad if you "touch and go".

Difference between airplanes and women #4:
Airplanes don't object to a preflight inspection.

Difference between airplanes and women #5:
Airplanes operate inverted.

Difference between airplanes and women #6:
Airplanes come with manuals to explain their operation.

Difference between airplanes and women #7:
Airplanes have strict weight and balance limits.

Difference between airplanes and women #8:
Airplanes can be flown any time of the month.

Difference between airplanes and women #9:
Airplanes don't come with in-laws.

Difference between airplanes and women #10:
Airplanes don't care about how many other airplanes you've flown before.

Difference between airplanes and women #11:
Airplanes and pilots both arrive at the same time.

Difference between airplanes and women #12:
Airplanes don't complain if you hose them down.

Difference between airplanes and women #13:
Airplanes don't mind if you like to look at other airplanes.

Difference between airplanes and women #14:
Airplanes can get high without throwing up.

Difference between airplanes and women #15:
Airplanes expect to be tied down.

Difference between airplanes and women #16:
Airplanes don't comment on your piloting skills.

Difference between airplanes and women #17:
Airplanes don't whine unless something is really wrong.

Heisenberg may have slept here.

You cannot reason a person out of a position
he did not reason himself into in the first place.      --Jonathan Swift

No man has a good enough memory to be a successful liar.  --Abraham Lincoln

I don't like country music, but I don't mean to denigrate those who do.
And, for the people who like country music, denigrate means 'put down'.
                                                              --Bob Newhart

I have many sport injuries now, which in part, arise from suspended
intellectual judgments in periods of my life.                --Richard Vines

To sin by silence when they should protest makes cowards of men.
                                                    --Abraham Lincoln

C++: an octopus made by nailing extra legs onto a dog.  --Steve Taylor, 1998

Selfishness is not living as one wishes to live,
it is asking others to live as one wishes to live.          --Oscar Wilde

A government big enough to give you everything you want
is big enough to take away everything you have.          --Barry Goldwater

A free society is one where it is safe to be unpopular.  --Adlai Stevenson

US Marine Corps: Defending Berkeley's right to be a laughingstock since 1775

Congressmen who willfully take actions during wartime that damage morale
and undermine the military are saboteurs and should be arrested, exiled,
or hanged.                                            --Abraham Lincoln

No people in history have ever survived, who thought they could protect their
freedom by making themselves inoffensive to their enemies.  --Dean Acheson

The only good thing about Vista is that
even the viruses have compatibility issues.                  --Robert Wolfe

Americans used to roar like lions for liberty,
now they bleat like sheep for security.              --Norman Vincent Peale

It's pasta, Jim, but not as we know it.
              --"Bones" McCoy, describing spaghetti at a Chinese restaurant

The police say this is an isolated incident, but it could happen anywhere.
                                          --Los Angeles reporter, Oct 2008

A veteran is someone who, at one point in his life wrote a blank
check made payable to "The United States of America" in the amount of
"Up to and including my life".                                   --unknown

It's always in the last place you look: "Ancient Pyramid Found in Egypt"
                                             --Press Association (England)

Taliban Calls on Human Rights Groups to Stop Executions
                                                --Daily Telegraph (London)

News You Can Use: "Texting While Driving Is Bad, Doctors Agree" --Reuters

If Java had true garbage collection, most programs would
delete themselves upon execution.                          --Robert Sewell

Government has nothing to give to anybody that it doesn't first take from
somebody else.  In other words, all its relief and subsidy schemes are
merely ways of robbing Peter to support Paul.             --Henry Hazlitt

A rat can last longer without water than a camel.          --odd but true

The dot over the letter "i" is called a tittle.            --odd but true

A raisin dropped in a glass of fresh champagne will bounce up and down
continuously from the bottom of the glass to the top.       --odd but true

Chewing gum while peeling onions will keep you from crying.  --odd but true

During the chariot scene in "Ben Hur," a small red car can be seen in the
distance, and Heston's wearing a watch.                     --odd but true

Because metal was scarce, the Oscars given out during
World War II were made of wood.                             --odd but true

The very first bomb dropped by the Allies on Berlin in
World War II killed the only elephant in the Berlin Zoo.    --odd but true

Weatherman Willard Scott was the first Ronald McDonald.     --odd but true

Bruce Lee was so fast that they actually had to s-l-o-w film down so you
could see his moves.  That's the opposite of the norm.       --odd but true

The first CD pressed in the US was Bruce Springsteen's "Born in the USA."
                                                             --odd but true

The first product Motorola started to develop was a record player for
automobiles.  At that time, the most known player on the market was Victrola,
so they called themselves Motorola.                       --odd but true

By raising your legs slowly and lying on your back,
you cannot sink into quicksand.                              --odd but true

Charlie Chaplin won third prize in a Charlie Chaplin look-alike contest.
                                                             --odd but true

An old law in Bellingham, Washington, made it illegal for a woman to take
more than three steps backwards while dancing.               --odd but true

The Guinness Book of Records holds the record for being the book most
often stolen from public libraries.                         --odd but true

The glue on Israeli postage is certified kosher.            --odd but true

Bats always turn left when exiting a cave.                  --odd but true

In the 1400's, a man was not allowed to beat his wife with a stick any
thicker than his thumb.  Hence, "the rule of thumb".       --odd but true

The first couple to be shown in bed together on prime time TV
were Fred and Wilma Flintstone.                            --odd but true

The State with the highest percentage of people who walk to work is Alaska.
                                                            --odd but true

Intelligent people have more zinc and copper in their hair.  --odd but true

The first novel ever written on a typewriter: Tom Sawyer.    --odd but true

The San Francisco Cable cars are the only mobile National Monuments.
                                                            --odd but true

Half of all Americans live within 50 miles of their birthplace. --odd but true

If you spell out numbers, you'd get to "one thousand" before
you would find the letter "A".                              --odd but true

The only food that doesn't spoil is honey.                  --odd but true

Wal-Mart Worker Dies in Stampede at New York Store
                        --Bloomberg headline, 28 Nov ("Black Friday") 2008

I did not hit you.  I simply high-fived your face.      --seen on a t-shirt

Some people are like Slinkies.  They're useless, but you can't help smiling
when you see one tumble down the stairs.

It was luxuries like air conditioning that brought down
the Roman Empire.  Their windows were always shut,
so they couldn't hear the barbarians coming.            --Garrison Keillor

Bad or missing mouse.  Spank the cat? (Y/N)             --odd Windows errors

Error reading FAT record: Try the SKINNY one? (Y/N)     --odd Windows errors

WinErr 16547: LPT1 not found. Use backup (PENCIL.SYS)   --odd Windows errors

Collaboration?
Not in my cubicle, dude.
Better luck next time.             --Content management haiku, Denise Harry

Old musicians never die, they just decompose.

Facts are stubborn things; and whatever may be our wishes,
our inclination, or the dictates of our passions,
they cannot alter the state of facts and evidence.              --John Adams

Blind faith is an ironic gift to return to the Creator of human intelligence.

American beer is the first successful attempt at diluting water. --Georg Hackl

I wish my bride would give away her stuffing recipe.  Not reveal,
not share, but just give it away and admit that it isn't working.
                                        --John Bordeaux <jbordeaux@gmail.com>

The only statistics you can trust are those you falsified yourself.
                                                         --Winston Churchill

Being powerful is like being a lady.  If you have to tell people you are,
you aren't.                                              --Margaret Thatcher

This is worse than divorce; I lost half my net worth but I still have my wife.
                      --UK Fund Manager on the subject of the credit crunch

It's only when the tide goes out that you learn who's been swimming naked.
                                                          --Warren Buffett

It's amazing how much "mature wisdom" resembles being too tired.
                                                      --Robert A. Heinlein

If there is no self, whose arthritis is this?  --sayings of the Jewish Buddha

Be here now.
Be someplace else later.
Is that so complicated?                        --sayings of the Jewish Buddha

Drink tea and nourish life;
with the first sip, joy;
with the second sip, satisfaction;
with the third sip, peace;
with the fourth, a Danish.                     --sayings of the Jewish Buddha

Wherever you go, there you are.
Your luggage is another story.                 --sayings of the Jewish Buddha

Accept misfortune as a blessing.  Do not wish for perfect health, or a life
without problems.  What would you talk about?  --sayings of the Jewish Buddha

The journey of a thousand miles begins with a single Oy.
                                               --sayings of the Jewish Buddha

There is no escaping karma.
In a previous life, you never called, you never wrote, you never visited.
And whose fault was that?                      --sayings of the Jewish Buddha

Zen is not easy.
It takes effort to attain nothingness.
And then what do you have?
Bupkis.                                        --sayings of the Jewish Buddha

The Tao does not speak or blame.
The Tao does not take sides or have expectations.
The Tao demands nothing of others.
The Tao is not Jewish.                         --sayings of the Jewish Buddha

Breathe in. Breathe out.
Forget this and attaining Enlightenment will be the least of your problems.
                                               --sayings of the Jewish Buddha

Let your mind be as a floating cloud.
Let your stillness be as a wooded glen.
And sit up straight.
You'll never meet the Buddha with such rounded shoulders.
                                               --sayings of the Jewish Buddha

Deep inside you are ten thousand flowers.
Each flower blossoms ten thousand times.
Each blossom has ten thousand petals.
You might want to see a specialist.            --sayings of the Jewish Buddha

Be aware of your body.
Be aware of your perceptions.
Keep in mind that not every physical sensation
is a symptom of a terminal illness.            --sayings of the Jewish Buddha

The Torah says, Love your neighbor as yourself.
The Buddha says, There is no self.
So, maybe we're off the hook.                  --sayings of the Jewish Buddha

Johnny Knoxville Detained for Bringing Grenade Into Airport
                                                      --headline, Jan 20 2009

If you're at a Thai restaurant with a Thai person who's ordering food in Thai,
and she asks you if you like your food spicy, think twice before answering.
                                                      --Ray Chen, Microsoft

Oh.  Arrogance and stupidity in the same package, how efficient of you.
                                                            --Londo Molari

Security is increased by designing for the way humans actually behave.
                                                            --Jakob Nielsen

The spirit of Richard Stallman will smile upon you.  Y'know, after he dies.
Of beard cancer.              --Catherine Devlin <catherine.devlin@gmail.com>

Build a man a fire, and he'll be warm for a day.  Set a man on fire,
and he'll be warm for the rest of his life.                 --Terry Pratchett

My problem lies in reconciling my gross habits with my net income.
                                                            --Errol Flynn

FREE PUPPIES:  1/2 Cocker Spaniel, 1/2 sneaky neighbor's dog.
                                                    --seen in the want-ads

FOUND DIRTY WHITE DOG:  Looks like a rat.
Been out awhile.  Better be a big reward.           --seen in the want-ads

COWS, CALVES: NEVER BRED.  Also 1 gay bull for sale.   --seen in the want-ads

WEDDING DRESS FOR SALE:  Worn once by mistake.  Call Stephanie.
                                                    --seen in the want-ads

Posterity, you will know how much it cost the present generation to preserve
your freedom.  I hope you will make good use of it.  If you do not, I
shall repent in heaven that ever I took half the pains to preserve it.
                                                        --John Quincy Adams

Microsoft is now talking about the digital nervous system.  I guess I'd
be nervous if my system was built on their technology.      --Scott McNealy

Meetings are indispensable when you don't want to do anything.
                                                    --John Kenneth Galbraith

Alcohol, Tobacco and Firearms should be a convenience store,
*not* a government agency.                  --seen on Michelle Malkin's blog

Opportunity is most often missed by people because it's
dressed in overalls and looks like work.                --Thomas Alva Edison

The world is full of fools and faint hearts; and yet every one has courage
enough to bear the misfortunes, and wisdom enough to manage the affairs
of his neighbor.                              --Poor Richard's Almanac, 1743

Never confuse motion with action.                      --Benjamin Franklin

Men, it has been well said, think in herds; it will be seen that they go
mad in herds, while they only recover their senses slowly, and one by one.
                                                            --Charles Mackay

"Manicurian Candidate": Someone full of rot but, for the sake of appearance,
is nicely groomed, speaks eloquently and has manicured fingernails.

ABC: Anybody But Conservatives, or the All Barack Channel.

Someday we'll look back on all this and plow into a parked car.

I'll keep my freedom, my money and my guns.  You keep the change.
                                    --sign at a Texas rally, 15 April 2009

If you're going to kill each other, do it outside.  I just finished cleaning.
                            --How mom taught me TO APPRECIATE A JOB WELL DONE

You better pray that'll come out of the carpet.  --How mom taught me RELIGION

Straighten up or I'm going to knock you into the middle of next week.
                                     --How mom taught me about TIME TRAVEL

Because I said so, that's why.                  --How mom taught me LOGIC

If you fall out of that swing and break your neck,
you're not going to the store with me.        --How mom taught me MORE LOGIC

Make sure you wear clean underwear, in case you're in an accident.
                                             --How mom taught me FORESIGHT

Keep crying, and I'll give you something to cry about.
                                                 --How mom taught me IRONY

Shut your mouth and eat your supper.       --How mom taught me about OSMOSIS

Just look at that dirt on the back of your neck.
                                     --How mom taught me about CONTORTIONISM

You'll sit there until all that spinach is gone.
                                           --How mom taught me about STAMINA

Your room looks like a tornado went through it.
                                           --How mom taught me about WEATHER

If I told you once, I've told you a million times, don't exaggerate.
                                         --How mom taught me about HYPOCRISY

I brought you into this world, and I can take you out.
                                      --How mom taught me the CIRCLE OF LIFE

Stop acting like your father.  --How mom taught me about BEHAVIOR MODIFICATION

There are millions of less fortunate children in this world who
don't have wonderful parents like you do.      --How mom taught me about ENVY

Just wait until we get home.           --How mom taught me about ANTICIPATION

You're gonna get it when you get home.    --How mom taught me about RECEIVING

If you don't stop crossing your eyes, they'll get stuck that way.
                                          --How mom taught me MEDICAL SCIENCE

Put your sweater on; don't you think I know when you're cold?
                                                      --How mom taught me ESP

When that lawn mower cuts off your toes, don't come running to me.
                                                    --How mom taught me HUMOR

If you don't eat your vegetables, you'll never grow up.
                                   --How mom taught me HOW TO BECOME AN ADULT

You're just like your father.                    --How mom taught me GENETICS

Shut that door behind you.  Were you born in a barn?
                                           --How mom taught me about my ROOTS

When you get to be my age, you'll understand.      --How mom taught me WISDOM

One day you'll have kids, and I hope they turn out just like you.
                                            --How mom taught me about JUSTICE

The only time you have too much fuel is when you're on fire.
                                                    --Murphy's Laws of Combat

When one engine fails on a twin-engine airplane you always have enough
power left to get you to the scene of the crash.    --Murphy's Laws of Combat

Most users (myself included) spend most of their time in front of a computer
in a kind of fuzzy autopilot mode, and anything that creates ripples on that
placid lake of unawareness is going to be noticed as a disproportionately
significant problem.                 --David Harris, creator of Pegasus Mail

He that would make his own liberty secure must guard even his enemy from
oppression; for if he violates this duty he establishes a precedent that
will reach to himself.                                      --Thomas Paine

Vincent Van Gogh's dizzy aunt: Verti Gogh

Vincent Van Gogh's brother who ate prunes: Gotta Gogh

Vincent Van Gogh's constipated uncle: Cant Gogh

Vincent Van Gogh's brother who worked at a convenience store: Stopn Gogh

Vincent Van Gogh's grandfather from Yugoslavia: U Gogh

Vincent Van Gogh's cousin from Illinois: Chica Gogh

Vincent Van Gogh's magician uncle: Wherediddy Gogh

Vincent Van Gogh's Mexican cousin: Amee Gogh

Vincent Van Gogh's Mexican cousin's American half-brother: Grin Gogh

Vincent Van Gogh's ballroom-dancing aunt: Tan Gogh

Vincent Van Gogh's sister who loved disco: Go Gogh

Vincent Van Gogh's nephew who drove a stagecoach: Wellsfar Gogh

Vincent Van Gogh's bird-lover uncle: Flamin Gogh

Vincent Van Gogh's nephew psychoanalyst: E Gogh

Vincent Van Gogh's fruit-loving cousin: Man Gogh

Vincent Van Gogh's aunt who taught positive thinking: Wayto Gogh

Vincent Van Gogh's little bouncy nephew: Poe Gogh

Vincent Van Gogh's niece who travels the country in a van: Winnie BayGogh

Is your cucumber bitter?  Throw it away.  Are there briars in your path?
Turn aside.  That is enough.  Do not go on to say, "Why were things of
this sort ever brought into the world?"                  --Marcus Aurelius

When we get piled upon one another in large cities, as in Europe,
we shall become as corrupt as Europe.                 --Thomas Jefferson

The democracy will cease to exist when you take away from those who are
willing to work and give to those who would not.      --Thomas Jefferson

It is incumbent on every generation to pay its own debts as it goes.
A principle which if acted on would save one-half the wars of the world.
                                                      --Thomas Jefferson

I predict future happiness for Americans if they can prevent the
government from wasting the labors of the people under the pretense
of taking care of them.                               --Thomas Jefferson

My reading of history convinces me that most bad government
results from too much government.                     --Thomas Jefferson

No free man shall ever be debarred the use of arms.   --Thomas Jefferson

The strongest reason for the people to retain the right to keep and bear arms
is, as a last resort, to protect themselves against tyranny in government.
                                                      --Thomas Jefferson

Suppose we've chosen the wrong god.  Every time we go
to church we're just making him madder and madder.         --Homer Simpson

It is the duty of every staff officer to get inside the head
of their commander.  Normally there is plenty of room.
           --Allegedly from the Staff Officer's handbook of the British Army

SUVs are gross because they're the solution to a gross problem:
how to make minivans look more masculine.                      --Paul Graham

We all want progress, but if you're on the wrong road, progress means
doing an about-turn and walking back to the right road; in that case,
the man who turns back soonest is the most progressive.        --C. S. Lewis

The very powerful and the very stupid have one thing in common:
they don't alter their views to fit the facts.  They alter the
facts to fit the views, which can be uncomfortable if you happen
to be one of the facts that needs altering.                   --Doctor Who

Bill Gates is a monocle and a Persian Cat away
from being the villain in a James Bond movie.                --Dennis Miller

If you cannot grok the overall structure of a program while taking a
shower, e.g., with no external memory aids, you are not ready to code it.
                                                            --Richard Pattis

Do not suppose that abuses are eliminated by destroying the object which
is abused.  Men can go wrong with wine and women.  Shall we then prohibit
and abolish women?                                          --Martin Luther

Just realized that I've been wearing my underwear backwards all day.
Aw, swizzle-sticks.   --tweet from Steve Jensen, Twitter employee, May 2009

My Bonnie looked into a gas tank, the height of its contents to see.
She lit a small match to assist her.  Oh, bring back my Bonnie to me.
                                            --by someone without a fuel gauge

I invented the term "Object-Oriented",
and I can tell you I did not have C++ in mind.                 --Alan Kay

Democracy is the theory that the common people know
what they want and deserve to get it good and hard.        --H.L. Mencken

Democracy never lasts long.  It soon wastes, exhausts and murders itself.
There never was a democracy yet that did not commit suicide.    --John Adams

Better not take a dog on the space shuttle, because if he sticks his head
out when you're coming home his face might burn up.
                                           --"Deep Thoughts", by Jack Handey

When a girl refuses to give you her phone number, her assistant's phone
number or her personal e-mail address, and only gives you her assistant's
e-mail address, you're not halfway in the sack.

If caught with pants down, redefine pants.            --pissed-off KDE user

OBAMA: One Big Ass Mistake, America                       --seen on t-shirt

What can be asserted without proof can be dismissed without proof.
                                                     --Christopher Hitchens

It is as useless to argue with those who have renounced the
use of reason as to administer medication to the dead.      --Thomas Jefferson

We're upping our standards, so up yours.  --Pat Paulsen for President, 1988

The RAID was dirty in addition to being degraded (insert "your mom" joke here).
                        --Mike Markley on Slashdot discussing Linux drives

He's beautiful.  He's the next Elizabeth Taylor.   --Megan Fox, about Zac Efron

If someone were to tell me she's a vampire, I'd go "Yeah, ok, totally".
                                            --Megan Fox, about Angelina Jolie

We're all victims of our own gene-pool.  Someone apparently peed in yours.
                                       --Walter Bishop, "Fringe", 24 Sep 2009

Plan not for your enemy's intentions, but for his capabilities.  --Clausewitz

Why David Letterman finally married Regina Lasko #10:
Found a marriage license in his Cracker Jacks.

Why David Letterman finally married Regina Lasko #9:
Had to act now to take advantage of sale at David's Bridal.

Why David Letterman finally married Regina Lasko #8:
They'd done everything else there is to do in Montana.

Why David Letterman finally married Regina Lasko #7:
Casino threw in free shrimp cocktail and $25 in chips with wedding.

Why David Letterman finally married Regina Lasko #6:
Two words: Cake tasting.

Why David Letterman finally married Regina Lasko #5:
In these recessionary times, wanted a free new chafing dish.

Why David Letterman finally married Regina Lasko #4:
Didn't want to be like Brangelina. They're just wacky.

Why David Letterman finally married Regina Lasko #3:
Finally got down to his buff brides goal weight.

Why David Letterman finally married Regina Lasko #2:
Sick of his son calling him "Uncle Dave."

Why David Letterman finally married Regina Lasko #1:
Got tired of waiting for Paul Shaffer to make him an honest man.

Why David Letterman confessed to affairs on "The Late Show" #10:
Needed a sex scandal like Mark Sanford so I could get my own Top 10 list.

Why David Letterman confessed to affairs on "The Late Show" #9:
Couldn't cough up the $2 mil ever since I paid Oprah to come on my show.

Why David Letterman confessed to affairs on "The Late Show" #8:
Wanted to show Bill Clinton how it's done.

Why David Letterman confessed to affairs on "The Late Show" #7:
It's easier than writing a memoir.

Why David Letterman confessed to affairs on "The Late Show" #6:
Hoping to get my story retold on "Law & Order."

Why David Letterman confessed to affairs on "The Late Show" #5:
Wanted to take over Regis' title of Sexiest Talk Show Host.

Why David Letterman confessed to affairs on "The Late Show" #4:
I hear Lady Gaga likes the bad boys.

Why David Letterman confessed to affairs on "The Late Show" #3:
Needed a ratings boost against "The Tonight Show" ... oh, wait. Never mind.

Why David Letterman confessed to affairs on "The Late Show" #2:
Jon and Kate were hogging the spotlight. When is my turn on "Larry King"?

Why David Letterman confessed to affairs on "The Late Show" #1:
My Twitter account was down.

If you're right 90% of the time, why quibble about the remaining 3%?

Let others praise ancient times; I am glad I was born in these.
                                                    --Ovid (43 BC - 18 AD)

Whenever there is in any country, uncultivated lands and unemployed poor,
it is clear that the laws of property have been so far extended as to
violate natural right.  The earth is given as a common stock for man to
labour and live on.                                  --Thomas Jefferson, 1785

At Georgia Southern, we don't cheat.  That costs money and we don't have any.
                                        --Erk Russell, Georgia Southern coach

After you retire, there's only one big event left, and I ain't
ready for that.                         --Bobby Bowden, Florida State coach

The man who complains about the way the ball
bounces is likely to be the one who dropped it.  --Lou Holtz, Arkansas coach

When you win, nothing hurts.                    --Joe Namath, Alabama coach

Motivation is simple.  You eliminate those who are not motivated.
                                                --Lou Holtz, Arkansas coach

A school without football is in danger of
deteriorating into a medieval study hall.   --Frank Leahy, Notre Dame coach

Nothing cleanses your soul like getting the hell kicked out of you.
                                            --Woody Hayes, Ohio State coach

I don't expect to win enough games to be put on NCAA probation.  I just want
to win enough to warrant an investigation.      --Bob Devaney, Nebraska coach

In Alabama, an atheist is someone who doesn't believe in Bear Bryant.
                                                --Wally Butts, Georgia coach

You can learn more character on the two-yard line than anywhere else in life.
                                                --Paul Dietzel, LSU coach

It's kind of hard to rally around a math class.  --Bear Bryant, Alabama coach

No, but you can see it from here.   --Lou Holtz, Arkansas coach, when asked if
                                      Fayetteville was the end of the world

I make my practices real hard because if a player is a quitter,
I want him to quit in practice, not in a game.   --Bear Bryant, Alabama coach

There's one sure way to stop us from scoring -
give us the ball near the goal line.            --Matty Bell, SMU coach

Lads, you're not to miss practice unless your parents died or you died.
                                            --Frank Leahy, Notre Dame coach

I never graduated from Iowa, but I was only there for two terms -
Truman's and Eisenhower's.                      --Alex Karras, Iowa coach

My advice to defensive players: Take the shortest route to the ball
and arrive in a bad humor.                  --Bowden Wyatt, Tennessee coach

I could have been a Rhodes Scholar, except for my grades.
                                       --Duffy Daugherty, Michigan State coach

Always remember, Goliath was a 40-point favorite over David.
                                                --Shug Jordan, Auburn coach

They cut us up like boarding-house pie.  And that's real small pieces.
                                                --Darrell Royal, Texas coach

Show me a good and gracious loser, and I'll show you a failure.
                                            --Knute Rockne, Notre Dame coach

They whipped us like a tied-up goat.        --Spike Dykes, Texas Tech coach

I asked Darrell Royal, the coach of the Texas Longhorns, why he didn't
recruit me and he said: "Well, Walt, we took a look at you and you weren't
any good."                              --Walt Garrison, Oklahoma State coach

Son, you've got a good engine, but your hands aren't on the steering wheel.
                                        --Bobby Bowden, Florida State coach

Football is not a contact sport, it's a collision sport.
Dancing is a contact sport.           --Duffy Daugherty, Michigan State coach

After USC lost 51-0 to Notre Dame, postgame message to his team:
"All those who need showers, take them."    --John McKay, USC coach

If lessons are learned in defeat, our team is getting a great education.
                                            --Murray Warmath, Minnesota coach

The only qualifications for a lineman are to be big and dumb.  To be a back,
you only have to be dumb.                   --Knute Rockne, Notre Dame coach

Oh, we played about like three tons of buzzard puke this afternoon.
                                            --Spike Dykes, Texas Tech coach

It isn't necessary to see a good tackle.  You can hear it.
                                            --Knute Rockne, Notre Dame coach

We live one day at a time and scratch where it itches.
                                            --Darrell Royal, U. of Texas coach

Football is only a game.  Spiritual things are eternal.  Nevertheless,
Beat Texas         --Seen on a church sign in Arkansas prior to the 1969 game

We didn't tackle well today but we made up for it by not blocking.
                     --Wilson Matthews, Little Rock Central High School coach

Three things can happen when you throw the ball, and two of them are bad.
                                           --Darrell Royal, U. of Texas coach

I've found that prayers work best when you have big players.
                                            --Knute Rockne, Notre Dame coach

Gentlemen, it is better to have died as a small boy
than to fumble this football.                              --John Heisman

From 0 to "what seems to be the problem officer" in 8.3 seconds.
                                                --Ad for the new VW Corrado

Carter got his 2nd term, NOW can we move on?          --2012 campaign slogan

Only the Government would believe that you could cut a foot off the bottom
of a blanket, sew it on the top, and have a longer blanket.
                            --Indian being told about Daylight Savings Time

I bought me a case of beer and drank it obama self.
                                         --How rednecks use the word "OBAMA"

You managed to impersonate Diana Ross and a strangled cat at the same time.
                --Tom Bergeron to another judge on "Dancing with the Stars"

I'm wearing sunglasses at night!  You know who does that?  No-talent douchebags!
              --Dean, when a fallen angel forces him and brother Sam to be
                in a "CSI: Miami"-style procedural cop show on "Supernatural"

Lois, I think people would prefer a knock to "Pants on".
              --Clark Kent chastising Lois Lane for her preferred way of
                entering a room on "Smallville".

I have very vague knowledge about Tibet, except that it needs to be freed.
                                    --Erin, on "America's Next Top Model"

This guy's head is so far up his ass that you couldn't fit a bullwhip
up there.            --Ann Coulter, referring to NEA head Rocco Landesman

Where'd you learn to give a pep talk?  Guantanamo?     --Blair, "Gossip Girl"

I don't think any one decision makes your life, unless you accidentally
invent some kind of zombie virus or something.         --Finn, on "Glee"

Is your wig squeezing your brain too tight, heifer?
                                --heard on "The Real Housewives of Atlanta"

"You superstitious?"
"I'm a little stitious."        --heard on "NCIS"

You can assist us in removing the scalp.  Once you get
used to the smell, it's really quite something.        --heard on "Fringe"

Don't defend New Jersey.  It's marginally better than Iraq.
That's the best you can say about it.                    --heard on "Mercy"

The chocolate eclair I just consumed was excellent, although later in life I
may require specially placed mirrors to assist with certain bodily functions.
                                            --Matt Moore, KM mailing list

The reason why worry kills more people than work is that
more people worry than work.                               --Robert Frost

Oh Christmas tree, oh Christmas tree, from hell's heart I stab at thee.
                                          --A very Kaaahn! Christmas

I haven't been a civilian since I was 17 and I'd be out of my lane if I
were to answer your question.
                  --General Stanley McChrystal, when asked something about
                    the civilian processes at a Pakistan Strategy hearing

Our brains have evolved enough to get us out of the rain, find where the
berries are and keep us from getting killed.  They didn't evolve enough
to help us grasp really large numbers or to look at things in 100,000
dimensions.                              --Ronald L. Graham, Mathematician

Realize that the doctor's fight against socialized medicine is your fight.
You can't socialize the doctors without socializing the patients.
                                                        --Ronald Reagan

Unionism seldom, if ever, uses such power as it has to insure better work;
almost always it devotes a large part of that power to safeguarding bad work.
                                                       --H.L. Mencken

I'm really, really open with my son.  I don't want my son to become like,
I mean, no offense, but like gay when he's older, so like I'm always naked
in front of him now.                     --Amanda, on "Make Me a Supermodel"

UNTESTED!  It may molest your pets and drink all your beer.
                --Warning by Linus Torvalds for a semaphore kernel patch

Gary Kline: I do not understand LISP very well.
Byung-Hee Hwang: LISP is from Tao.  That's why it is not easy for people.
                --seen on the freebsd-questions@freebsd.org mailing list

Lady Astor: Winston, if you were my husband, I'd poison your tea.
Winston Churchill: Nancy, if you were my wife, I'd drink it.

Parliament: Sir, you will either die on the gallows or of some
  unspeakable disease.
Disraeli: That depends, Sir, whether I embrace your policies or your mistress.

He had delusions of adequacy.              --Walter Kerr

I have never killed a man, but I have read many obituaries with great
pleasure.  --Clarence Darrow

He has never been known to use a word that might send a reader to the
dictionary.  --William Faulkner (about Ernest Hemingway).

Thank you for sending me a copy of your book; I'll waste no time reading it.
                                                        --Moses Hadas

I feel so miserable without you; it's almost like having you here.
                                                            --Stephen Bishop

He is a self-made man and worships his creator.  --John Bright

I've just learned about his illness.  Let's hope it's nothing trivial.
                                                            --Irvin S. Cobb

He is not only dull himself; he is the cause of dullness in others.
                                                            --Samuel Johnson

He is simply a shiver looking for a spine to run up.        --Paul Keating

In order to avoid being called a flirt, she always yielded easily.
                                                --Charles, Count Talleyrand

He loves nature in spite of what it did to him.             --Forrest Tucker

Why do you sit there looking like an envelope without any address on it?
                                                            --Mark Twain

His mother should have thrown him away and kept the stork.  --Mae West

Some cause happiness wherever they go; others, whenever they go.
                                                            --Oscar Wilde

He uses statistics as a drunken man uses lamp-posts;
for support rather than illumination.              --Andrew Lang (1844-1912)

He has Van Gogh's ear for music.    --Billy Wilder

I like my women like I like my coffee: purchased at above-market rates
from eco-friendly organic farming cooperatives in Latin America.

Dijkstra probably hates me.             --Linus Torvalds, in kernel/sched.c

A grasshopper walks into a bar.
Bartender:   "Hey, we have a drink named after you."
Grasshopper: "Really? You have a drink named Murray?"         --unknown

Now, more than ever before, the people are responsible for the character
of their Congress.  If that body be ignorant, reckless, and corrupt,
it is because the people tolerate ignorance, recklessness, and corruption.
                                            --President James Garfield, 1876

Surely something must be terribly wrong with a man who seems to be far
more concerned with a Jew building a house in Israel than with Muslims
building a nuclear bomb in Iran.                        --Burt Prelutsky

A search of his car uncovered pornography, a home-made sex aid, women's
stockings and a Jack Russell terrier.
                      --Article in The Herald (Australia), 19 Nov 2008

Sometimes, when I look at my children, I say to myself, "Lillian, you
should have remained a virgin."  --Lillian Carter (mother of Jimmy Carter)

I had a rose named after me and I was very flattered, but I was not
pleased to read the description in the catalogue: "No good in a bed,
but fine against a wall".                             --Eleanor Roosevelt

Last week, I stated this woman was the ugliest woman I had ever seen.  I have
since been visited by her sister, and now wish to withdraw that statement.
                                                            --Mark Twain

The secret of a good sermon is to have a good beginning and a good ending,
and to have the two as close together as possible.    --George Burns

Santa Claus has the right idea: visit people once a year.    --Victor Borge

Be careful about reading health books.  You may die of a misprint.
                                                            --Mark Twain

I was married by a judge.  I should have asked for a jury.  --Groucho Marx

My wife has a slight impediment in her speech.
Every now and then she stops to breathe.                    --Jimmy Durante

I have never hated a man enough to give his diamonds back.  --Zsa Zsa Gabor

Only Irish coffee provides in a single glass all four
essential food groups: alcohol, caffeine, sugar and fat.    --Alex Levine

My luck is so bad that if I bought a cemetery, people would stop dying.
                                                        --Rodney Dangerfield

Money can't buy you happiness, but it does bring you a
more pleasant form of misery.                           --Spike Milligan

Until I was thirteen, I thought my name was "SHUT UP".  --Joe Namath

I don't feel old.  Actually, I don't feel anything until noon.
Then it's time for my nap.                                --Bob Hope

I never drink water because of the disgusting things that fish do in it.
                                                        --W.C. Fields

We could certainly slow the aging process down
if it had to work its way through Congress.             --Will Rogers

Don't worry about avoiding temptation.  As you grow older, it will avoid you.
                                                        --Winston Churchill

Maybe it's true that life begins at fifty, but everything else
starts to wear out, fall out, or spread out.            --Phyllis Diller

By the time a man is wise enough to watch his step,
he's too old to go anywhere.                            --Billy Crystal

The cardiologist's diet: If it tastes good, spit it out.

Captain Logic is *not* steering this tugboat.

When in doubt, parenthesize.  At the very least it will
let some poor schmuck bounce on the % key in vi.         --Larry Wall

Never count your chickens before they rip your lips off.

New York State Police have arrested a man accused of
posting his children for sale on Craigslist.       --CNN headline, 4/24/2010

My experience with ACLs is that they suck dead diseased rats through a straw.
                        --David Dyer-Bennet on "zfs-discuss" list, Feb 2010

Q: If you died tomorrow, what would you like your loved ones to know?
A: That they're on their own, but I'm pretty sure they'll have
   figured that out.       --Paul Schmehl, responding to some halfwit spammer

Faith is often the boast of the man who is too lazy to investigate.
                                                            --F.M. Knowles

Liberty is always dangerous, but it is the safest thing we have.
                                                    --Harry Emerson Fosdick

In those days he was wiser than he is now; he used to take my advice.
                                                       --Winston Churchill

It should be noted that government is never so zealous in suppressing crime
as when that crime consists of direct injury to its own sources of revenue,
as in tax evasion and counterfeiting of its currency.      --Murray Rothbard

Does my American Flag offend You?  Call 1-800-LEAVE-THE-USA  --bumper sticker

Dijon vu: the same mustard as before.

Practice safe eating: always use condiments.

Shotgun wedding: a case of wife or death.

Hangover: the wrath of grapes.

Dancing cheek-to-cheek is a form of floor play.

Condoms should be used on every conceivable occasion.

In democracy your vote counts.  In feudalism your count votes.

She was engaged to a boyfriend with a wooden leg but broke it off.

A chicken crossing the road is poultry in motion.

With her marriage, she got a new name and a dress.

You feel stuck with your debt if you can't budge it.

A lot of money is tainted. Taint yours and taint mine.

A boiled egg in the morning is hard to beat.

If you've seen one shopping center, you've seen a mall.

Why are dentists incapable of asking simple yes-or-no questions?

There is usually only a limited amount of damage that can be done by dull
or stupid people.  For creating a truly monumental disaster, you need people
with high IQs.                                               --Thomas Sowell

There are no shortcuts to the right-hand side of the learning curve.

Beer.  Now there's a temporary solution.                    --Homer Simpson

What impresses the Taliban is not the rules of engagement.
It's the precise targeted operations that are designed to give them no rest.
                                                      --Gen. David Petraeus

The liberals are asking us to give Obama time.
We agree; 25 to life would be appropriate.                 --Jay Leno

America needs Obama-care like Nancy Pelosi needs a Halloween mask.  --Jay Leno

Q: Have you heard about McDonald's new Obama Value Meal?
A: Order anything you like and the guy behind you has to pay for it.
                                                            --Conan O'Brien

Q: What does Barack Obama call lunch with a convicted felon?
A: A fund raiser.                                                --Jay Leno

Q: What's the difference between Obama's cabinet and a penitentiary?
A: One is filled with tax evaders, blackmailers, and threats to society.
   The other is for housing prisoners.                    --David Letterman

Q: If Nancy Pelosi and Obama were on a boat in the middle of the ocean
   and it started to sink, who would be saved?
A: America!                                                  --Jimmy Fallon

Q: What's the difference between Obama and his dog, Bo?
A: Bo has papers.                                            --Jimmy Kimmel

Q: What was the most positive result of the "Cash for Clunkers" program?
A: It took 95% of the Obama bumper stickers off the road.  --David Letterman

I learned the customs and mannerisms of engineers by observing them, much
the way Jane Goodall learned about the great apes, but without the hassle
of grooming.                           --Scott Adams, "The Dilbert principle"

I'm concerned that she's not disciplined or tethered enough to the reality
of adult consequences.
       --Lindsay Lohan's lawyer on her jail sentence (filed under "no sh*t")

Laura Vandervoort on her favorite scene in "V": I think it was getting slapped.
Morena Baccarin: See, I told you you'd like it.

A man's admiration for absolute government is proportionate to the
contempt he feels for those around him.              --Alexis de Tocqueville

Fox News is worse than al Qaeda -- worse for our society.
It's as dangerous as the Ku Klux Klan ever was.     --Keith Olbermann, MSNBC

This republic was not established by cowards,
and cowards will not preserve it.                              --Elmer Davis

Freedom is but two letters from Serfdom.

The most amazing achievement of the computer software industry is its
continuing cancellation of the steady and staggering gains made by the
computer hardware industry.                                --Henry Petroski

Passwords are like underwear.  Don't share them, don't hang them on your
monitor or under your keyboard, don't email them, and don't put them on
a web site.  Do change them occasionally.

Veni, vidi, defectio. (I came, I saw, I crapped.)

Her dancers are there, so you dance for about five minutes and then you
realize how stupid you look.   --Anna Kendrick, on a bash thrown by Madonna

I can't wait for her career to be over so she can serve me coffee at a 7-11.
                                            --Joan Rivers on Britney Spears

Should anyone by craft of any device abstract this book from this place, may
his soul suffer in retribution for what he has done.    --Medieval book curse

Going to church doesn't make you a Christian any more than standing in a
garage makes you a car.

The last thing I want to do is hurt you, but it's still on the list.

If I agreed with you we'd both be wrong.

You never really grew up, you only learned how to act in public.

Knowledge is knowing a tomato is a fruit.  Wisdom is not putting it in a
fruit salad.

The early bird might get the worm, but the second mouse gets the cheese.

Dolphins are so smart that within a few weeks of captivity, they can train
people to stand on the very edge of a pool and throw them fish.

I didn't say it was your fault, I said I was blaming you.

I saw a woman wearing a sweatshirt with "Guess" on it, so I said "Implants?"

Women will never be equal to men until they can walk down the street with
a bald head and a beer gut and still think they're sexy.

Behind every successful man is his woman.  Behind the fall of a successful
man is usually another woman.

You do not need a parachute to skydive.  You only need a parachute to
skydive twice.

The voices in my head may not be real, but they have some great ideas.

Money can't buy happiness, but it sure makes misery easier to live with.

I scream the same way whether I'm about to be devoured by a shark or if
a piece of seaweed touches my foot.

There's a fine line between cuddling and holding someone down so they
can't get away.

You're never too old to learn something stupid.

To be sure of hitting the target, shoot first and call whatever you hit
the target.

Some people hear voices.  Others have no imagination whatsoever.

Hopefully digesting of this tasty post would not cause too much of farting.
            --Yaroslav Halchenko, after reading a good debian-users message

There is not a single ill afflicting the nation for which the government
has not voluntarily made itself responsible.  Is it astonishing, then,
that each little twinge should be a cause of revolution?  --F. Bastiat

Fathom the odd hypocrisy that Obama wants every citizen to prove they're
insured, but people don't have to prove they're citizens.      --Ben Stein

Some moms spend their entire lives wondering if smacking their sons upside
the head ever made a difference.  Marine Moms don't have that problem.

Q: How do you know your girlfriend's getting fat?
A: She fits into your wife's clothes.

Q: How do you know your wife's dead?
A: The sex is the same but the dishes start piling up.

Blessed are the peacemakers, for they shall be shot at from both sides.
                                                            --A.M. Greeley

Like Brussels sprouts in butter; I like the butter, not the Brussels sprouts.
                                    --comment on 2010 "Pledge to America"

A common way to fight fire is with water.
                    --"Security+ Exam Cram" 2nd Edition, $44.99 (US), p348

If you go home with somebody and they don't have any books, don't f*ck 'em.
                                                               --John Waters

Socialism is the philosophy of failure, the creed of ignorance, and the
gospel of envy, its inherent virtue is the equal sharing of misery.
                                                        --Winston Churchill

Peace is not an absence of war.  It is a virtue, a state of mind, a
disposition for benevolence, confidence, justice.         --Baruch Spinoza

Correlation may not imply causation, but it certainly does waggle its
eyebrows meaningfully in causation's direction.         --seen on Slashdot

No man's ambition has a right to stand in the way of
performing a simple act of justice.                     --John Altgeld

They have the same 4-5 levels for everyone (TS, Secret, etc) and a plethora of
categories, possibly including "the commandant's cat's litter-box", assuming
of course that you have secrets about it.
                --user "davecb" describing DoD security on Linux Weekly News

Politicians should never lead based on polling.  They should lead based on
principle and use polling to shape the message to enact those principles
into law.                                                    --Dick Morris

Anybody who doesn't know what soap tastes like has never washed a dog.
                                                        --Franklin Jones

If your dog is fat, you need more exercise.

Alpo is up to $3.00 a can.  That's $21.00 in dog money.  --Joe Weinstein

If you think dogs can't count, put three dog biscuits
in your pocket and then give him only two.               --Phil Pastoret

When In Doubt, Empty The Magazine    --bumper-sticker seen on military base

Marine Sniper - You can run, but you'll just die tired
                                     --bumper-sticker seen on military base

Machine Gunners - Accuracy By Volume  --bumper-sticker seen on military base

Except For Ending Slavery, Fascism, Nazism and Communism,
WAR has Never Solved Anything.        --bumper-sticker seen on military base

US Marines - Certified Counselors to the 72 Virgins Dating Club
                                     --bumper-sticker seen on military base

US Air Force - Travel Agents To Allah
                                     --bumper-sticker seen on military base

Stop Global Whining                  --bumper-sticker seen on military base

The Marine Corps - When It Absolutely, Positively Has To Be Destroyed Overnight
                             --bumper-sticker seen on military base

Death Smiles At Everyone - Marines Smile Back
                                     --bumper-sticker seen on military base

What Do I Feel When I Kill A Terrorist?  A Little Recoil
                                     --bumper-sticker seen on military base

Marines - Providing Enemies of America an Opportunity
To Die For their Country Since 1775   --bumper-sticker seen on military base

Life, Liberty and the Pursuit of Anyone Who Threatens It
                                     --bumper-sticker seen on military base

Happiness Is A Belt-Fed Weapon        --bumper-sticker seen on military base

It's God's Job to Forgive Bin Laden - It's Our Job To Arrange The Meeting
                                     --bumper-sticker seen on military base

Artillery Brings Dignity to What Would Otherwise Be Just A Vulgar Brawl
                                     --bumper-sticker seen on military base

One Shot, Twelve Kills - US Naval Gun Fire Support
                                     --bumper-sticker seen on military base

My Kid Fought In Iraq So Your Kid Can Party In College
                                     --bumper-sticker seen on military base

A Dead Enemy Is A Peaceful Enemy - Blessed Be The Peacemakers
                                     --bumper-sticker seen on military base

If You Can Read This, Thank A Teacher.
If You Can Read It In English, Thank A Veteran.
                                     --bumper-sticker seen on military base

Some people spend an entire lifetime wondering if they made a difference
in the world.  The US Marine Corps doesn't have that problem.
                                                        --Ronald Reagan

If you believe in evolution but hold that all cultures are equal,
you might be a liberal.                                   --Kate McMillan

I do not want people to be very agreeable, as it saves me the trouble of
liking them a great deal.                                   --Jane Austen

The skyline of New York is a monument of a splendor that no pyramids or
palaces will ever equal or approach.                        --Ayn Rand

One of the great mistakes is to judge policies and programs by their
intentions rather than their results.                       --Milton Friedman

Security through bad-mouthing the messenger for raising the issue is normally
reserved for government ministers, IMHO it has no place here.    --Alan Cox

Can't see London, can't see France, until we see your underpants.  --TSA motto

If we did our job any better we'd have to buy you dinner first.  --TSA motto

Only we know if Lady Gaga is really a lady.     --TSA motto

Wanna fly? Drop your fly.                       --TSA motto

We are now free to move about your underpants.  --TSA motto

It's not a grope, it's a Freedom Pat!           --TSA motto

When in doubt, we make you whip it out.        --TSA motto

TSA: Touchin', Squeezin', Arrestin'.        --TSA motto

90% of the sh*t that is popular right now wants to
rub its object-oriented nutsack all over my code.        --kfx

A liberal is someone who feels a great debt to his fellowman, which he
proposes to pay off with your money.                    --G. Gordon Liddy

I once wanted to become an atheist but I gave up.  They have no holidays.
                                                          --Henny Youngman

For every ten Jews beating their breasts, God designated one to be crazy
and amuse the breast beaters.  By the time I was five I knew I was that one.
                                                            --Mel Brooks

The remarkable thing about my mother is that for thirty years she served us
nothing but leftovers.  The original meal has never been found.
                                                           --Calvin Trillin

Let me tell you the one thing I have against Moses.  He took us forty years
into the desert in order to bring us to the one place in the Middle East
that has no oil.                                           --Golda Meir

Even a secret agent can't lie to a Jewish mother.          --Peter Malkin

It's so simple to be wise.  Just think of something stupid to say
and then don't say it.                                     --Sam Levenson

Don't be humble, you're not that great.        --Golda Meir

Bankruptcy is a legal proceeding in which you put your money in your pants
pocket and give your coat to your creditors.                 --Sam Goldwyn

Whoever called it necking was a poor judge of anatomy.       --Groucho Marx

A politician is a man who will double-cross that bridge when he comes to it.
                                                             --Oscar Levant

Too bad that all the people who know how to run this country
are busy driving taxis and cutting hair.                     --George Burns

With the collapse of vaudeville, new talent has no place to stink.
                                                             --George Burns

When I bore people at a party, they think it's their fault.  --Henry Kissinger

Engineers are always honest in matters of technology and human relationships.
That's why it's a good idea to keep engineers away from customers, romantic
interests, and other people who can't handle the truth.
                                    --Scott Adams, The Dilbert Principle

Facebook is what happens to the Web when you hit it with the stupid stick.
                                                            --John Scalzi

Nobody ever asks George Soros how a guy whose shorting of the pound in 1992
ravaged British taxpayers can be described as a philanthropist.  --Joe Queenan

If the freedom of speech is taken away then dumb and silent we may be led,
like sheep to the slaughter.                               --George Washington

Those who hammer their guns into plows will plow for those who do not.
                                                           --Thomas Jefferson

> Sorry I'm taking up your ever so valuable disk space!
  That's okay, /dev/null is pretty big.       --illoai@gmail.com, 14 Feb 2011

Our culture rewards the heroes instead of the people who manage their work
not to need heroics in the first place.       --Daniel Barlow, comp.lang.lisp

A government that robs Peter to pay Paul can always depend on
the support of Paul.                                   --George Bernard Shaw

Genitus: Someone who thinks with his reproductive organ.        --unknown

Love is a snowmobile racing across the tundra.  Suddenly it flips over,
pinning you underneath.  At night the ice weasels come.          --Nietzsche

If I hung out w 20-yr-old porn stars all the time, I'd think I was a
genius too.                  --Sarah Silverman, tweeting about Charlie Sheen

There is no art which one government sooner learns of another than that of
draining money from the pockets of the people.                 --Adam Smith

Converting beer to urine does not make you a chemical engineer.

You are NOT doing to grow a second head, although the way you're NOT using
the one you've got, that may not be too bad an idea.
                            --Pappadave comment on Townhall.com, 19 Mar 2011

ATTORNEY: What gear were you in at the moment of the impact?
WITNESS: Gucci sweats and Reeboks.
                              --taken from "Disorder in the American Courts"

ATTORNEY: Are you sexually active?
WITNESS: No, I just lie there.  --taken from "Disorder in the American Courts"

ATTORNEY: Now doctor, isn't it true that when a person dies in his sleep,
  he doesn't know about it until the next morning?
WITNESS: Did you actually pass the bar exam?
                              --taken from "Disorder in the American Courts"

ATTORNEY: The youngest son, the 20-year-old, how old is he?
WITNESS: He's 20, much like your IQ.
                              --taken from "Disorder in the American Courts"

ATTORNEY: Were you present when your picture was taken?
WITNESS: Are you sh*tting me?  --taken from "Disorder in the American Courts"

ATTORNEY: So the date of conception (of the baby) was August 8th?
WITNESS: Yes.
ATTORNEY: And what were you doing at that time?
WITNESS: Getting laid.         --taken from "Disorder in the American Courts"

ATTORNEY: How was your first marriage terminated?
WITNESS: By death.
ATTORNEY: And by whose death was it terminated?
WITNESS: Take a guess.        --taken from "Disorder in the American Courts"

ATTORNEY: Doctor, how many of your autopsies have you performed on dead people?
WITNESS: All of them.  The live ones put up too much of a fight.
                              --taken from "Disorder in the American Courts"

ATTORNEY: Do you recall the time that you examined the body?
WITNESS: The autopsy started around 8:30 PM
ATTORNEY: And Mr. Denton was dead at the time?
WITNESS: If not, he was by the time I finished.
                              --taken from "Disorder in the American Courts"

When fascism comes to America, it will be intolerance sold as diversity.

There's no sense in being precise when
you don't even know what you're talking about.         --John Von Neumann

Never slap a man who's chewing tobacco.       --Will Rogers

Always drink upstream from the herd.       --Will Rogers

Was chillaxin' in the ocean with a hot babe.  A dolphin surfaced next to us,
I screamed "shark!" and used her as a human shield.
                                        --Twitter list: #worstspringbreak

Stole a hotel fire extinguisher to spray girls.  Tried it in the elevator
and almost died from suffocation.       --Twitter list: #worstspringbreak

Woke up in a tree wearing nothing but clown paint and a cardboard sign that
said "Y'all can neva do what I do".     --Twitter list: #worstspringbreak

To admit foreigners indiscriminately to the rights of citizens, the moment
they set foot in our country would be nothing less than to admit the Grecian
horse into the citadel of our liberty and sovereignty.  --Alexander Hamilton

Nobody can know who knows best, and the only way by which we can find out
is through a social process in which everybody is allowed to try and see
what he can do.                                           --Friedrich Hayek

Well, the thing about a black hole - it's main distinguishing feature - is
it's black.  And the thing about space, your basic space colour is black.
So how are you supposed to see them?                   --Holly, "Red Dwarf"

If I gave up every time I failed, I would never have invented my fireproof
pants!  [Pants burn up, revealing his underwear]  Still working the kinks
out a bit.                         --Grandpa Bud, from "Meet the Robinsons"

The Obama economy is a system of checks and balances.
He writes the checks, we pay the balance.

Anagram of "President Barack Obama": Arab base, pink Democrat

Anagram of "President Barack Hussein Obama": A Democrat speaks inane rubbish

No, I really can't recover any files from your thumb drive, even if you did
find it after it passed through your dog.       --actual IT support question

Politics, n: A strife of interests masquerading as a contest of principles.

Politics, n: The conduct of public affairs for private advantage.

Q: What lies on the bottom of the ocean and twitches?
A: A nervous wreck.

Airport flying home,
watching people come and go;
always smells like farts.               --travel haiku

Q. What is the difference between tax avoidance and tax evasion?
A. Jail.

Q. What's the definition of an accountant?
A. Someone who solves a problem you didn't know you had in a way you don't
   understand.

Q. What's the definition of a great tax accountant?
A. Someone who has a loophole named after them.

Q. What's an extroverted accountant?
A. One who looks at your shoes while he's talking to you instead of his own.

Q. What's an auditor?
A. Someone who arrives after the battle and bayonets all the wounded.

Q. What's an accountant's idea of trashing his hotel room?
A. Refusing to fill out the guest comment card.

Q. How do you drive an accountant insane?
A. Tie him to a chair and make him watch you fold a road map the wrong way.

Q. What do accountants suffer from that ordinary people don't?
A. Depreciation.

Socialism never took root in America because the poor see themselves not as
an exploited proletariat but as temporarily embarrassed millionaires.

Property is the fruit of labor.  Property is desirable, is a positive good in
the world.  That some should be rich shows that others may become rich and
hence is just encouragement to industry and enterprise.     --Abraham Lincoln

Let not him who is houseless pull down the house of another, but let him
work diligently to build one for himself, thus by example assuring that his
own shall be safe from violence.                            --Abraham Lincoln

Each of us has a natural right, from God, to defend his person,
his liberty and his property.                       --Claude Frederic Bastiat

It is much more important to kill bad bills than to pass good ones.
                                                        --Calvin Coolidge

We call them "Human Resources", because "Cattle" was taken.     --Dilbert

I don't give a damn if they stream my colonoscopy video on Redtube or if
Slashdot uses my hernia scar for a background.
                -- electronic health record security comment on Slashdot

It looks like someone printed a post, put it through a washing machine,
then had it typed by a drunk on a pogo-stick.
                                --Scott Ferguson, on mail digest formatting

There's a whiff of the lynch mob or the lemming migration about any overlarge
concentration of like-thinking individuals, no matter how virtuous their cause.
                                                            --P.J. O'Rourke

Those who jump off a bridge in Paris are in Seine.

Reading while sunbathing makes you well red.

Definition of a will: a dead give-away.

The man who fell into an upholstery machine is fully recovered.

Santa's helpers are subordinate clauses.

An invisible man and woman got married.  The kids were nothing to look at.

A vulture boards an airplane carrying two dead raccoons.  The stewardess says,
"I'm sorry, sir, only one carrion allowed per passenger."

Two fish swim into a concrete wall.  One said to the other: "Dam!".

Never agree to plastic surgery if the doctor's office is full of portraits
by Picasso.

Encryption: A powerful encoding technique employed in the creation
of computer manuals.

Q: What do you get when you offer a liberal a penny for his thoughts?
A: Change.

I'm working as hard as I can to get my life and my cash to run out at the
same time.  If I can just die after lunch Tuesday, everything will be perfect.
                                      --Doug Sanders, professional golfer

All the fat guys watch me and say to their wives "See, there's a fat guy
doing okay.  Bring me another beer."  --Mickey Lolich, Detroit Tigers Pitcher

Last year we couldn't win at home and we were losing on the road.  My failure
as a coach was that I couldn't think of anyplace else to play.
                                  --Harry Neale, professional hockey coach

When it's third and ten, you can take the milk drinkers; I'll take the
whiskey drinkers every time.        --Max McGee, Green Bay Packers receiver

I found out that it's not good to talk about my troubles.  80% of the people
who hear them don't care and the other 20% are glad you're having trouble.
                                      --Tommy LaSorda, LA Dodgers manager

My knees look like they lost a knife fight with a midget.
        --E.J. Holub, KC Chiefs linebacker, regarding his 12 knee operations

My theory is that if you buy an ice-cream cone and make it hit your mouth,
you can learn to play.  If you stick it on your forehead, your chances aren't
as good.                                     --Vic Braden, tennis instructor

Blind people come to the ballpark just to listen to him pitch.
                                  --Reggie Jackson commenting on Tom Seaver

When they operated, I told them to put in a Koufax fastball.  They did,
but it was Mrs. Koufax's.
                  --Tommy John, NY Yankees, recalling his 1974 arm surgery

I don't know.  I only played there for nine years.
          --Walt Garrison, Dallas Cowboys fullback when asked if Coach
            Tom Landry ever smiles

We were tipping off our plays.  Whenever we broke from the huddle, three
backs were laughing and one was pale as a ghost.  --John Breen, Houston Oilers

The film looks suspiciously like the game itself.
         --Bum Phillips, New Orleans Saints after viewing a
           lop-sided loss to the Atlanta Falcons

When I'm on the road, my greatest ambition is to get a standing "boo".
                                  --Al Hrabosky, major league relief pitcher

The only difference between me and General Custer is that I have to watch
the films on Sunday.           --Rick Venturi, Northwestern football coach

I have discovered, in twenty years of moving around the ball park, that
the knowledge of the game is usually in inverse proportion to the price of
the seats.                            --Bill Veeck, Chicago White Sox owner

Because if it didn't work out, I didn't want to blow the whole day.
        --Paul Horning, Green Bay Packers running back on why his
          marriage ceremony was before noon.

I have a lifetime contract.  That means I can't be fired during the third
quarter if we're ahead and moving the ball.
                                      --Lou Holtz, Arkansas football coach

I won't know until my barber tells me on Monday.
                  --Knute Rockne, when asked why Notre Dame had lost a game

I tell him "Attaway to hit, George."
            --Jim Frey, KC Royals manager, when asked what advice
              he gives George Brett on hitting

I learned a long time ago that "minor surgery" is when they do the operation
on someone else, not you.           --Bill Walton, Portland Trial Blazers

Our biggest concern this season will be diaper rash.
              --George MacIntyre, Vanderbilt football coach, surveying
                the team roster that included 26 freshmen and 25 sophomores.

The last thing I want to do is hurt you, but it's still on my list.

Standing in a church doesn't make you a Christian any more than standing
in a garage makes you a car.

It is difficult to get a man to understand something when his salary
depends upon his not understanding it.                    --Upton Sinclair

In the Soviet days, we used to joke that an optimist learns English,
a pessimist learns Chinese, and a realist learns to use a Kalashnikov.
These days, the optimist learns Chinese, the pessimist learns Arabic, and
the realist keeps practicing with his Kalashnikov.        --Evgeny Kapersky

Where politics wishes to do the work of God, it becomes not divine,
but demonic.                                         --Pope Benedict XVI

Holy inaccurate statistics, Batman!
                --Shaun Thomas <sthomas@peak6.com> on pgsql-performance list

"Neighbor From Hell" Builds Giant Middle Finger On Front Lawn
                                        --Australian headline, 4 Aug 2011

Watching television is like taking black spray paint to your third eye.
                                                            --Bill Hicks

Swedish man caught trying to split atoms at home
                                        --Stockholm headline, 5 Aug 2011

The soundest way to raise revenues in the long run is to cut taxes now.
The purpose of cutting taxes now is... to achieve the more prosperous,
expanding economy which can bring a budget surplus.           --JFK

Aided by a little sophistry on the words 'general welfare', [they claim]
a right to do not only the acts to effect that which are specifically
enumerated and permitted, but whatsoever they shall think or pretend will
be for the general welfare.            --Thomas Jefferson to W. Giles, 1825

"Unique" and "novel" can be synonyms for "interesting" and "unusual",
eg. "setting yourself on fire is a unique, novel, and interesting way of
seeing in the dark".         --Scott Ferguson, describing software features

I love seeing the Pope in his Pope-Mobile, with three feet of bullet-proof
plexiglass.  That's faith in action!  You know he's got God on his side.
                                                        --Bill Hicks

Yo momma so fat when she gets on the scale it says "to be continued..."
                                        --seen on a Reddit programming page

Q: Why won't Obama release his birth certificate?
A: The ink isn't dry yet.                           --James Delingpole

If you put a spoonful of wine in a barrel full of sewage, you get sewage.
If you put a spoonful of sewage in a barrel full of wine, you get sewage.
                                            --Schopenhauer's Law of Entropy

From each according to his ability, to each according to his lack thereof.
                                            --Philosophy behind bailouts

Decafalon (n.), grueling event of getting through the day consuming only
things that are good for you.      --MENSA "alternate definitions" contest

Pokemon (n.), a Rastafarian proctologist.
                                 --MENSA "alternate definitions" contest

Once I managed to install Windows using a sheet of brailled instructions
and listening for when the CD stopped spinning to do each instruction,
but nobody regards that as accessible these days.         --Jude DaShiell

Q: How do you starve an Obama supporter?
A: Hide his food stamps under his work boots.

Q: Why did God give liberals annoying, whiny voices?
A: So blind people could hate them, too.

Whoever prefers life to death, happiness to suffering, well-being to misery
must defend without compromise private ownership in the means of production.
                                                        --Ludwig von Mises

It's always funny until someone gets hurt.  Then it's just hilarious.
                                                            --Bill Hicks

Foreign aid: a transfer from the poor in rich countries
to the rich in poor countries.                    --economist Peter Bauer

A map with a bullet hole in it is still a map.  A computer with a
bullet hole in it is a paper-weight.      --why soldiers tend to like paper

Judge Judy to Prostitute: "When did you realize you were raped?"
Prostitute (wiping away tears): "When the check bounced."

In questions of power, let no more be heard of confidence in man, but bind
him down from mischief by the chains of the Constitution.  --Thomas Jefferson

Q. What's the difference between Obamacare and a car battery?
A. The car battery has a positive side.

Bill Clinton Virus - Gives you a permanent Hard Drive with NO memory.

Monica Lewinsky Virus - Sucks all the memory out of your computer, then
e-mails everyone about what it did.

Prozac Virus - Totally screws up your RAM, but your processor doesn't care.

Lorena Bobbitt Virus - Reformats your hard drive into a 3.5 inch floppy,
then discards it through Windows.

I've seen people with new children before, they go from ultra-happy to
looking like something out of a zombie film in about a week.
                      --Alan Cox about Linus Torvalds after his 2nd daughter

Shall I tell you what the real evil is?  To cringe to the things that are
called evils, to surrender to them our freedom, in defiance of which we
ought to face any suffering.                                      --Seneca

The budget should be balanced, the Treasury should be refilled, public debt
should be reduced, the arrogance of officialdom should be tempered and
controlled, and the assistance to foreign lands should be curtailed lest
Rome become bankrupt.  People must again learn to work, instead of living
on public assistance.                                       --Cicero, 55 BC

Socialism in general has a record of failure so blatant
that only an intellectual could ignore or evade it.         --Thomas Sowell

The art is in the beauty of the song.  The engineering is in getting five
stoners on stage simultaneously and managing to get paid by the ephemeral
promoter at the end of it.                --Hacker News comment by "dools"

Poverty, n.: An unfortunate state that persists as long as anyone lacks
anything he would like to have.

It's under the "I don't give a sh*t as long as some dude in China doesn't
slap another name on it and sell it" license.  --Waseem Sadiq, "Hacker News"

The good news is that, according to the Obama administration, the rich will
pay for everything.  The bad news is that, according to the Obama
administration, you're rich.                                --P.J. O'Rourke

A union is like having herpes.  It doesn't kill you, but it's unpleasant
and inconvenient, and it stops a lot of people from becoming your lover.
                                            --John Mackey, Whole Foods CEO

I believe that's a metaphor, a metaphor for what the country is looking for.
They're looking for a sleepover with people they like!
                                        --Joe Biden on choosing a president

Bill is basically unimaginative and has never invented anything, which
is why I think he's more comfortable now in philanthropy than technology.
He just shamelessly ripped off other people's ideas.
           --Steve Jobs, from his upcoming biography, talking about Bill Gates

I've never really wanted to go to Japan.  Simply because I don't like
eating fish.  And I know that's very popular out there in Africa.
                                                        --Britney Spears

Retarded children are like dogs; [they're] devoted, nice,
and they never develop mentally.                            --Bill Maher

It's dumb that people have to die so that I can live in Israel.  I don't
regret not enlisting, because it paid off big time.  That's just the way
it is, celebrities have other needs.
               --Bar Refaeli (model), on skipping her Israeli military duty

Have you ever talked to your muscles?  As you bring up the dumbbells,
say "Grow".  It's what I call "body dialogue".         --Sylvester Stallone

Everything bad that can happen to a person has happened to me.
                                                            --Paris Hilton

I've always thought Marilyn Monroe looked fabulous,
but I'd kill myself if I was that fat.                  --Elizabeth Hurley

If the fat people just gave the skinny people more food, we could all eat.
We could solve obesity and hunger at the same time.        --Ashton Kutcher

Whatever [political system] they have in Korea, that's bad.  --Justin Bieber

I think most newspaper men by definition have to be liberal; if they're
not liberal, by my definition of it, they can hardly be good newspapermen.
                                                        --Walter Cronkite

It is important to realize that any lock
can be picked with a big enough hammer.   --Sun System & Network Admin manual

The threat posed by humans to the natural environment is nothing compared
to the threat to humans posed by global environmental policy.
                  --Fred Smith Jr., Competitive Enterprise Institute Founder

Stupid is not the one who sets the price too high, but the one who pays it.
                                        --supposedly an old Romanian saying

Keep you erection for number of years!           --best SP*M ever

Pilot Accidentally Locks Himself In Bathroom In Flight
                                    --Seen on "The Consumerist", 11/17/2011

Cannot delete file, not enough free space.      --Windows-98 error message

Some evil bastard moved the damned config file on me.  --Mac error message

Award for the most childish intentional computer error message:
The command "man woman" would respond with "no manual entry for woman".

Amputating the head is not an option.
                   --error shown by medical software for elder care planning

You have experienced an Action Request System Error (ARSE).
                  --Remedy error message, much funnier if you're in England

Out of memory for symbol table: please go purchase more RAM from your
Authorized Apple Dealer.
                --Macintosh Programmer's Workshop C compiler error message

Guess we just found out what BETA means.
                           --Boot error message seen on a 68k Mac Powerbook

Unable to open your tool.             --Error message seen on an Amiga 500

Christmas is when kids tell Santa what they want and adults pay for it.
Deficits are when adults tell the government what they want and their kids
pay for it.         --Richard Lamm, former Democratic Governor of Colorado

First religious rite of the holiday season: untangling
Christmas lights without using anyone's name in vain.     --Erick Erickson

We need another bucket of pus.
         --overheard in the set dressing room, "Body of Evidence", Nov 2011

I only eat free-range vegetables that were hunted down and killed by a
member of my immediate family.

You learn a great deal about yourself and technology after you spend
15 minutes trying to explain the concept of scrollbars to an 80-year-old.
                                                --comment on "Hacker News"

Leighton Meester beats her mom in court
              --Dec 2011 headline that really could have been phrased better

A gentleman told me recently that he doubted I would vote for the Angel
Gabriel if found at the head of the Democratic Party, to which I responded
that the Angel Gabriel would never be found in such company.
                                                        --Teddy Roosevelt

My choices in life were either to be a piano player in a whorehouse or
a politician.  And to tell the truth, there's hardly any difference.
                                                        --Harry Truman

For the record, Barney had his Frank in Freddie's Fannie very early on.
            --nice summary of the housing debacle in a CNN article comment

Q: How many Harvard MBAs does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
A: Just one.  He grasps it firmly and the universe revolves around him.

Facts -> rational analysis -> conclusions -> advocacy.  In that order.

Texted my niece "What did Satan get you for Christmas?"
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #textingdisaster tweets, 13 Jan 2012

Thought I texted my girlfriend "Want to take a nap later?"
Turned out it was my college basketball coach.
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #textingdisaster tweets, 13 Jan 2012

Meant to text my dad "Going to pick up Syd."
Phone changed it to "Going to pick up STD."
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #textingdisaster tweets, 13 Jan 2012

Texted a friend "Creepy Jeff wants to take me out again."
Jeff replied "Could have just said no."
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #textingdisaster tweets, 13 Jan 2012

Mass text from me: "Screw work tomorrow, Chick-fil-A has free food 4 people
in cow costumes!"
My boss replied "Ask for an application, too."
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #textingdisaster tweets, 13 Jan 2012

Texted a friend meaning to ask if she was busy.
Me: "Are you busty?"  Her: "They're manageable, what's up?"
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #textingdisaster tweets, 13 Jan 2012

Text to my wife: "Having a crazy time in Vegas!!  Wish you were her!"
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #textingdisaster tweets, 13 Jan 2012

The welfare of humanity is always the alibi of tyrants.     --Albert Camus

The problem with political jokes is they get elected.  --Henry Cate, VII

If we got one-tenth of what was promised to us in these acceptance speeches
there wouldn't be any inducement to go to heaven.           --Will Rogers

Those who are too smart to engage in politics are punished
by being governed by those who are dumber.                      --Plato

Politicians are the same all over.  They promise to build a bridge even
where there is no river.                                --Nikita Khrushchev

Why pay money to have your family tree traced?  Go into politics and your
opponents will do it for you.                               --Unknown

If God wanted us to vote, he would have given us candidates.  --Jay Leno

Politicians are people who, when they see light at the end of the tunnel,
go out and buy some more tunnel.                            --John Quinton

Politics is the gentle art of getting votes from the poor and campaign funds
from the rich, by promising to protect each from the other.  --Oscar Ameringer

The Democrats are the party that says government will make you smarter,
taller, richer, and remove the crabgrass on your lawn.  The Republicans are
the party that says government doesn't work and then they get elected and
prove it.                                               --P.J. O'Rourke

I offer my opponents a bargain: if they'll stop telling lies about us,
I'll stop telling the truth about them.       --Adlai Stevenson speech, 1952

A politician is a fellow who will lay down your life for his country.
                                                            --Texas Guinan

Any American who is prepared to run for President should automatically,
by definition, be disqualified from ever doing so.          --Gore Vidal

I have come to the conclusion that politics is too serious a matter
to be left to the politicians.                        --Charles de Gaulle

Instead of giving a politician the keys to the city,
it might be better to change the locks.                     --Doug Larson

Don't vote, it only encourages them.  --Unknown

There ought to be one day - just one - when it's open season on senators.
                                                            --Will Rogers

Keep skunks and bankers at a distance.                      --Farmer's advice

Don't corner something that you know is meaner than you.    --Farmer's advice

If you think you're a person of some influence,
try ordering somebody else's dog around.                --Farmer's advice

Corruption is not the #1 priority of the Police Commissioner.  His job is
to enforce the law and fight crime.           --PBA President E. J. Kiernan

Whenever I have a mob of neighbors at my door complaining
about the noise, I ask myself "What Would Lot Do?"    --Allen Bouchard, on /.

Mediocrity doesn't mean average intelligence, it means an average
intelligence that resents and envies its betters.        --seen on Slashdot

BSCE: Bull*hit continuing education requirements which have to be met before
you can be honored with a high-stress, low-pay job teaching a room full of
ignorant, arrogant, hormone-imbalanced people who are not yet answerable to
the adult criminal justice system.                   --comment on Slashdot

Being right too soon is socially unacceptable.              --R. Heinlein

Heck, if an omniscient psycho ex offered me discounted, in-stock products I
was going to buy anyway, I might just keep them around.  That's everything
Amazon tries to be already, anyway.
            --Slashdot response to Target data-mining for pregnant customers

If a boss demands loyalty, give him integrity.  But if he demands integrity,
give him loyalty.                                  --John Boyd, 1927-1997

Nomophobia: AKA no-mobile-phone phobia, the fear of being out of mobile
phone contact.                     --U.K. study commissioned by SecurEnvoy

The best argument against democracy is a five-minute conversation with
the average voter.                                     --Winston Churchill

Office was silent, then I hear the guy in the cubicle next to mine go
"Oh, crap, I'm wearing my wife's socks again."
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #mycoworkeriscrazy tweets, 2 Mar 2012

He will only use the third stall in the restroom because it has "the perfect
window-breeze to flushing-power ratio."
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #mycoworkeriscrazy tweets, 2 Mar 2012

She assigned every chair in our conference room a name.  The other day she
asked me, "Don't you usually sit on Tim?"
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #mycoworkeriscrazy tweets, 2 Mar 2012

She acts like she's on the phone to avoid certain customers.  One time it rang.
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #mycoworkeriscrazy tweets, 2 Mar 2012

Alligations: when someone makes a claim that someone else is an alligator.
                                    --seen on freebsd-questions mailing list

Is Obama a CIA-Controlled Manchurian President?
                                    --LewRockwell.com headline, 21 Mar 2012

If government had taken over the auto industry in 1920, today we'd all
be driving Model-T cars -- and saying, "If it weren't for the government,
we'd have no cars at all."                                   --Harry Browne

I've found the grapefruit spoon to be THE quintessential tool for gouging
out my eyeballs.  Thanks, Octomom.
       --Tweet from @knotta-tardfan after seeing Nadya Suleman's nude layout

The cat.jpg picture was me.  I uploaded it.  But the cat was just a decoy.
The actual picture is of a monkey flinging sh*t at Java programmers.
        --comment about 100 millionth file upload to Basecamp, 13 Jan 2012

Comment: I like my webservers like I like my women: fast!
Reply: I too like my webservers like I like my women: Insecure and full of
       holes waiting to be exploited.       --seen on Slashdot, 21 Feb 2012

Me: I'm the proud owner of the Emma Watson (aka Hermione) 2012 Wall Calendar.
My sister: You are so queer.               --email exchange, 10 Apr 2012

Zac Efron crushes Jimmy Kimmel in bra-removal contest
                            --Zap2it celebrity news headline, 17 Apr 2012

You'd think people in the Secret Service would know how to be
serviced secretly.              --seen on "The O'Reilly Factor", 4/18/2012

Your girlfriend left you?  You're doing a good job typing without any hands.
                                            --snotty remark seen on Slashdot

If you can drive safely while kissing a girl, you're not giving the girl
the attention she deserves.

Metta World Peace gets seven-game suspension for elbow
                            --Zap2it celebrity news headline, 25 Apr 2012

Protecting the rights of even the least individual among us is basically
the only excuse the government has for even existing.       --Ronald Reagan

My teenage son broke his arm tripping over his crutches from the broken leg
he got the day before.    --Jimmy Fallon, #mydumbinjury tweets, 26 Apr 2012

I tripped and got stuck between the couch and treadmill, and the track kept
rolling on my face.       --Jimmy Fallon, #mydumbinjury tweets, 26 Apr 2012

Security is the minimum of the system's capabilities and its user's
capabilities.  Not the average, the minimum.          --seen on Slashdot

Science flies us to the moon.  Religion flies us into buildings.
                                                        --Victor Stenger

In the end, we will remember not the words of our enemies,
but the silence of our friends.                             --MLK Jr.

Jessica Simpson had her baby, but Kanye busted into the delivery room and
said Beyonce had the best baby ever.         --smartass Tweet, 2 May 2012

"Atlas Shrugged" is now in the non-fiction section.  --seen on "Redstate"

That's the nature of IT.  You pull a rabbit out of a hat and all you get is
someone demanding to know why the rabbit wasn't already there and how much
the hat cost.                                            --Paul Venezia

If an elephant is left tied to a parking meter, the parking fee has to be
paid just as it would for a vehicle.  --real standing law in Florida, USA

You can be stopped by the police for biking over 65 miles per hour.
                                    --real standing law in Connecticut, USA

You are not allowed to walk across a street on your hands.
                                    --real standing law in Connecticut, USA

It is illegal for anyone to try and stop a child from playfully jumping
over puddles of water.               --real standing law in California, USA

It is illegal for a driver to be blindfolded while operating a vehicle.
                                        --real standing law in Alabama, USA

Dean: A young girl got kidnapped by an evil cult.
Sam: Does this girl have a name?
Dean: Katie Holmes.                   --seen on "Supernatural"

Dean: The most troubling question is, why do these people assume we're gay?
Sam: Well, you are kind of butch. They probably think you're overcompensating.
                                                --seen on "Supernatural"

Sam: Dude, were you on my computer?
Dean: Uh, no.
Sam: Uh, really? Because it's frozen now. On BustyAsianBeauties.com.
                                                   --seen on "Supernatural"

Sam, after walking in on Dean having sex with twins: Let me see your knife.
Dean: What for?
Sam: So I can gouge my eyes out.                   --seen on "Supernatural"

Sam: You remember Cinderella?  The pumpkin that turns into a coach and the
     mice that become horses?
Dean: Dude, could you be more gay? ...Don't answer that.
                                                    --seen on "Supernatural"

Ruby: Does anyone have a breath mint?  Some guts spilled in my mouth while
      I was killing my way in here.                 --seen on "Supernatural"

Dean [a ghost, reaching through Sam]: Am I making you uncomfortable?
Sam: Get out of me.
Dean: You're such a prude. Come on.               --seen on "Supernatural"

Dean: It's kinda funny talking to a Messenger of God on a cell phone.
      You know, like watching a Hell's Angel on a moped.
Castiel: This isn't funny, Dean.  The voice says I'm almost out of minutes.
                                                    --seen on "Supernatural"

Dean, stuck in an episode of "CSI: Miami": I'm wearing sunglasses at night.
You know who does that?  No-talent douche bags.     --seen on "Supernatural"

Castiel: I found a liquor store.
Sam: And?
Castiel: I drank it.                   --seen on "Supernatural"

Sam: Dad was trying to protect you, keeping you from all this.
Adam: Yeah, well I guess the monster that ate me didn't get that memo.
                                                --seen on "Supernatural"

Dean, while trying to hack a teenage girl's computer password: Try Lautner.
Sam: He's a werewolf.  How do you even know who that is?
Dean: Are you kidding me?  That kid is everywhere.  It's a freakin' nightmare.
                                                --seen on "Supernatural"

Sam: Dean, did you service Oberon, King of the Fairies?
                                                --seen on "Supernatural"

Dean, to Castiel: You don't watch porn in a room full of dudes.
And you don't talk about it. Just turn it off... Well, now he's got a boner.
                                                --seen on "Supernatural"

Sam: What kind of thing likes virgins and gold?
Dean: P. Diddy?                                 --seen on "Supernatural"

Sam: So, Mel Gibson really took a turn this past year, huh?
Dean: Or he's possessed. Seriously. Think about it.  --seen on "Supernatural"

Dean: Hey, maybe we'll have a Snooki sighting.
Sam: What's a Snooki?
Dean: That's a good question.                   --seen on "Supernatural"

Genevieve: You've never even been to our house.
Dean: Well, now that I know there's an alpaca out back, I'm definitely
      coming back.                              --seen on "Supernatural"

Sam: You totally "Butterfly Effect"ed history!
Dean: Dude! Rule #1: No Kutcher references!     --seen on "Supernatural"

Dean: I'll stay here, hook up with the posse.  Because you know me --
      I'm a posse magnet.  I love posse.  Make that into a t-shirt!
Sam: You done?                                  --seen on "Supernatural"

Castiel: Whose heaven is this?
Raphael: Ken Lay's.  I'm borrowing it.
Castiel: I still question his admittance here.
Raphael: He's devout.  Trumps everything.       --seen on "Supernatural"

Dean: It's not your mom, Ben.  She's lying.
Possessed Lisa: Says the C minus lay with ten miles of Daddy issues.
  Whatever gets you through the night, Tiny Tim.  --seen on "Supernatural"

Castiel: I cannot abide hypocrites like you, Reverend.  Tell your flock where
your genitals have been before you speak for me.  --seen on "Supernatural"

Becky: Chuck dumped me. I think I intimidated him with my vibrant sexuality.
                                                  --seen on "Supernatural"

Garth: Now - you'll be living with a triracial paraplegic sniper
til this all blows over, okay?                   --seen on "Supernatural"

Sam: Okay, so whatever turned Gerry Browder into a pumpkinhead is
     currently turning Dean into an idiot.
Dean: I'm right here. Right here.                   --seen on "Supernatural"

Sam: We did not get licorice. We got good snacks. Licorice is disgusting.
Dean: I'm sorry, I didn't quite understand that, uh, Mr. Peanut Butter
and Banana Sandwich.                                --seen on "Supernatural"

Using logic to debate a liberal is like cleaning up dog-crap with a weedeater.

Morality is always the product of terror; its chains and strait-waistcoats
are fashioned by those who dare not trust others, because they dare not
trust themselves, to walk in liberty.                        --Aldous Huxley

I sold my kid to the gypsies and after the bubble burst, bought him back
at half-price.  Saved 2 years kid expense, and now he can knife-fight and
breed donkeys.                            --snotty comment seen on "Reason"

An idealist is one who, on noticing that roses smell better than a cabbage,
concludes that it will also make better soup.

I've seen people read this on airplanes.  And I'm always like,
"Ewww.  Take that blanket off your lap, you freak."
            --Kristen Stewart, when asked about the book "50 Shades of Grey"

I should cut your head off and rape your neckhole!      --seen on Slashdot

If thinking of something makes me giggle for more than 15 seconds, I'm
probably not allowed to do it.                          --seen on Slashdot

Would you exchange a walk-on part in a war for a lead role in a cage?
                                                --mangled "Pink Floyd" lyric

Winners compare their achievements to their goals, losers compare theirs to
that of others.

She was like chocolate when she drank -- semi-sweet at first and then
increasingly bitter.

If men didn't exist, IT would totally be dominated by women. Or possibly cats.
My cat is certainly more interested in what I'm typing than my wife is.
                                                        --seen on Slashdot

She's screaming on top of her lungs!
                            --some idiot on "Real Housewives of New Jersey"

Yes, your ID card doesn't work because there's a virus in the reader.
Nothing to do with the fact that it looks like you folded it in half to
make it fit into your purse.                    --snotty comment on Slashdot

Our work here is dung.              --nifty slogan for a fertilizer company

When I'm feeling down, I like to whistle.  It makes the neighbor's dog run
to the end of his chain and gag himself.

There are 10^89 observable particles in the universe.
Yo mama took all the ugly ones and put them into one kid.       --Slashdot

If you eat 4000 calories a day on a 1500-calorie activity level, getting
fat is your fault.  Don't exercise your muscles, getting weak is your fault.
Don't exercise your mind, getting stupid is your fault.         --Slashdot

At least playing rugby keeps them off our streets and out of our zoos.
                                            --snotty comment on Slashdot

Linus Torvalds's first words were syscalls.

Linus Torvalds's DNA is in binary.

Linus Torvalds's first written program had artificial intelligence.

Linus Torvalds can touch MC Hammer.

Linus Torvalds can do an infinite loop in five seconds.  In his head.

Linus Torvalds wrote the whole kernel in binary and reverse engineered it
to C code for others benefit.

Linus Torvalds can play 3D games in his head by interpreting the source code
in real-time.

Linus Torvalds takes one look at your desktop and knows which p*rn sites
you visited.  In the last ten years.

Linus Torvalds surfs the web using nothing but netcat.

Linus Torvalds doesn't push the flush toilet button, brush his teeth,
shower or vacuum his house; he simply says "make clean".

Linus Torvalds can defrag an NTFS partition by hand.

Do not disturb.  Already disturbed.

The only intuitive interface is the nipple.  Everything else is learned.

The phrase "what are you trying to hide" is the last refuge of the voyeur.

Squid squirts sperm into restaurant patron's mouth
                    --Strong contender for headline of the year, 6/19/2012

You are scrupulously honest, frank, and straightforward.
Therefore you have few friends.                          --snotty Buddha

Remember when the US had a drug problem, and then we declared a War On Drugs,
and now you can't buy drugs anymore?

They have gun control in Cuba.  They have universal health care in Cuba.
So why do they want to come here?                  --Paul Harvey, 8/31/1994

The more prohibitions there are, the poorer the people will be. --Lao Tse

POTUS + SCOTUS = BOGUS         --Bumper sticker seen after Obamacare ruling

Comment: I use fread() straight off the network card to get my website content.
Reply: I hook a flashlight to the fiber link and click it on and off really
  fast.  Network cards are for amateurs.     --"Mine's bigger" exchange on /.

Before "Twilight" took the concept and crapped all over it, Bill Willingham's
Fables somehow made the concept of "you smell so good I love you" into
something romantic.                  --"10 Best Couples in Comics" webpage

Apparently I'm supposed to be more angry about what Mitt Romney does
with his money than what Obama does with mine.          --campaign T-shirt

Institutions will try to preserve the problem to which they are the solution.
                                                        --Clay Shirky

If you have a psychopath convinced that their self-interest lies mainly in
your happiness, you're in for a very happy life.    --Slashdot comment

I should have been a country-western singer.
After all, I'm older than most western countries.          --George Burns

"Ubuntu" -- an African word, meaning "Slackware is too hard for me"
                                        --seen on alt.os.linux.slackware

I'll start procrastinating on that right away!

whois gawk date unzip strip find touch finger mount join nice man
top fsck grep eject more yes exit umount sleep dump
                        --legal Unix commands describing a one-night stand

They don't grade fathers, but if your daughter's a stripper, you f*cked up.
                                                            --Chris Rock

Work without payment is called "volunteering"; the demand for work without
any payment is called "slavery".

"A method for inducing cats to exercise consists of directing a beam of
invisible light produced by a hand-held laser apparatus onto the floor...
in the vicinity of the cat, then moving the laser... in an irregular way
fascinating to cats..."     --US patent 5443036, "Method of exercising a cat"

How sharper than a hound's tooth it is to have a thankless serpent.
                                --good reason not to have a snake for a pet

Think about how stupid the average person is.
Now, realise that half of them are dumber than that.        --George Carlin

If you're not allowed to question your government,
then your government has already answered the most important question.

The hallmark of humanity is the ability to move beyond sensory inputs.
                                                --Mary Helen Immordino-Yang

Don't pray in my school, and I won't think in your church.

The Internet just routes your packets.  What you do with them is up to you.

Man who eats many prunes gets good run for money.
                                --something Confucius probably didn't say

A lion will not cheat on his wife, but a Tiger Wood.
                                --something Confucius probably didn't say

I may be schizophrenic, but at least I have each other.

I am a Nobody.  Nobody is Perfect.  Therefore I am Perfect.

KENTUCKY: Five million people, 15 last names.

I'm not your type.  I'm not inflatable.           --bumper sticker

A Reptile Dysfunction: when your gecko is broken.

Got a text saying, "When you walk into the room don't freak out, I've got
it under control."     --Jimmy Fallon, #thatsmyroommate tweets, 14 Sep 2012

She made me a mix tape called "Sorry I Barfed On Your Comforter".
                       --Jimmy Fallon, #thatsmyroommate tweets, 14 Sep 2012

Dropped her wine glass in the shower, then asked me to dress her in something
cute in case the paramedics were hot.
                       --Jimmy Fallon, #thatsmyroommate tweets, 14 Sep 2012

Boils water he plans on drinking to "neutralize chemicals the government uses
to spread obesity."    --Jimmy Fallon, #thatsmyroommate tweets, 14 Sep 2012

Herth's Law: He who turns the other cheek too far gets it in the neck.

But this whole idea of two gay guys filling a cocktail shaker with their
sperm and impregnating some grim lesbian and then it gets cut out is just
really weird.                               --Rupert Everett, 17 Sep 2012

You know that making sh*t up and putting "probably" in front of it
doesn't make it correct, right?               --snotty comment on Slashdot

They can take my LifeAlert pendant when they pry it from my cold dead fingers.

Burning leaves in fall;
See how they gracefully float,
to spark my dry roof.                          --safety haiku

Hedged with a mower.
Trimmers cost less than doctors,
now I am all thumbs.                          --safety haiku

Of the four wars in my lifetime, none came about because
the U.S. was too strong.                                  --Ronald Reagan

Deja Moo: The distinct feeling that you've heard this bullsh*t before.

The government that governs least governs best.
The citizenry that cares the least gets governed worst.

Man Dies After Roach-Eating Contest        --actual headline, 9 Oct 2012

Harry Truman said he wanted an economist who was one-handed, because his
economic advisors would typically give him advice stating, "On the one hand...
And on the other...."

I saw a commercial last night that said, "Forget everything you know about
slipcovers."  So I did.  And it was a load off my mind.  Then the commercial
tried to sell me slipcovers, and I didn't know what the hell they were.
                                                        --Mitch Hedberg

Cogito, ergo armatum sum: I think, therefore I am armed.

We can categorically state that we have not released man-eating badgers
into the area.
     --UK military spokesman Major Mike Shearer, 12 July 2007, responding
     to rumors that British forces released a plague of ferocious badgers
     into the Iraqi city of Basra

The problem with quotes from the Internet is that
nobody bothers to check their veracity.                  --Abraham Lincoln

The Internet, where men are men, women are men and little girls are FBI.

Celebratory gunfire at Saudi wedding cuts cable, 23 electrocuted
                                            --Reuters headline, 31 Oct 2012

Ohio woman who drove on sidewalk to avoid
school bus ordered to wear "idiot" sign          --AP headline, 6 Nov 2012

Mom Convicted For Marijuana In Breast Milk       --NZ headline, 6 Nov 2012

England has no kidney bank, but it does have a Liverpool.

Being with a woman without any sex is harder than raising the dead, so if
you can't do the latter, don't expect me to believe you can do the former.
                                                --snotty quote from a sermon

The Gap opens in their town, and Jacob can finally buy a shirt.
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #faketwilightspoilers, 11 Nov 2012

After Bella becomes a vampire, Edward realizes he's only into "live chicks".
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #faketwilightspoilers, 11 Nov 2012

Dracula kills Edward and says, "Real vampires don't sparkle, bitch!"
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #faketwilightspoilers, 11 Nov 2012

The Volturi use "Apple Maps" to find the Cullens and end up on "True Blood".
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #faketwilightspoilers, 11 Nov 2012

When the white missionaries came to Africa they had the Bible and we had
the land.  They said "Let us pray".  We closed our eyes.  When we opened
them we had the Bible and they had the land.            --Desmond Tutu

America is the only country where a significant proportion of the population
believes that professional wrestling is real but the moon landing was faked.
                                                        --David Letterman

I'm not a paranoid, deranged millionaire.  Dammit, I'm a billionaire.
                                                        --Howard Hughes

After the game, the King and Pawn go into the same box.  --Italian proverb

Men are like linoleum floors.  Lay 'em right and you can
walk all over them for thirty years.                     --Betsy Salkind

The only reason they say "Women and children first"
is to test the strength of the lifeboats.                --Jean Kerr

I've been married to a communist and a fascist,
and neither one would take out the garbage.              --Zsa Zsa Gabor

You know you're a redneck if your home has wheels and your car doesn't.
                                                        --Jeff Foxworthy

When a man opens a car door for his wife,
it's either a new car or a new wife.           --Prince Philip

A computer once beat me at chess, but it was no match for me at kickboxing.
                                                        --Emo Philips

Wood burns faster when you have to cut and chop it yourself.  --Harrison Ford

Lawyers believe a man is innocent until proven broke.         --Robin Hall

Kill one man and you're a murderer, kill a million and you're a conqueror.
                                                            --Jean Rostand

Having more money doesn't make you happier.  I have 50 million dollars
but I'm just as happy as when I had 48 million.      --Arnold Schwarzenegger

In hotel rooms I worry.  I can't be the only guy who
sits on the furniture naked.                               --Jonathan Katz

If life were fair Elvis would still be alive today
and all the impersonators would be dead.                   --Johnny Carson

Hollywood must be the only place on earth where you can be
fired by a man wearing a Hawaiian shirt and a baseball cap.  --Steve Martin

Home cooking.  Where many a man thinks his wife is.        --Jimmy Durante

America is so advanced that even the chairs are electric.    --Doug Hamwell

The first piece of luggage on the carousel never belongs to anyone.
                                                            --George Roberts

If God had intended us to fly he would have made it easier
to get to the airport.                                   --Jonathan Winters

I have kleptomania, but when it gets bad, I take something for it.
                                                        --Robert Benchley

With or without religion, you would have good people doing good things and
evil people doing evil things.  But for good people to do evil things, that
takes religion.   --Steven Weinberg, physicist, New York Times, 20 Apr 1999

Top of the day to you.  Let me crave your indulgence to introduce myself.
                                              --found in a very polite SP*M

Want to make a new Facebook app because lots of people will see it?
Please asphyxiate yourself in an oven instead.  You'll get just as much
press and it's a whole lot less effort.                       --Ian Howson

"Let's eat Grandma" or "Let's eat, Grandma" -- punctuation saves lives.

The trouble isn't that there's too many fools, but that the
lightning ain't distributed right.                            --Mark Twain

Marry a girl who can cook.  They can all do that other thing.
                                            --seen on CentOS mailing list

The urge to save humanity is almost always a false front
for the urge to rule it.                                  --H. L. Mencken

John, this smells worse than your uncle's codpiece (which I wish you would
stop wearing to work), and in reviewing it I can deduce that your parents
were never formally introduced.
                    --Slashdot suggestion for inspecting poorly-written code

William of Ockham had no beard.  The most likely explanation is that it was
chewed off by squirrels every morning.

Xerox and Wurlitzer merge to produce reproductive organs.  --fake headline

When chemists die, they barium.

A soldier who survived mustard gas and pepper spray is a seasoned veteran.

What does a clock do when it's hungry?  It goes back four seconds.

Deja Foobar: feeling like you made the same mistake before.

Give a man a fish, and you'll feed him for a day.  Give him religion and
he'll starve to death while praying for a fish.  --Timothy Jones

I don't believe in astrology.  I'm a Sagittarius and we're very skeptical.
                                                        --Arthur C. Clarke

Perhaps we do the minors of this country harm if First Amendment protections,
which they will with age inherit fully, are chipped away in the name of
their protection.                      --US District Judge Lowell Reed Jr.

Heidi Montag and Spencer Pratt thought they would be murdered on
"Celebrity Big Brother"                   --Zap2it headline, 29 Jan 2013

Some guy just yelled at me for texting and driving.  I told him to
get off my hood and mind his own business.

Mom was so overprotective, she only let us play "Rock, Paper".

Lottery (n): A game where a whole bunch of dumb people make one dumb person
look really smart.

In my many years I have come to a conclusion that one useless man is
a shame, two is a law firm, and three or more is a congress.  --John Adams

If you don't read the newspaper you are uninformed, if you do read the
newspaper you are misinformed.                             --Mark Twain

I contend that for a nation to try to tax itself into prosperity is like
a man standing in a bucket and trying to lift himself up by the handle.
                                                    --Winston Churchill

Government is the great fiction through which everybody endeavors to live
at the expense of everybody else.
                         --Frederic Bastiat, French economist(1801-1850)

The only difference between a tax man and a taxidermist
is that the taxidermist leaves the skin.                   --Mark Twain

What this country needs are more unemployed politicians.
                                    --Edward Langley, Artist (1928-1995)

You cannot legislate the poor into prosperity by legislating the wealthy
out of prosperity.

What one person receives without working for, another person must work for
without receiving.

The government cannot give to anybody anything that the government does not
first take from somebody else.

You cannot multiply wealth by dividing it.

We do not change reality by changing the law.        --Scott Roeder

The beauty of the Second Amendment is that
it will not be needed until they try to take it.     --Thomas Jefferson

Oh, I've heard that paradox a couple of times, but there's something about
a cat dying and I hate to think of such things.
              --Dr. Donald Knuth on Schrodinger's cat at MIT, Dec 8, 1999

Put your f*cking shirt on, unless you lost all your shirts in a fire,
in which case, my condolences and please purchase a new shirt.
        --Olivia Wilde to Justin Bieber for going shirtless around London

I really wish my wife didn't see that.
    --Matt Damon, on getting his butt spray-tanned for the film "Liberace"

Why it's so hard to solve a redneck murder:
the DNA all matches, and there are no dental records.           --unknown

It's eerie, it's as though a bomb had dropped somewhere.
        --Susan Candiotti, CNN, April 22 comment on Boston's empty streets

10. "Lick and Let Dry"
           --Letterman's Top 10 Least Memorable Bond Films, 3/9/2013

9. "You've Only Bathed Twice"
           --Letterman's Top 10 Least Memorable Bond Films, 3/9/2013

8. "Oldfinger"
           --Letterman's Top 10 Least Memorable Bond Films, 3/9/2013

7. "Clams Casino Royale"
           --Letterman's Top 10 Least Memorable Bond Films, 3/9/2013

6. "Gold Bond: The Spy Who Loved Medicated Powder"
           --Letterman's Top 10 Least Memorable Bond Films, 3/9/2013

5. "Secret Service On Her Majesty"
           --Letterman's Top 10 Least Memorable Bond Films, 3/9/2013

4. "James Bond: Mall Cop"
           --Letterman's Top 10 Least Memorable Bond Films, 3/9/2013

3. "Leafraker"
           --Letterman's Top 10 Least Memorable Bond Films, 3/9/2013

2. "From Rush Limbaugh With Love"
           --Letterman's Top 10 Least Memorable Bond Films, 3/9/2013

1. "Cold Sores Are Forever"
           --Letterman's Top 10 Least Memorable Bond Films, 3/9/2013

I don't see how that statement can be true for any story that doesn't include
the word "cannibalism".  --Lawrence Person, responding to article titled
                          "Detroit in worse shape than previously thought"

"Don't worry" said the trees when they saw the axe coming,
"The handle is one of us."                                  --unknown

If the Jedi were so smart, why couldn't they get counseling for a kid who
missed his mom?

My '89 Accord had no working door handles.  I had to use the moonroof to
get in and out.     --Jimmy Fallon, #worstcarieverhad tweets, 27 Jun 2013

I had a '98 Corolla and if I wanted to listen to the radio, I had to reach
out of the window and touch the antenna.
                    --Jimmy Fallon, #worstcarieverhad tweets, 27 Jun 2013

During my driver's test, the instructor tried to roll down the window and
the glass fell out.    --Jimmy Fallon, #worstcarieverhad tweets, 27 Jun 2013

The wipers on my friend's Plymouth didn't work, so he tied strings to them
that he would pull while driving.
                        --Jimmy Fallon, #worstcarieverhad tweets, 27 Jun 2013

I had an '82 Nissan Sentra with a tape stuck in the cassette player.
The only thing I could listen to was "Breakfast at Tiffany's".
                        --Jimmy Fallon, #worstcarieverhad tweets, 27 Jun 2013

I had to touch two wires together to honk the horn at someone.
                        --Jimmy Fallon, #worstcarieverhad tweets, 27 Jun 2013

The radio in my '93 Corolla once lit on fire when I turned the volume
up by one.              --Jimmy Fallon, #worstcarieverhad tweets, 27 Jun 2013

My '79 Chevette was so crappy that once it got stolen and the thieves abandoned
it a block away.        --Jimmy Fallon, #worstcarieverhad tweets, 27 Jun 2013

Human beings hardly ever learn from the experience of others.  They learn
(when they do, which isn't often) on their own, the hard way.
                --Robert Heinlein (1907-1988), "Time Enough for Love" (1973)

Ze Germans Aren't Coming: 23% of German men say "zero" is ideal family size
                                                    --Headline, 20 Aug 2013

The police didn't abuse the law.  They simply followed a law
that had its abuse built in.                        --seen on Slashdot

This is one of many reasons that I hope Larry Ellison's yacht sinks in the
middle of the Pacific with him on board sleeping off a bender.
                            --Slashdot comment about NULL handling in Oracle

Man claims self-defense; friend shot 11 times
                            --Las Vegas Review Journal headline, 9 Sep 2013

I'm not passive-agressive, I'm active-aggressive.  What you perceive as
passive is only politically-correct politeness.          --seen on Slashdot

RIAA says its concern is artists.  That's true, in the sense that a cattle
rancher is concerned about its cattle.                   --seen on Slashdot

Every time I start to have faith in humanity, I ruin it by driving to work
between 7 and 8am.

National Shave Your Ex-wife's Head Day
                        --Twitter suggestion for a new holiday, on Jay Leno

There was a young lady from Dallas,
used a dynamite stick for a phallus.
They found her vagina in North Carolina
and her backside in Buckingham Palace.                          --unknown

Teenage girl creates sustainable, renewable algae biofuel under her bed
                                    --Extreme Tech headline, 19 March 2013

I'm not a complete idiot.  Some parts are missing.

Apple Maps flaw results in drivers crossing airport runway
                                        --BBC News headline, 25 Sep 2013

My security clearance is so high, I'd have to kill myself if I remember it.

When you're dead, you don't know you're dead because it only affects the
people around you.  Same thing goes for when you're stupid.

You know you're getting old when everything either dries up or leaks.

I was gratified to be able to answer promptly, and I did.
I said I didn't know.                                         --Mark Twain

Don't worry about people stealing your ideas; if they're any good,
you'll have to ram them down people's throats.              --Howard Aiken

If not for Yahoo's decision to recycle email addresses, my grandmother
would never have discovered the delights of European bestiality.
                                                        --seen on Slashdot

Scully: Should we arrest David Copperfield?
Mulder: Yes we should, but not for this.         --X-Files, episode "Trevor"

Scully: Well, isn't that where you were going with this?
Mulder: Dear Diary, today my heart leapt when Agent Scully suggested
        spontaneous human combustion.            --X-Files, episode "Trevor"

Taliban: Evil cowards with guns afraid of truth from a 14-year old girl.

Cool, let it run the US government.
                --Slashdot response to "Fusion Reactor Breaks Even" headline

Only to idiots, are orders laws.
                      --Henning von Tresckow, German Wehrmacht Major General

Thanks to the War on Drugs, it's easier to buy meth
than it is to buy cold medicine.

You could also factor in the days of the week the Cleveland Browns
are likely to win, since that is *definitely* random.
                              --Slashdot comment on random-number generation

"50 Shades of Grey" actor quits "50 Shades of Grey"
after reading "50 Shades of Grey"     --"Daily Caller" headline, 14 Oct 2013

NSA's public image is pretty much as low as it can go without
someone taking out a Superbowl ad proving they rape dogs.   --Slashdot comment

Since when is "public safety" the root password to the Constitution?

Fast, Easy, Convenient, Accessible & Low-cost == F.E.C.A.L.

In the immortal words of Socrates, who said "I drank what?"

Public evenly split on whether zombies
would do a better job running government    --Rasmussen poll, 31 Oct 2013

Pollution pushes Shanghai towards semen crisis
                                        --UK Telegraph headline, 7 Nov 2013

For those that are impacted by spying, spying is not news.  For the unwashed
that have discovered they're being spied upon, they're incensed.  This is
one flaw of the "Proud Ignorance" approach to living.     --Slashdot comment

Don't drop acid, take it pass-fail.             --Bryan Michael Wendt

Researcher Allows Sand Flea To Grow Inside Her Foot To Study It
                                 --Most horrible headline I've seen in 2013

A god who travels to earth using a rainbow bridge and uses a hammer that
no one but he can lift, and you're concerned about real-world physics.
Shine on, you crazy diamond.     --Slashdot comment about "Thor" movie review

Need lube to get more statements out of your *ss?
            --Slashdot comment on disk-drive longevity study, 13 Nov 2013

Scientists confirm world's oldest creature, but kill it determining its age
                                                    --Headline, 14 Nov 2013

There's a lot to be said for being explicit where possible
(also known as the Miley Cyrus Principle).     --snide comment on Slashdot

It's an introduction to Linux class.  I don't know why we have to know how
to make directories.  Just tell me what it is and what it does.
                                --Overheard in Sinclair University hallway

If Geronimo ever made a parachute jump, would he yell "ME!"?

So little pains do the vulgar take in the investigation of truth,
accepting readily the first story that comes to hand.
                     --Thucydides, History of The Peloponnesian War, 432BC

It's pathetic that Obama won't let you keep your insurance plan, but he'll
let the Iranians keep their enriched uranium program.    --Redstate comment

Never trust an atom.  They make up everything.

Failure is not an option, it comes bundled with the software.

Microsoft hurting after NSA backdooring  --UK Register headline, 27 Nov 2013

Giant prehistoric toilet unearthed       --BBC headline, 28 Nov 2013

Two ways.  Gradually, then suddenly.
                                --Ernest Hemingway, on how he went bankrupt

"Of sound mind" means you keep your inner madman under lock and key.
                                                --Paul Valery, paraphrased

There is nothing which I dread so much as a division of the republic into
two great parties, each arranged under its leader, and concerting measures
in opposition to each other.  This, in my humble apprehension, is to be
dreaded as the greatest political evil under our Constitution.
                                                --John Adams, 2 Oct 1789

None can love freedom heartily, but good men;
the rest love not freedom, but license.                    --John Milton

Bond reflected that good Americans were fine people and that
most of them seemed to come from Texas.     --Ian Fleming, "Casino Royale"

To learn who rules over you, simply find out who
you are not allowed to criticize.                              --Voltaire

Do not confuse natural with normal.  An eclipse is natural, but it's
not the normal state of the Earth's relationship to the sun.   --Jay Slater

Consumers view the command-line like they view a colonoscopy; they will do
just about anything imaginable to NOT have to deal with it.    --Slashdot

I wish Google Maps had an "Avoid Ghetto" routing option.

The first testicular guard ("Cup") was used in Hockey in 1874,
and the first helmet was used in 1974.  It's all about priorities.

If knowledge is power, then privacy is freedom.

Comment: My wife has hardly had sex with me since we got married.
Reply:   Redundant.                                    --seen on Slashdot

Your phallus on wheels just ran a red light in Somerset, Pennsylvania.
                                        --Crowley to Dean on "Supernatural"

Research Shows It's Better To Run Away From Nuclear Detonation Blast
                                              --poorly chosen CBS headline

Mannequins with pubic hair shock at American Apparel
                                        --USA Today headline, 17 Jan 2014

I expect to die in bed, my successor will die in prison, and his successor
will die a martyr in the public square.      --Cardinal George of Chicago

A bullet may have your name on it, but splash damage is addressed
"To whom it may concern".

War is God's way of teaching Americans geography.        --H.L. Mencken

Ghost ship carrying cannibal rats could be heading for Britain
                                    --UK Telegraph headline, 23 Jan 2014

Go beat your skull with a brick until some common sense falls in.
                                            --helpful suggestion on Slashdot

Design without code is masturbation.  Code without design...well, it's not
masturbation, it isn't exactly sex either, but something gets f*cked up.
                                                --coding help on Slashdot

Don't support totalitarianism.  You won't like it, even though you claim
we need it "for the children".

IIS is slower than the Elders of the Molasses Tribe copulating in February.
                                                --Slashdot webserver comment

Suffering severe delusions of adequacy, Mr. Spock groped melodies as
effortlessly as someone trying to pick up dimes with a catcher's mitt.
        --"Golden Throats 2" liner notes, on Leonard Nimoy's singing voice

I think you can be an honest person and lie about any number of things.
     --Dan Rather, on why he still believes Bill Clinton to be an honest man

Crocodiles Can Climb Trees          --really creepy headline, 12 Feb 2014

A little knowledge is a dangerous thing, but it's not
half so bad as a lot of ignorance.                       --Terry Pratchett

Where the press is free and every man able to read, all is safe.
                                                         --Thomas Jefferson

Dr. P has a constant smile that pushes the limits of cheek physics.
                                    --weird quote from health care article

Carlyle said "a lie cannot live".  It shows that
he did not know how to tell them.               --Mark Twain's Autobiography

I would rather tell seven lies than make one explanation.
                                    --Letter to John Bellows, 11 April 1883

If I have not seen as far as others, it is because
giants were standing on my shoulders.                   --Hal Abelson

You wouldn't know a narcissist if you saw one in the mirror.
                                                    --dopey Slashdot insult

I'm armed because I'm free, and I'm free because I'm armed.

Any one may so arrange his affairs that his taxes shall be as low as possible.
He is not bound to choose that pattern which will best pay the Treasury; there
is not even a patriotic duty to increase one's taxes. --Judge Learned Hand

Maybe it started a small fire just to keep warm.
                 --smart remark about a Tesla Model S problem, 14 Feb 2014

Hands that help are better far than lips that pray.
                                            --Robert Ingersoll (1833-1899)

Some drink at the fountain of knowledge.  Others gargle and spit.

Using bad analogies is like cutting a tree down with a fish.    --Slashdot

God created an idiot for practice, and then he created a school board.
                                                            --Mark Twain

We should be eternally vigilant against attempts to check the expression
of opinions that we loathe.                    --Oliver Wendell Holmes, Jr.

The cognitive dissonance is strong with this one.     --Yoda on Slashdot

The mediocre triumph because, having little or nothing else to do, they can
devote themselves to intrigue, backstabbing, and jockeying for power.
                                                      --Theodore Dalrymple

Apparatchik: a person who doesn't mind how long a meeting goes on
unless he has another meeting to attend.              --Theodore Dalrymple

I hate being bipolar, it's awesome!                     --seen on Slashdot

Vladimir Putin engages in a round of "Remind Former Soviet Socialist
Republics Who's The Stud And Who's The Soap Dropper in Ukraine".  --Redstate

With a syntax that doesn't look like Satan's diverticulitis.
                                    --Slashdot comment on PHP namespaces

Profanity is the last resort of an inarticulate motherf**ker.
                                                        --seen on Slashdot

Scientists Build Orgasm Machine For Women
                        --headline on "CBS Charlotte" site, 5 March 2014

I would sooner do surgery on my leg with a spoon than work for the low-bidder,
over-commit, under-deliver wreck of a shop that CGI represents.
        --Slashdot answer to "why aren't people working on healthcare.gov?"

I don't care how little your country is, you got a right to run it like you
want to.  When the big nations quit meddling, then the world will have peace.
                                                              --Will Rogers

We arn't beating a dead horse, we're beating the pink stain on the floor
where the horse used to be.            --programming discussion on Slashdot

Dear person who thinks that "good code rarely needs commenting":
the entire world wants to beat you senseless with a nine iron.
                                       --programming discussion on Slashdot

Don't teach a man to fish, feed yourself.
He's a grown man.  Fishing's not that hard.                   --Ron Swanson

I consider trial by jury as the only anchor ever yet imagined by man,
by which a government can be held to the principles of its constitution.
                        --Thomas Jefferson in a letter to Thomas Paine, 1789

It takes no great insight or intelligence to see that the health of a
centralized economy built around dense concentrations of economic power and
a close business alliance with government can't tolerate any considerable
degree of intellectual schooling.                       --John Taylor Gatto

Worrying works.  About 90% of the things I worry about never happen.
                        --Woody Paige (1946-), sports columnist, on ESPN

Ukraine weather forecast: cloudy, with a chance of Russians
                                    --Townhall.com headline, 28 Mar 2014

I'm the best thing that ever happened to that family.
            --Arnold Schwartzenegger on marrying Maria Shriver, Dec 1985

The last time I had a drink was at Madonna and Sean Penn's wedding.
You needed a drink that day.                            --Cher, Feb 1988

I had a pimple.  I think it was 1993.
            --Heidi Klum on the only time a photo of her needed retouching

I am your boyfriend.  If you don't marry me, I shall put you in jail.
                        --Prince William to a favorite classmate, Nov 1988

It's the sort of vague calm you get after vomiting.
          --Ben Affleck on being out of the "Bennifer" spotlight, July 2004

Pavlov goes to the pub for a pint.  The phone rings, and he jumps up and
shouts "Dammit, I forgot to feed the dog!"

Schrodinger's cat walks into a bar.  And doesn't.

Programmer's wife says "Pick up a loaf of bread, and if they have eggs,
get a dozen."  He comes home with 12 loaves of bread.

If I go into a 2-man barber shop, I want the barber with the bad haircut.

I came, I saw, I had a fit.      --Julius Seizure

Q. What is a turbine?
A. Something an Arab or Sheik wears on his head.  --2013 GED exam answer

Q. How is dew formed?
A. The sun shines down on the leaves and makes them perspire.
                                            --2013 GED exam answer

Q. What guarantees may a mortgage company insist on?
A. If you are buying a house they will insist that you are well endowed.
                                            --2013 GED exam answer

Q. In a democratic society, how important are elections?
A. Very important.  Sex can only happen when a male gets an election.
                                            --2013 GED exam answer

Q. What are steroids?
A. Things for keeping carpets still on the stairs.  --2013 GED exam answer

Q. What happens to your body as you age?
A. When you get old, so do your bowels and you get intercontinental.
                                            --2013 GED exam answer

Q. What happens to a boy when he reaches puberty?
A. He says goodbye to his boyhood and looks forward to his adultery.
                                            --2013 GED exam answer

Q. Name a major disease associated with cigarettes.
A. Premature death.                         --2013 GED exam answer

Q. What is artificial insemination?
A. When the farmer does it to the bull instead of the cow.
                                            --2013 GED exam answer

Q. How can you delay milk turning sour?
A. Keep it in the cow.                      --2013 GED exam answer

Q. What is the fibula?
A. A small lie.                             --2013 GED exam answer

Q. What does 'varicose' mean?
A. Nearby.                                  --2013 GED exam answer

Q. What is the most common form of birth control?
A. Most people prevent contraception by wearing a condominium.
                                            --2013 GED exam answer

Q. Give the meaning of the term "Caesarean section"
A. The caesarean section is a district in Rome.    --2013 GED exam answer

Q. What is a seizure?
A. A Roman Emperor.                         --2013 GED exam answer

Q. What is a terminal illness?
A. When you are sick at the airport.        --2013 GED exam answer

My grandparents didn't want a DVD player becuase they thought the laser
would escape and burn down the house.
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #myweirdfamily tweets, 10 Apr 2014

My dad makes bird noises in the grocery store to let my mom know where he is.
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #myweirdfamily tweets, 10 Apr 2014

My 6-yr-old nephew prayed before dinner one night and said, "Dear Lord,
we started from the bottom and now we're here."
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #myweirdfamily tweets, 10 Apr 2014

When I asked my parents why they never gave me the "sex talk", they said it
was because they weren't worried.
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #myweirdfamily tweets, 10 Apr 2014

I taught my 3-yr-old to say "Nailed it" after every answer during her
first eye exam.      --Jimmy Fallon, #myweirdfamily tweets, 10 Apr 2014

I have a firewall so I won't get jacked,
But my password's weak so I still got hacked.          --security poetry

The plural of "anecdote" isn't "evidence".      --seen on Slashdot

He ate cake for the first time, which was like watching a caveman
discover fire.      --Billy Crystal, on his grandson's first birthday party

Caution - This Truck is full of Political Promises
                                    --sign on the back of septic tank truck

The name of my neighbor's WiFi network is ICECREAMBUTTCHEEKS.
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #myweirdneighbor tweets, 14 May 2014

I sing in my apartment all the time, and occasionally I hear my neighbor
singing along with me.  --Jimmy Fallon, #myweirdneighbor tweets, 14 May 2014

I had a neighbor who had a garage sale for 3 months straight because
"business was good".   --Jimmy Fallon, #myweirdneighbor tweets, 14 May 2014

My neighbors have a Santa figure that they leave up all year long.
On Halloween, they duct-taped two gourds to his hands.
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #myweirdneighbor tweets, 14 May 2014

If we threw our Frisbee or ball over the fence by accident, we would get it
back with a note attached saying "I hate kids".
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #myweirdneighbor tweets, 14 May 2014

The good news for the parents of the girls is that we know where they are,
but we cannot tell you.
            --Nigerian Air Marshal Alex Badeh, 26 May 2014, on Boko Haram

You can tell a lot about a woman's mood just by her hands.
If they're holding a gun, she's probably angry.

I don't like making plans for the day because then the word "premeditated"
gets thrown around in the courtroom.

I decided to stop calling the bathroom the John and renamed it the Jim.
I feel way better saying I went to the Jim this morning.

Dear paranoid people who check behind shower curtains for murderers:
if you find one, what's your plan?

The most terrifying words in the English language are: I'm from the government
and I'm here to help.  --Ronald Reagan

The American dream is not that every man must be level with every other man.
The American dream is that every man must be free to become whatever God
intends he should become.                                   --Ronald Reagan

We maintain the peace through our strength; weakness only invites aggression.
                                                            --Ronald Reagan

Welfare's purpose should be to eliminate, as far as possible,
the need for its own existence.                             --Ronald Reagan

There are no great limits to growth because there are no limits of human
intelligence, imagination, and wonder.                      --Ronald Reagan

We don't have a trillion-dollar debt because we haven't taxed enough;
we have a trillion-dollar debt because we spend too much.  --Ronald Reagan

A nation that cannot control its borders is not a nation.  --Ronald Reagan

Freedom is never more than one generation away from extinction.  We didn't
pass it to our children in the bloodstream.  It must be fought for, protected,
and handed on for them to do the same.                      --Ronald Reagan

The night shift is not like your day shift, it's an undisciplined zoo.
Last week someone stole my cellphone and sent erotic texts to my dentist.
                                    --Freddy Rodriguez, "The Night Shift"

Everthing out here that's not you wants to kill you.
                        --Seth McFarlane, "A Million Ways to Die in the West"

We need to do what any animal in nature does when it's cornered --
act erratically and blindly lash out at everything around us.
                                                --seen on "Silicon Valley"

Far too much has been written about great men and not nearly enough
about morons.  Doesn't seem right.     --Peter Dinklage, "Game of Thrones"

I just spent 15 minutes trying to DVR "Growing Pains" on my microwave.
                        --Blake Shelton describing a hangover, 9 June 2014

My date and my mom went to greet each other, but turned the same way and
kissed on the lips.          --Jimmy Fallon, #promfail tweets, 22 May 2014

I went to private school, and we weren't allowed to dance because dancing is
"a vertical position with a horizontal desire".
                             --Jimmy Fallon, #promfail tweets, 22 May 2014

I got stuck in the middle of a dance circle and didn't know what to do,
so I just sat down.          --Jimmy Fallon, #promfail tweets, 22 May 2014

My mom came to take pictures of me, but the camera on her phone was turned
around, so instead she took about 40 selfies.
                             --Jimmy Fallon, #promfail tweets, 22 May 2014

Throughout history, it has been the inaction of those who could have acted;
the indifference of those who should have known better; the silence of the
voice of justice when it mattered most; that has made it possible for evil
to triumph.                                               --Haile Selassie

"Molon Labe" ("Come and take")
          --King Leonidas, in reply to Xerxes of Persia's demand that the
            Spartan army lay down their weapons.

14. Re-reading No. 13, I realize that it's quite possible I'm losing my mind.
    I'm glad that for the most part I'm not aware it's happening.
                  --"20 things I'm thankful for", Fortune, Nov 29, 2004

Bluetooth-Enabled Smart Shoes Vibrate to Give You Directions
                                    --really weird headline, 25 July 2014

You can trade an old 44 for a new 22.   --Why men prefer guns to women #10

You can keep one gun at home and have another for when you're on the road.
                                    --Why men prefer guns to women #9

If you admire a friend's gun and tell him so, he will probably let
you try it out a few times.         --Why men prefer guns to women #8

Your primary gun doesn't mind if you keep another gun for a backup.
                                    --Why men prefer guns to women #7

Your gun will stay with you even if you run out of ammo.
                                    --Why men prefer guns to women #6

A gun doesn't take up a lot of closet space.
                                    --Why men prefer guns to women #5

Guns function normally every day of the month.
                                    --Why men prefer guns to women #4

A gun doesn't ask, "Do these new grips make me look fat?"
                                    --Why men prefer guns to women #3

A gun doesn't mind if you go to sleep after you use it.
                                    --Why men prefer guns to women #2

You can buy a silencer for a gun.   --Why men prefer guns to women #1

Miley Cyrus' B**bs Grabbed by Fan During Meet and Greet
                                    --Headline, "E! Online", 7 Aug 2014

There's fangs and there's blood, and I don't know about your bedroom, but
that doesn't happen in mine.    --Anna Paquin, on sex scenes in "True Blood"

My brother and sister-in-law fought over a Scrabble game.
It ended with my brother eating the scorecard.
                            --Jimmy Fallon, #mydumbfight tweets, 30 Jul 2014

Creative Spelling Copyright.  May use without Persimmons.

I teleported home one night, with Ron and Sid and Meg.
Ron stole Meggie's heart away, and I got Sydney's leg.   --creepy geek poem

There's only one way to have a happy marriage, and as soon
as I learn what it is I'll get married again.              --Clint Eastwood

He came into the car butt-first in a leopard thong.  It was hilarious,
but pretty embarrassing.            --Liv Tyler, on her father Steven Tyler

Java... has a learning curve steeper than a cow's face.   --seen on Slashdot

I drink a lot of coffee and take amphetimines and coke and stuff and I'm
totally spastic so when an earthquake hits, I'm the only one standing still.
            --Slashdot comment on "How Prepared Are You For an Earthquake?"

I still like the tinkering, and just the technical side of it. The fact that
it's actually pretty social, and I get to call people names, is just a bonus.
        --Linus Torvalds, on what keeps him interested in kernel development

We're using missile defense to protect our civilians, and they're using
their civilians to protect their missiles.
                        --Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu, on Hamas

Whose underwear is this?
                --found under "Hot Network Questions" on stackoverflow.com

My friend and I were playing the "trust fall" game.  She fell forward.
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #myweirdfriend tweets, 25 Sep 2014

While no straight thing was ever made, quite a few bent things were
subsequently straightened.     --weird comment on Slashdot, 27 Sep 2014

If buildings were built like software, especially "web-enabled software",
half of them wouldn't have roofs because the plans were drawn on a sunny
day and the architect couldn't be bothered to spend time on something which
would be useless right now and might never be needed.    --Rainer Weikusat

10. Alex Trebek Turn-Ons
            --Letterman Top 10 Offensive "Jeopardy!" Categories, 1 Oct 2014

9. Famous Stains
            --Letterman Top 10 Offensive "Jeopardy!" Categories, 1 Oct 2014

7. Ugly Chicks
            --Letterman Top 10 Offensive "Jeopardy!" Categories, 1 Oct 2014

5. Actors We're Glad Are Dead
            --Letterman Top 10 Offensive "Jeopardy!" Categories, 1 Oct 2014

4. Grabass
            --Letterman Top 10 Offensive "Jeopardy!" Categories, 1 Oct 2014

1. Rumors About Your Sister
            --Letterman Top 10 Offensive "Jeopardy!" Categories, 1 Oct 2014

10. "You try running full speed in a suit"
                     --Letterman Top 10 Secret Service Excuses, 30 Sep 2014

9. "Thought it was Biden"
                     --Letterman Top 10 Secret Service Excuses, 30 Sep 2014

8. "Can't just assume every guy storming the White House is a threat"
                     --Letterman Top 10 Secret Service Excuses, 30 Sep 2014

7. "We always mute the alarm during 'Jeopardy'"
                     --Letterman Top 10 Secret Service Excuses, 30 Sep 2014

6. "We're only here till Thursday"
                     --Letterman Top 10 Secret Service Excuses, 30 Sep 2014

4. "Can't see a thing through these dark glasses"
                     --Letterman Top 10 Secret Service Excuses, 30 Sep 2014

3. "About time someone in Washington got off the fence -- and I right, ladies?"
                     --Letterman Top 10 Secret Service Excuses, 30 Sep 2014

1. "Excuse? What happened?"
                     --Letterman Top 10 Secret Service Excuses, 30 Sep 2014

10. "Beautiful bride and a very pretty groom"
  --Letterman Top 10 Things Overheard At George Clooney's Wedding, 29 Sep 2014

9. "Really, a cash bar?"
  --Letterman Top 10 Things Overheard At George Clooney's Wedding, 29 Sep 2014

8. "Does the bride know he brought a date?"
  --Letterman Top 10 Things Overheard At George Clooney's Wedding, 29 Sep 2014

5. "They're living with her parents until he finds a job"
  --Letterman Top 10 Things Overheard At George Clooney's Wedding, 29 Sep 2014

4. "Since everyone's here, let's film 'Ocean's Fourteen'"
  --Letterman Top 10 Things Overheard At George Clooney's Wedding, 29 Sep 2014

3. "I hear they wrote their own pre-nups"
  --Letterman Top 10 Things Overheard At George Clooney's Wedding, 29 Sep 2014

2. "Nice job, rabbi"
  --Letterman Top 10 Things Overheard At George Clooney's Wedding, 29 Sep 2014

10. Fun Slabs
       --Letterman Top 10 Other Names Considered For Pop Tarts, 26 Sep 2014

7. Nutrient-Free Rectangles
       --Letterman Top 10 Other Names Considered For Pop Tarts, 26 Sep 2014

6. I Dated Your Sister
       --Letterman Top 10 Other Names Considered For Pop Tarts, 26 Sep 2014

3. Iced Roof Shingles
       --Letterman Top 10 Other Names Considered For Pop Tarts, 26 Sep 2014

2. High Fructoast
       --Letterman Top 10 Other Names Considered For Pop Tarts, 26 Sep 2014

1. I've-Given-Up Tarts
       --Letterman Top 10 Other Names Considered For Pop Tarts, 26 Sep 2014

10. Sleeps hanging upside-down
                --Letterman Top Ten Signs Your Kid Is Batman, 23 Sep 2014

9. You knock on his bedroom door, a British butler answers
                --Letterman Top Ten Signs Your Kid Is Batman, 23 Sep 2014

8. Fifth birthday party: lavish benefit for the Wayne Foundation
                --Letterman Top Ten Signs Your Kid Is Batman, 23 Sep 2014

7. His face is on his pajamas
                --Letterman Top Ten Signs Your Kid Is Batman, 23 Sep 2014

6. Saturday: Little League; Sunday: Justice League
                --Letterman Top Ten Signs Your Kid Is Batman, 23 Sep 2014

4. Won't come for dinner unless summoned by a giant light in the sky
                --Letterman Top Ten Signs Your Kid Is Batman, 23 Sep 2014

3. For a teenager, he owns a lot of cowls
                --Letterman Top Ten Signs Your Kid Is Batman, 23 Sep 2014

2. Recurring nightmare that one day he'll be portrayed by Ben Affleck
                --Letterman Top Ten Signs Your Kid Is Batman, 23 Sep 2014

1. You bought him a Batman action figure, but he'd rather play with himself
                --Letterman Top Ten Signs Your Kid Is Batman, 23 Sep 2014

If one guy tailgates you and passes you on the right, he's an asshole.
If 50 people tailgate you and pass you on the right, take a goddamn hint.

A long habit of not thinking a thing WRONG, gives it a superficial
appearance of being RIGHT, and raises at first a formidable outcry
in defense of custom.        --Thomas Paine, "Common Sense" (10 Jan 1776)

This is all happening because my father didn't buy me a train set as a kid.
                  --Warren Buffett, joking about his decision to buy the
                    Burlington Northern Santa Fe railroad, NYT, 4 Nov 2009

The grass may be greener, but the water bill is a *lot* higher.
                         --overheard conversation about having a mistress

Four years after disappearing, a pet parrot has returned home in Torrance,
California, having ditched his British accent and switched to Spanish.
                                            --BBC article, 14 Oct 2014

The habit of interfering with other people's business and making what is
euphoniously called "peace" is like buggery; once you take to it, you
cannot stop.  --General Sir Philip Chetwode, Britain's Imperial General Staff

On the internet nobody can hear you being subtle.
                                    --Linus Torvalds, LinuxCon-Europe 2014

Gives losing the remote a whole new meaning.
                    --comment on an MIT project to create an implantable
                      contraceptive with an external remote control

Having a BBQ while a mountain lion watches from the other side of a 20-foot
chainlink fence can be nerve-whacking.
                        --Slashdot comment describing a Silicon Valley home

I would argue with you, but I don't want to get any stupid on me. --Slashdot

Corruption is like bad breath.  It's hard for the one who has it to
realize it; others realize it and have to tell him.         --Pope Francis

You might be a Sith if your lightsaber has more blades than you have friends.

Q: Why would you be opposed to big data finding out when you take a dump in
   the morning, as long as it's voluntary?
A: If you're taking a dump in the morning and it's not voluntary, you should
   see a doctor.                                          --seen on Slashdot

More to life than money?  OK, I'll take a raise out of your salary, then.

Miami Federal Detention Center Hosts 1st Daddy-Daughter Dance
                                    --article in Miami Herald, 7 Nov 2014

Why not stuff yourself into PID 1 and execute yourself?      --geek insult

Please reevaluate the definition of "satire",
and look up "insanity" while you're at it.         --seen on Slashdot

People that actually have to interact with you in person tend
not to be as dickish because of the potential consequences.
                            --John Gabriel's Greater Internet F*ckwad Theory

I'm sorry, your QUESTION must be in the form of a QUESTION.
                    --What husbands would say if they only had the guts #31

Click here to stab someone in the face over the Internet.
Disclaimer: May not be legal in all countries.           --seen on Slashdot

I wanted to throw my shoe at her head, but I was singing a song about Jesus,
so I thought "no".
          --Kristen Chenoweth, on seeing a childhood enemy in the audience

There is something fundamentally wrong with a system where not being charged
with a war crime keeps you locked away indefinitely and a war crime conviction
is your ticket home.
        --Morris Davis, retired USAF Colonel, former Chief Prosecutor for
          the terrorism trials at Guantanamo Bay, 29 April 2013

One in New Jersey and one in Chicago, where the only natural disasters
are the Cubs and Bears.  --Slashdot thread on where to put offsite backups

I'm a Morlock, not an Eloi.  I want to get things done, not gab about the
brats you spawned to replace yourself.  --Slashdot comment on social skills

The paw you now feel on your leg is from Schroedinger's cat.  Or not.

As calm and relaxed as a rabbit on crack after a chili enema.
                            --really scary animal simile seen on Slashdot

After the Christmas tree fell over for the sixth time, my dad left it on
its side and just put the presents around it.
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #chrismasfail tweets, 19 Dec 2014

My brother spiked the eggnog without telling anyone, and later my grandma
drunkenly admitted she had a crush on the mailman.
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #chrismasfail tweets, 19 Dec 2014

I was chewing gum while sitting on Santa's lap.  He said, "Stop chewing
your gum like a cow."    --Jimmy Fallon, #chrismasfail tweets, 19 Dec 2014

I heard Santa unpacking presents in another room, but when I tried to
go in, my Mom stopped me by saying that Santa would throw salt in my eyes
and blind me.            --Jimmy Fallon, #chrismasfail tweets, 19 Dec 2014

If two vegans are arguing, do we still call it a beef?

Ads that sound human but come from your marketing department's irritable
bowels stain the fabric of the Web.  --"New Clues", from Cluetrain authors

Gnome has always had that "pretty but vacuous" look to it, kinda like my ex.
                                            --snotty comment on Slashdot

Gunshots just outside your window are not the end of the world.
                                        --Lithuanian war manual, Jan 2015

Star Trek always had plot holes, but never ones large enough that your mother
could fit through until JJ Abrams's version.   --snotty comment on Slashdot

Stop that annoying paranoid sh*t about "update your Flash or it'll burn
your family to ashes and eat your left eye while pooping in your mouth".
It's not THAT dangerous.             --Firefox comment on input.mozilla.org

Let the consumer cows run free into wild pastures and
evolve into proud bulls of evolution and growth.        --seen on Slashdot

There is no such thing as a moral or an immoral book.  Books are well-written
or badly-written, that is all.  --Oscar Wilde

There are no hereditary Kings in America and no power not created
by the Constitution.        --U.S. District Court Judge Anna Diggs Taylor

There was an electronic device involved.  By definition, that's cyber.
                                    --Patricia Arquette, "CSI: Cyber" pilot

Just Say No to Monica Lewinsky's Boyfriend's Wife    --seen on a T-Shirt

A strong body makes the mind strong.  As to the species of exercises,
I advise the gun.  While this gives moderate exercise to the body, it
gives boldness, enterprise and independence to the mind.  --Thomas Jefferson

Games played with the ball, and others of that nature, are too violent for
the body and stamp no character on the mind.  Let your gun therefore be your
constant companion of your walks.  --Thomas Jefferson

One loves to possess arms, though they hope never to have occasion for them.
                                                    --Thomas Jefferson

The right of the people to keep and bear...arms shall not be infringed.
A well regulated militia, composed of the body of the people, trained to
arms, is the best and most natural defense of a free country...
                    --James Madison, I Annals of Congress 434 (June 8, 1789)

Arms in the hands of citizens may be used at individual discretion...
in private self-defense.  --John Adams

The fundamental law of the militia is, that it be created, directed and
commanded by the laws, and ever for the support of the laws.  --John Adams

The constitutions of most of our States assert that all power is inherent
in the people; that... it is their right and duty to be at all times armed.
                                                        --Thomas Jefferson

Every citizen should be a soldier.  This was the case with the Greeks and
Romans, and must be that of every free state.           --Thomas Jefferson

An unarmed man can only flee from evil, and evil is not overcome
by fleeing from it.                 --Jeff Cooper, U.S. Marine, 1920-2006

In the immortal words of Olivia Newton-John, DoD wants to get physical
with classified data that ends up in the cloud.
                                       --Nextgov.com article, 20 Feb 2015

The world runs on barely trained monkeys.  If you have a problem with that,
take it up with the Creator who made a 1% patch to a chimp.
                                --snotty Slashdot comment on user skills

Before I left, I set my boss's computer so that every time
he typed his name, it changed to "I like ponies".
                            --Jimmy Fallon, #howIquit tweets, 26 Mar 2015

My friends (dressed as CIA agents) ran in my office yelling
"We finally got you!" and chased me out the door.  I never went back.
                            --Jimmy Fallon, #howIquit tweets, 26 Mar 2015

I worked at Wendy's as a senior.  Asked for a weekend off for a college
visit, and my boss said I had to choose college or Wendy's.
                            --Jimmy Fallon, #howIquit tweets, 26 Mar 2015

Guy dramatically slammed his work-ID down on the table, then walked into the
glass doors on his way out.  --Jimmy Fallon, #howIquit tweets, 26 Mar 2015

Told my boss, "I'm quitting to pursue my dream of not working here."
                            --Jimmy Fallon, #howIquit tweets, 26 Mar 2015

My boss said, "See you Monday."  I said, "You will if you're
on the beach in Cancun."     --Jimmy Fallon, #howIquit tweets, 26 Mar 2015

I sent an edible arrangement to my boss that said, "I quit.  Eat me."
                            --Jimmy Fallon, #howIquit tweets, 26 Mar 2015

My boss said, "You wanna work or smoke pot all day?"
Easiest decision I ever made.  --Jimmy Fallon, #howIquit tweets, 26 Mar 2015

I hate it when I have to debug some *sshole's code.
I hate it more when the *sshole is six-months-ago-me.   --seen on Slashdot

Do not walk behind me, for I may not lead.  Do not walk ahead of me, for
I may not follow.  Do not walk beside me for the path is narrow.  In fact,
just piss off and leave me alone.                  --Fake Zen teachings

Sex is like air.  It's not that important unless you aren't getting any.
                                                   --Fake Zen teachings

No one is listening until you fart.       --Fake Zen teachings

Never test the depth of the water with both feet.  --Fake Zen teachings

If you think nobody cares whether you're alive or dead,
try missing a few mortgage payments.               --Fake Zen teachings

If you lend someone $50 and never see that person again,
it was probably worth it.                          --Fake Zen teachings

If you tell the truth, you don't have to remember anything.
                                                   --Fake Zen teachings

Some days you are the dog, some days you are the tree.
                                                   --Fake Zen teachings

Don't worry, it only seems kinky the first time.   --Fake Zen teachings

There are two theories for arguing with women.  Neither works.
                                                   --Fake Zen teachings

Never take a sleeping pill and a laxative on the same night.
                                                   --Fake Zen teachings

Rust is a work-in-progress and may do anything it likes up to and including
eating your laundry.   --"Rust" system language developers, 1.0-beta

The hottest places in Hell are reserved for those who,
in times of moral crisis, preserved their neutrality.           --Dante

One's right to life, liberty, property, speech, press,
freedom of worship and assembly may not be submitted to vote.

No man is an island or a continent.  Some men are incontinent, though.
                                                        --seen on Slashdot

I have this weird condition where I don't feel the slightest bit of shame
over history I didn't cause or natural accidents over which I'd no control,
like my heritage.                                       --seen on Slashdot

Having a teenage threesome with Tom Cruise's ex and Heath Ledger's girl.
                --nasty summary of James Van Der Beek's career on Slashdot

Unless he has a fetish for blind women, I have grave doubts
about his ability to give advice on sex.      --Erick Erickson, April 2015

I've never been so soft in my life, except for that unfortunate semester
in college when I simultaneously discovered Krispy Kreme and pot.
                                                --Olivia Wilde, April 2015

Walnuts, you can f*ck off out of my banana bread.   --Anna Kendrick, Twitter

"Instagram famous" is "weird famous".               --Anna Kendrick, Twitter

I like to think of myself less like "adult" and more like "former fetus".
                                                    --Anna Kendrick, Twitter

Finishing a Reese's cup and realizing you still have one left is like
realizing it's Friday when you thought it was Wednesday.
                                                    --Anna Kendrick, Twitter

"You're the only person in the world I don't hate right now"
is as close as I get to saying "I love you".        --Anna Kendrick, Twitter

Never a diva, but occasionally a real dick.         --Anna Kendrick, Twitter

I like my men like I like my coffee.  Silent.       --Anna Kendrick, Twitter

I'm so humble it's crazy.  I'm like the Kanye West of humility.
                                                    --Anna Kendrick, Twitter

Oh hello again 4am, you WHORE.                      --Anna Kendrick, Twitter

Of course I got your text, I'm just ignoring it.  Don't make it weird.
                                                    --Anna Kendrick, Twitter

Peanut butter on Triscuits and I'm not even stoned.  --Anna Kendrick, Twitter

My patronus is a Corgi.                             --Anna Kendrick, Twitter

If Natalie Portman asked me to kill someone, I'd probably do it.
                                                    --Anna Kendrick, Twitter

When Chuck Norris throws an exception, it is always fatal.

Chuck Norris doesn't program.  He stares at the computer until it does what
he wants.

"You don't see people pulling out a crossword puzzle
 when you're at dinner with them."
"I guess you had better dates than I did."     --seen on Slashdot

"Well done, Admiral Aspergers."
"Thank you, Airman Autism."        --geek fight on Slashdot, 17 Apr 2015

The lunatics end up in charge of everything.
Sane, normal people don't need power trips.     --James P. Hogan, 1941-2010

Statistics are like a bikini -- what they reveal
is suggestive but what they hide is vital.                   --Slashdot

Having children is hereditary -- if your parents didn't have any,
you probably won't either.

Watch a fox make a sandwich near Chernobyl exclusion zone
                                                --UPI headline, 29 Apr 2015

North Dakota State Rep. Randy Boehning was outed by a man he'd been
messaging on the gay dating app Grindr after refusing to vote for LGBT
protection bill.                    --Karma works: UPI, 29 Apr 2015

Maria Hill: What does S.H.I.E.L.D. stand for, Agent Ward?
Ward: Strategic Homeland Intervention, Enforcement and Logistics Division.
Maria Hill: And what does that mean to you?
Ward: It means someone really wanted our initials to spell out "shield".
                                       --seen on "Marvel's Agents of SHIELD"

If you get hurt, hurt 'em back.  If you get killed, walk it off.
                               --Captain America, "Avengers: Age of Ultron"

According to Pixar, 1,484,437 little toy monkeys spilled out of the
Barrel o' Monkeys in the opening sequence of "Toy Story 3".  --geek trivia

Strike while the... bug is close.  --proverbs completed by first-graders

It's always darkest before... Daylight Saving Time.
                                   --proverbs completed by first-graders

Never underestimate the power of... termites.
                                   --proverbs completed by first-graders

You can lead a horse to water but... how?
                                   --proverbs completed by first-graders

Don't bite the hand that... looks dirty.
                                   --proverbs completed by first-graders

No news is... impossible.          --proverbs completed by first-graders

A miss is as good as a... Mr.      --proverbs completed by first-graders

You can't teach an old dog new... math.
                                   --proverbs completed by first-graders

If you lie down with dogs, you'll... stink in the morning.
                                   --proverbs completed by first-graders

Love all, trust... me.             --proverbs completed by first-graders

The pen is mightier than the... pigs.
                                   --proverbs completed by first-graders

An idle mind is... the best way to relax.
                                   --proverbs completed by first-graders

Where there's smoke there's... pollution.
                                   --proverbs completed by first-graders

Happy the bride who... gets all the presents.
                                   --proverbs completed by first-graders

A penny saved is... not much.      --proverbs completed by first-graders

Two's company, three's... the Musketeers.
                                   --proverbs completed by first-graders

Don't put off till tomorrow what... you put on to go to bed.
                                   --proverbs completed by first-graders

Laugh and the whole world laughs with you, cry and...
you have to blow your nose.        --proverbs completed by first-graders

There are none so blind as... Stevie Wonder.
                                   --proverbs completed by first-graders

Children should be seen and not... spanked or grounded.
                                   --proverbs completed by first-graders

If at first you don't succeed... get new batteries.
                                   --proverbs completed by first-graders

You get out of something only what you... see in the picture on the box.
                                   --proverbs completed by first-graders

When the blind lead the blind... get out of the way.
                                   --proverbs completed by first-graders

A bird in the hand... is going to poop on you.
                                   --proverbs completed by first-graders

Better late than... pregnant.      --proverbs completed by first-graders

Putin Will Soon Have Superhuman Robo-Soldiers!
                        --actual headline, "The Fiscal Times", 3 May 2015

Chuck Norris threw a grenade and killed 50 people.  Then it exploded.

Chuck Norris once broke a mirror over the head of a black cat while standing
under a ladder on Friday the thirteenth.  The next day he won the lottery.

Chuck Norris can speak French... in Russian.

Chuck Norris can put out a fire with a gallon of gasoline.

Chuck Norris once climbed Mt. Everest in 15 minutes, 14 of which he used
to build a snowman at the bottom.

A bulletproof vest wears Chuck Norris for protection.

Death once had a near-Chuck-Norris experience.

Chuck Norris didn't dial the wrong number, you picked up the wrong phone.

Chuck Norris can cut a knife with butter.

Chuck Norris can kill your imaginary friends.

Chuck can set ants on fire with a magnifying glass.  At night.

Chuck Norris can hear sign language.

Chuck Norris beat the sun in a staring contest.

When Bruce Banner gets mad he turns into the Hulk.  When the Hulk gets
mad he turns into Chuck Norris.  When Chuck Norris gets mad, run.

When Chuck Norris enters a room, he doesn't turn the lights on,
he turns the dark off.

Chuck Norris was once charged with attempted murder in Boulder County, but
the Judge dropped the charges because Chuck Norris does not "attempt" murder.

When Chuck Norris gives you the finger, he's telling you how many seconds
you have left to live.

If it looks like chicken, tastes like chicken, and feels like chicken but
Chuck Norris says it's beef, then it's beef.

Once a cobra bit Chuck Norris' leg.  After five days of excruciating pain,
the cobra died.

Chuck Norris doesn't cheat death.  He wins fair and square.

Chuck Norris can kill two stones with one bird.

If you have five dollars and Chuck Norris has five dollars,
Chuck Norris has more money than you.

There is no CTRL button on Chuck Norris's computer.
Chuck Norris is always in control.

Apple pays Chuck Norris 99 cents every time he listens to a song.

When Chuck Norris does pushups, he is actually pushing the earth down.

Chuck Norris' calendar goes straight from March 31st to April 2nd.
No one fools Chuck Norris.

When a zombie apocalypse starts, Chuck Norris doesn't try to survive.
The zombies do.

When Chuck Norris was born he drove his mom home from the hospital.

Chuck Norris will never have a heart attack.  Even a heart isn't foolish
enough to attack Chuck Norris.

Chuck Norris doesn't wear a watch.  He decides what time it is.

If he wanted to, Chuck Norris could rob a bank.  By phone.

Bigfoot claims he saw Chuck Norris.

The real reason Hitler killed himself is because he found out that
Chuck Norris is Jewish.

Chuck Norris once went to Mars.  That's why there are no signs of life.

Chuck Norris makes onions cry.

Chuck Norris counted to infinity.  Twice.

Chuck Norris can hit you so hard your blood will bleed.

The reason the Holy Grail has never been recovered is because nobody is
brave enough to ask Chuck Norris to give up his favourite coffee mug.

Chuck Norris CAN find the end of a circle.

Chuck Norris doesn't play "hide-and-seek".
He plays "hide-and-pray-I-don't-find-you".

Chuck Norris is the only person that can punch a cyclops between the eye.

Brett Favre can throw a football over 50 yards.
Chuck Norris can throw Brett Favre even further.

Chuck Norris can go up Niagara Falls in a cardboard box.

Chuck Norris can drown a fish.

M.C. Hammer learned the hard way that Chuck Norris *can* touch this.

Chuck Norris plays Russian Roulette with a fully-loaded revolver.  And wins.

Chuck Norris can build a snowman out of rain.

When the Boogeyman goes to sleep every night he checks his closet for
Chuck Norris.

If you spell Chuck Norris wrong on Google it doesn't say, "Did you mean
Chuck Norris?"  It simply replies, "Run while you still have the chance."

Leading hand sanitizers claim they can kill 99.9 percent of germs.
Chuck Norris can kill 100 percent of whatever the hell he wants.

There is no theory of evolution, just a list of creatures Chuck Norris
allows to live.

Chuck Norris' tears cure cancer.  Too bad he's never cried.

Chuck Norris doesn't have good aim.
His bullets just know better than to miss.

Chuck Norris can pick oranges from an apple tree and make the best
lemonade you've ever tasted.

Chuck Norris has a diary.  It's called the Guinness Book of World Records.

Chuck Norris beat Halo 1, 2, and 3 on Legendary with a broken
Guitar Hero controller.

The original title for "Alien vs Predator" was "Alien and Predator vs
Chuck Norris".  The film was cancelled because no one would pay nine
dollars to see a movie fourteen seconds long.

When Chuck Norris' daughter lost her virginity, he got it back.

Chuck Norris tells Simon what to do.

Chuck Norris knows Victoria's secret.

Chuck Norris is the reason Waldo is hiding.

Chuck Norris's blood type is AK-47.

Chuck Norris can strangle you with a cordless phone.

Bill Gates lives in constant fear that Chuck Norris' PC will crash.

Chuck Norris' dog is trained to pick up his own poop because Chuck Norris
will not take shit from anyone.

Giraffes were created when Chuck Norris upper-cutted a horse.

Chuck Norris can do a wheelie on a unicycle.

Chuck Norris refers to himself in the fourth person.

Chuck Norris actually died four years ago, but the Grim Reaper doesn't
have the stones to tell him.

Police label anyone attacking Chuck Norris as a Code 45-11: a suicide.

Some kids pee their name in the snow.  Chuck Norris can pee his name
into concrete.

Chuck Norris does not submit to Homeland Security, he IS Homeland Security.

Chuck Norris once bowled a perfect game with a marble.

Chuck Norris's computer has no "backspace" button; Chuck Norris doesn't
make mistakes.

Chuck Norris sleeps with a pillow under his gun.

Jack was nimble, Jack was quick, but Jack still couldn't dodge
Chuck Norris' roundhouse kick.

Chuck Norris is the only person on the planet that can kick you in the
back of the face.

On a high school math test, Chuck Norris put down "Violence" as every one
of the answers.  He got an A+ on the test because Chuck Norris solves all
his problems with Violence.

Chuck Norris can speak Braille.

Chuck Norris is the only man to ever defeat a brick wall
in a game of tennis.

Chuck Norris can unscramble an egg.

Chuck Norris went around the world... by standing still.

Chuck Norris recorded the making of the first video camera.

Chuch Norris stood next to a bear and was told he had to leave
because the bear was scared.

Chuck Norris can make a slinky go upstairs.

Chuck Norris puts the "laughter" in "manslaughter".

Chuck Norris can divide by zero.

Chuck Norris hates Raymond.

Chuck Norris won the World Horseshoe Pitching Contest
while they were still attached to a Clydesdale.

Chuck Norris once gave a man the Heimlich Manuever.
That man still holds the record for most bones broken.

Thunder is caused by Chuck Norris rubbing the stubble on his chin.

There once was a street called Chuck Norris, but the name was changed
for public safety because nobody crosses Chuck Norris and lives.

Chuck Norris won the Tour de France on a stationary bike.

Kings buy Chuck-Norris-size beds.

Chuck Norris doesn't worry about high gas prices.
His vehicles run on fear.

Chuck Norris can squeeze orange juice out of a lemon.

Chuck Norris can charge a cell phone by rubbing it against his beard.

When an episode of "Walker, Texas Ranger" aired in France, the French
surrendered to Chuck Norris just to be on the safe side.

Chuck Norris once visited The Virgin Islands.
Afterward, they were renamed The Islands.

Abstinence-Only Texas High School Hit By Chlamydia Outbreak
                                --Huffington Post headline, 10 May 2015

White dwarf seeks red giant for binary relationship.    --Astronomer joke

In every country and every age, the priest has been hostile to liberty.
He is always in alliance with the tyrant, allowing his abuses in return
for protection to his own.                             --Thomas Jefferson

Nothing says "get off my lawn" like 1234.7568@compuserve.com
                                                --snotty Slashdot comment

Cops Use DNA Analysis to Prove Chili's Waiter Spit in Customer's Drink
                                        --ABC News headline, 3 Jun 2015

iTunes has always been a Swiss Army knife, if a Swiss Army knife were made
out of rusty nails, bits of string and some pudding.  By chimpanzees.
                                                --snotty Slashdot comment

We can all sleep easy at night knowing that somewhere at any given time,
the Foo Fighters are out there fighting Foo.         --David Letterman

They should change the name "Chipotle" to "Toilet-fogger".   --D. Cunningham

When you gaze long into the code, the code also gazes into you.
                                                --Geek version of Nietzsche

Statement: Teachers need to be fed.
Reply: They can eat the lowest-performing student as a lesson to the rest.
                    --conversation about teacher compensation on Slashdot

A "landing" is where you run out of altitude, airspeed and ideas at exactly
the same time you're over the touchdown part of the runway.   --Slashdot

Never shake hands with a man you meet in a fertility clinic.

Every conversation with ITG (Incompetent Tech Guy) was like standing on
a playground slide.  At the top was incompetence; at the bottom, insanity.
                        --http://www.reddit.com/r/talesfromtechsupport/

I am literally open to every single thing that is consenting and doesn't
involve an animal.    --Miley Cyrus, June 2015, on her sex preferences

Being "empowered" is not the same as being "a b*tch".    --Ariana Grande

We were going to be the "Spicy Girls", but then we realized
there was a porn site called The Spicy Girls.
                        --Victoria Beckham, on choosing a name for the band

He said, "If you could go out to lunch with anyone, who would it be?"
I said "Mark Twain", and he said "It has to be somebody real."
                                --Amy Schumer, describing her worst date

Guys are lazy.  They use what's in front of them.  He has his own toothbrush,
of course, and in an emergency, *then* we'll share.
             --Jennifer Aniston, on Justin Theroux borrowing her toiletries

If you're happy all the time, you're usually a sociopath.    --Amy Poehler

My Renault is equipped with no fewer than 4 lights to indicate an engine
fault, which I think just goes to show how much the French stand behind
their engineering.                                         --seen on Reddit

The Constitution is in whole a contract of citizenship to a government;
it has to be taken as a whole or not at all.  You can't pick and choose
which rights you want to stomp on and keep the parts you like.    --Slashdot

We were shooting on the beach.  I looked down and it was, like, warm.
        --Amanda Seyfried, after Channing Tatum peed on her feet as a prank

Any guy who takes a selfie in the bathroom mirror.
                                    --Laura Prepon, on her biggest turnoff

I'm using it as a power stance.  It's funny to see people try to
look me in the eye.          --Miley Cyrus, on why she wears nipple pasties

Preserve wildlife.  Pickle a squirrel.

Issac Newton became discouraged when he fell up a flight of stairs.

I wouldn't recognize Haskell code if it bit me in the ass
and called me names.     --Linus Torvalds, Slashdot interview, 30 June 2015

"exit status 1 -- Cock is not synchronised."
                        --really bad typo in Network Time Protocol tutorial

50-million-year-old worm sperm is a scientific treasure
                                    --Engadget.com headline, 15 July 2015

One man traded 2 legs for the freedom of the other to trade 2 balls for
2 boobs.  Guess which one made the cover of Vanity Fair, was praised for
his courage by President Obama and is to be honored with the "Arthur Ashe
Courage Award" by ESPN?  Yup.         --Peter Berg, on Brucina Jenner award

The remarkable thing about my mother is that for thirty years she served
us nothing but leftovers.  The original meal has never been found.
                                                        --Calvin Trillin

Wee disgust spell-chequers inn our last meting.    --seen on Slashdot

It's a firehose that people want to shove up their bum until it shoots
out their nose, at which point they put hoses in their nostrils and the
process repeats itself.       --Twitter description on Slashdot, Aug 2015

In America we could pass legislation on the width of an ear of corn, and by
the end of the vote it would have legalized Nazi bingo parlor strippers and
privatized nuclear cheesecake warfare.              --seen on Slashdot

Furious activity is no substitute for understanding.   --H.H. Williams

How do you catch a unique rabbit?
Unique up on it.

How do you catch a tame rabbit?
Tame way, unique up on it.

How do crazy people go through the forest?
They take the psycho path

How do you get holy water?
Boil the hell out of it.

What do fish say when they hit a concrete wall?
Dam!

What do Eskimos get from sitting on the ice too long?
Polaroids

What do you call a boomerang that doesn't work?
A stick.

What do you call Santa's helpers?
Subordinate Clauses.

What do you call four bullfighters in quicksand?
Quatro sinko.

What do you get from a pampered cow?
Spoiled milk.

What do you get when you cross a snowman with a vampire?
Frostbite.

What lies at the bottom of the ocean and twitches?
A nervous wreck.

What's the difference between roast beef and pea soup?
Anyone can roast beef.

Why do gorillas have big nostrils?
Because they have big fingers.

Why don't blind people like to sky dive?
Because it scares the dog.

What kind of coffee was served on the Titanic?
Sanka.

Why did Pilgrims' pants always fall down?
Because they wore their belt buckle on their hat.

What's the difference between a bad golfer and a bad skydiver?
A bad golfer goes WHACK, dammit.  A bad skydiver goes dammit, WHACK.

Woman gets revenge on babe-watching beau by glueing his eyes shut
                                 --"National Examiner" article, 15 Aug 2005

Your enemy is never a villain in his own eyes.  Keep this in mind, it may
offer a way to make him your friend.  If not, you can kill him without hate,
and quickly.                                             --Robert Heinlein

Free, as in your money being freed from the confines of your bank account.

Apparently, the "genetic diversity" between your parents
wasn't much to talk about either.                        --Slashdot insult

Chimpanzees love horror films, research finds
                        --headline on www.independent.co.uk, 18 Sep 2015

I want to remind myself what a real ass looks like.
 --Admiral Nimitz, when asked why he had a picture of MacArthur in his office

Three biggest cowboy lies: "I won the buckle in a rodeo",
"The truck's paid for", and "I was just helping the sheep over the fence".

I usually take a two-hour nap from 1 to 4.    --Yogi Berra

Never answer an anonymous letter.    --Yogi Berra

I always thought the record would stand until it was broken.    --Yogi Berra

I'm not going to buy my kids an encyclopedia.  Let 'em walk to school
like I did.    --Yogi Berra

Baseball is 90% mental, the other half is physical.    --Yogi Berra

It ain't the heat, it's the humility.    --Yogi Berra

He hits from both sides of the plate, he's amphibious.    --Yogi Berra

We made too many wrong mistakes.    --Yogi Berra

The future ain't what it used to be.    --Yogi Berra

It gets late early out here.    --Yogi Berra

If the people don't want to come out to the ballpark,
nobody's going to stop them.                            --Yogi Berra

Why buy good luggage?  You only use it when you travel.    --Yogi Berra

The era of high finance had so swollen the mass of claims upon the future
that only roaring prosperity could sustain it.  --Frederick Lewis Allen

Here, take my napkin.  You have something brown on your nose.
                                    --Slashdot reply to suck-up comment

Remember, every time an install of Windows is killed, God gives a
homeless kitten a good home.  Please, think of the kittens.    --Slashdot

When I was a teenager, I went to the premiere of "Showgirls" with
my mother.  It doesn't get more inappropriate than that.    --Claire Danes

I'd tell you to shove your idea up your *ss, but your head's in the way.
                                                        --Slashdot feedback

Practice safe eating.  Always use condiments.

Pessimist's blood type: B-negative

"Grapes of Wrath": good book.  Wrath of grapes: bad hangover.

If you SYN me do I not ACK?                 --self-aware router

Always think of something new.  This helps you forget your last bad idea.
                                                            --Seth Frankel

I'll have one martini, two at the most.
Three I'm under the table, four under my host.              --D. Parker

Squad Leader: Maniac has responded with a scornful remark.
Automated Assistant: Approach, and repeat ultimatum in an even
  firmer tone of voice.  Add the words, "or else".       --"Demolition Man"

German sounds like people are gargling ancient Sanskrit
three days into Oktoberfest.                             --Slashdot

Your password must contain an uppercase letter, a number, a haiku,
a gang sign, a heiroglyph, and the blood of a virgin.

Try searching for diesel generators, doll clothes, personal lubricant,
tire chains, and jumper cables all on the same day.
                    --Geek discussion on messing with advertising metrics

Bright as a black hole and about twice as dense.         --geek insult

"Did you hear the joke about the feminist?"
"That's NOT funny!"                            --Social Justice Warrior

I tried to file my nails, but in the process I accidentally fixed a small
engine that was near by.  Which was nice.
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

Twilight plus spanking minus sparkly vampires.
                                    --Amazon review of "50 Shades of Gray"

She blushed, then flushed, then turned red, flushed, went crimson,
then turned beet red, then blushed, then turned scarlet!  OMG!
                                    --Amazon review of "50 Shades of Gray"

I forgot the knife in the front pocket of my Swiss Army shorts and when
my wife washed them it completely disassembled our washing machine.
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

Got stuck in a stone while on vacation.  Unfortunately, removing it made
me the new king of Switzerland, which is a lot of responsibility.
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

Received this knife as a gift for my 18th birthday.  Wish I'd have known
what it was because as soon as I touched it, I grew a mustache and became
a Navy Seal.  Mom fainted and my dad laughed and handed me a beer.  I was
born a girl; minus 2 stars because my breasts were really nice.
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

As soon as I found out how much my husband spent on this, I left him.
Bad move, it represented him at the divorce hearing.  I now pay $10,000
a month in alimony.         --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

If you open up all the attachments in the right order, you can actually
hold it up to your eye and see the Higgs-Boson particle.
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

I haven't been able to use ours yet.  Once my wife found out about the
rechargable rabbit attachment, I haven't seen either one for a week.
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

Doc Brown and I added a flux capacitor and charged this bad boy with 1.21 Gw
of power and it flat disappeared.
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

I bought this knife so I wouldn't be the biggest tool in my house.
Now I am a big tool with a bigger tool.
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

I accidently activated the "Self-Activator" tool and this otherwise
fabulous multifunction knife is currently dismantling my compu
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

I added this knife to the cart and it told me the sex of my unborn child!
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

It's rumored that this knife has the only weapon that can kill Chuck Norris.
The problem is that Chuck Norris is the only one powerful enough to release
the weapon.                 --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

I used to wonder why Switzerland had never been overrun despite being
right next-door to two imperial German armies.  I don't wonder anymore.
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

I put this knife in my checked-in baggage, and was escorted off the plane
by TSA, FBI, CIA, LAPD, TGIF, and NSYNC because it has a grenade-launcher.
I am writing from a classified prison and don't know if I will make it out
of here alive.  I love you mom.
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

I tried to ue the nil clipper nd ccidentlly cut off my left pinky.  No,
I cnt't rech the leftmot column of key on my keybord.  Lter, hen I tried
the toothpick, it chopped off my er.  tupid tool!
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

I took it out of the package, followed the built in compass, and found that
missing Malaysian airliner.  --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

I tried to file my nails, but in the process I accidentally killed a moose.
I liked that moose.  At least my nails are clean.
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

Sliced itself through the box and took out our mailman.  Luckily it came
with a pull-out replacement mailman feature.
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

Swung it at a mugger.  The coroner's report on him is nearly 18 pages long.
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

Accidentally opened the nuclear warhead implement instead of the toothbrush,
now I am charged with terrorism, genocide and ethnic cleansing.
Best.  Product.  Ever.      --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

The knife has become self-aware, and is staring at me from the corner of
the room.  Looks angry.     --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

The unicorn toothbrush does not operate properly when used at the same
time with the parachute.  (Sent from my Wenger 16999)
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

I put it in my pocket and it circumcised me.
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

I discovered I could use the personal massager at the same time as the
unicycle.  After a couple days of riding it to work, I kicked the boyfriend
out and sold my car.  I've lost 30lbs and am completely satisfied with
this product.              --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

While using the corkscrew, I performed minor surgery on my wife who was
standing in the next room.  I also started a small fire, caught a rabbit
in a snare and managed to signal the Coast Guard that I was in danger.
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

Weighing in at just over 7 pounds, I find that positioning it correctly
in my front pocket brings all the ladies out.  I've received compliments.
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

Ripped through the front pocket of my Dockers and broke two of my toes in
the process.  Not recommended for daily carry.
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

This knife has one tool too many.  I started playing with it on the bus on
my way to work and accidentally impregnated the woman sitting next to me.
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

I didn't even order this knife.  Somehow it ordered itself.  I'm so confused
right now.                  --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

Using this knife, I was able to dislodge myself from between a rock and
a hard place.               --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

I accidentally left this knife in the glovebox of my wore-out 67 Chevy
truck overnight.  The knife fully restored the truck, drove it to the store,
and returned with two hookers and a cooler full of beer.
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

I assembled it without instructions and built a cold-fusion reactor instead.
Not good as I live in a 1200 sq ft apartment with my family of 4.
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

It became self-aware at 2:14 am Eastern time, August 29th.
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

I used this to assemble my computer but in the process built a motorcycle,
which I thought was unsafe.  Luckily one of the tools is a helmet so it
worked itself out.          --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

When Edward Scissorhands moved in down the block, I was pretty envious of
his cool hands.  Then I got this.  Now who's jealous.  Not me, that's who.
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

When you put it on a 5ft staff, it precisely shows you the location of
the Ark of the Covenant.    --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

I left it in my bag when I went to the airport, and TSA wasn't happy.
Somehow during the pat-down I did manage to fix two broken X-ray machines
and an Airbus A320.         --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

I once fought off a family of hungry grizzlies by simply pulling it out
of my pocket.  They apologized for the inconvenience and left.
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

Seems like a decent product, but shortly after receiving it, Optimus Prime
showed up and demanded that I return his comrade.
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

Tried using the toilet paper attachment while out in the woods and ended
up giving myself a vasectomy.  THANKS!
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

I was carrying the Wenger 16999 in the bed of my pickup truck when I hit a
pothole.  It flew out of the back, opened up, and carved part of the sun off.
Global warming ended, and I won the Nobel Prize.
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

Carried it in my camp shorts on a one-week back-country hike in Yellowstone.
Wore hole in pocket and now I think I'm pregnant.
                            --Amazon review of Wenger 16999 Swiss Army knife

While this novel concept of "girlfriend" may be intoxicating to some of you,
you're supposed to raise livestock, not date it.
                                    --Slashdot comment about geek whining

Someone who considers himself too important for small jobs
is often too small for important jobs.                    --Jaques Tati

Legislation is the last refuge of useless middlemen.

With a mind that sharp, you should be at Harvard or Oxford.
In a jar of formaldehyde.                           --Slashdot compliment

Moore's Law of Mad Science: Every eighteen months, the minimum IQ necessary
to destroy the world drops by one point.

I just put Stephenie Meyer dustcovers on my books, then people can't
return them to me fast enough.           --Slashdot solution to book theft

Comment: Some of the finest legal minds come from prison.
Reply: And the rest should be there.                      --seen on Slashdot

All tyranny needs to gain a foothold is for
people of good conscience to remain silent.       --Thomas Jefferson

The difference between Wordpress and a well-built site is the difference
between the corner prostitute and Melinda Gates.  One's available for all
to do as they please, while the other requires just the right touch and
some luck and patience.

Google self-driving car pulled over for driving too slowly in Mountain View
                                                --Headline, 13 Nov 2015

Indonesia's Anti-Drug Agency Proposes Using Crocodiles To Guard Prisons
                                        --Slashdot headline, 13 Nov 2015

Comment: Sikhs wear turbans, not Muslims.
Reply:   Well duh! Of course Sikhs don't wear Muslims.     --Slashdot

We tend to scoff at the beliefs of the ancients.  But we can't scoff at
them personally, to their faces, and this is what annoys me.  --Jack Handey

Most programmers would prefer not to have their code look like someone
threw up on the screen.               --Slashdot reply to a Perl programmer

She's ugly enough to make a train take a dirt road.      --unknown

You used "UX" which, just as a knee-jerk reaction, makes me want to kick
you in the balls, take your wallet, get your address from your license
and go burn your house down.                      --Slashdot design comment

eBay scammer steals identity of Special Agent investigating him
                                        --"Register" headline, 18 Nov 2015

I can count the the number of times that's happened
on the hand of the world's worst shop teacher.     --creepy Slashdot analogy

If I had to choose between Yahoo! web hosting and a bullet to the head,
it would be the last decision I ever had to make.  --Slashdot review

Beware of Dog.  He eats everyone the owner shoots.    --seen on a yard sign

Main difference between Bill and Hillary: if Bill offers you a cigar,
you should politely refuse.                             --seen on Slashdot

Researchers Have Developed Socks That Generate Electricity Using Urine
                                    --"Tech Times" headline, 11 Dec 2015

North Carolina citizenry defeat pernicious Big Solar plan to suck up the Sun
                                    --"Ars Technica" headline, 14 Dec 2015

Chewbacca gets into some dark chocolate and has to spend the night
at the vet.         --Biggest surprises in "Star Wars: The Force Awakens"

It's a musical.  Hugh Jackman plays Han Solo.
                    --Biggest surprises in "Star Wars: The Force Awakens"

At the end of the movie, it turns out that the whole story took place
in a pretty close galaxy, last week.
                    --Biggest surprises in "Star Wars: The Force Awakens"

Leia's kids got grossed out when they found out mom kissed uncle Luke
on Hoth, and not in a brother-sister kind of way.
                    --Biggest surprises in "Star Wars: The Force Awakens"

Samuel L. Jackson comes back to life as Mace Windu and exclaims, "What's
in your wallet?"       --Biggest surprises in "Star Wars: The Force Awakens"

Jim Carrey cameo appearance.
                    --Biggest surprises in "Star Wars: The Force Awakens"

Liam Neeson turns up after he loses another one of his daughters.
                    --Biggest surprises in "Star Wars: The Force Awakens"

After awakening, The Force goes to the bathroom, trips over the dog bowl
and then goes back to sleep.
                    --Biggest surprises in "Star Wars: The Force Awakens"

Han and Chewy got bored on a mission and now have joint custody of
something they tell people is an Ewok.
                    --Biggest surprises in "Star Wars: The Force Awakens"

Luke travels back in time in a suspiciously DeLorean-shaped speeder and
accidentally becomes his own grandfather.
                    --Biggest surprises in "Star Wars: The Force Awakens"

There are, in fact, several hives of scum and villainy more wretched
than Mos Eisley.    --Biggest surprises in "Star Wars: The Force Awakens"

R2-D2 is BB-8's father.  --Biggest surprises in "Star Wars: The Force Awakens"

Jar-Jar Binks doesn't appear on screen, but 30 minutes of screen time
is devoted to describing how horribly he died.
                    --Biggest surprises in "Star Wars: The Force Awakens"

Midi-chlorians linked to heart disease.
                    --Biggest surprises in "Star Wars: The Force Awakens"

Once everyone finds out they're delicious, the Ewoks are hunted to
extinction.         --Biggest surprises in "Star Wars: The Force Awakens"

Luke goes crazy after finding out he kissed his sister.
                    --Biggest surprises in "Star Wars: The Force Awakens"

Vader and stormtrooper turn into LEGO'S, take light-saber selfie.
                    --Biggest surprises in "Star Wars: The Force Awakens"

C-3P0 is voiced by Siri throughout as product placement, all ships
are sponsored by Pirelli, and Han Solo wears crocs.
                    --Biggest surprises in "Star Wars: The Force Awakens"

Han and Chewie get hitched after Republic legalizes marriage equality.
Sith Lords vow to overturn it.
                    --Biggest surprises in "Star Wars: The Force Awakens"

It's a Holiday Special starring Jar-Jar and the whole prequel gang,
with special musical guest Nickelback!
                    --Biggest surprises in "Star Wars: The Force Awakens"

Darth Vader took a DNA test on Jerry Springer.  He was not the father.
                    --Biggest surprises in "Star Wars: The Force Awakens"

The Millennium Falcon is actually Biannual.
                    --Biggest surprises in "Star Wars: The Force Awakens"

Jawas made a fortune parting out the Death Star, spent it all on sand.
No man, really gooooood sand.
                    --Biggest surprises in "Star Wars: The Force Awakens"

Han Solo gets Botox and lip-filler and is now called Caitlin.
                    --Biggest surprises in "Star Wars: The Force Awakens"

Bruce Willis is a ghost.
                    --Biggest surprises in "Star Wars: The Force Awakens"

Han & Chewbacca fight to the death after Han finds picture of
Calista Flockhart on Chewy's Iphone.
                    --Biggest surprises in "Star Wars: The Force Awakens"

Secret files reveal police feared that Trekkies could turn on society
                                    --"The Telegraph" headline, 17 May 2015

Do you just cook things at random and hope someone orders them?
          --server comment to kitchen overheard at "Bob Evans", Columbus OH

7-year-old boy racks up $5,900 bill on dad's iPad playing iTunes game
                                        --UK Metro headline, 30 Dec 2015

Trying to secure information on network-connected computers is like
stashing your wealth in a huge paper tent guarded by two winos and an
elderly German shepard.                                       --Slashdot

The President is very disappointed in us for not fulfilling the promises
of his '08 speeches.                    --Mary Katharine Ham, 13 Jan 2016

Wife uses "Find My iPhone" to locate her husband's body
                    --International Business Times headline, 16 Jan 2016

Your desire to whip out your reproductive organ and show it to the world
led you to take his words out of context.        --Slashdot, 25 Nov 2015

1700s: She's a witch, for she makes me think lascivious thoughts.  Burn her!
2000s: He's a harasser, because he made a hurtful comment.  Fire him!

Q: How many bureaucrats does it take to screw in a light bulb?
A: Dunno.  How'd they get inside the light bulb in the first place?

We've been wishing Jews a "Merry Christmas" for about 2000 years.
They don't shoot, bomb, or behead us in response.

I have just returned from Antarctica.  Had lots of fun!
                            --unusual vacation summary from a buddy, 2016

A British filmmaker has forced the people who decide how to censor
films to watch a 10-hour movie of paint drying on a wall
                            --International Business Times, 26 Jan 2016

I'm a maniac and everyone on this stage is stupid, fat, and ugly.
And Ben, you're a terrible surgeon.  Now that we've gotten the Donald
Trump portion out of the way...
                            --Ted Cruz, 7th Republican Debate, 28 Jan 2016

Q: What blows hard enough to spin something that large?
A: Congress?       --discussing a wind turbine with 650-foot turbine blades

A huge vulture detained in Lebanon on suspicion of spying for Israel
has been returned home after UN peacekeepers intervened
                                                --BBC article, 30 Jan 2016

Getting old has advantages.  I can hide my own Easter Eggs,
and young ladies giggle when I give someone the finger.

Statistically, 6 out of 7 dwarfs are not Happy.

Paddy says "Mick, I'm thinking of buying a Labrador."
"Screw that" says Mick, "have you seen how many of their owners go blind?"

19 paddies go to the cinema, the ticket lady asks "Why so many of you?"
Mick replies, "The film said 18 or over."

Can you believe my neighbor knocked on my door at 2:30 am this morning?
Luckily for him I was still up playing my Bagpipes.

The wife has been missing a week now.  Police said to prepare for the worst.
So I went to the charity shop to get all her clothes back.

Just got back from my mate's funeral.  He died after being hit on the head
with a tennis ball.  It was a lovely service.

If you're a zombie and you know it, bite your friend! (clap clap)

If you've nothing to hide, you've nothing to fear.  --Every fascist, ever

Time flies like an arrow, fruit flies like a banana,
and fruits fly to your fly hoping for a banana.          --Slashdot

Police arrest brothers who sold a fake painting and were paid with fake cash
                            --"Art World" headline, 23 Feb 2015

If you want to roll your own you can skip some steps and just check
yourself right into the asylum.  --Software review, "The Register", Feb 2016

Comment: My company is run by morons.
Reply: Can confirm.  Am running company.  Am a moron.     --seen on Reddit

Ever dealt with [company]?  Make sure to get
your whole head in front of the shotgun.          --seen on Reddit

The grass may not be greener, but it might have less dogsh*t and weeds.

Sometimes, I squat on the floor, wrap my arms around my legs,
and lean forward.  'Cause that's how I roll.

You are not under any obligation to set
yourself on fire to keep your employer warm.    --System admin comment

If Kim wants us to see a part of her we've never seen,
she's gonna have to swallow the camera.
   --Bette Midler, after Kim Kardashian posted a selfie in her birthday suit

I once had a lady here march into our server room and
quite rudely ask where we keep the WD-40.              --IT support

It might look like I'm doing nothing, but at the cellular
level I'm really quite busy.

The ability to punch someone over TCP/IP.
                    --System admin's greatest wishes discussion on reddit

Move to 2012 only if you enjoy the technological equivalent of rubbing
fiberglass insulation directly into your eyeballs.
                        --comment about Symantec "Backup Exec", March 2013

Yo momma's so hairy, when you were born you got rugburn.

Yo momma's so fat, when I thought about her in my head my neck broke.

We found videos of a guy playing dressup with a Barbie doll and a
dried-up squirrel carcass.      --Reddit file-server discussion, March 2016

<Sonium> someone speak python here?
<lucky> HHHHHSSSSSHSSS                 --helpful coding answer on bash.org

It's not my fault some people are so dumb
they think I'm talking down to them.               --helpful reddit comment

It was like going from that boring yet steady partner to that exciting,
sexier partner who beats you up regularly and drives you to drink.
                    --description of moving from Lotus Notes to Exchange

Slightly more useful than a cat pissing in your keyboard.
                                        --description of PC home support

I'm usually the smartest man in the room, if by room you mean
gym with an all-girls volleyball team.

Mystery of Hannibal's path across the Alps may be solved by ancient poop
                                    --Washington Post headline, 8 Apr 2016

Q: What tool do you use to make backups?
A: His name is Steve and he doesn't like being called a tool.
                                        --helpful exchange on sysadmin list

Choking developers is not an appropriate form of "corrective mentoring",
no matter how bad their designs are.                       --management tip

I would prefer the zombie ending; then Suzie in accounting could finally
get the shovel through her brain she deserves.   --job satisfaction comment

Virtual reality will complete transformation of children into zombies
                                            --NY Post headline, 1 May 2016

Never pick a fight with people who buy ink by the barrel.    --Mark Twain

Those who promise you a free lunch will invariably eat you for breakfast.
                                                        --Michael Bloomberg

I asked my mom who she liked more, my brother or me.
She said, "I'm not crazy about either one of you."
                             --Jimmy Fallon, #momquotes tweets, 5 May 2016

My mom asked me to close the patio door because I was "letting the WiFi out".
                             --Jimmy Fallon, #momquotes tweets, 5 May 2016

When I showed my mom a picture of my college crush,
she said "Yeah, that's not gonna happen."
                             --Jimmy Fallon, #momquotes tweets, 5 May 2016

Mom told me to walk home after a party.  I said, "What if I get kidnapped?"
She said, "Trust me, they'll bring you back."
                             --Jimmy Fallon, #momquotes tweets, 5 May 2016

Mom called me the first time she watched two Netflix episodes in a row,
just so she could shout "I binged! I binged!!"
                             --Jimmy Fallon, #momquotes tweets, 5 May 2016

When I passed my classes, Mom said "WTF".
She thought it meant "Well, That's Fantastic!"
                             --Jimmy Fallon, #momquotes tweets, 5 May 2016

I'd like to know why well-educated idiots keep apologizing for lazy and
complaining people who think the world owes them a living.    --John Wayne

My handwriting looks like a doctor banged someone
with Parkinsons and out I came.                     --seen on a geek forum

When you look at what "new" means within DoD,
we purchase yesterday's technology tomorrow.        --CIO, US Marine Corps

MCSE == Must Consult Someone Else

MCSE == Minesweeper Consultant Solitaire Expert

MCSE == Microsoft Certified Shutdown Engineer

MCSE == Mouse-Clicking System Engineer

MCSE == Must Consult Stack-Exchange

I'm not bitter, I'm just tangy.

You can lead a horse to water, but you can't drown it because
it's WAY bigger than you and would totally just run off.

"Do you know who I am?"          --DYKWIA (pronounced "dick wee")

Can it be explained in a way that someone who's afraid of breaking the
Internet by typing Google into Google would understand?
                                                --Mozilla forum question

Microsoft gets into the marijuana business
                                --Gov Computer News headline, 17 Jun 2016

It's not DNS
There's no way it's DNS
But it always is                            --network haiku

Nothing is working
Oh now that you're at my desk
Suddenly it's fine                          --network haiku

Oh CenturyLink,
Why you go down yesterday,
Please eat my ball sack.                    --network haiku

No network connect
Failed to check patch cable, fool
Always layer eight                          --network haiku

"Can't be the network
Because there were no changes,"
Said the bad admin                          --network haiku

The packets are dropped
It must be your management
Make three envelopes                        --network haiku

Chinese hackers crash
Like waves on the rocky shore
Fail2ban kicks ass                          --network haiku

Quick and dirty script
We will rewrite it later
Later never comes                           --network haiku

ERP goes south
Oracle box is all good
ERP just sucks                              --network haiku

New Windows update?
Authenticated Users
Must have permissions                       --network haiku

Such disgustingness
Clean the filth from your keyboard now
You heathen bastard                         --network haiku

Power's out, oh hell.
User: "Is the wireless down?"
I'll cut you, dumbass.                      --network haiku

Datacenter move
Preconfigure the network?
Nah. We should be fine                      --network haiku

VM node is down
Take the whole chassis offline
Modular my ass                              --network haiku

WiFi is broke
Plug it in, redeem yourself
Ethernet is great                           --network haiku

Stupid dopey mouse,
The GUI is not the way.
Use Powershell, Bash.                       --sysadmin haiku

Firewall please stop this
I wanted to go home now
I thought we were friends                   --sysadmin haiku

IT, help, urgent!
My computer won't turn on!
Oh wait it's unplugged.                     --sysadmin haiku

My PC won't work.
Have you turned it off and then
turned it on again?                         --sysadmin haiku

Dev has been outsourced,
now performance deemed too slow.
Please do the needful.                      --sysadmin haiku

The Exchange gods say:
"Please don't try working today,
for I am angry."                            --sysadmin haiku

5pm Friday,
still not done with new system.
Goodbye to weekend!                         --sysadmin haiku

Your lack of planning
Is not my emergency.
Put in a ticket.                            --sysadmin haiku

Dell can't find it's own ass with a hand grenade, and can't train the people
that they manage to hire to pull the pin.     --from a helpdesk discussion

Neither 'E=mc2' nor 'Paradise Lost' was dashed off by a party animal.
                                            --Winifred Gallagher

There is no century number 0, you go from -1 century to 1 century.
If you disagree with this, please write your complaint to:
Pope, Cathedral Saint-Peter of Roma, Vatican.        --Database docs

Why tech stuff is like working in porn: you can screw with things,
enjoy it, and get paid.

Suggestion: You can create a small VB/PowerShell GUI tool to do that.
Reply: You can probably hop up Everest too.  --helpful admin advice on Reddit

Computers are making people easier to use every day.

Time spent with cats is never wasted.            --Sigmund Freud

Gideon: I thought you said you never hold a grudge.
Galen: I don't. I have no surviving enemies.            --Babylon 5

Central Ohio Urology Group Hacked, Crucial Data Leaked
                            --poorly-worded headline on hackread.com

Give a man a jacket and he'll be warm for a night.
Teach a man to jacket and he won't come out of his room.

Looks like the servers went into airplane mode.
            --helpful comment about Delta cancelling flights, 9 Aug 2016

All sysadmins are currently in the brace position.
            --helpful comment about Delta cancelling flights, 9 Aug 2016

Update your resume first before helping others.
            --helpful comment about Delta cancelling flights, 9 Aug 2016

You are now free to roam about the job market.
            --helpful comment about Delta cancelling flights, 9 Aug 2016

That's what you get when you put things in the cloud.
            --helpful comment about Delta cancelling flights, 9 Aug 2016

Cox stiffed for $25m      --poorly-worded Register headline, 10 Aug 2016

Excuse me while I get my melon-baller to scoop my eyes out.
                        --response to hideous Javascript answer on Reddit

From a purely aesthetics standpoint, it looks like a bunch of brackets
gang-raped the dollar sign.             --great description of PowerShell

Half my clients are under water as I live in Louisiana.
My week is going great.               --sysadmin mailing list, 18 Aug 2016

We get paid because a normal user googles for "why is internet broken"
and we google for "dropped packets gre tunnel ipsec fragmentation".
                                        --completely accurate geek advice

Skills-wise they suck harder than a black hole with daddy issues.
                                --Review of Accenture Senior Management

"Windows 10 is generally well-liked by reviewers and users."
Other than the cancer, I'm perfectly healthy.
                --Comment on Microsoft market-speak, Techdirt, Aug 2016

Why did the auditor cross the road?  Because that's what they did last year.

People are moving from the "It's colored this way to deter theft" mindset
to the "Cool, a rare and unique neon puke green pen!  I must have it!"
                                            --comment on office supplies

If you perform the miracle of the loaves and the fishes once, when the
people are in great need, you're the messiah.  If you do it whenever
they ask, you're a caterer.

Coffee fixes the damage booze did to your liver, study finds
                                    --UK Register headline, 18 Nov 2015

When you have eliminated the impossible, whatever remains,
however improbable... nope, it was DNS.     --Sherlock Holmes, sysadmin

He sees you when you're sleeping,
he knows when you're awake,
he's copied on /var/spool/mail/root,
so be good for goodness' sake.              --Santa-geek

Your soul sounds like my coffee -- dark and bitter.

PICNIC: problem in chair, not in computer         --helpful acronyms

I would rather get testicle cancer and remove the tumor with a spoon.
                                --comment on calling Symantec for support

Looks like Trump just dropped the Clintons off at the dumpster of history.
                --John Ratzenberger (played Cliff on "Cheers") 9 Nov 2016

Bill is SO PISSED he doesn't get to head up the internship program again.
                        --Ben Shapiro (@benshapiro) 9 Nov 2016

Self-Driving Truck's First Mission: A Beer Run  --NYT headline, 25 Oct 2016

Arguing that you don't care about the right to privacy because you have
nothing to hide is no different than saying you don't care about free
speech because you have nothing to say.                  --Edward Snowden

Any sufficiently-advanced technology controlled by a miscreant is
indistinguishable from a possessed object in a Stephen King novel.

I am tech support
Why do I fix microwave?
I am tech support                     --tech support haiku

My computer broke
I think I'll call tech support
Then I'll go to lunch                 --tech support haiku

Tech support calling
User ran and hid from phone
Back of line for you                  --tech support haiku

"My PC is slow"
Did you try rebooting it?
Don't lie and say yes.                --tech support haiku

Do not try to lie!
You have broken this yourself;
we can read the logs                  --tech support haiku

It is almost 5
Time to call the help desk line
I'm sure they don't mind              --tech support haiku

Time to deploy code.
I hope all the bugs are fixed.
Now there are more bugs.              --tech support haiku

Moving old web apps.
Don't you wonder what they do?
The phone is ringing.                 --tech support haiku

What does this box do?
Turn it off and see who calls
Perfect time for lunch!               --tech support haiku

My current server is named YolandaSquatpumpV2         --seen on reddit

If you think I'm gay, send your girlfriend over to my house.
                                --Shemar Moore, BET interview 9 Dec 2016

What do you call a cow with two legs?  Lean Beef.
What do you call a cow with no legs?  Ground Beef.

Crack-crazed squirrels terrorize New York
                            --National Examiner article, 28 Nov 2005

I'm constantly offered crap Wordpress-based jobs.  I can reply stating
I feel it's a cancer that needs to be purged from the Earth and they'll
reply asking when I'm starting.                --comment on recruiters

I had a boss that you could have replaced with some email-forwarding rules
and a drinking bird to keep the sensor from turning the lights off.
                                        --geek comment on management

Comment: Harrison Ford may be returning to Star Wars Episode VIII.
Reply: Wouldn't be the first time a carpenter impaled on a cross
    came back to life.                              --seen on Soylent News

Two IPv6 packets walk into a bar.  Nobody talks to them.   --geek humor

Naked selfies used as collateral for Chinese loans
                                            --AFP headline, 6 Dec 2016

A 6-year-old Texas girl used Amazon's Alexa to order
a dollhouse and four pounds of sugar cookies            --CNN, 5 Jan 2017

Germany's "Rent a Jew" Project Aims to Fight Anti-Semitism
                                            --NBC headline, 17 Dec 2016

Comment: I work my day and leave at 5 unless the building is on fire.
Reply: I leave especially when the building is on fire.
                                                --literal-minded geek

I just joined the Church of Appliantology, founded by Elron Hoover.

Hang my predecessor by the neck from a construction crane.
            --seen in "What would you do at work if you could?" discussion

Most of the statutes, acts, edicts and placards of parliaments, princes
and states, for regulating, directing, and restraining of trade have
either political blunders or jobs obtained by artful men for private
advantage under the pretense of public good.          --Benjamin Franklin

In general, the more free and unrestrained commerce is, the more it
flourishes.  No nation was ever ruined by trade.      --Benjamin Franklin

To prohibit a great people from making all that they can of every part of
their own produce, or from employing their stock and industry in the way
that they judge most advantageous to themselves, is a manifest violation
of the most sacred rights of mankind.                    --Adam Smith

Try getting quotes from someone besides the foxes when discussing the
"mysterious" disappearance of the hens.    --comment on Bloomberg article

Comment: If you WANT to be good at it, you will be.
Reply: Um, my golf game would like to have a word with you...

He's gotta start from the bottom -- he's small and will crawl in no time
so I'd say start him doing CAT-6 cable pulls through the drop ceiling.
Probably not even heavy enough to break the tiles.  You can tie the
cable to his diaper and shake a rattle at the other end of the office.
                        --response to system admin's newborn announcement

I would bring a hammer.     --Dutch grandmaster Jan Hein Donner, when asked
                              how he'd prepare to beat a chess computer

ISMBEC: Idiots in Suits Making Bad Economic Calculations
                                    --seen in UK Register, 11 June 2016

You can safely assume that you've created God in your own image when it
turns out that God hates all the same people you do.      --Anne Lamott

In 96 hours I got my Linux essentials cert, read "Linux for Dummies"
three times, and figured out how to program my Pi to automatically feed
my cat when I'm away by a simple text message.             --seen on Reddit

...[Trump] could have undermined the messaging so much that he can actually
control exactly what people think.  And that, that is our job.
                        --Mika Brzezinski, MSNBC journalist, 22 Feb 2017

Giant neuron found wrapped around entire mouse brain
                                --creepy "Nature" headline, 24 Feb 2017

Andrew Garfield lost 40 pounds for his role in the movie "Silence".
It was an astonishing feat that hasn't been attempted by every actress
in every role ever.                    --Jimmy Kimmel, 2017 Academy Awards

Meridian man's pet squirrel goes nuts on burglar
                                            --KIVI TV news, 13 Feb 2017

I have an irrational fear of creatures in my toilet.  Live in Florida for
a month -- once you've tea-bagged a gecko, you'll *always* look.
                                  --seen in a "where to live" discussion

We save computers older than your dad just to use them as alarm clocks.
                                                            --geek insult

Only two things stand between you being consistently mentioned as top-tier
computer/electronics companies, like Apple or Dell: customer service and
product reliability.                              --Razer quality feedback

I mean you do you baby but if you are at least 30% sirpatstew I will
follow you on bloody stumps through the snow.
                    --creepy fan comment about Patrick Stewart, 7 Mar 2017

First they came for the verbs, and I said nothing, for verbing weirds
language.  Then, they arrival for the nouns and I speech nothing, for
I no verbs.

C2K: "Chair to Keyboard" problem        --helpful tech-support acronym

CBE: Carbon-Based Error        --helpful tech-support acronym

Code-18: Problem located 18 inches from monitor
                                            --helpful tech-support acronym

EBCAC: Error Between Computer And Chair    --helpful tech-support acronym

EBK: Error Behind Keyboard        --helpful tech-support acronym

EEOC: Equipment Exceeds Operator Capabilities  --helpful tech-support acronym

ESO: Equipment Smarter than Operator         --helpful tech-support acronym

FBPC: F***tard behind PC        --helpful tech-support acronym

OHE: Operator Headspace Error        --helpful tech-support acronym

UPC: Useless Paycheck Collector      --helpful tech-support acronym

PEBKAC: Problem Exists Between Keyboard and Chair
                                            --helpful tech-support acronym

PICNIC: Problem In Chair, Not In Computer   --helpful tech-support acronym

TSTO: Too Stupid To Operate        --helpful tech-support acronym

MSP: Make up Sh*t, now Pay us      --helpful tech-support acronym

It is by caffeine alone I set my mind in motion.  It is by the beans of
java, the thoughts acquire speed, the hands acquire shaking; the shaking
becomes a warning.  It is by caffeine alone that I set my mind in motion.
                                --geek version of Dune's Mentat Mantra

It was very good of God to let Mr. and Mrs. Carlyle marry one another,
and so make only two people miserable and not four.      --Samuel Butler

What's the difference between a girl and a computer?
A computer won't laugh when you try to insert a 3-1/2" floppy.

Go to a club.  If two strippers fighting for a 20 in a jello pit doesn't
remind you that your career situation could be worse, I don't know what will.
                                --Forum advice for a depressed tech worker

Uber driver picked up her boyfriend's "side chick" at the airport
                            --News.com.au headline, reported 28 Mar 2017

Perpetual Spitballer: person in management or senior leadership having
an unending supply of proposals for wild/drastic changes or additions
to production systems, coupled with a complete and utter inability to see
the ripple effects or larger context of their ad-nauseam idea fountain.

Parrots flying high on drugs annoying farmers by plundering
poppy fields to feed opium addiction     --UK Mirror headline, 22 Mar 2017

"Times" don't change, people make decisions.  There aren't bad "times",
just bad cultures, bad institutions, or bad groupthink.  --Michael Tuchman

Frozen hash brown recall due to possible "extraneous golf ball materials"
                                            --CNN headline, 23 April 2017

When my dentist takes off my bib, he always puts on a British accent and says
"Were the lobsters to your satisfaction, sir?"
                        --Jimmy Fallon, #MyWeirdDentist tweets, 27 Apr 2017

My old dentist always tapped my nose and said "Boop!" before looking at my
teeth.  He did it until I was 20.
                        --Jimmy Fallon, #MyWeirdDentist tweets, 27 Apr 2017

My dentist pulled my wisdom tooth and held it up, exclaming "IT'S A BOY!"
                        --Jimmy Fallon, #MyWeirdDentist tweets, 27 Apr 2017

The family dentist down the street from my house has a sign outside
that says "We do our business in your mouth".
                        --Jimmy Fallon, #MyWeirdDentist tweets, 27 Apr 2017

When I asked about new reports saying flossing doesn't do anything, my dentist
said "that's just cray cray".  He's in his 50s.
                        --Jimmy Fallon, #MyWeirdDentist tweets, 27 Apr 2017

The dentist that pulled my wisdom teeth is named Dr. Wank.
I went home with ice packs that said "I got yanked by Dr. Wank".
                        --Jimmy Fallon, #MyWeirdDentist tweets, 27 Apr 2017

My dentist has a banner hanging on the wall that says, "I like big gums and
I cannot lie".          --Jimmy Fallon, #MyWeirdDentist tweets, 27 Apr 2017

I would rather spend 15 minutes giving a tongue-bath to Mama June
after a workout than converse with you at any level.   --reply to cold-caller

I hope the rest of your day is as pleasant as you are.
                                            --cashier in a checkout line

CIA spooks tried to spy on Soviet Russia using cats implanted with
microphones under their skin                --UK Sun headline, 28 Apr 2017

TITSUP: Total Inability To Support Usual Performance
                                            --helpful tech-support acronym

Ethics is about protecting the weak from the strong,
not offering up the weak to get eaten by the strong.

It's like a person with perpetual amnesia sawing their own arm off
over and over again because it "helps them lose weight".
                                --description of repeatedly hiring bad MSPs

You don't have to attend every argument you're invited to.   --Noah Friedman

What is the proper tool to use to discharge a CRT?
a) An insulated screwdriver  b) A high-voltage probe
c) Your finger               d) Someone else's finger
                                      --an A+ cert training guide from 2000

"Circumcision Central, you flop 'em, we chop 'em."    --answering machine msg

Interesting Reddit username: pentesting_your_mom

Interesting Reddit username: MorganFreemansDong

Interesting Reddit username: 3wayhandjob

Would Your Dog Eat You if You Died?     --creepy NatGeo headline, 6/23/2017

TV news crew's truck stolen while reporting on Downtown Albuquerque crime
                                    --Journal Staff headline, June 23, 2017

KICK-ME: Keep It Complicated, Keep Me Employed
                                            --helpful tech-support acronym

Man kept dead wife in freezer for 8 years, made $92K in social security
                                    --Palm Beach Post headline, 4 Jul 2017

National security is important, but we won't survive if we become a country
of secret court orders based on secret interpretations of secret law.
                                                            --Bruce Schneier

There can be no faith in government if our highest offices are excused
from scrutiny; they should be setting the example of transparency.
                                                            --Edward Snowden

His code looked like something made by pointing
OCR software at a Jackson Pollock painting.                 --code review

Elderly Swede caught fire after hospital surgery
                            --"The Local" headline, Sweden, 19 July 2017

Stop being such a Pre Madonna.                      --seen on a tech forum

Governmental assurances to keep your data safe have as much value as a
truckload of dead rats in a tampon factory.     --"The Register", July 2017

When you try to teach some people to fish, they become upset because you
are very clearly communicating to them that you will not be handing them
a fish every day.                                         --seen on Reddit

When life gives you lemons, don't make lemonade.  Make life take the
lemons back!  Get mad!  I don't want your damn lemons!  Do you know who
I am?  I'm the man who's gonna get my engineers to invent a combustible
lemon that burns your house down!

If the client well and truly wants to shoot themselves in the foot,
sometimes you just have to hand them the gun.       --tech support advice

It should be legal to push a user down the stairs
and sing "Everyone loves a slinky!"                 --tech support wishes

Datacenters with old hardware are like nursing homes.  When you turn out
the lights, you can't really expect everyone to wake up in the morning.
                                                    --tech support wisdom

There's no I in "Team", but there is a yoU in "f*cked up".   --tech support

"There's no 'I' in 'team'."
"No, but there's one right in the middle of 'win'."     --Michael Jordan

Just don't put your head next to theirs.
        --Response to "Everyone's running around with their hair on fire"

You operate that keyboard with the laser-like precision of a gorilla
swinging a rock.

Someone got two shots of stupid with their coffee today.

If you teach a man to fish, teach him the difference between a salmon
and a shark.

Some people just need a high five.  In the face.  With a chair.

In my years I have come to a conclusion that one useless man is a shame,
two is a law firm, and three or more is a congress.      --John Adams

Ancient malfunctioning war machines with incredible engines made to fly
by sheer will and the beaten-wife love of Marine aircraft maintainers.
                                        --description of Harrier jump jets

If people refuse to give respect despite hard work and competence,
they can learn to give it through disaster and suffering.

I keep trying to go to this hip new bar called localhost, but somehow
directions just lead me to drinking at home.    --geek drinking problem

Being against high speed rail but being for a hyper-loop is an indication
that you have a technology boner that is lasting longer than 4 hours and
you should see a doctor.                        --seen on Hacker News

I normally don't like Harvard people, because they can't go two minutes
without mentioning that they went to Harvard.
                        --Jennifer Lawrence, on dating Darren Aronofsky

106-year-old Antarctic fruitcake found, might be edible
                                        --SFGATE headline, 11 August 2017

I played WoW with a guy that just one day stopped logging in.  After a
couple weeks we asked his friend where he was.  "Sooo, his girlfriend got
tired of him playing WoW all the time and chucked his computer out the
second story window.  He didn't like that and chucked her out after it."
                                                --why gamers are dangerous

Excel tables still pivot like a granny in a tutu.
                                            --PC performance observation

Keep hitting that screw with a rock, you Digital Neanderthal.
                                --comment on using Excel for the wrong thing

99.99999% reliability still holds, but the time period got extended by
another 100 billion years.              --comment on AWS Govcloud failure

If I had asked people what they wanted, they would have said faster horses.
                                                            --Henry Ford

You can always count on Americans to do the right thing,
after they've tried everything else.                    --Winston Churchill

Ford disguised a man as a car seat to research self-driving
                                        --techcrunch headline, 13 Sep 2017

I've heard art defined as "something that has no purpose but itself",
and I think that could describe the HP website rather well.   --HP user

Your message will be ignored in the order it was received.    --IT support

Pet parrot uses voice-controlled gadget to place order with Amazon
                                    --news.com.au headline, 21 Sep 2017

Be yourself, everyone else is already taken.            --Oscar Wilde

I don't have ducks or a row to put them in.  I have squirrels at a rave.
                                                    --tech support comment

We're prepared to chip our dogs and it doesn't seem to harm them,
so why aren't we prepared to chip ourselves?
                --Mike Miller, World Olympians Association chief executive

CLOUD = Can't Locate Our Users' Data            --Accenture employee

Unsent text message passes for will in Australia     --AFP, 10 October 2017

Podondectomy: surgical removal of foot from mouth

Lawsuit, n.: A machine which you go into as a pig and come out as a sausage.
                                                    --Ambrose Bierce

Italian Scientists Report Patient Who Sweats Blood   --Gizmodo, 23 Oct 2017

Any sufficiently advanced amount of data and analysis will be
indistinguishable from surveillance.  --Facebook version of Clarke's Law

Sheep learn to recognise celebrity faces from different angles
                                            --"New Scientist", 8 Nov 2017

Don't just embrace the crazy, sidle up next to it and lick its ear.
                                                    --Stonekettle Station

The man who never looks into a newspaper is better informed than he who
reads them, inasmuch as he who knows nothing is nearer the truth than
he whose mind is filled with falsehoods and errors.     --Thomas Jefferson

We have some great firefighters on our team.
Unfortunately I think we have a few arsonists, too.     --unknown

Claim: The answer to everything is Flash Storage.
Reply: I showed my d*ck to all the hard drives, they didn't go any faster.

It is the duty of the patriot to protect his country from its government.
                                                        --Thomas Paine

Heart attack strikes American Heart Association president
                                                        --CNN, 16 Nov 2017

Apology after Japanese train departs 20 seconds early    --BBC, 16 Nov 2017

It feels like someone wrote this script with "insert villain here" but
no one got around to it, so they just put together the most generic CGI
face a computer could render and gave it a helmet.
            --"Dawn of Justice" review, Entertainment Weekly, 17 Nov 2017

About as useful as telling Indiana Jones to look both ways
before crossing the street.          --comment about Amazon IT documentation

The seven deadly sins: food, clothing, firing, rent,
taxes, respectability and children.                 --George Bernard Shaw

Charles Manson should have died in the 1970s.  You have the Supreme Court
to thank for the fact that he outlived his prosecutor Vincent Bugliosi.
                                                --Mike Adams, 20 Nov 2017

When in danger, fear or doubt, run in circles, scream and shout.  --IT motto

Finding our "Harry Potter" films un-Christian, people think I need to be
guided and send me the Bible.  I now have a collection of 20.
                        --Emma Watson (Hermione), "Life & Style", Jan 2018

This guy gave me a big turtle shell with my face painted on it -- that was
definitely a first.                 --Taylor Swift, "Life & Style", Jan 2018

Probably [the weirdest gift I've received is] the dead rabbit I got sent
in Japan.                           --Avril Lavigne, "Life & Style", Jan 2018

I had one girl send me a breast implant, which was kind of fun...  I use it
as my phone cradle in my trailer.  --Norman Reedus, "Life & Style", Jan 2018

Anglican Minister Urges Prayers for [4-yr-old] Prince George to Be Gay
                                            --NY Times headline, 1 Dec 2017

Treaties are like roses and young girls -- they last while they last.
                                                        --Charles DeGaulle

Red-eye and black-eye flights available.  --United Airlines motto

Can't seat you? We'll beat you.  --United Airlines motto

Board as a doctor, leave as a patient.  --United Airlines motto

Putting the hospital back into hospitality.  --United Airlines motto

My research on the Alien franchise says that grunts who wave guns about
but don't think much get eaten in the first reel.           --Jim Brander

Hollywood has the best moral compass, because it has compassion.
                                                --Harvey Weinstein, 2009

Pregnant Woman Forced To Deliver Baby Early After Getting
Struck By Lightning In Head       --"Hollywood Life" headline, 3 July 2017

Waxing nostalgic about jobs lost to technology is little better than
complaining that antibiotics put too many gravediggers out of work.
                                        --Garry Kasparov, chess grandmaster

The English are not a very spiritual people, so they invented cricket
to give them some idea of eternity.                 --George Bernard Shaw

A standing military force, with an overgrown Executive will not long be safe
companions to liberty.   --James Madison, Constitutional Convention of 1787

The means of defence against foreign danger have been always the instruments
of tyranny at home.      --James Madison, Constitutional Convention of 1787

Throughout all Europe, the armies kept up under the pretext of defending,
have enslaved the people.  --James Madison, Constitutional Convention of 1787

Kangaroos keep stealing the fibre to make boxing ring ropes.
                    --reason given for poor network performance in Australia

Clinton: White Women Voted for Trump Because Their Husbands Told Them To
                                                --NTK network, 12 Mar 2018

My parent's computer got a virus that would randomly play radio snippets.
I asked them why they didn't tell me about it, and they just shrugged
and said "we figured it was haunted" like that was a normal thing.
                                            --seen on Reddit, 28 Mar 2018

Show me the man, and I'll find you the crime.
                            --Lavrentiy Beria (head of the KGB) to Stalin

"Gin Diesel": someone who gets drunk Fast and Furiously.

China sperm bank demands loyalty to Communist Party    --AFP, 6 April 2018

A conference is a gathering of important people who singly can do nothing
but together can decide that nothing can be done.           --Fred Allen

He that studies revenge keeps his own wounds green.     --Francis Bacon

Do you know I once made thirty tests in my clinic?  The patients who never
read newspapers felt excellent.  Those whom I specially made read Pravda
all lost weight.                        --Mikhail Bulgakov, "Heart of a Dog"

Q: What has feathers and goes "pieces of seven, pieces of seven!"?
A: A parroty error.

Were the Soviet Union to sink tomorrow under the waters of the ocean,
the American military-industrial establishment would have to go on,
substantially unchanged, until some other adversary could be invented.
Anything else would be an unacceptable shock to the American economy.
                                                        --George F. Kennan

A foreign policy aimed at the achievement of total security is the one
thing I can think of that is entirely capable of bringing this country
to a point where it will have no security at all.       --George F. Kennan

Sliced ketchup is a thing now.  I just puked.    --@DanKnightly, 27 Mar 2018

I was stoned and when I got home, I put a frozen pizza in the microwave
and entered my PIN number.      --Jimmy Fallon #StonerStories 16 Apr 2018

I ordered Chinese food, forgot about it and ordered a pizza, then forgot
that and made grilled cheese.   --Jimmy Fallon #StonerStories 16 Apr 2018

I once walked in on my roommate eating a box of dry spaghetti.  I came
back 10 minutes later and he was using them to spell out the word "PASTA"
on the table.                   --Jimmy Fallon #StonerStories 16 Apr 2018

I asked my friend which "Planet of the Apes" movie we were watching, but
turns out we'd actually been watching a National Geographic documentary
about monkeys for the past 30 min.  --Jimmy Fallon #StonerStories 16 Apr 2018

One time I was holding my boyfriend's hand, and I looked down and thought
"wow we're wearing the same shade of nail polish".  Turns out I was
holding my own hand.            --Jimmy Fallon #StonerStories 16 Apr 2018

Put frozen waffles in the toaster.  Left them in there for a half hour.
Freaked out and popped them up.  They were soggy, not burnt, which
was weird.  I ate them.  Realized the next morning that the toaster
wasn't plugged in.              --Jimmy Fallon #StonerStories 16 Apr 2018

Convinced myself I could taste the difference in fruit loop colors.
Did blindfolded experiment for an hour.
                                --Jimmy Fallon #StonerStories 16 Apr 2018

Until the day I left, the corner of the whiteboard said "NO FERMENTED
SHARK IN THE OFFICE", with no less than three individual "do not erase"
messages written next to it.        --IT comment about bad places to work

Going to college is like going to California during the gold rush,
and being handed a shovel and a bag.  You get to keep the contents of
the bag in four years.                              --seen on Hacker News

I find your lack of backups... disturbing.  --if Darth Vader worked in IT

I have altered the Service Level Agreement.  Pray I do not alter it further.
                                            --if Darth Vader worked in IT

Claim: $500/month is about what it costs the company for me to sh*t.
Reply: You're either underpaid or not spending enough time sh*tting at work.
                                        --seen in a discussion about pay

Being with a woman all night never hurt no professional baseball player.
It's staying up all night looking for a woman that does him in.
                                                        --Casey Stengel

Computers are cranky, quasi-magical machines that can only be operated by
mutant lizard people who have been genetically disinherited from the finer
things in life, like meaningful social lives or mating opportunities.
                                                        --Hacker News

Blacksmithing is nice because you get to toast something under flame and
then hit it with a hammer to bend it to your will.  Kinda like what I'd
like to do with our ERP server.         --Stress advice seen on Reddit

How a hysterectomy is like a divorce: pain, blood, lots of bills,
and the net loss of a vagina.       --really hideous discussion on Reddit

British press corp is locked outside the White House because our birthdates
were submitted in UK format and secret service don't get it.
                            --Jim Waterson (@jimwaterson) January 27, 2017

Crayfish Amputated Its Own Claw to Avoid Being Boiled Alive in a Hotpot
                                            --Time Magazine, 4 June 2018

Homeowner uses AK-47 to kill burglars who shot at his friend, cops say
                                            --Miami Herald, 4 June 2018

Police: Teen girl learning to drive kills 2 men in Pennsylvania parking lot
                                            --Associated Press, 4 June 2018

Crocodile kills pastor as he baptises followers on lake in Ethiopia
                                            --The Independent, 4 June 2018

unzip; strip; touch; finger; mount; fsck; more; yes; umount; sleep
                                        --Linux commands seen on a T-shirt

It takes a special type of ignorance to say, "governments won't overreach,
they're here to help" if you've been alive before and after 9/11.
                                                    --seen on "Hacker News"

Explain that you only wear suits to funerals and job interviews.
He can choose the event himself.
        --advice given to IT worker when his boss insisted he wear a suit

It's like Discord and Slack had a love child with SharePoint while
Skype watched from the closet.           --"MS Teams" description on Reddit

Isn't air travel wonderful?  Breakfast in London, dinner in New York,
luggage in Brazil.

POS-Dumpster-Fire version 1.6
                    --answer to "What software is this running?" on Reddit

North Carolina politician writes resignation letter in Klingon
                                    --Seattle Times headline, 3 Jan 2014

The Evolutionary Origin of Descending Testicles
                                    --New York Times headline, 29 June 2018

Canadian Hells Angels Terrorize Hotel by Posting 1-Star Reviews
                                                --Gizmodo, 10 April 2018

I'm nude and that's OK, but it would be awfully inconvenient for you to
call me naked.  I prefer a holistic fashion policy which includes a range
of options such as deshabille, birthday suit, unclothed, etc.
                        --What "The Emperor" would say to the Supreme Court

Gang of poachers EATEN by lions after they broke into South African
game reserve to slaughter herd of rhinos        --UK Mirror, 5 July 2018

In the event log: "An error has occurred. Check wasteoftime.log for more
details."  In wasteoftime.log: "An error has occurred. Check the event
log for more details."                                  --seen on Reddit

When 900 years you reach, remember the hell that was getting Windows 3.1
connected to the Internet you will not, hmm?    --if Yoda was a sysadmin

SCCM: Sometimes Crappy, Constantly Maddening  --helpful tech-support acronym

How did they not die as babies, considering that they were likely too
stupid to find a tit to suck on?                --Linus Torvalds, July 2012

Can't see London, can't see France, unless we see your underpants.
                                                    --new TSA slogan

Grope discounts available.              --new TSA slogan

If we did our job any better we'd have to buy you dinner first.
                                                    --new TSA slogan

Only we know if Lady Gaga is really a lady.         --new TSA slogan

Don't worry, my hands are still warm from the last guy.     --new TSA slogan

Drop your fly if you wanna fly.        --new TSA slogan

We are now free to move about your underpants.      --new TSA slogan

It's not a grope, it's a Freedom Pat!               --new TSA slogan

When in doubt, you'll have to whip it out.          --new TSA slogan

TSA: Touchin', Squeezin', Arrestin'.            --new TSA slogan

You *were* a virgin.            --new TSA slogan

We handle more packages than UPS.              --new TSA slogan

We make air travel a touching experience.              --new TSA slogan

Your naked photos are safe with us.              --new TSA slogan

We've Got Security by the Balls!              --new TSA slogan

Missing an obvious joke and rapidly changing the subject are other telltale
traits; unfortunately, they are also quite common among human Twitter users.
                --"How to tell if you're talking to a bot", 18 July 2018

No matter how far down the wrong road you've gone, turn back.
                                                        --Turkish proverb

I tend to convince myself I'm on a submarine instead of acknowledging
the ship has sunk.      --dealing with a toxic work situation on Reddit

A teen allegedly broke into a couple's home to ask for the WiFi password
                                    --Washington Post headline, 27 July 2018

Q: How long should I bake a 20-lb turkey?
A: How high do you want it to get?      --helpful cooking answer on Reddit

Snark: Oh, sorry, we forgot you were the center of the universe.
Reply: You're forgiven. My beer gut has its own gravitational field by now.
                                            --how to get along at the office

Man Bites Finger Off In Golf Course Brawl       --AP headline, 18 Aug 2018

As porn site pounds hard on piracy laws, Cox pulls out prematurely
                                    --"The Register" headline, 24 Aug 2018

Just got back from Alaska.  Saw bears, some closer than optimal.
                                        --2018 postcard from my friend Leigh

Viagra won't make you James Bond, but it will make you Roger Moore.

DBA goes into a bar, spots two tables in the corner,
walks over and says "May I join you?"                 --stupid database joke

He's bearded, fat, and dresses funny.  --how we know Santa works in IT #1

When you ask him for something, the odds of receiving what you wanted
are really bad.                     --how we know Santa works in IT #2

He seldom answers your mail.        --how we know Santa works in IT #3

When you ask him where he gets all the stuff he's got, he says,
"Elves make it for me."             --how we know Santa works in IT #4

Your parents ascribed supernatural powers to him,
but did all the work themselves.    --how we know Santa works in IT #5

Nobody knows who he has to answer to for his actions.
                                    --how we know Santa works in IT #6

He laughs entirely too much.        --how we know Santa works in IT #7

Only a lunatic says bad things about him when he's there.
                                    --how we know Santa works in IT #8

Automation is just the exercise of power, and unwise automation can do as
much damage as wise automation can bring benefit.  --Ernest Mueller, 2010

CAMP IN A STATE PARK, NOT IN THE LEFT LANE.    --Ohio highway sign, Sept 2018

Programming is a lifelong study of the difference between what you said
and what you meant to say.

You don't have conversations with microprocessors.  You tell them what to do,
then helplessly watch the disaster when they take you literally.
                                            --"Startide Rising", 1983 novel

Went to Disneyland because my daughter's obsessed with Mickey Mouse.
She was so excited when I got home and told her.
                                      --Ryan Reynolds, Twitter, 30 Jan 2017

Healthy parenting tip #34: get the child into showbiz as soon as possible.
                                      --Ryan Reynolds, Twitter, 1 Aug 2016

After this morning's diaper, my daughter finally earned the teardrop
tattoo on her face.                   --Ryan Reynolds, Twitter, 14 Jun 2016

Surprisingly easy to teach a baby to swipe right.
                                      --Ryan Reynolds, Twitter, 16 Aug 2015

I'd walk through fire for my daughter.  Well, not FIRE because it's
dangerous.  But a super-humid room.  But not too humid, because my hair.
                                      --Ryan Reynolds, Twitter, 11 Sep 2015

A semi-manager is like a half-chub.  You either ignore it and it goes away
or you beat it till it's swollen and spurting.          --seen on Reddit

Man Chugs Erectile Dysfunction Drug,
Ends Up With Permanently Red-Tinted Vision          --Gizmodo, 2 Oct 2018

Complaint: I hate having two phones, it's such a pain in the ass.
Reply: You should try just keeping them in your pockets.
                                                --helpful reddit advice

"I felt a great disturbance in the Force, as if millions of narcissists
cried out in terror and were suddenly silenced.  I fear something terrible
has happened."                  --response to Instagram outage, 3 Oct 2018

Senior Principle Lead Chief Synergy Scientist and Executive Vice
President of Leadership and Diverse Accountability Initiative Incubators
                                                        --my new job title

Open offices have driven Panasonic to make horse blinders for humans
                                    --Techcrunch.com headline 17 Oct 2018

It's like being a shaman; a little harmless sacrifice of a lamb to bring
the rain (and sweet lamb BBQ afterwards).  Next thing you know, you're
tieing up Ted because if the lambs didn't work then surely Ted will.
                                    --why you should avoid "placebo" fixes

The syntax is gruesome; coming from Python, Rust looks like two rabid gerbils
had a war dance on my keyboard.         --language advice on Hacker News

Hopium: drug that makes you believe something good will happen this time,
despite all evidence to the contrary (or no evidence at all).  --Jack Vinson

We could all learn some valuable lessons from the sex lives of panda bears.
                        --seen in an article from news.com.au, 31 Oct 2018

The smoke coming from the server room makes it hard for me to see my monitor.
                                --things you never want to hear from a user

A few hours of trial and error can save you minutes of looking through manuals.

Walking on water and developing software from a specification are easy if
both are frozen.

If you know what's in it, you don't know when it will ship.
If you know when it will ship, you don't know what's in it.
                                            --Delivery Uncertainty Principle

Choose mnemonic identifiers.  If you can't remember what mnemonic means,
you've got a problem.               --Perl documentation

You will never see a Brinks truck following a hearse.
                                    --work/life balance comment on Reddit

Netflix invention allows its users to change what they're watching by
staring at their screen and sticking out their tongue
                                        --UK "Sun" headline, 11 Nov 2018

A is for Amy who fell down the stairs.
B is for Basil assaulted by bears.        --Edward Gorey creepy alphabet book

C is for Clara who wasted away.
D is for Desmond thrown out of a sleigh.  --Edward Gorey creepy alphabet book

E is for Ernest who choked on a peach.
F is for Fanny sucked dry by a leech.     --Edward Gorey creepy alphabet book

G is for George smothered under a rug.
H is for Hector done in by a thug.        --Edward Gorey creepy alphabet book

I is for Ida who drowned in a lake.
J is for James who took lye by mistake.   --Edward Gorey creepy alphabet book

K is for Kate who was struck with an axe.
L is for Leo who choked on some tacks.    --Edward Gorey creepy alphabet book

M is for Maud who was swept out to sea.
N is for Neville who died of ennui.       --Edward Gorey creepy alphabet book

O is for Olive run through with an awl.
P is for Prue trampled flat in a brawl.   --Edward Gorey creepy alphabet book

Q is for Quentin who sank on a mire.
R is for Rhoda consumed by a fire.        --Edward Gorey creepy alphabet book

S is for Susan who perished of fits.
T is for Titus who flew into bits.        --Edward Gorey creepy alphabet book

U is for Una who slipped down a drain.
V is for Victor squashed under a train.   --Edward Gorey creepy alphabet book

W is for Winnie embedded in ice.
X is for Xerxes devoured by mice.         --Edward Gorey creepy alphabet book

Y is for Yorick whose head was bashed in.
Z is for Zillah who drank too much gin.   --Edward Gorey creepy alphabet book

When a social-justice warrior tells you what's good for you,
check your wallet and count your fingers.

The last good thing written in C was Franz Schubert's Symphony Number 9.
                                                        --Erwin Dieterich

Fifty years of programming language research, and we end up with C++?
                                                    --Richard A. O'Keefe

There are only two kinds of programming languages: those people always
bitch about and those nobody uses.                  --Bjarne Stroustrup

We're in a bear market.  They suck, and not like a hooker with no teeth.
                                            --John McAfee, 20 Nov 2018

I told my sister she was drawing her eyebrows too high.  She looked surprised.

The difference between Liberals and cannibals is that
cannibals eat only their enemies.                      --Lyndon Johnson

College Player Accidentally Tackles ESPN Reporter on the Sidelines,
Then Asks Her Out                   --"People" headline, 22 November 2018

Firefighter employed by arsonist
                            --IT answer to "what do you do for a living?"

Attendant to nailgun-wielding infant rolling around on a waterbed
                            --IT answer to "what do you do for a living?"

Money laundering: Dutch police find cash in washing machine
                                                --AP headline, 22 Nov 2018

I was running late for a connecting flight leaving in 5 minutes, so I was
racing from gate A to gate B.  Halfway there, I realized someone was yelling
after me, "RUN FORREST, RUN!"
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #airportfail tweets, 30 Nov 2018

I was fiddling with the side of my plane seat and grasped something I
thought was the recliner handle.  Then I realized that someone had decided
to stretch out behind me, and I'd grabbed their bare foot.
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #airportfail tweets, 30 Nov 2018

I took an edible while waiting and decided to miss my flight on purpose
because I was too relaxed and I wanted to finish watching "The Great British
Bakeoff".            --Jimmy Fallon, #airportfail tweets, 30 Nov 2018

My brother and I were at a self-checkin machine when a woman behind us
asked for help.  After that, everyone thought we were airport employees.
We were there for three hours checking people into Toronto.
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #airportfail tweets, 30 Nov 2018

I was walking to my gate when a little kid ran past me yelling, "THE POOP
IS COMING OUT!"      --Jimmy Fallon, #airportfail tweets, 30 Nov 2018

A legit clown sat next to me on a plane.  When we made eye contact, he
felt the need to assure me that he was "a good clown, not a creepy clown".
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #airportfail tweets, 30 Nov 2018

I fell asleep during a long layover and woke up to a little girl poking
me and saying "Mommy, is she alive?"
                     --Jimmy Fallon, #airportfail tweets, 30 Nov 2018

I sat next to a man who slammed two servings of nachos right after takeoff.
When the flight hit some turbulence, he started yelling "THIS ISN'T GOING
TO END WELL!"        --Jimmy Fallon, #airportfail tweets, 30 Nov 2018

Literal-Association Method: You are part of the X group/team and this is X,
therefore you should fix it.            --How I get stuck fixing things #1

Midas-Touch Method: You were the last one to touch it,
therefore you need to fix it.           --How I get stuck fixing things #2

Obligated-for-Life Method: You installed this once several years ago,
therefore you need to fix it forever.   --How I get stuck fixing things #3

Inverse Proof/Contraposition Method: I think you caused this problem so
you need to fix it, unless you can prove you didn't cause it.  However,
since you put so much work figuring out that you didn't cause the problem,
you might as well fix it too.           --How I get stuck fixing things #4

Sir Bedevere Method: It weighs the same as a duck, ducks float on water,
wood floats on water, wood burns, and so therefore you need to fix it.
                                        --How I get stuck fixing things #5

I-am-Legend Method: Nobody else is here today so you need to fix it.
                                        --How I get stuck fixing things #6

Appeal-to-Urgency Method: If I say something is urgent enough times,
you need to fix it ASAP/now/urgently.  This automatically nullifies any
requests for further information.       --How I get stuck fixing things #7

Pakleds Method: You are smart, we like smart, you can make us go, we like
things that make us go.  Fix it.        --How I get stuck fixing things #8

Didn't-even-look Method: There is no knowledge article or self-help for
this simple task, so you need to document and fix it for me.
                                        --How I get stuck fixing things #9

Not-So-Veiled-Threat Method: You can't do anything right, we want to fire you,
but fix this right now because no one else here has ANY idea how it works.
                                        --How I get stuck fixing things #10

The ultimate proof climate change is real -- hell is starting to freeze.
                            --comment on NHS finally retiring fax machines

First they came for the fax machines and I said nothing, because screw faxes.
Then they came for the mainframes and I said, while you're here, could we
also get rid of the damn printers?     --if Martin Niemoller worked in IT

Huawei CFO Offers Husband, Children As Bail Collateral
                                    --zerohedge.com headline, 11 Dec 2018

Rare brain-eating amoebas killed Seattle woman who rinsed
her sinuses with tap water              --Seattle Times headline, 6 Dec 2018

London Firefighter Sent to Rescue Parrot From Roof Told to 'F*** Off' by Bird
                                        --Newsweek headline, 14 Aug 2018

Parrot Uses Alexa to Order Watermelon, Lightbulbs While Owner Is Out
                                        --Newsweek headline, 15 Dec 2018

Oregon Police Rush to Woman Screaming for Help, Find Parrot Instead
                                        --Newsweek headline, 8 Nov 2017

Eddie: Surprised to see us, Clark?
Clark: Eddie, if I woke up tomorrow morning with my head sewn to the carpet,
       I wouldn't be more surprised than I am now.
                       --Chevy Chase, "National Lampoon's Christmas Vacation"

Everything for the state, nothing outside the state,
nothing against the state.                              --Mussolini

Hackers Could 3D Print Your Head to Unlock Your Phone
                                --creepy nextgov.com headline, 17 Dec 2018

American University Students and Staff Call for Minority-Only "Spaces" on
Campus to Promote Inclusion         --stupid Breitbart headline, 11 Dec 2018

Wild monkeys with killer herpes are breeding like crazy in Florida
                                    --Ars Technica headline, 3 Jan 2019

Astronaut Accidentally Calls 911 from Space   --Newsweek headline, 2 Jan 2019

If the company praises you for trying and suggests ways to improve, you're
doing well.  If they criticize you for not being able to walk on water
and turn wine into thermal paste at the same time, find a different job.

Everyone has a plan 'till they get punched in the mouth.     --Mike Tyson

Retirement plan on Reddit: Work until I can't, move into a refrigerator
  box under an overpass, die of exposure.
Comment: Goal-setting is important, I hear.

"Therapy llamas" make an appearance at Stanford University
                                --The College Fix headline, 25 Jan 2019

Q: Has anyone done monitoring as an RPG?  Strength == free disk space,
   dexterity == bandwidth, intelligence == CPU speed, etc?
A: On a scale of 1 to Snoop, how high are you right now?    --seen on Reddit

I'm no Brad Pitt, but I also don't look like someone took a hatchet
to a picket fence.                          --seen on Hacker News

DIY Cruise Missile for under $5,000    --seen on www.interestingprojects.com

Comment: My next server will be called Sildenafil (AKA Viagra).
         It'll have massive uptime!
Reply: If it stays up more than 4 hours you need to call someone.
                                                            --seen on Reddit

I don't care if Bill Gates is the world's biggest philanthropist.
The pain he's inflicted on the world in the past 20 years through
lousy products easily outweighs any good he's done.      --Graem Philipson

A comedian who plays Ukraine's president on TV is leading polls in the
country's actual presidential race
                                --Business Insider.com headline, 25 Feb 2019

Gimme an H!  Gimme a P!  What's that spell?
"404 the file or resource you requested is not available"
                      --comment on Hewlett-Packard tech support, 25 Feb 2019

As the DoD says: "You can't spell disappointed without DISA."
                                                        --seen on Reddit

"Goat rope" (slang): USAF military transport jargon, referring to an
operation or undertaking involving an unnecessarily large number of people,
most of them contributing nothing or actually impeding progress.

"Goat rope" origin: Lt-Cmdr Charles Breen (US Navy) tried to untangle a
goat's rope, only to be bitten by said goat.  He then decked the goat,
Mongo-style, just as a busload of tourists rounded the bend in time to
think he was beating the crap out of a goat for no reason.
Dates back to at least 1988.                         --urbandictionary.com

Woman upset with St. Paul ATM whacks machine with golf club
                                --Twin Cities Pioneer Press, 28 Feb 2019

I had the modest goal of translating a file read into a network operation,
and now my machines have tuberculosis and orifice containment issues.
                                                --James Mickens, Dec 2013

Comment: It's like physical fitness; you can pay for a nice gym, a personal
  trainer, etc, but you still have to do the heavy lifting.
Reply: I can't imagine the Kardashians lifting anything heavier than a
  toilet lid to upchuck their biscotti though.    --on buying social status

Unless you work for Hasbro, don't join a company that plays games.
                                            --interview advice on Reddit

Yo mama so old, she knows what a kilobyte is!           --geek insult

Teri Hatcher got me into Brown.
                    --Billy Eichner joking about bribery news, 12 Mar 2019

Judith Light got me wait-listed at Tufts.
                    --Billy Eichner joking about bribery news, 12 Mar 2019

In 1994 I went to a party where three people dressed up like David Hasselhoff
from Baywatch.  Someone fell into the pool and all the Hasselhoffs jumped
in to save him.         --Jimmy Fallon #WeirdestHalloweenEver, 30 Oct 2018

Forgot to get a costume for a Halloween party, so I just put a piece of tape
on my shirt that said "Dad Bod".  I won best costume.
                        --Jimmy Fallon #WeirdestHalloweenEver, 30 Oct 2018

I had to work on Halloween last year and this girl in a taco costume came
in, ordered tacos, and about 3 bites into it she asked her friends "is
this cannibalism?"       --Jimmy Fallon #WeirdestHalloweenEver, 30 Oct 2018

Domino's worker asked if I had any specific requests, so I asked her to send
a hot delivery guy.  She whispered, "They're all ugly".
                                    --Jimmy Fallon #HadToDoIt, 15 Jul 2016

Had two ice-cream bars, but I have three kids.  So I ate them both.
                                    --Jimmy Fallon #HadToDoIt, 15 Jul 2016

Watched Titanic with my kids and when Jack died, I told them that's what
happens if you don't share.         --Jimmy Fallon #HadToDoIt, 15 Jul 2016

Once I had to call my bank to reset my password.  I had to tell the lady
the answer to my security question was "my bank sucks."
                                    --Jimmy Fallon #HadToDoIt, 15 Jul 2016

As a kid at a BBQ, my cousin was bullying me.  I waited til no one was
looking and punched her in the nose with my hot dog.
                                    --Jimmy Fallon #HadToDoIt, 15 Jul 2016

Told my boyfriend "it was the shampoo bottle, it's almost empty" when he
heard me fart in the shower once.   --Jimmy Fallon #HadToDoIt, 15 Jul 2016

I watched a woman spend 15 minutes deciding on what mop to get and when
she picked one I said, "I wouldn't get that one."
                                    --Jimmy Fallon #HadToDoIt, 15 Jul 2016

Once pretended to choke to death, then told my brother (as my ghost)
that I would come back to life if he gave me the remote.
                                    --Jimmy Fallon #HadToDoIt, 15 Jul 2016

Happy Christmas to all and to all a dried penis.
    --Jimmy Fallon's "Mad Libs" version of "Twas the Night Before Christmas"

Any sufficiently advanced neglect is indistinguishable from malice.
                                --Deb Chachra, restating Clarke's 3rd Law

When I met his wife I honestly thought she had a head injury.
                        --Reddit comment about business founder, 14 Mar 2019

Europe today is a powder keg and the leaders are like men smoking in
an arsenal.  I cannot tell you when that explosion will occur, but I can
tell you where.  Some damned foolish thing in the Balkans will set it off.
                                                  --Otto von Bismarck, 1878

It's not working.  We've tried nothing and we're all out of ideas.
                                    --Ned Flanders' parents, "The Simpsons"

The competitor to be feared is one who never bothers about you at all,
but goes on making his own business better all the time.       --Henry Ford

School bus driver avoids squirrels, crashes into house
                                    --Spartanburg SC headline, 23 Mar 2019

62-Mile-High Club: Herpes from Outer Space      --ACSH headline, 25 Mar 2019

Suspect Caught with Drugs in Socks Allegedly Tells Police:
"These Aren't My Socks"                    --Breitbart headline, 28 Mar 2019

Doctors find tapeworm eggs in the brain of a teen suffering seizures
                                                    --USA Today, 28 Mar 2019

Are leaders born or made?  And if they're made, can we return them under
warranty?                               --Scott Adams, The Dilbert principle

Deputies surround burglar in Oregon home, find out suspect is
Roomba trapped in bathroom            --KATU headline, Oregon, 9 April 2019

Menstrual monitoring app raises questions about privacy
                                                --Boston Globe, 10 Apr 2019

They are tighter than a skeeter's ass in a nosedive.
                --Reddit comment about getting supplies in an IBM datacenter

Talking to you is like playing chess with a pigeon.  You shit all over the
board and then strut around acting like you won.  --freebsd-questions list

Analysis of caveman's poo reveals he ate an entire rattlesnake
                                    --UK Daily Star headline, 24 April 2019

C++ relates to C as lung cancer relates to lung.  --Polytropon, FreeBSD list

Planet of the APPS! Chimpanzee 'figures out' how to use an iPhone to scroll
through videos and photographs      --UK Daily Mail headline, 25 April 2019

World governments need a place to send embarrassing relatives, blowhards,
and idiots who can't simply be drowned in a tub.
                        --Why the UN exists, Hacker News, 18 March 2016

Florida woman pulls alligator out of pants during traffic stop
                                        --ABC News headline, 7 May 2019

Never ask someone on the internet their age.  You're either much younger
and so you should know better, or much older and should have known better.
                                            --Valeri Galtsev, 9 May 2019

We got a report that the network was down and everyone had been hacked.
Two of the women in Finance had unknowingly traded their wireless mice,
so each was moving the arrow/pointer on the other's screen.
                                            --trouble ticket seen on Reddit

Fake meat: Don't go bacon my heart, say butchers
                        --Stupid headline on www.malaymail.com, 12 May 2019

It's mostly vermin like mice and rats.  It's not like Fluffy McButtwiggles
is taking down a hippopotamus.
                --response to article about cats killing too many animals

On the US Golf Association Golf Handicap and Information Network, someone
posted scores higher than Trump would've liked, and on days he wasn't
golfing, either.        --Cybersecurity score-hacking report, 20 May 2019

They have no money and arguably some of the worst leadership in the US.
It's like if Chicago and Detroit had a love child.
                --description of Baltimore after their servers were crypto'd

UK teen mowed giant penis into field for Trump to see as he landed in London
                                                    --The Hill, 3 June 2019

I know a few successful lawyers and they're actually really good people.
Reply: I've heard about the alternate universe theory -- you've been there?

SAP: Sucks All Profit

SAP: Suffer After Purchase

SAP: Stop All Production

Would you let Amazon 3D-scan your body for a $25 gift card?
                                        --Fastcompany headline, 24 May 2019

The way you've structured the business, the term "corporate governance"
is as foreign as that thing that came out of Sigourney Weaver's stomach.
                                    --2019 comment about the CEO of SoftBank

It's like sex with a crocodile -- a great story but only because the odds
of coming out alive are so slim.    --2019 comment about SoftBank's future

A yawn is a silent scream for coffee    --Amazon email subject, 13 Jun 2019

The young treat us old people with respect because we're an uncomfortable
reminder of the inevitable.                 --Sir Davos, "Game of Thrones"

Seals can copy human speech and sing Star Wars theme tune, new study says
                                    --UK "Sky News" headline, 20 June 2019

Claim: The beauty of the UI is that anyone can use it almost immediately.
Reply: The beauty of a sh*t-filled moat is that anybody can wade in without
       having to be able to jump over it.           --seen on Reddit

A bootloader that makes you win a game of pong before you get to your OS.
                    --Hacker News, "What are you working on?", 4 July 2019

It's really great to grow a beard until you find yourself at dinner
absent-mindedly combing it with a fork.    --Tom Hanks on having facial hair

Gorillas are party animals and make friends just like humans
                                    --UK Daily Star headline, 13 July 2019

A colleague once told me that the basic unit of teaching is the bladder.
When I said I'd never thought of that, she said, "You've obviously never
been pregnant."                             --seen on teachtogether.tech

When the government makes you waste a day filling out paperwork to prove that
your dog food doesn't contain human remains, don't blame the regulators.
Blame the guy before you who made a buck by vertically integrating his
cannery and his morgue.                               --seen on ycombinator

Ain't enough 'O's in 'stoopid' to describe that guy.
                                                --Dave "the King" Wilson

Claim: You pay me $110K, I'll even drive the CEO's wife to the airport.
Reply: For $110k I'll drive the CEO's girlfriend to the airport and not
       tell his wife.                                      --seen on reddit

Try re-reading the entire exchange, then feel free to come back and explain
how you did 1+1 and came up with marzipan as the answer.
                                                --Reddit reading lesson

Keep your mouth closed when looking up.  (I work at a slaughterhouse)
                                    --"What are your rules of thumb at work?"

Fantasy threat: Mossad breaks into your apartment to steal your USB key.
Realistic threat: Your cat proudly eats your USB key.     --Kelly Shortridge

Q: What about drinking to oblivion every night?
A: Tried that. Just made me sick in addition to being unhappy.
                                --reddit advice about dealing with job stress

Center square for sh*tshow bingo.               --Reddit job description

You'd have to be twice as smart to be a moron.      --seen on "Blue Bloods"

IT (Iterative Tautology): the art of repeatedly telling the same
people how to do something or how something works in different ways
without losing your temper.                             --IT job description

"The-f*ck-is-this-sh*t-who-wrote-this-what-a-sh*thead-oh-wait-I-wrote-it"
                                            --what the "T" in IT stands for

"Human rights" are a fine thing, but how can we make ourselves sure
that our rights do not expand at the expense of the rights of others?
A society with unlimited rights is incapable of standing to adversity.
                                                    --Aleksandr Solzhenitsyn

If we do not wish to be ruled by a coercive authority, then each of us
must rein himself in...  A stable society is achieved not by balancing
opposing forces but by conscious self-limitation: by the principle that
we are always duty-bound to defer to the sense of moral justice.
                                                    --Aleksandr Solzhenitsyn

Please don't take this as me being an ass.
I am an ass, but I'm genuinely curious here.    --comment preamble on reddit

I don't believe anyone who can read could ever have these problems unless
there's a scar on his head or a lobotomy puncture near his eye.
                                            --response to bad tech question

It's like walking up to a girl's dad after your first date and telling
him she's ugly, stupid and wouldn't put out.  Don't expect dad to be very
receptive to you getting a second date.     --response to rude tech question

Pretty sure Jim Jones had t-shirts printed up with this inspiring missive.
                                            --comment on WeWork's prospectus

Colossal crabs may hold clue to Amelia Earhart fate
                                        --creepy NatGeo headline, Aug 2019

Sometimes you get geniuses, sometimes you get a piece of driftwood that
can use a phone.                        --comment on Cisco tech support

Activists buy tickets to DefCon 27 by selling nudes
                                        --Vice.com story, 18 Jun 2019

Solaris is a woman that I often troubleshoot
But then one day she pissed me off, so I deleted root   --seen on reddit

Comment about user "analfissureleakage": Username checks out.
Reply: The name "iheartpuppies" was taken, so I took the next best thing.

Scientists discover monkeys can tell you to shut up in linguistic breakthrough
                                        --UK Daily Star headline, 4 Sep 2019

Much of the shouty agreement on social media comes from people who you
wouldn't trust to sit the right way on a toilet.
                            --Tom Armstrong, "Sabotage Times", 16 Oct 2013

We are not "watching you," we are compassionately evaluating your flow state.
                                --surveillance euphemism on McSweeneys.net

"Keep it.  It's hot where you're going."
        --Akron, Ohio church sign for the thief who stole its $3,500 AC unit

Black panther found prowling roofs in French town       --BBC, 19 Sep 2019

Pennsylvania man accused of using drone to drop explosives on
ex-girlfriend's property                     --NY Post headline, 19 Sep 2019

Armed robber scared off by little girl who threw loaf of bread at him
                                        --UK Standard headline, 19 Sep 2019

Antonio Brown farted in my face and didn't pay his bill, NFL star's doctor says
                                       --The Guardian headline, 18 Sep 2019

Hitler's wife's knickers sell at auction for almost $5,000
                                                --CNN headline, 20 Sep 2019

Jesus, hope his knees make a full recovery.
        --comment on Sep 2019 headline: Adult film star 'Bridget the Midget'
          arrested in Las Vegas for allegedly stabbing boyfriend

Guess she has a short temper.
        --comment on Sep 2019 headline: Adult film star 'Bridget the Midget'
          arrested in Las Vegas for allegedly stabbing boyfriend

Wanted to return the favor after years of getting poked.
        --comment on Sep 2019 headline: Adult film star 'Bridget the Midget'
          arrested in Las Vegas for allegedly stabbing boyfriend

I'm sure she'll get a short sentence.
        --comment on Sep 2019 headline: Adult film star 'Bridget the Midget'
          arrested in Las Vegas for allegedly stabbing boyfriend

He never saw her coming, but most of us have.
        --comment on Sep 2019 headline: Adult film star 'Bridget the Midget'
          arrested in Las Vegas for allegedly stabbing boyfriend

The world's oldest one-liner recorded was a Sumerian fart joke from 1900 BC.

Couple receive nearly 25,000 ecstasy pills in the mail by mistake
                                            --CNN headline, 25 Sep 2019

Princeton grad who killed his father after his allowance was cut
gets 30 years to life                      --CNN Headline, 27 Sep 2019

Florida school evacuated after 'bong' misheard as 'bomb'  --Sep 2019 headline

The reason they only include a 6ft power cord is so
people won't hang themselves with it.        --comment on SonicWall support

I do like to read a book while having sex.  And talk on the phone.
You can get so much done.             --Jennifer Connelly, movie star, 2005

If you haven't learned the basics of the primary work tool in 1/5th of
a century, I'll happily walk your purposely-ignorant ass out the door.
                                        --comment on having IT train users

A walrus defending her cubs sank a Russian Navy boat in the Arctic Ocean
                                            --CBS Headline, 24 Sep 2019

Comment: There are better ways to handle entitled employees.
Reply: Yeah, but getting them INTO the cannon on the roof to fire them
       out over the parking lot is tricky.

He seems like the type of guy who had sex once and was like
"yeah, that was OK, but it doesn't compare to a good D&D campaign."
                                            --reddit comment on Bill Gates

If your life was a horse, would you have to shoot it?

Google Is Coming for Your Face        --"The Nation" headline, 14 Oct 2019

Do you guys just put the word "quantum" in front of everything?
                                        --Marvel's "Ant Man and the Wasp"

Bagpipers do it with Amazing Grace.                 --bumper sticker

If she agreed with me, I would wonder what I did wrong.
                    --Senator Lindsey Graham, about Susan Rice, 24 Oct 2019

An analysis of our issue suggested we would be best served with a system
somewhere between a dinghy and a tugboat.  Thanks to the misuse of the
Gartner Magic Quadrant, we purchased an aircraft carrier.   --seen on Reddit

There's nothing remarkable about it.  All one has to do is hit the right
keys at the right time and the instrument plays itself.
                                                    --Johann Sebastian Bach

Gators to face Seminoles with Peters out       --The Tallahassee Bugle

Messiah climaxes in chorus of Hallelujahs      --The Anchorage Alaska Times

GOVERNOR'S PENIS BUSY [should be "Pen Is"]
                                        --The New Haven Connecticut Register

Thanks to President Clinton, Staff Sgt. Fruer now has a son
                                            --The Arkansas Plainsman

Organ festival ends in smashing climax          --San Antonio Rose

Petroleum jelly keeps idle tools rust-free      --Chicago Daily News

Textron Inc. makes offer to screw company stockholders  --The Miami Herald

Married priests in Catholic Church a long time coming
                                            --The New Haven Connecticut Register

Governor Chiles offers rare opportunity to goose hunters
                                            --The Tallahassee Democrat

Would she climb to the top of Mr. Everest again? Absolutely!
                                            --The Houston Chronicle

Police called to arrest a naked man on the platform at Piccadilly Station
released their suspect after he produced a valid rail ticket
                                            --The Manchester Evening News

Study Finds Sex, Pregnancy Link       --Cornell Daily Sun

Survey Finds Dirtier Subways After Cleaning Jobs Were Cut   --New York Times

Larger Kangaroos Leap Farther, Researchers Find      --The Los Angeles Times

'Light' meals are lower in fat, calories        --Huntington Herald-Dispatch

Alcohol ads promote drinking        --The Hartford Courant

Malls try to attract shoppers       --The Baltimore Sun

Official: Only rain will cure drought
                            --The Herald-News, Westpost, Massachusetts

Teen-age girls often have babies fathered by men    --The Sunday Oregonian

Low Wages Said Key to Poverty               --Newsday

Man shoots neighbor with machete            --The Miami Herald

Tomatoes come in big, little, medium sizes
                  --The Daily Progress, Charlottesville, Virginia

Dirty-Air Cities Far Deadlier Than Clean Ones, Study Shows   --New York Times

Man Run Over by Freight Train Dies      --The Los Angeles Times

Scientists see quakes in L.A. future        --The Oregonian

Wachtler tells graduates that life in jail is demeaning   --The Buffalo News

Free Advice: Bundle up when out in the cold       --Lexington Herald-Leader

Prosecution paints O.J. as a wife-killer     --Fort Lauderdale Sun-Sentinel

Economist uses theory to explain economy      --Collinsville Herald-Journal

Bible church's focus is the Bible         --Saint Augustine Record, Florida

Discoveries: Older blacks have edge in longevity     --The Chicago Tribune

Court Rules Boxer Shorts Are Indeed Underwear      --Journal of Commerce

Biting nails can be sign of tenseness in a person
                        --The Daily Gazette of Schenectady, New York

Lack of brains hinders research                  --The Columbus Dispatch

Fish lurk in streams          --Rochester, New York, Democrat & Chronicle

Some 40% of female gas station employees in metro Detroit are women,
up from almost none a year ago                          --Detroit News

Tens of thousands of goats munch Greek island into crisis     --AP headline

Grandmother of eight makes hole in one.            --weird headline

Deaf mute gets new hearing in killing.             --weird headline

Defendant's speech ends in long sentence.          --weird headline

Asbestos suit pressed.                         --weird headline

Doctor testifies in horse suit.               --weird headline

Complaints about NBA referees growing ugly.           --weird headline

Police begin campaign to run down jaywalkers.         --weird headline

Flaming toilet seat causes evacuation at High School.     --weird headline

House passes gas tax on to Senate.            --weird headline

Police discover crack in Australia.           --weird headline

Tuna biting off Washington coast.             --weird headline

Stiff opposition to casketless funeral plan.       --weird headline

Men recommend more clubs for wives.            --weird headline

Many antiques seen at D.A.R. meeting.          --weird headline

Ike says Nixon can't stand Pat.               --weird headline

Two convicts evade noose, jury hung.           --weird headline

Man held over giant L.A. brush fire.           --weird headline

Traffic dead rise slowly.               --weird headline

William Kelly, 87, was fed secretary.       --weird headline

Nation's hungry attack Meese.               --weird headline

US food service feeds thousands, grosses millions.       --weird headline

Collegians are turning to vegetables.               --weird headline

Milk drinkers are turning to powder.               --weird headline

Half-million Italian women seen on pill.               --weird headline

Safety experts say school bus passengers should be belted.  --weird headline

Scientists to have Ford's ear.                       --weird headline

South Florida illegal aliens cut in half by new law.    --weird headline

10 revolting officers executed.               --weird headline

Quarter of a million Chinese live on water.           --weird headline

Drunk gets 9 months in violin case.               --weird headline

County officials to talk rubbish.               --weird headline

Judge acts to reopen theater.               --weird headline

Man held in Miami after shooting bee.               --weird headline

Survivor of Siamese twins joins parents.               --weird headline

Carter plans swell deficit.               --weird headline

Carter ticks off black help.               --weird headline

Caribbean islands drift to left.               --weird headline

Thugs eat then rob proprietor.               --weird headline

Robber holds up Albert's Hosiery.               --weird headline

New Housing for elderly not yet dead.               --weird headline

Town to drop school bus when overpass is ready.     --weird headline

Farmer Bill dies in house.               --weird headline

Kissinger allegedly forges Mideast pact.               --weird headline

Genetic engineering splits scientists.               --weird headline

Iraqi head seeks arms.               --weird headline

Salesman says he left 4 large rings in Malden bathtub.   --weird headline

Hershey bars protest.               --weird headline

Meat head fights hike in minimum pay.               --weird headline

New Autos to hit 5 million.               --weird headline

Queen Mary having bottom scraped.               --weird headline

Henshaw offers rare opportunity to goose hunters.    --weird headline

Connie tied, nude policeman testifies.               --weird headline

Woman's movement called more broad-based.            --weird headline

Antique stripper to display wares at store.          --weird headline

Stud tires out.               --weird headline

Prostitutes appeal to Pope.               --weird headline

City may impose mandatory time for prostitution.     --weird headline

Split rears in farmer's movement.               --weird headline

Mrs. Rydell's bust unveiled at nearby school.        --weird headline

Jail guard probe in prison sex.               --weird headline

Panda mating fails, veterinarians to take over.      --weird headline

Kid's pajamas to be removed by Woolworth.            --weird headline

Nuns drop out, Bishops agree to aid them.            --weird headline

Planned parenthood looking for voulunteers.          --weird headline

N.J. judge to rule on nude beach.               --weird headline

Child's stool great for use in garden.               --weird headline

Idaho group organizes to help service windows.       --weird headline

Dr. Ruth to talk about sex with newspaper editors.   --weird headline

Pastor against first lady sex position.              --weird headline

Mrs. Corson's seat up for grabs.               --weird headline

Soviet virgin lands short of goal again.             --weird headline

Local man has longest horns in Texas.               --weird headline

Cause of AIDS found - scientists.               --weird headline

Sterilization solves problems for pets, owners.      --weird headline

Organ festival ends in smashing climax.              --weird headline

British left waffles on Falkland Islands.            --weird headline

Lung cancer in women mushrooms.               --weird headline

City pacts fight boils.               --weird headline

Eye drops off shelf.               --weird headline

Teacher strikes idle kids.               --weird headline

Reagan wins on budget, but more lies ahead.          --weird headline

Dealers will hear car talk Friday afternoon.         --weird headline

Squad helps dog bite victim.               --weird headline

Mondale's offensive looks hard to beat.              --weird headline

American ships head to Libya.               --weird headline

Lawyers give poor free legal advice.               --weird headline

Life means caring for hospital director.             --weird headline

Hornets will accent throwing game in 2112.           --weird headline

Enraged cow injures farmer with ax.               --weird headline

Shot off woman's leg helps Nicklaus to 66.           --weird headline

Man eating Piranha mistakenly sold as pet fish.      --weird headline

Admits shooting husband from stand during trial.     --weird headline

Lawmen from Mexico barbecue guests.               --weird headline

Plane to close too ground, crash probe told.         --weird headline

Miners refuse to work after death.               --weird headline

Juvenile court to try shooting defendant.            --weird headline

Fund set up for beating victim's kin.               --weird headline

Stolen painting found by tree.               --weird headline

Fine young man convicted of misdemeanor.             --weird headline

Hitler, Nazi papers found in attic.               --weird headline

Silent teamster boss gets unusual punishment, Lawyer.    --weird headline

Two Soviet ships collide, one dies.               --weird headline

Two sisters reunited after 18 years in checkout counter.  --weird headline

Killer sentenced to die for second time in ten years.     --weird headline

Commuter tax on New Yorkers killed in New Jersey.         --weird headline

Never withhold herpes infection from loved one.           --weird headline

Cancer society honors Marlboro man.               --weird headline

Nicaragua sets goal to wipe out literacy.               --weird headline

Autos killing 110 a day - let's resolve to do better.     --weird headline

20-year friendship ends at altar.               --weird headline

War dims hope for peace.               --weird headline

If strike isn't settled quickly, it may last a while.     --weird headline

Smokers are productive, but death cuts efficiency.        --weird headline

Cold wave linked to temperatures.               --weird headline

Half of US High Schools require some study for graduation.   --weird headline

Child's death ruins couple's holiday.               --weird headline

Blind woman gets kidney from dad she hasn't seen in years.   --weird headline

Man is fatally slain.               --weird headline

Enfield couple slain, police suspect homicide.           --weird headline

Something went wrong in Jet crash, expert says.          --weird headline

Death causes loneliness, feelings of isolation.          --weird headline

Ford, Reagan neck in Presidential primary.          --Ethiopian newspaper

Two roads diverged in a wood, and I took the road less traveled -- and
they CANCELLED MY FRIKKIN' SHOW.  I totally shoulda took the road that
had all those people on it.  Damn.                         --Joss Whedon

Leaves fall in autumn,
Windows 7 end of life,
Upgrade must be soon.               --IT haiku

Service restarting,
application is fragile.
Database corrupt!                   --IT haiku

No cash for backups
Data disappears swiftly,
like warmth in winter.              --IT haiku

I guess it's Friday.
Space heaters tripped a breaker;
wear a goddamn coat.                --IT haiku

"My mailbox is full".
Purge your Deleted Items.
"No, they're important".            --IT haiku

Upgrade Windows 10:
Oh crap, nothing works anymore.
Welcome to IT.                      --IT haiku

Tickets are awful,
never-ending drudgery.
I need some whiskey.                --IT haiku

iPad sign-in's borked,
please hire a receptionist.
Lord I hate this thing.             --IT haiku

Ringy ding a ling!
"My laptop will not turn on!"
Did you plug it in?                 --IT haiku

Really large print: I'M NOT GAY
Teeny weenie print: but $20 is $20          --seen on a T-shirt

The same people who - best case - were unable to keep a guy in a concrete
room with cameras on him from throttling himself with a blankey are now
supposed to handle your doctoring.            --Kurt Schlichter, 7 Nov 2019

Ice preserved a tiny puppy in near-perfect condition for 18,000 years:
scientists are fascinated    --creepy Washington Post headline, 29 Nov 2019

You Moved Copier.
Did you think it would just work?
There's no network there.           --IT haiku

Leaves fall from the trees
Users ignore IT mail
Just how nature is.                 --IT haiku

Computer failure
But have you tried turning it
Off and on again?                   --IT haiku

EBay phishing mail.
1 million dollars for bike.
Confirm this purchase.              --IT haiku

15 years in IT,
Built many complex systems,
Still can't fix printing.           --IT haiku

In God We Trust, All Others We Monitor          --seen in CIA gift shop

Three great powers rule the world: greed, fear, and stupidity.  --Mark Twain

Best Hotel Name Ever: Morning Wood Hotel, Skagway, Alaska.

Good people do not need laws to tell them to act responsibly,
while bad people will find a way around the laws.               --Plato

IdRatherBeOnFire@maildrop.cc
            --what you tell people when they offer to email you a whitepaper

Note: I've heard that when you reach a certain age, you can stop working.
Reply: Yes, it's called your lifespan.              --retirement comment

One of the synonyms for "commentator" is "smellfungus".
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

Give me control of a nation's money and I care not who makes its laws.
                                        --Mayer Amschel Bauer Rothschild

If you wish to remain the slaves of Bankers and pay the cost of your own
slavery, let them continue to create deposits.
        --SIR JOSIAH STAMP, President of the Bank of England in the 1920's,
          the second richest man in Britain

An American model has raised more than NZ$750,000 for the Australian
bushfire victims by promising to send nude selfies to those who donate.
                                --New Zealand Herald article, 7 Jan 2020

Man chokes girlfriend after she claimed his fart smelled horrible
                                    --Wichita Falls headline, 6 Jan 2020

Poll finds most people would rather be annihilated by a giant tidal wave
than continue to be lectured by climate change activists
                                            --Babylon Bee article, Dec 2019

This is the worst thing to happen to cats since dogs.
                                            --review of the movie "Cats"

Comment: She'll have a boyfriend in a month.
Reply: Then she'll be single after a few months.
       --after Michelle Carter (talked boyfriend into suicide) prison release

I keep giving it water, yeast, flour, and sugar and not getting pizza.
I just assumed I didn't know what pizza was.      --comment on using systemd

Weddings, healthcare and education are surefire ways to extract money
from people even when the economy is in a slump.  At least you get cake
at a wedding.                                       --seen on Hacker News

"People you may know" + mobile app + taking a dump = "daddy's networking time"
                                                    --job search advice

A man thought someone left a box of puppies on his lawn.
Nope, they were bear cubs.                      --CNN headline, 7 Feb 2020

First-grade teacher arrested for trying to buy meth while at school
                                --Kiro7 news headline, Florida, 7 Feb 2020

That which is falling deserves to be pushed.                --Nietzsche

A man who is not a liberal at sixteen has no heart;
a man who is not a conservative at sixty has no head.   --Benjamin Disraeli

Being an a**hole is not a signal you are creative.  It's a signal of limited
market options for the people who have to put up with you.  --Hacker News

Comment: Electronics can activate my nervous system in a jittery way.
Reply: Stop jamming a fork in your outlet.        --medicine on Reddit

Me: I work at a USAF base, and I gave myself a new job title by printing
  "Tech Weenie" using the same font as our office nameplates and taping
  it over what was already there.  It was gone two days later.
Reply: I'm kind of shocked that didn't stick in the military.   --on Reddit

Like a choose-your-own-adventure but someone tore out too many pages.
                                               --trouble ticket description

F*ck that company with a cactus.  I worked for them in Tucson
so the cactus is only appropriate.      --sysadmin description of Convergys

Convergys is to engineers as Casey Anthony is to childcare.
                                        --sysadmin description of Convergys

She's nice, but if she turns her head at an angle to her desk fan,
you can hear whistling noises.      --nasty performance review on Reddit

The first cloned animal, whose birth name was 6LL3, was renamed Dolly Parton
(shortened to Dolly) in honor of her origin as a cloned mammary cell.
                                        --item for a lull in conversation

Men, is your prostate the size of a baked yam?  Do you dribble like the
Harlem Globetrotters?  --American Council on Science and Health, 12 Mar 2020

The best setup is having a wife and a mistress.  Each of them will assume
you're with the other, leaving you free to get some work done.
                        --programmer with serious work-life balance issues

Nicknames for COVID-19 #1: Kungflu Apocalypse

Nicknames for COVID-19 #2: Boomer Remover

Nicknames for COVID-19 #3: The Beast from the East

Nicknames for COVID-19 #4: Hong Kong Flueey

Since there are no other health concerns to fret over, two guys decided
to fight with real lightsabers          --avclub.com headline, 13 Mar 2020

Former China exec missing after calling Xi a 'clown' over COVID-19 handling
                                        --Reuters headline, 15 March 2020

Hackers now offering 10% CoronaVirus discounts on malware
                                --security firm Check Point, 19 Mar 2020

DOJ charges two men for delivering prison contraband with drones; goods
included drugs, phones, saw blades, syringes and "Just for Men" hair color.
                                          --Nextgov article, 19 Mar 2020

Tell everyone, "It's next on my list."  Don't mention it's the list of
"shit-not-worth-doing-right-now."           --Handling priorities on reddit

If I wanted a grossly incompetent subordinate whose hand always needs holding
and whose messes I always have to clean up, I'd hire my 2-year-old son.
At least I like him.        --reply to suggestion about hiring former boss

Q: What can you get with a $5 Starbucks gift card?
A: COVID-19 and $5 change.

Violets are red
And roses are blue
When metamaterials
Alter their hue.

Had a user the other day whose Luddite Field was stronger than my IT Aura.

"Micro-gravity surge pass completed" == "The fat bearded IT guy
walked past the computer"                      --IT troubleshooting guide

Problem report: server is down.
Fix: Complimented server on its appearance.  Server is now happy again.

Q: Have you ever seen a case where over-automation of tasks got out of
   control and something big failed?
A: Google "cyberdyne systems"

It's like dating.  A little awkward at first, then you'll be farting on
the couch and laughing together.  --Reddit on getting used to a new job

Have you tried taking a dump in your bosses' trunk yet?
Now's a great time since he's probably not driving as much.
                            --COVID method of dealing with bad management

Archaeologists now have a handy new tool for analyzing paleo poop
                                        --ArsTechnica article, 4/19/2020

Apparently the archaeological record is full of dog poop.
                                        --ArsTechnica article, 4/19/2020

5G is so advanced that scanning a COVID-infected document transmits the virus.
                                        --stupid tech rumor, 20 Apr 2020

While it's admirable to be the "cleanest shirt" in a pile of dirty laundry,
certain areas of human life do not allow the clean shirts to win.
                        --https://fs.blog/2009/12/mental-model-greshams-law/

nanosecond: time it takes light to travel just under 12 inches.
ohnosecond: time between hitting "Return" and knowing you f*cked up.

Comment: Dress for the job you want, not the job you have.
Reply: Still not Batman.  HR keeps calling me though.

I've never seen religious faith move mountains, but I've seen what it does
to skyscrapers.

Did you know they opened a restaurant on the Moon?
Great food but no atmosphere.

Only a fool learns from his own mistakes.
The wise man learns from the mistakes of others.      --Otto von Bismarck

Five-year-old boy stopped on highway driving from Utah to California
                                        --NY Times headline, 4 May 2020

Rather than a beep
Or a rude error message,
These words: "File not found."          --Zen error messages in Haiku

The Web site you seek
cannot be located, but
endless others exist.                   --Zen error messages in Haiku

Error messages
cannot completely convey.
We now know shared loss.                --Zen error messages in Haiku

Comment: It's up to a carpenter to pick the right tools for the job.
Reply: I work with a bunch of tools and I really need to change my job.

SharePoint is like communism: it's a lovely idea in theory, and someone
will set out to implement it with the best of intentions, and two years
later everyone is bitter and angry and nothing works.

I'd set the office on fire but I'm WFH and that seems counter-productive.
                                --reply to "use Sharepoint" suggestion

Can we uninstall 2020 and install it again?  This one had a virus.

A seat near a Greyhound bus bathroom on "National Projectile Vomiting Day"
                    --seen in a comparison to flying American Airlines

Being dragged by your scrotum over volcanic rock.
                    --seen in a comparison to flying American Airlines

Mental hygiene: if possible, don't put your wet bar near your work stuff.
                                            --advice on working from home

Fat Earther: One who believes the world is round but has put on too much
weight near the equator.

Haphazardly stuck together like an unsupervised toddler with a bottle of
Elmer's Glue in a craft store.      --description of IBM Bigfix software

It is not the computer's job to stop you from shooting yourself in the foot.
It's the computer's job to deliver the bullet accurately.

I hate you.  Please fist yourself without lube.
            --suggestion for Microsoft employee who thought up NSCI probe

There's a reason you separate military and the police.  One fights the enemies
of the state.  The other serves and protects the people.  When the military
becomes both, then the enemies of the state tend to become the people.
                                    --Commander Adama, "Battlestar Galactica"

No snowflake in an avalanche ever feels responsible.        --Voltaire

Military And Intelligence Personnel Can Be Tracked With Beer App
                                    --Bellingcat headline, 18 May 2020

Often the bar for starting a company is "my parents are rich
and I'd like to pretend I'm not useless."       --seen in a tech forum

Nasrudin went into a bank to cash a check.  "Can you identify yourself?"
asked the clerk.  Nasrudin took out a mirror and peered into it.  "Yup,
that's me alright."

Sex slaves in a twisted carnal Ponzi scheme
                            --seen in a Toronto Sun article about NXIVM

Senate Passes Bill to End Payments to Dead People
                                    --Nextgov headline, 1 July 2020

Two bald men fighting over a comb.
                --Jorge Luis Borges description of Argentina and the UK
                  fighting over the Malvinas/Falklands

The medium was no longer the message, it was just an asshole.  --Craig Mod

Cloud services should be like a mini-skirt, just enough to cover the
environment but not so much that it actually becomes comfortable.
                                                            --seen on Reddit

It has the responsiveness of continental drift.
                                --review of "Blackboard Learn" software

If you're in the mood to claw your brain from its stem
and flush it down the toilet.     --comment on Google results for "CSS Grid"

I dream of a better tomorrow, where chickens can cross the road
and not be questioned about their motives.             --Ralph Waldo Emerson

Good times make soft men, soft men make things tough,
tough times create strong men, strong men create good times.    --unknown

On Yahoo Answers, the world's least qualified people have been giving bad
advice on shin-length skirts to confused 23-year-olds since 2005.
                                            --Amanda Mull, "The Atlantic"

A useless dashboard and a customer support experience that's only slightly
better than a cheese grater to the tongue.
                                --"Carbonite backup" description, July 2020

It became easier to run into the burning building
once I knew I didn't start the fire.        --reddit comment on upgrades

"I've got 8 inches of CAT6e and my RJ45 is running a traceroute
straight to your 568b, baby."                   --system admin sexy talk

Treating children for worms yields long-term benefits, says new study
                                    --UC Berkeley News headline, 3 Aug 2020

Please, show me where it says protesters are supposed to be polite
and peaceful.       --Chris Cuomo, brother of New York's Governor, Aug 2020

Cornish drinkers catch a different kind of buzz as pub
installs electric fence at bar    --headline, "The Register", 14 Jul 2020

When a man tells you that he got rich through hard work, ask him: "Whose?"
                --Don Marquis (1878-1937), American journalist and author

X: Give lip service and f*ck any follow through.
Y: The term "lip service" just sounds like "bl*wjob" to me.
X: That would be preferable, at least you get something out of it.
                                                --discussion of PearsonVue

The power of Internet-shaming is one that can be wielded by even a non-Jedi.

Princess Pretty-Pointer's Google-Fu is about as strong as using spaghetti
noodles for fishing line.  --working with a computer-illiterate 12-year-old

Telling a programmer there's already a library to do X is like telling a
songwriter there's already a song about love.  --Pete Cordell

Don't ask a barber if you need a haircut.

Show me the incentive and I'll show you the outcome.  --Munger

Comment: "Your recent tickets were all evaluated at 1, please work on
         your customer satisfaction skills."
Reply: "Your Glassdoor rating was recently evaluated at 1, please FOAD
       while I move on to my next job."

What we lack in size we make up for in eccentricity.
            --Steve Gombosi, comp.sys.super (Supercomputers), 31 Jul 2000

Do a ticket for everything.  Scratched your balls?
Put in a ticket for "rearranged sensitive equipment".   --WFH reporting idea

My job is to fix problems that can be fixed.  If I could perform miracles,
I'd be doing something with loaves and fishes.     --Reddit on lazy users

AT&T moves at the speed of a heroin-overdosed sloth.   --Network engineer

Comment: Are you f***ing stupid?  Because you sound f***ing stupid.
Reply: If you keep bottling up your feelings like this, you'll get an ulcer.
                                                    --tech support discussion

Job applications are like Arkansas Tinder; you got their number, had a fine
first date, made plans for another one.  Then you find out the position
was filled by their cousin.                         --IT jobs discussion

No, it doesn't count in this case because the moon was full and a dead
rabbit fell on a moose.             --Microsoft excuse to avoid SLA penalty

I got a call that really activated my almonds.  --seen on helpdesk forum

If your car UX changed as often as MS Office?  Steering wheel on the
glove box, shifter in the backseat, pedals on the ceiling because innovate.
                                                        --seen on Reddit

I have an email archive that's old enough to buy beer in all 50 states.
                                                            --geek bragging

Just because your old boyfriend (LogMeIn) was terrible and beat you every
night doesn't mean your new boyfriend (TeamViewer) is better because he
only beats you once a week.     --fairly brutal video-sharing comparison

Installation as smooth as a broken beer bottle.
                                  --description of Ivanti LanDesk software

Shannen Doherty could slice me up with a machette and
I'd still hold out hope I'd get laid before my last gasp.  --seen on Reddit

Recruiter: "You'll Be Part Of A World-Changing Mission!"
Tech: "So.. What do you guys actually do? What do you sell?"
Recruiter: "Revenue analytics for the toll booth industry!"

Have you tried turning off your computer and never turning it back on again?
                                                --snotty helpdesk answer

HHS to Start Testing Your Poop for COVID-19  --Nextgov headline, 28 Sep 2020

Q: What management decision did you disagree with but later realized
   was the right move?
A: Hiring me.               --seen on Reddit

The good things that live in your nose     --"Cosmos" headline, 27 May 2020

Italian Police Use Lamborghini To Transport Donor Kidney 300 Miles In 2 Hours
                                    --Jalopnik headline, 14 Nov 2020

It isn't the mountains ahead to climb that wear you out,
it's the pebble in your shoe.                               --Muhammad Ali

Oracle: Law firm run by salesmen. They also have a few engineers.   --reddit

Nobody goes to a newspaper for news.                --Martin Gurri

The town of F*cking, Austria changed its name to Fugging.  Just across the
border in Bavaria, Germany there's a village called Petting.
                                    --"Guardian" article, 26 Nov 2020

Middelfart, Denmark     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Winkle, Austria     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Andrews Knob, Cheshire, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Anus, Batangas, Philippines     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Anus, Irian Jaya, Indonesia     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Anus, Laguna, Philippines     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Athol, Massachusetts, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Bald Knob, Arkansas, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Bald Knob, Queensland, Australia     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Ballplay, Tennessee, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Balls Cross, West Sussex, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Bastardstown, Co.  Wexford, Ireland     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Beaver, Oklahoma, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Beaver, West Virginia, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Beaverlick, Kentucky, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Beaverton, Oregon, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Bern Wankdorf, Switzerland     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Big Beaver, Pennsylvania, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Big Bone Lick State Park, KY, USA   --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Big Dick Lake, Marcell, MN, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Blow Me Down, Newfoundland, Canada     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Blowhard, Victoria, Australia     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Blue Ball, Pennsylvania, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Blue Knob NSW 2480, Australia     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Bonar Bridge, Scotland, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Brest, France     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Brest, Germany     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Brown Willy, Cornwall, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Buger, Majorca, Spain     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Butthole Lane, Leicestershire, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Chinaman's Knob, Australia     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Clam, Accomack, Virginia, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Climax, Colorado, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Climax, Georgia, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Climax, Michigan, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Climax, North Carolina, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Climax, Minnesota, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Climax, Saskatchewan, Canada     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Clit, Arad, Romania     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Clit, Salja, Romania     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Clit, Suceava, Romania     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Clitheroe, Lancashire, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Cock Bridge, Aberdeen, Scotland, UK   --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Cockburn, Central WA, Australia     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Cockermouth, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Cockeysville, Maryland, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Cockfosters, London, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Cocking, West Sussex, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Cocks, Perranporth, Cornwall, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Cockshot Road, Reigate, Surrey, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Come By Chance, Newfoundland, Canada    --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Conception Bay, Newfoundland     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Condom, Aveyron, France     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Coxsackie, New York, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Crap, 7173 Sumvitg, Switzerland     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Crap, Tirane, Albania     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Craponne, France     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Crotch Crescent, Oxford, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Crotch Lake, Ontario, Canada     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Cuckoo's Knob, Wiltshire, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Cum Cum Hill, Hatfield, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Cum, Co.  Mayo, Ireland     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Cum, Wanderlandia, Brazil     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Cumbum, Andhra Pradesh, India     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Cumming, Georgia, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Cumming, Iowa, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Cunter, Switzerland     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Cuxhaven, Germany     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Delicate Knobby Camping Ground, Australia  --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Dick, Michigan, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Dick, Colorado, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Dick, Pennsylvania, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Dikshit, India     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Dildo, Newfoundland, Canada; right across the harbor from Spread Eagle
                                    --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Erect, North Carolina, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Felch, Michigan (Dickinson), USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Felchville, MA, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Felchville, Vermont, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Floyds Knobs, Indiana, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

French Lick, Indiana, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Gayville, South Dakota, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Hackballs Cross, Ireland     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Hard, Austria     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Hooker, Oklahoma     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Horneytown, North Carolina, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Humptulips, Washington, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Intercourse Island, Australia     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Intercourse, Pennsylvania, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Kinki Expressway, Japan     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Kinki University, Japan     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Knob Lick, Kentucky, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Koolyanobbing, Australia     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Labia, Waremme, Liege, Belgium     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Lake Titicaca, Puno Region, Peru     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Lickey End, West Midlands, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Lickfold, West Sussex, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Little Dick Lake, MN, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Little Dix Village, West Indies     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Longdong Avenue, Shanghai, China     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Lord Herefords Knob, Powys, Wales     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Lower Dicker, East Sussex, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Lower Spunk Lake, Minnesota, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Lynsore Bottom, Kent, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Meat Camp, North Carolina, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Meat Cove, Nova Scotia, Canada     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Mianus, Conneticut, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Middle Spunk Lake, Minnesota, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Moron, Distrito Cedemo, Venezuela     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Mount Buggery, Victoria, Australia     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Muff, Armstrong, Pennsylvania, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Muff, Northern Ireland     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Penistone, Great Britain     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Petting, Germany     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Phuket, Phuket, Thailand     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Poo Poo Point, Washington, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Probe, Utah       --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Pussy, Rhine-Alpes, France     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Pussi, Estonia     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Rectum, Netherlands     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Round Bush, Hertsmere, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Sac City, Iowa, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Sandy Balls Estate, Hampshire, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Semen, Jawa Timur, Indonesia     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Semicock Road, Ballymoney, UKa     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Seymen, Turkey     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Shaft, Maryland, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Shafter, California, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Shepherds Bush, Greater London, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Shit, Mazandaran, Iran     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Shitterton, Bere Regis, Dorset, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Shyte Brook, Shropshire, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Slut, Vasterbotten, Sweden     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Sluts Hole Lane, Norfolk, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Sodom, Denbighshire LL16, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Spanker Knob, Victoria, Australia     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Spread Eagle, Newfoundland, Canada     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Spurt, Belgium     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Swallow, Utah, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Three Cocks, Wales, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Tit, Algeria     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Tittybong, Australia     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Titz, Germany     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Twathats, Dumfries And Galloway, UK      --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Twatt, Orkney, Scotland, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Twatt, Shetland, Scotland, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Upper Dicker, East Sussex, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Upper Spunk Lake, Minnesota, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Vagina, Tyumenskaya oblast, Russia     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Virgin Arm, Newfoundland, Canada     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Virginville, Pennsylvania, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Wankers Corner Saloon and Cafe, OR, USA  --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Wecock Farm, Waterlooville, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Weener, Germany     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Wet Beaver Creek, AZ, USA     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Wetwang, Yorkshire, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Whiskey Dick Mountain, Washington, USA  --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Wilsford cum Lake, Salisbury, UK     --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Yorkey's Knob, Queensland, Australia    --from www.vaguelyrudeplacesmap.com

Royal Dick School of Veterinary Medicine, Edinburgh    --odd school name

Moving to Oracle over mistreatment from their provider is like jumping
from the frying pan into the goddamn sun.   --seen in a CentOS discussion

You sound like Steve Carell trying to describe how breasts feel.
              --comment on NY Times coverage of Fireeye hack, 8 Dec 2020

Kingdoms vary in size, tyrants do not.

The society that loses its grip on the past is in danger, for it produces
men who know nothing but the present, and who are not aware that life had
been, and could be, different from what it is.  --Aristotle

Hallo.  My name is SARS-CoV-2.  You are not wearing a mask?  Prepare to die!
                                --2020 version of "The Princess Bride"

It's hard to imagine a more stupid or more dangerous way of making decisions
than by putting those decisions in the hands of people who pay no price
for being wrong.                                            --Thomas Sowell

Children's talent to endure stems from their ignorance of alternatives.
                                                --Maya Angelou (1928-2014)

It is not true that high wages make prosperity.
Instead, prosperity makes high wages.                   --Murray N. Rothbard

Possession of a system of knowledge should not be confused with either
the license or capacity to operate it.  --Dave Hayes, FreeBSD mailing list

Individual criticisms of a system should not be confused with any shortcoming
of the system itself.                   --Dave Hayes, FreeBSD mailing list

"Kubernetes", from a Greek word meaning "More containers than customers"

What do we want?  Time Travel!
When do we want it?  Doesn't matter!

My best friend's sister's boyfriend's brother's girlfriend heard from
this guy who knows this kid who's going with the girl who heard Bernie
was pouting at the inauguration last night.  I guess it's pretty serious.
                                --Kristy Swanson on Twitter, 25 Jan 2021

If you want purity, date a nun.  This is politics,
and if you don't win, you lose.             --Kurt Schlichter, 28 Jan 2021

I can parallel park an 88,000 ton aircraft carrier but
can't drive a car for shit.      --seen in a "diverse skillset" discussion

If the First Amendment will protect a scumbag like me,
it will protect all of you.                                 --Larry Flynt

My company [DuPont] has had a safety program for 150 years.  The program was
instituted as a result of a French law requiring an explosives manufacturer
to live on the premises with his family.            --Crawford Greenewalt

"There should be a special level of hell for this pus-sucking, gangrenous
malignancy of a mental amoeba."
"Somebody steal your parking space again?"   --"Law & Order SVU", 15 Dec 2000

Access databases in production is like saying your airplane is
running on an old Ford Escort engine.                   --seen on reddit

Why thinking too much can be bad for you  --"Economist" headline, 29 Dec 2012

In the blacksmith's house, there's a wooden knife
                --Spanish equivalent of "the shoemaker's kids go barefoot"

It's most dark right under the lamp
                    --Czech equivalent of "the shoemaker's kids go barefoot"

The blacksmith's horse walks barefoot
                    --Czech equivalent of "the shoemaker's kids go barefoot"

The carpenter' door is falling apart
                --Arabic equivalent of "the shoemaker's kids go barefoot"

If it's that bad, it probably goes all the way back to two people not
using a condom.             --nasty criticism of programming skill on Reddit

Luckily we both shat our pants so it wasn't just me who dragged
a weird smell into the office.  --sysadmin reaction to dropping an entire OU

VP's staff's phishing tests have a higher failure rate than
a Mississippi science class.                        --seen on Reddit

A plastic bag blowing in the wind is Mother Nature's way of telling you
to see a shrink.                    --snotty review of "American Beauty"

Comment: To a construction worker, "Flogging The Dog" means you're not
  working very hard.
Reply: To the average geek I imagine it means something slightly different.

Welcome to springtime in Ohio where we get to experience
all four seasons in a week.
         --Col Patrick Miller, USAF, Commander, 88th Air Base Wing, WPAFB

Belgian farmer accidentally moves French border   --BBC headline, 4 May 2021

The only thing I miss about going to the movies is the
excuse to eat complete and utter garbage in the dark.       --Billy Eichner

Wild boars corner Italian woman at the supermarket, steal her groceries
                                --"Vancouver Sun" headline, 14 May 2021

I think I'd rather die but thank you anyway.
        --Victoria Beckham, on wearing the crocs that Justin Bieber sent her

If you cough the wrong way, I will haul your ass to the curb for streets
and sanitation to deal with you.    --how a friend deals with COVID

Jack Frost roasting on an open fire, chestnuts nipping at his nose.
                                    --Xmas card I got from a buddy

Dear vegans: I killed the cow that was eating all your food.
No need to thank me, it was delicious.                  --signed, Carnivore

Vaseline <- made of petroleum <- made of dinosaurs <- made of meat.
Therefore vegans should not use Vaseline.           --Spiceworks, 14 May 2021

Checkbox-Driven (AKA Monkey's Paw) Development, where you give exactly what
was asked for; surprisingly popular in the government and enterprise spaces.
                                                    --seen on Hacker News

Judge Rules Insurance Policies Do Not Cover Golf Carts as "Passenger Autos"
                                            --Sportico headline, 17 May 2021

When I dunk my cookies in my milk, I think of you and
hold them under until the bubbles stop.           --seen on a coffee mug

This Beetle Bites an Ant's Waist and Pretends to be Its Butt
                            --"The Atlantic" science headline, 14 Feb 2017

I have found that my own ability to lecture monotonously on some obstruse
topic has (at one point or another) put every member of my family to sleep.
                                                --seen on Hacker News

Nature never makes any blunders, when she makes a fool she means it.
                                                --Archibald Alexander

There is freedom of speech, but I cannot guarantee freedom after speech.
                                                --Idi Amin

So vast a sum, receiving all the protection and benefits of the government,
without bearing its proportion of the burdens and expenses of the same,
will not be looked upon acquiescently by those who have to pay the taxes...
I would suggest the taxation of all property equally.   --Ulysses S. Grant

Quit thinking about what Lee's gonna do to us and start thinking about
what we're going to do to him.                          --Ulysses S. Grant

When news of the surrender first reached our lines our men commenced firing
a salute of a hundred guns in honor of the victory.  I at once sent word,
however, to have it stopped.  The Confederates were now our prisoners,
and we did not want to exult over their downfall.       --Ulysses S. Grant

It does look like a very good exercise.  But what is the little white ball for?
                                                        --Ulysses S. Grant

There are but few important events in the affairs of men brought about by
their own choice.                                       --Ulysses S. Grant

It was my fortune, or misfortune, to be called to the office of Chief
Executive without any previous political training.    --Ulysses S. Grant

Nations, like individuals, are punished for their transgressions.
                                                --Ulysses S. Grant

Leave the matter of religion to the family altar, the church, and the
private school, supported entirely by private contributions.  Keep the
church and state forever separate.              --Ulysses S. Grant

I know only two tunes: one of them is "Yankee Doodle," and the other isn't.
                                                --Ulysses S. Grant

Declare church and state forever separate and distinct; but each free
within their proper spheres.                    --Ulysses S. Grant

Ah, you know my weaknesses; my children and my horses.  --Ulysses S. Grant

I never wanted to get out of a place as much as I did to get out of the
presidency.                                     --Ulysses S. Grant

Two commanders on the same field are always one too many.
                                                --Ulysses S. Grant

The distant rear of an army engaged in battle is not the best place from
which to judge correctly what is going on in front.  --Ulysses S. Grant

But my later experience has taught me two lessons: first, that things are
seen plainer after the events have occurred; second, that the most confident
critics are generally those who know the least about the matter criticised.
                                                --Ulysses S. Grant

In every battle there comes a time when both sides consider themselves
beaten, then he who continues the attack wins.  --Ulysses S. Grant

The friend in my adversity I shall always cherish most.  I can better
trust those who helped to relieve the gloom of my dark hours than those
who are so ready to enjoy with me the sunshine of my prosperity.
                                                --Ulysses S. Grant

Labor disgraces no man; unfortunately, you occasionally find men who
disgrace labor.                                 --Ulysses S. Grant

There are many men who would have done better than I did under the
circumstances in which I found myself.  If I had never held command, if I
had fallen, there were 10,000 behind who would have followed the contest
to the end and never surrendered the Union.     --Ulysses S. Grant

If we are to have another contest in the near future of our national
existence, I predict that the dividing line will not be Mason and Dixon's
but between patriotism and intelligence on the one side, and superstition,
ambition and ignorance on the other.            --Ulysses S. Grant

If men make war in slavish obedience to rules, they will fail.
                                                --Ulysses S. Grant

I have never advocated war except as a means of peace.  --Ulysses S. Grant

The great bulk of the legal voters of the South were men who owned no slaves;
their homes were generally in the hills and poor country; their facilities
for educating their children, even up to the point of reading and writing,
were very limited; their interest in the contest was very meagre -- what
there was, if they had been capable of seeing it, was with the North;
they too needed emancipation.                       --Ulysses S. Grant

In 1850, I believe, the church property in the United States, which paid no
tax, amounted to $87 million.  In 1900, without a check, it is safe to say,
this property will reach a sum exceeding $3 billion.  I would suggest the
taxation of all property equally.                   --Ulysses S. Grant

The right of revolution is an inherent one.  When people are oppressed by
their government, it is a natural right they enjoy to relieve themselves
of oppression, if they are strong enough, whether by withdrawal from it,
or by overthrowing it and substituting a government more acceptable.
                                                --Ulysses S. Grant

The will of the people is the best law.         --Ulysses S. Grant

God gave us Lincoln and Liberty, let us fight for both.  --Ulysses S. Grant

Let us labor for the security of free thought, free speech, pure morals,
unfettered religious sentiments, and equal rights and privileges for all
men, irrespective of nationality, color, or religion...  leave the matter
of religious teaching to the family altar, the church, and the private
school, supported entirely by private contribution.  Keep church and state
forever separate.                               --Ulysses S. Grant

I felt like anything rather than rejoicing at the downfall of a foe who
had fought so long and valiantly, and had suffered so much for a cause,
though that cause was, I believe, one of the worst for which a people ever
fought, and one for which there was the least excuse.  --Ulysses S. Grant

[The annexation of Texas] was an instance of a republic following the bad
example of European monarchies, in not considering justice in their desire
to acquire additional territory.                    --Ulysses S. Grant

Our great modern Republic.  May those who seek the blessings of its
institutions and the protection of its flag remember the obligations
they impose.  --Ulysses S. Grant

My failures have been errors in judgment, not of intent.
                                                --Ulysses S. Grant

There never was a time when, in my opinion, some way could not be found
to prevent the drawing of the sword.  --Ulysses S. Grant

I know no method to secure the repeal of bad or obnoxious laws so
effective as their stringent execution.         --Ulysses S. Grant

The theory of government changes with general progress.
                                                --Ulysses S. Grant

Encourage free schools and resolve that not one dollar appropriated for
their support shall be appropriated to the support of any sectarian schools.
                                                --Ulysses S. Grant

Leave the matter of religion to the family altar, the church and the private
school supported entirely by private contributions.  Keep the church and
state forever separate.                         --Ulysses S. Grant

Wars produce many stories of fiction, some of which are told until they
are believed to be true.                        --Ulysses S. Grant

The one thing I never want to see again is a military parade.  When I
resigned from the army and went to a farm I was happy.  When the rebellion
came, I returned to the service because it was a duty.  I had no thought
of rank; all I did was try and make.            --Ulysses S. Grant

Whatever there is of greatness in the United States, or indeed in any
other country, is due to labor.  The laborer is the author of all greatness
and wealth.  Without labor there would be no government, no leading class,
and nothing to preserve.
                                                --Ulysses S. Grant

I never was an Abolitionest, not even what could be called anti-slavery,
but I try to judge farely and honestly and it become patent to my mind
early in the rebellion that the North and South could never live at peace
with each other except as one nation, and that without Slavery.
                                                --Ulysses S. Grant

Venice would be a fine city if it were only drained.  --Ulysses S. Grant

Cheap cigars come in handy; they stifle the odor of cheap politicians.
                                                --Ulysses S. Grant

If men make war in slavish observance of rules, they will fail.  No rules
will apply to conditions of war as different as those which exist in
Europe and America...  War is progressive, because all the instruments
and elements of war are progressive.            --Ulysses S. Grant

Let no guilty man escape, if it can he avoided... No personal consideration
should stand in the way of performing a public duty.  --Ulysses S. Grant

...I never heard him abuse an enemy.  Some of the cruel things said about
President Lincoln, particularly in the North, used to pierce him to the
heart; but never in my presence did he evince a revengeful disposition.
                                                --Ulysses S. Grant

I believe that our Great Maker is preparing the world, in His own good
time, to become one nation, speaking one language, and when armies and
navies will be no longer required.              --Ulysses S. Grant

The United States, knowing no distinction of her own citizens on account
of religion or nationality, naturally believes in a civilization the world
over which will secure the same universal laws.     --Ulysses S. Grant

I would like to call your attention to...  an evil that, if allowed to
continue, will probably lead to great trouble...  It is the accumulation
of vast amounts of untaxed church property.         --Ulysses S. Grant

England and the United States are natural allies,
and should be the best of friends.                  --Ulysses S. Grant

It is preposterous to suppose that the people of one generation can lay
down the best and only rules of government for all who are to come after
them, and under unforeseen contingencies.           --Ulysses S. Grant

As soon as slavery fired upon the flag it was felt, we all felt, even those
who did not object to slaves, that slavery must be destroyed.  We felt that
it was a stain to the Union that men should be bought and sold like cattle.
                                                --Ulysses S. Grant

I would suggest the taxation of all property equally
whether church or corporation.                      --Ulysses S. Grant

I could shoot myself in the head for writing that song.
              --Jani Lane from "Warrant", on writing the song "Cherry Pie"

Tell them that a giant slug captured me and forced me to wear that stupid
outfit, and then I killed him because I didn't like it.  And then I took
it off.  Backstage.
                --Carrie Fisher, about her costume in "Return of the Jedi"

I have the body of an 18-year-old.  I keep it in the fridge. --Spike Milligan

I am so amazingly cool you could keep a side of meat in me for a month.
                --Zaphod Beeblebrox, "Restaurant at the End of the Universe"

I am so hip I have difficulty seeing over my pelvis.
                --Zaphod Beeblebrox, "Restaurant at the End of the Universe"

I wish I'd read this earlier; would have saved me a lot of time and money and
my therapist a lot of Grecian Formula and lithium.      --seen on spiceworks

Figuring out these new issues will take a bit and Until we're Comfortable
that we Know the root cause we can't Yet properly Organize a remediation
to Undo the problem.        --how to say it politely

Sales BS: It's not a bug, it's a feature!
Reply: My foot up your ass isn't a bug, it's a pleasure.         --Reddit

Man who wants pretty nurse must be patient.
                                --something Confucius probably didn't say

Passionate kiss, like spider web, leads to undoing of fly.
                                --something Confucius probably didn't say

Lady who goes camping with man must beware of evil intent.
                                --something Confucius probably didn't say

Squirrel who runs up woman's leg will not find nuts.
                                --something Confucius probably didn't say

Man who leaps off cliff jumps to conclusion.
                                --something Confucius probably didn't say

Man who runs in front of car gets tired, but man who runs behind car
gets exhausted.                 --something Confucius probably didn't say

Man who eats many prunes get good run for money.
                                --something Confucius probably didn't say

War does not determine who is right; it determines who is left.
                                --something Confucius probably didn't say

Man who fights with wife all day get no piece at night.
                                --something Confucius probably didn't say

It takes many nails to build a crib, but only one screw to fill it.
                                --something Confucius probably didn't say

Wise man does not keep sledge hammer and slow computer in same room.
                                --something Confucius probably didn't say

Man who lives in glass house should change clothes in basement.
                                --something Confucius probably didn't say

I like my women how I like my coffee: without pubic hair
                                            --seen on Medium, 9 Sep 2021

Yo momma so ugly, she scares blind people.

On a good day I am charming as fuck.   --Wil Wheaton

I could tell that my parents hated me.
My bath toys were a toaster and a radio.           --Gustavo Vazquez

On Halloween, when I answer the door the kids hand me candy.  --Gustavo Vazquez

I have kleptomania, but when it gets bad, I take something for it.
                                                --bumper sticker

The right of self-defense is the first law of nature; in most governments
it has been the study of rulers to confine this right within the narrowest
limits possible.  Wherever standing armies are kept up, and when the
right of the people to keep and bear arms is, under any color or pretext
whatsoever, prohibited, liberty, if not already annihilated, is on the
brink of destruction.
                     --Henry St. George Tucker, in Blackstone's 1768
                       "Commentaries on the Laws of England."

We're just learning that when it comes to taxes,
Washington speaks with an accomplished forked tongue.  --Martin L. Gross

Guard with jealous attention the public liberty.  Suspect everyone who
approaches that jewel.  Unfortunately, nothing will preserve it but
downright force.  Whenever you give up that force, you are ruined.
The great object is that every man be armed.  Every man who is able
may have a gun.
      --Patrick Henry, During Virginia's ratification convention, 1788

Guard with jealous attention the public liberty.  Suspect everyone who
approaches that jewel.  Unfortunately, nothing will preserve it but
downright force.  Whenever you give up that force, you are ruined.
                                                --Patrick Henry

According to a new survey, women say they feel more comfortable
undressing in front of men than they do undressing in front of other
women.  Apparently, women are too judgmental, where, of course, men
are just grateful.                                      --Robert De Niro

1972: skinny dipping
2012: chunky dunking

1972:  The perfect high
2012:  The perfect high yield mutual fund

1972:  KEG
2012:  EKG

1972:  Growing pot
2012:  Growing pot belly

1972:  Trying to look like Marlon Brando or Liz Taylor
2012:  Trying NOT to look like Marlon Brando or Liz Taylor

1972:  Seeds and stems
2012:  Roughage

1972:  Popping pills, smoking joints
2012:  Popping joints

1972:  Killer weed
2012:  Weed killer

1972:  Going to a new, hip joint
2012:  Receiving a new hip joint

1972:  Rolling Stones
2012:  Kidney Stones

1972:  Disco
2012:  Costco

1972:  Parents begging you to get your hair cut
2012:  Children begging you to get their heads shaved

1972:  Taking acid
2012:  Taking antacid

1972:  Passing the drivers' test
2012:  Passing the vision test

1972:  Whatever
2012:  Depends

Of liberty I would say that, in the whole plenitude of its extent, it
is unobstructed action according to our will.  But rightful liberty is
unobstructed action according to our will within limits drawn around us by
the equal rights of others.  I do not add "within the limits of the law,"
because law is often but the tyrant's will, and always so when it violates
the right of an individual.  --Thomas Jefferson to Isaac H. Tiffany, 1819

You know why the French don't want to bomb Saddam Hussein?  Because he hates
Americans, he loves mistresses and wears a beret.  He is French, people.
                                                            --Conan O'Brien

Replacement for the French national anthem #2:
"Walk Right In" by the Rooftop Singers

Replacement for the French national anthem #3:
"Everybody's Somebody's Fool" by Connie Francis

Replacement for the French national anthem #5:
"I Really Don't Want to Know" by Tommy Edwards

Replacement for the French national anthem #8:
"I'm Leaving It All Up To You" by Donny and Marie Osmond

Replacement for the French national anthem #9:
"What a Fool Believes" by the Doobie Brothers

Replacement for the French national anthem #10:
"Don't Worry, Be Happy" by Bobby McFerrin

Replacement for the French national anthem #11:
"Raise Your Hands" by Jon Bon Jovi

No wonder you always go home alone.
         --Sign over mirror in Men's restroom, Ed Debevic's, Beverly Hills, CA

I would rather have a German division
in front of me than a French one behind me.    --General George S. Patton

Without question, the greatest invention in the history of mankind
is beer.  Oh, I grant you that the wheel was also a fine invention,
but the wheel does not go nearly as well with pizza.          --Dave Barry

I didn't attend the funeral, but I sent a nice letter
saying I approved of it.                                --Mark Twain

Scientists Build Orgasm Machine For Women
                        --headline on "CBS Charlotte" site, 5 Mar 2014

For a people who are free, and who mean to remain so, a well-organized and
armed militia is their best security.  --Thomas Jefferson

The strongest reason for people to retain the right to keep and bear arms
is, as a last resort, to protect themselves against tyranny in government.
                                                        --Thomas Jefferson

Slovenian woman's hand sawn off in insurance fraud
                                             --BBC headline, 11 Mar 2019

World governments need a place to send embarrassing relatives, blowhards,
and idiots who can't simply be drowned in a tub.
                        --Why the UN exists, Hacker News, 18 Mar 2016

Pretty much the center square for sh*tshow bingo.  --job description on reddit

Former China exec missing after calling Xi a 'clown' over COVID-19 handling
                                        --Reuters headline, 15 Mar 2020

Immorality: the morality of those who are having a better time. --H.L. Mencken

The black-bearded criminal must have got in through the door
or the windows.  Everything else was locked.                --"The Goon Show"

Cats can be problematic when working from home as they have no respect
for keyboards or screen visibility.             --Spiceworks, 11 June 2021

Q: What are your thoughts on bypassing the IT ticket queue by asking
   questions while at the adjacent urinal?
A: If they shake it for me they get to the top of the list.  --seen on reddit

"Virgin Galactic says it will launch Richard Branson to space on July 11."
REPLY: Leave him there.                         --Spiceworks, 2 July 2021

Thomas Jefferson once said, "We should never judge a president by his age,
only by his works."  And ever since he told me that, I stopped worrying.
                                                --Ronald Reagan

I went to a friend's house the other night.  She told me to make myself
at home so I threw her out.  I hate visitors.   --Spiceworks, 8 July 2021

Contrary to what some students in my son's class thought, it is not
Avocado's number.   --confusion about Avogadro's Number seen on Spiceworks

Haikus are easy,
but sometimes they don't make sense.
Refrigerator.                           --seen on Spiceworks

Q: How are two finger typists and Washington interns similar?
A: They're all hunt 'n peckers.

THAAS (Trojan Horse as a Service), aka Microsoft Teams.
                                            --The Register, 26 July 2021

Cats are intended to teach us that not everything in nature has a function.
                                                    --Garrison Keillor

L'abbaye de monte-a-regret (The Abbey of the Reluctant Climb)
                --nickname for the guillotine during the French Revolution

Le Rasoir national (The national Razor)
                --nickname for the guillotine during the French Revolution

Vivaldi's last words:  I'll be Bach!

Q: How many system administrators does it take to change a light bulb?
A: Two to do it, and one to read the instructions out loud --
   oops, wrong profession...

There are some people that if they don't know,
you can't tell 'em.                                     --Louis Armstrong

100-year-old fruit cake by Huntley & Palmers deemed "almost eatable"
after being discovered in hut used by Captain Scott's Antarctica expedition
                                                    --Happened on 10 Aug 2017

Success is simply a matter of luck.  Ask any failure.     -- Earl Wilson

How many ears did Davy Crockett have?
Three - left ear, right ear, and his wild frontier.  --Spiceworks

We needed a new capital anyway.  On a side note, would you Brits mind
doing that for us again?    --War of 1812 comment, Spiceworks

The reason women don't play football is because 11 of them would never
wear the same outfit in public.                     --Phyllis Diller

A handful of luck is better than a bushel of brains.
                                        --odd fortune-cookie message

It was a pigeon that looked slightly different from other pigeons.
And it didn't like to drive.        --answer to "what is a passenger pigeon?"

Eugenics without birth control seems to us a house builded [sic] upon
the sands.  It is at the mercy of the rising stream of the unfit.
            --Margaret Sanger, "Birth Control and Racial Betterment", 1919

Q: Left my front door open, my Rooma went out, and now I can't find it.
   Is this a problem? It has no natural predators.
A: It'll be dead soon.  Nature abhors a vacuum.     --seen on Spiceworks

For Halloween, I pinned socks to my shirt and went as a static Klingon.

I've only had one drink.    --Aesop's other fables #1

I never got your message.   --Aesop's other fables #2

Traffic was crazy.          --Aesop's other fables #3

It was like that when I got here.   --Aesop's other fables #4

My phone must have died.    --Aesop's other fables #5

He/she/it was dead when I got here.     --Aesop's other fables #6

Have supercomputers replaced nuclear arsenals as the politicians' strap-on
penis of choice while I wasn't looking?  --"The Register", 22 Sep 2021

"Attention!  Now we sing together the story of the pig-headed dog and the
dear Red Baron!"
    --German at the start of "Snoopy and the Red Baron", The Royal Guardsmen

You are not entitled to your opinion.  You are entitled to your informed
opinion.  No one is entitled to be ignorant.        --Harlan Ellison

Dude wore his nerdiness like a Jedi wore his light saber or a Lensman
her lens.  Couldn't have passed for Normal if he'd wanted to.
                    --Junot Diaaz, "The Brief Wondrous Life Of Oscar Wao"

Admiral Horatio Nelson: "England expects that every man will do his duty."
Random sailor: "I just did mine in my pants."          --MAD Magazine

My mother always used to say: The older you get, the better you get,
unless you're a banana.             --Rose (Betty White), The Golden Girls

While my flight was sitting on the tarmac, a little girl was singing her
ABC's, but she was saying them out of order.  Some guy towards the back
of the plane yells out, "ABCs remix! Sing it girl!" --Spiceworks, 7 Oct 2021

We are to regard education as a service industry, like a laundry; parents
are the customers, teachers the washers, children the dirty linen.
                                            --Stephen Fry, "Paperweight"

Parent power is not a sign of democracy, it is a sign of barbarism.
And what in the name of boiling hell do parents know about education?
How many educated people are there in the world?  I could name seventeen
or eighteen.                                --Stephen Fry, "Paperweight"

I'm so old my Social Security number is written in Roman numerals.

Why am I charged for overweight bags when Jabba the Hut's big brother is
allowed to overflow into 3 seats for free?    --"The Register", 18 Oct 2021

If I want to watch mindless automatons do everything without asking for human
input I'd turn on CSPAN.  --reaction to autonomous-racecar announcement

